In retirement, Krey and her husband are participating in a two-week concert tour in Italy in June with the UW-RF Alumni Choir. When they return, Krey plans to spend more time with her family and friends, and enjoy nature, books and her home.

As a member of the English department, Owen had a full range of responsibilities for teaching, from such General Education courses as Freshman English and Literature, to electives like Modern Novels and Short Stories. He's taught courses for majors, including American Literature, as well as teaching focussed writing courses such as Business Writing and Technical Writing. He also was immersed in the department's internship program.

The Business and Technical Writing courses emphasized the practical professional element of preparing students for workplace writing after graduation. He also took his substantial expertise off campus to help professionals in the field through in 11 years devoted to Technical Writing instruction at 3M through the UW-RF Outreach Program.

Department Chair Marshall Toman said of Owen: "In addition to his commitment to the General Education program where he taught great numbers of classes in Freshmen English and sophomore Literature, Dr. Owen has taught American literature and been the department specialist in Technical Writing and Business Writing, two areas which have become extremely important in recent years. Dr. Owen also worked with 3M in offering special courses to their employees on effective business and technical writing.

Swain joined UW-RF in 1990 in the agricultural economics with an appointment with Cooperative Extension as a statewide community economic development specialist in the Regional Development Institute. His position eventually shifted to include a teaching appointment, with classes in Macroeconomics, Microeconomics, and Cooperatives. He also coached the National Agri-Marketing Team for National Marketing Plan competition for five years and he served on numerous committees for UW-RF and the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

Statewide for Cooperative Extension, Swain developed strategic planning programs and founded the UW-RF Survey Research Center and performed survey research work for townships, counties and municipalities throughout Wisconsin. He also led leadership training programs statewide.

Splett says, "His students benefited, we as colleagues benefited, and through his Extension appointment, communities throughout Wisconsin and beyond have benefited. I think he basically retired because he is too busy helping folks pursue their possibilities, such as family-owned and operated mini-dairies."

Swain's retirement plans include being an advocate for small family farms by assisting family sustainable farms to add value to their output will be his primary emphasis. He will also continue to work with Evangelistic Christian activities, as well as participate in more traditional retirement recreational activities.

Second year Head Coach Dick Vermeil has a distinct profile of the kind of player and team he wants to build this year. "Smarter, tougher, better conditioned and a team that can play the game fast," said Vermeil in a recent interview.

Some new additions to the team to watch are first-round draft pick defensive tackle Ryan Sims and second-round draft pick defensive tackle Eddie Freeman, who will add depth to an already talented defense. Also, watch for the speed of wide receiver Johnnie Morton and the power of offensive tackle Willie Roaf.

For those who can't attend training camp, extensive coverage and daily updates are available on UW-RF's award winning web site at www.uwrf.info/chiefs. Fans can call the Chiefs Hotline at 1-800-4-KCC-KCC for the latest information on daily practice times and event dates, as these are subject to change. For information about lodging and other attractions in River Falls and in the nearby Scenic St. Croix Valley, log on to www.saintcroixriver.com.

Small town Wisconsin residents want to eat out more and have greater diversity in the cuisine offered in their communities. They don't mind driving farther to buy an appliance or furniture, but they want to easily purchase an odd nut or bolt from a local hardware store. They like convenient parking on Main Street.

Larry Swain, a former UW-RF associate professor of agricultural economics, started the Survey Research Center in 1990 and expanded it in 1995. He launched the center so rural communities could get affordable, reliable information based on solid surveying methodologies. Its purpose was to serve as an aid to community development specialists and it has been growing ever since.

The center's survey services are not available to private businesses. The cost to government units and non-profits is held to just $7 per completed survey because most don't have many resources. That rate is only about a third of the cost that is usually charged by commercial survey takers who provide research services to private enterprise. In some cases, non-profit organizations can reduce the cost even more by doing their own curbside or phone surveys. In those cases, the Survey Research Center consults on the survey design and then inputs the data and analyzes it for just $2.50 a survey.

Generally, it takes the center several weeks to process data because it relies on student help to gather and input information so as to keep costs down. That lag time can prove to be a drawback when a community needs information in a hurry, said David Kabes, current director of the Survey Research Center.

Currently, the center is working on a survey for Waukesha County to learn how people feel about the 16 libraries in their county. Another is measuring the economic impact of tourism in 20 communities along the Lower St. Croix National Scenic Riverway. Other examples of the center's past work includes asking people in townships how they feel about land use; gauging public support for school district referenda; or assessing downtown parking preferences for shoppers.

There are three types of surveys that the center conducts: mail-out, telephone and face-to-face surveys. For mail-out and telephone surveys, the center uses phone books to keep the surveys anonymous. "There are no pre-printed lists so there is no way that person can go back to see what a particular individual said," Kabes said.

Richmond, received the Distinguished Social Work Field Service Award 2002. A field supervisor assists students in an agency setting and teaches them to put the theory, techniques, and information they have learned in classes into actual practice with clients. Leahy has worked in the field for over 20 years.

UW-RF Associate Professor Ruth Kalms said of the award, "Lisa Leahy has been a classic role model for our students and has provided them with the background and skill development they have needed to put their theoretical knowledge into practice. She is a professional who both talks about the code of ethics and then practices that code with the people she serves. We are proud to present the award to such a deserving individual."

Angela Cornell, a graduating senior from Gilman, majoring in social work, was the first recipient. Kalms said, "Angela Cornell has been outstanding in both academics and in her ability to put the theory of social work into her field practices at the Guild in St. Paul."

Minn., majoring in social work. Kalms said, "Shauna Lambert was outstanding in her work in the student social work association, her work in the classroom, and in her work within her field placement at Ramsey County Corrections."

An explorer who has drawn international acclaim for his work in conservation and preservation, and who has been hailed as an "Asian Hero," is the Distinguished Alumnus for 2002 at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

China and Asia that have opened new doors to understanding the cultures of its many peoples. His documenting of those cultures and his remarkable efforts to preserve their historical and culturally significant sites are untiring.

"Wong How Man is held in the highest esteem throughout Asia and the world for his life's work. We are delighted to be able to add his alma mater to the lengthy list of organizations who have celebrated his resolve and success."

As Wong told Time Magazine, he has concentrated on those areas of China that have not been yet been modernized. One result is the knowledge, he said, that "everywhere I went I encountered people and customs that I knew were going to vanish almost as soon as I'd photographed them. I realized that to be an explorer in today's world, you can't escape becoming a conservationist."

Wong began his career in 1975 after graduating from UW-River Falls with a double-major in journalism and art. He worked as a free-lance journalist for Asian magazines and Architectural Digest. In 1979 he began exploring the remote areas of China and its minority peoples. Then in 1982 he led the first of six major exploration and photojournalism expeditions for the National Geographic Society.

In 1985 he led an expedition for several months across thousands of miles that culminated in him being credited with finding the true source for the Yangtze River in the rugged plateau regions of Tibet. His work on this and then producing an educational interactive CD earned 11 international awards. A subsequent educational program on his explorations of Tibet earned Wong another five international awards.

Kong in 1994. Its mission is to explore the remote regions of China, while conducting multi-disciplinary research, implementing nature and culture conservation projects, and sharing that information through education and the media. Since then he has led numerous expeditions and has initiated a dozen conservation projects.

Among them are preservation of the "hanging coffins" of the extinct Bo people of Yunnan province; locating, in concert with imaging from NASA, cities buried in the sands of the Silk Road caravan routes; documenting poaching of the world-protected Tibetan Antelope; initiating Tibetan mural conservation projects; protecting the endangered Black-necked crane, and preventing a natural destruction of a remote Tumu Monastery.

For the first workshop, titled "Recognizing Others' Investments," business management Assistant Professor Claire Kilian will help managers identify what employees truly value in work, which management strategies are most effective for employee recognition, and how to give and receive constructive feedback..

Tittle from Influence Systems, Inc. of Boulder, Colo., will lead the second workshop,which examines how to build trust, increase the frequency of workplace feedback and improve employee retention by establishing loyalty and commitment.

Hegstrom, a double-major in marketing communications and business communications, becomes the seventh graduating senior in the modern history of the University to be invited to deliver the commencement address.

Hegstrom will take note of the events that occurred since September 11 and America's recovery. In his speech, he will speak to the role that the new graduates will assume in moving the nation forward. "My address acknowledges and interprets our rights, privileges and obligations associated with the degrees we will receive."

Hegstrom was selected for the honor of delivering the commencement address by Chancellor Ann Lydecker on the recommendation of the Faculty Senate External Relations Committee. Each spring semester all commencing undergraduates are invited to apply for the privilege. They must include a letter of support from two faculty members, a resume, and a draft of their proposed speech. The committee reviews the applications, invites students to do deliver their speech in an audition, and then sends a recommendation to the chancellor, who approves the selection and extends the invitation to speak.

Speech Professor Suzanne Hagen, in recommending Hegstrom to deliver the address, noted that he began school on a part-time basis but then quit his job and relocated to River Falls to enroll full-time. "I've never seen his educational commitment waiver; he's an exemplar to both students and faculty for his drive, perseverance and positive outlook."

Said nominator Professor James Pratt, "James has overcome a good deal of adversity in his life, and the result is that he has become a strong and effective advocate for people with disabilities. His credibility to speak on such subjects is obvious, and he does so in a confident and reasonable manner.

Senior Honors for his academic performance. While at UW-RF, he has served on the Chancellor's Disability Advisory Committee, was recognized by faculty in the speech communication and theater department with membership in the National Communication Association, and he has been active in the Marketing Communications Club.

In announcing the award, Lydecker noted: "For 30 years, Bob Sievert has been a true leader on campus. He is bright, energetic, inclusive and extraordinarily effective in all of the many critical tasks that he performs. Throughout all of that, Bob is always seeking new ways to help our students with their experiences here on campus, and he has always been a tremendous mentor who actively develops the new professionals who are assigned to his service area.

Sievert came to campus as a student in 1969 after completing a four-year tour of duty in the U.S. Air Force. He began work as a resident assistant for two years, and then we hired as a full-time staff member in February of 1972. Since then he has assumed responsibilities as the facilities coordinator of the Hagestad Student Union, oversight of food services, intramurals and as the Interim Associate Dean of Students.

Planning Committee that is developing the design and program documents for a new $28.4 million student center. Groundbreaking for that building is expected in 2003. Sievert also is extensively involved in the planning of a new $10 MORE million residence hall and a new daycare center, which will both begin construction this year.

Assistant vice chancellor Mary Halada, who was among those who nominated Sievert for the award, noted: "His foresight, and his broad understanding of facilities, statistics, finances and the needs of the students have been invaluable to us as we plan for the future of this institution."

The MUPC, one of the longest-running undergraduate research conferences in the country, offers undergraduate students a chance to present psychology-related research projects in either oral or poster form. It also gives students a chance to gain conference experience.

Caskey said that while most of the projects focused on the summation of empirical research, students were also encouraged to present literature reviews and talks focusing on any specific issues within the science of psychology. Each oral presenter was allowed eight minutes for delivery and two minutes for questions.

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker in presenting the awards, "It is given to a small and very special group of students who have given distinguished leadership and service to the University during the course of their time on campus. I'm particularly pleased to recognize their contributions in this manner."

Typically, recipients are juniors and seniors. They are nominated by a faculty member, staff member, or their student peers through the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Student Senate. Finalists are interviewed by a committee of students, faculty and staff who forward their recommendations to Lydecker.

During her four years at UW-River Falls, Kulzer was extensively involved in various campus organizations. As a member of the Newman Club and InterVarsity Christian Fellowship, she participated in many campus and community service projects and co-led a small group. She also initiated the development of websites for both organizations. She was a Spanish tutor and mentors Hispanic children in Rochester and Native American children in Red Wing, where she is currently student teaching.

Aside from her campus involvement, Reese volunteered to provide community service at Have-a-Heart and Turningpoint for Victims of Domestic Abuse. She also participated in a community service trip to Negril, Jamaica. Through all of her involvement with student organizations, Greek life, Admissions and academics, Reese believes that she has learned and experienced what UW-River Falls has to offer and she has worked hard to show other students these many opportunities.

Silver's leadership skills and campus involvement have provided services to the University community at a level few others have offered. As Event Manager in the Leadership Center, Silver displayed professionalism and maturity in organizing numerous student entertainment and involvement opportunities.

In her four years at the University, Willers benefited greatly from her involvement in various activities. As a member of the Technology Leadership Cadre, Willers has led technology workshops for University faculty, students, and area teachers.

Educational Psychology," a position that had never been held by an undergraduate student. She was President of the UW-River Falls chapter of the National Art Education Association and served as a student representative on the Undergraduate Student Advisory Council for the College of Education. Willers enjoys learning and believes that some of the most valuable knowledge is often not found in the books she studies, but rather in the people with whom she encounters and works.

Falls. After starting in the Residence Hall Council and working at the front desk, she became a Resident Assistant. She has served as a Hall Manager for the past two years. Sweet advises Hall Council and an RA staff to provide programming and support for hall residents. She has worked especially hard to encourage community service and educational attainment among these students.

In addition to her work in residence halls, Sweet worked for both the Education and Biology Departments. She was a Research Assistant for the CaseIt! program for three years. She recently presented this research at an international education conference in Washington, D.C.

The award was initiated eight years ago and recognizes a UW-RF staff member who represents blue collar, craft, security, and technical workers, and a member from the administrative support, fiscal staff, and non-represented workers.

They are nominated by their peers or supervisors and selected for success in fulfilling overall job responsibilities; participating in university service projects outside of their job; and overall human relations skills.

In announcing the award, Chancellor Ann Lydecker said classified staff fulfill a crucial role on campus. "Without them, our campus simply wouldn't function very well. They are the individuals who program our computers, answer our phones and truly run our offices, and who keep the buildings and grounds looking exceptional."

Presently, she monitors athletics accounts, tracks monthly budgets, maintains the records and serves as the eligibility liaison with the Registrar's office and with coaches. Wolf also prepares NCAA reports, game schedules, contracts, purchase order, travel arrangements, and handles game-day responsibilities.

"Doris goes above and beyond to get the job done. She is invaluable to the smooth running of the athletic program. Her loyalty to the University, her work ethic, her outstanding interpersonal skills, and her years of dedicated service make her a truly valued employee."

Nate Beeman, UW-RF custodial services program supervisor, who nominated Jones, said she brings a lot of "extras" to the job. "Kris, in particular, is always willing to go the extra mile. She never turns me down for anything out of the ordinary. She is the first to volunteer for assignments. She willingly comes in on Saturdays or she rearranges her personal schedule to help out. She's in it for what's best for the university.

The four-part contest tests the students' knowledge of animal science. It includes a written exam, a laboratory practicum, an oral presentation on a current animal issue, and a quiz bowl competition. The material covers the broad spectrum of animal production in beef, dairy cattle, swine, sheep, poultry, and horses, as well as basic laboratory techniques and disciplines including nutrition, genetics, physiology, breeding, and meat science.

Animal and food science assistant Professor Gary Onan said, "There were 16 collegiate teams from most of the major agricultural colleges in the Midwest entered in the competition. The UW-RF team did quite will with a 4th place finish in the lab practicum, 3rd place in the written exam, and 5th placing overall.

"RSCA Day brings members from various disciplines together to share their research results with members of the community and each other," he said. " And it gives students the opportunity to make professional presentations about their work. Several extremely productive collaborative projects have resulted from cross-disciplinary conversations started at the event."

Though topics of study for RSCA Day vary widely, they each fall into one of three categories of research: primary research to generate new knowledge; applied research to develop something new; or scholarly research to interpret data in new ways.

Paul Bignall, a senior from Hudson majoring in mathematics, did a project titled, "Comparative Study Between Target and Wal-Mart in Hudson." Bignall tracked the sales of film in each store at both their registers and in their electronics department to determine which store captured the impulse sale best. He found that Target sells 75 percent of its total film from the register displays, while Wal-Mart sells about that same percentage out of its electronic department.

Gina Searls, a senior from Baraboo majoring in animal science, last summer researched the underlying cause of an inherited form of recurrent exertional rhabdomyolysis, a muscle cramping condition, that occurs in five percent of Thoroughbred horses. The research is part of a collaborative effort that will continue for six years.

Membership in Sigma Pi Sigma is a lifelong honor. Selection for membership is based on high scholastic achievement as well as interest and abilities in physics. The UW-River Falls chapter, which began in 1975, now totals 67 members.

UW-River Falls student Lauren Burkee was crowned "Miss Wisconsin National Teenager" at the state pageant, held recently in Oconomowoc at the Olympia Resort and Conference Center. Burkee is a freshman from West Allis pursuing a degree in marketing communications.

Burkee earned the state crown and more than $15,000 in college scholarships by demonstrating her scholastic achievements, community involvement, leadership abilities, talent and individuality to a panel of five judges.

Among her contributions to life in Wisconsin are reading and music programs that she founded. For "Afternoon Adventures," Burkee and fellow UW-RF students read to children at the River Falls Public Library. Her "Share the Music" program is dedicated to collecting gently-used CDs and CD players and distributing them to Wisconsin charities.

The backdrop for the availability will be an exhibit of his photography and other publications from his many expeditions to the most remote parts of China and Tibet. The exhibit is open to the public from 9 a.m.-4 p.m. May 21-24.

The UW-River Falls animal and food science department will host nine courses as part of the 2002 Horse Science Institute. Eight instructors with a variety of backgrounds will conduct the courses this summer.

The Colt Training course is June 10-14. Lectures on horse psychology and behavior will combine with demonstrations and applications of different methods of gentling and riding young horses. These include sacking out with the Scotch hobble and the Ray Hunt method of bridleless riding. Use of the bosal and snaffle bit will also be covered extensively.

The Reining Course will run June 12-14. Instructors will demonstrate reining horse training techniques with horses at different levels to show the progression of the training process. Emphasis will be placed on developing a foundation based on body control and suppleness. Riders will also work to improve their skills and the performance of the horse. Skills to be covered include circles, turn-arounds, back-ups, sliding stops, and lead changes.

June 17-21. The first year course involves techniques to teach hunting and jumping, basic dressage, and English and Western Riding. Business aspects and advice in operating a riding school will be covered. Horse psychology, biting techniques, spoiled and difficult horses also will be discussed.

The first year students will improve riding skills in English equitation, dressage, hunting and jumping, and western riding. Special emphasis will be placed on position, use of aids, control, and other issues involved in riding and training.The second year students will refine their riding ability. Communication techniques, aids and cues to achieve greater control of the horse.

July 15-19. A camp for intermediate riders will be July 8-12. The camp involves a week of riding, demonstrations, and lectures for Western and English riders to help students become better owners and competitors.

College with additional expertise regarding the financial side of agriculture, food and environmental sciences. He brings insights useful to our college strategic planning efforts as a result of his active membership on the Growing Wisconsin Agriculture Task Force.

Council members provide assistance and advice to improve the agriculture, food and environmental sciences industry through the educational opportunities offered at UW-River Falls. They promote the College in its interaction with industry colleagues, community leaders, state and federal legislators, and the higher education community.

The Council provides advice to the College on a wide array of topics, including a mission and vision for the College. It also helps to develop a strategic plan to accomplish them. It helps develop curriculum and new program initiatives; assists with internships, placements, personnel searches, development efforts and scholarships; creates partnerships between industry and education; as well as capital building projects.

"enormously successful" said Kinders. He noted the Alliance has conducted many productive marketing campaigns, and as a result has been recognized regionally and nationally for its work. "We have received a number of awards, including the 'Trailblazer Award for Excellence in the Use of Technology for our website.

Cruise," he noted. This web site is the first bi-state, regional site to specifically promote tourism in either state. The web site was redesigned this year and given its own distinct domain name: www.saintcroixriver.com.

The campaign included press kits to 250 media outlets and travel writers throughout the Upper Midwest; an interactive CD; the purchase of a trade show booth and participation in tourism shows in Des Moines and Minneapolis; and a media familiarization tour.

"It was a excellent campaign," Kinders said. "We generated stories by some of the leading media in the Midwest. And, importantly, we played a role in producing a significant economic impact for the tourism industry, with over $230,000 in additional revenue in the lodging industry. In the aftermath of the economic downturn, September 11th, and a lack of snow for winter recreation, we were really pleased to be able to help reverse their negative impact and to help our local economies to grow."

This year's main projects are to increase Alliance membership and to conclude an economic impact survey. Supported by private funding from Xcel Energy, the First National Bank of River Falls, the Stillwater Area Chamber of Commerce & Visitors Bureau, and technical support from the UW-River Falls Survey Research Center, the survey is the first-ever community specific analysis of the region.

Both Doorninks are active in the Professional Dairy Producers of Wisconsin, with Todd Doonink serving as a member of the board of directors. They are also active in other farm organizations. Their service to UW-RF includes hosting several student farm tours annually and helping conduct the biannual "Holstein Highlights" heifer cattle sale.

Four students were recognized for their contributions to the Dairy Club during the past school year. Sarah Day of Lakeville, Minn., majoring in dairy science, was named Outstanding Freshman; Luke Buttles of Black Creek, majoring in dairy science, was named Outstanding Sophomore; Aimee Finley of St. Charles, Minn., majoring in agricultural education, was named Outstanding Junior; and Jeannie Winkelman of Watertown, majoring in dairy science, was named Outstanding Senior.

Gregg Hadley, assistant professor of agricultural economics at UW-RF, was the keynote speaker. Hadley, a new faculty member with extensive experience in the dairy industry, spoke of the challenges and opportunities facing the dairy industry today.

Josetta Halbur, a freshman from Fond du Lac, majoring in agricultural marketing communications, as second vice-president; Luke Miller, a junior from Lewiston, Minn., majoring in agricultural business, as treasurer; Erin Nelson, a freshman from Dassel, Minn., majoring in agricultural business, as secretary.

Also elected were Sarah Clemenson, a sophomore from Zumbrota, Minn., majoring in agricultural marketing communications, as publicity officer; Leslie Shuler, a junior from Oneida, majoring in agricultural marketing communications, as yearbook editor; Day as yearbook business manager; Aaron Schroht, a junior from Owatonna, Minn., majoring in dairy science, alumni relations officer; Stephanie Omtvedt, a junior from New Auburn, majoring in animal science, as historian.

The UW-RF Dairy Club is a professional student organization, open to all students, and devoted to education, service, leadership, fellowship, and career development within agriculture and the dairy industry. With 122 members, it is the largest student organization on the UW-RF campus and the largest collegiate dairy club in the United States.

Andrea Nelson, a freshman from Galesville majoring in biology; Amanda Arndt, a freshman from Prescott majoring in animal science with an equine emphasis; and Martine Bredl, a sophomore from Stratford majoring in dairy science.

Dean Gorden Hedahl said the award was instituted to recognize the importance of advising to ensure that students make timely and reliable progress toward earning their degrees, obtaining internships, and finding employment after they graduate.

A Dean's Student Advisory Committee, comprised of a student representative from each of the major programs in the College, that meets regularly reported very positive experiences with faculty and wanted a way to recognize those who had provided significant help.

Hedahl adopted a recommendation to have students nominate faculty, with students from outside of the disciplinary areas evaluating the nominations. This spring, some 50 students submitted nominations.

Among the student comments were: "Dr. Caskey has always been available to me with great advice and has gone to bat for me on confusing issues. He takes an active role in his students' academic lives and has an encouraging style."

Another student wrote, "Dr. Caskey is an outstanding adviser, and always has been, particularly because he is one who never stops advising. Even though I have graduated, we are still in contact; he has helped me to prepare and plan for graduate school. . . I would not have accomplished any of this with out the work of my "advisor," Dr. Caskey."

A member of the faculty since 1990, Caskey is the department's life-span developmental psychologist. He teaches courses in general psychology, psychology of sex differences, child & adolescent development, the exceptional child and adulthood and aging.

Among the student comments were: "She has been a huge asset to me throughout my college career. She has always answered all of my questions promptly and given me tips on how to graduate on time. Dr. Miller also has almost 100 advisees and she has always take the time to meet with me and has never cut me short regardless of how many others she has had to help. My college experience would not have been the same with out her."

Miller joined the faculty in 1994 and specializes in biotechnology. She teaches courses in introduction to biology, general biology, cell biology, histology, molecular biology, applications in molecular biology, biological Greek and Latin, and senior colloquium. In 2000 she was recognized with the College's Outstanding Faculty Award.

Another student wrote: "He has been extremely helpful to me. He completely and thoroughly answers any questions that I have, and he always goes out of his way to assist me. Thanks to Mr. Roy I am always well-informed about what I need to do and he keeps me on track with my major."

A member of the faculty since 1980, Roy specializes in theory, composition, and orchestration. He has composed and arranged over 80 works that are published and performed around the world. In addition, for the past 15 years he has served as music director for the St. Croix Summer Theatre and the University Theatre.

This spring, as a graduating senior at UW-River Falls, he took the unusual step of building one for a capstone course. It was Dabruzzi's first jet engine, and the first known to be built at the University.

After he graduated from Hudson High School in 1997, a friend introduced him to the Experimental Aircraft Association. When he came to school at UW-River Falls, he decided to convert his passion for engines into building one for himself.

I was price shopping online, I stumbled across the Web site of a guy that built his own gas turbine engine." Dabruzzi recently graduated from UW-RF with a degree in geology. Instead of following the traditional route and take a geology senior seminar class, he decided to enroll in the physics seminar instead.

Faculty members in both the physics and geology departments were willing to let Dabruzzi try an unusual approach to completing his major. "The attitude of faculty in both departments was very supportive of the plan to switch senior seminars," he said.

The aftermath of September 11 should lead graduates of UW-River Falls to renew their commitment to the nation and liberty with integrity and ethics, they were told during spring commencement ceremonies on Saturday.

Addressing the 597 bachelor's and master's candidates who participated in commencement ceremonies and thousands of their family members and friends on May 25 was James Hegstrom, a River Falls resident and graduating senior. A double-major in marketing communications and business communications, Hegstrom, became the seventh graduating senior in the modern history of the University to deliver the commencement address.

He is the president and founder of the China Exploration and Research Society and a former photojournalist and expedition leader with the National Geographic Society. His appearance on Saturday culminated a series of lectures and an exhibit this week of his work through his 28 years of exploration, conservation and preservation that has earned him accolades as an "Asian Hero" and recognition as China's greatest living explorer in a poll conducted by Time Magazine.

In his commencement address, Hegstrom told the graduates, "As the first graduating class of 2002, we have a responsibility to carry America, with the greatest of pride, to the next level. It is not enough to be patriotic; we must act as Americans with integrity, a strong sense of ethics and positive performance.

Hegstrom related a personal experience that occurred just a few weeks after the terrorist attack that he said should serve as an example of service. He severely burned his feet, and after calling for help declined to ride in an ambulance because the cost wasn't covered by his insurance. When police arrived to assist him, "they were willing to do anything they could to help. They were not only helpful, and dignified, they allowed me to keep my dignity," he related.

After he received treatment and returned home, Hegstrom found a pair of new house slippers by his door, left as a gift by one of the officers. "I believe the motto of the police is 'to protect and serve.' These officers did far more than the call of duty would imply." The commencement speaker noted that as Chancellor Lydecker conferred degrees, they are based on the authority invested in her by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents. They award confers the rights and privileges associated with a bachelor's degree, Hegstrom pointed out.

"But I submit that there are more than rights and privileges. As college graduates, we have obligations associated with our degrees. No matter what field we're going into, we share the common obligations of integrity, ethics, and positive performance. If we cannot perform with integrity and a strong sense of ethics, we might question whether we have truly earned our rights and privileges," Hegstrom said.

"But just as important as life and liberty is the pursuit of happiness. Whether you walk, wobble, or roll through this life, if you're pursuing happiness, start running. For it is the pursuit of happiness that makes liberty worth having and appreciating; and it is the pursuit of happiness that truly makes life worth living."

Wisconsin is taking greater note of the importance of immigrant dairy workers, and institutions like UW-River Falls are responding. From June 17-28 it will offer Workforce English as a Second Language program. It provides basic training for tutors, who can then go out into the community or to a specific business to help workers learn basic survival English.

Cooper's presentation on Spanish-speaking workers was attended by 50 people, mostly dairy producers who employ Hispanic and Latino workers. Cooper's extension specialty is human resource management for dairy farmers. But with a dramatic increase of Hispanic workers in the dairy industry, his presentation now takes that into consideration.

Ten percent of the workforce in Wisconsin is Hispanic, and although a high concentration is in the southeastern part of the state, there are still Hispanic workers that come to larger dairy farms in this area.

Cooper said language barriers are being overcome because of efforts to provide language training to both Wisconsin employers and Hispanic workers. Programs, such as Teaching English to Speakers of Other Languages, teaches Hispanic workers to understand and speak English. Community colleges and universities, such as UW-RF, offer Spanish instruction for dairy farmers, CD-ROM's, books and tapes are available, as well as classes for dairy producers to familiarize Hispanic workers with dairy terminology.

He strongly suggests that dairy farmers who employ Hispanic workers learn to speak Spanish, or have a manager learn the language to avoid the confusion that could arise when workers are doing the translating.

Sciences, and the assistant to the dean of Outreach and Graduate Studies, helps with the Workforce ESL program. The class will be offered this summer, starting June 17 and lasting until June 28. Next semester the class will be offered over the 10-week period, and also will be broadcast on interactive television and transmitted to areas where there are a large population of non-English speakers.

This class resulted from requests by area dairy operators who had non-English speakers employed at their farms. Over time and with the success of the program, the Dairy Workers ESL Project has expanded to include other industries, such as horticulture, manufacturing and food processing industries.

Larsen also said that it is a very rewarding experience for all three groups that are involved in the process. The tutors are pleased to be helping people, businesses are enthused to have their workers have more English knowledge, and the workers are happy because they are more acclimated to their surroundings.

Student Center on May 13. Chancellor Ann Lydecker presented the awards to one agency, one student, one academic staff person and one faculty member, to honor them for their participation in projects that served the community.

Lutheran Home in River Falls received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for an agency, for the work the activities department has done with social work students. Each semester, staff members and students have worked together on a project with the elderly, such as a craft project for a holiday or an outdoor planting.

"Each group of students has come away with a greater appreciation of the elderly and the role of group work in our world, as well as a desire to continue relationships with elderly individuals." Accepting the award were Roxy Sukowatey of the Lutheran Home of River Falls, Glenda Zielski, the director of WelHaven in River Falls, and Angel Stoddard of the Lutheran Home Kids Care Center in Woodville.

Joseph Frost, a junior from Hastings, Minn., majoring in art education, received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for a student. Frost spent more than 100 hours on a mural in the Chalmer Davee Library, traveled to the Wisconsin State Art Conference with art Professor Lynn Jermal to co-present a workshop on service learning, and spent many productive hours with the elementary and high school students he was student teaching.

Exchange, received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for academic and support staff. The Exchange is a national network of experienced service learning practitioners who have volunteered to assist others with their service learning projects and programs. The North Central office, located on the campus of UW-RF, works specifically with 10 states in the Upper Midwest.

Said Stanley Potts CESA 11 at the Regional Development Institute, who also nominated Dupre, "Nanette exemplifies the kind of staff member it takes to ensure the success of any program. She is diligent, persistent and accurate, and always gets the job done."

As a result, his university students work as mentors with elementary and secondary students. For five years, they have worked with the River Falls Meyer Middle School "Caretakers of the Earth" program, participating in field trips, arranging guest speakers to address environmental issues, instructing the students and conducting an environmental project.

UW-River Falls retired Professors Lou Greub, agronomy, and Gerald Nolte, agricultural economics, spent three weeks in Nicaragua recently to share some of their professional expertise and agricultural skills with several agricultural groups.

At the Universidad National Agria, Greub, who specializes in forages, worked with students and faculty on intensive rotational grazing systems and electric fence construction. After conducting a class on how to lay out a pasture system, he took students into the field at the UNA Lab Farm where they planned a grazing system and constructed an electric fence. Greub noted that many farms in Nicaragua do not have electric fencing but that solar powered units, like the one used at the UNA Lab Farm, would be a viable way to incorporate the technology into their farming systems. Intensive rotational grazing also has potential in Nicaragua where cattle are almost universally grazed. The challenge lies in that there is nearly six months of dry season to work around when grazing at the lower elevations.

Nolte, who specializes in farm financial management and marketing, gave a seminar to agribusiness students and faculty on a personnel management system and worked with faculty on several grant proposals. A grant already submitted to the U.S.

State Department, would result in three years of agribusiness faculty exchanges between the UNA and UW-RF. Work was done on a similar proposal for faculty in other disciplines at UNA and on a large community development grant proposal.

Nearly 400 producers were in attendance for the first annual Dairy Congress sponsored by the cattle producers association of Nicaragua. Nolte led off the Congress with a talk on the status of the dairy industry worldwide. Greub followed on the second day with a presentation on intensive rotational grazing. There was keen interest in both topics with many hands still raised at the end of the formal question and answer periods. Several of the younger farmers and farm managers that Greub and Nolte met were well on their way to adopting more modern and efficient grazing systems. However, with an average production of 10 ten pounds of milk, per cow per day, Nicaraguan dairy systems still have a long way to approach United States standards.

Following the dairy congress, Greub and Nolte spent several days giving workshops to farmers and the extension educators employed by cooperatives. These were in collaboration with PRODEGA, a Finnish government-sponsored dairy development project, and with local dairy cooperatives. The emphasis of these workshops was on forage management and rotational grazing. One conclusion reached by the two and their hosts is the need for demonstration forage plots and grazing systems to give better information for farmers.

Greub and Nolte also visited a unique coffee plantation, dairy farm, greenhouse, and resort operation in the higher elevations of north central Nicaragua. The Selva Negra plantation and others in the area are producing shade-grown coffee organically. Organic producers often use compost in place of chemical fertilizer.

Though the conference has been held annually for nearly 15 years, this is the first year it has been in Wisconsin. Students and faculty members from across the nation will be in attendance to share their projects.

NCUR was established in 1987 as an association supportive of college and university faculty, students, and administrators that works to promote undergraduate research, scholarship, and creative activity in all fields of study. It enriches undergraduate teaching and learning by providing opportunities for students to experience firsthand the processes of scholarly exploration and discovery that characterize academic life.

Harsh Aggarwal, a sophomore from Woodbury, Minn., majoring in biology will present a project on placental cellular development to explain the role played by an unusual class of normal genes that are directly related to retroviruses.

Micale, a junior from Fort Atkinson majoring in chemistry, will present a project on synthesizing compounds similar to capsaicin, the substance in chili peppers that makes them hot, which may have the ability to render a person insensible to pain without loss of consciousness.

Jillene Beuke, a junior from Forest Lake, Minn., majoring in biology will present a project on the characterization and identification of psychrophiles, organisms that thrive at a relatively low temperature, from the Kinnickinnic River.

Clayton Carlson, a senior from Fort Atkinson majoring in biology and Kurt Fleschner, a senior from Fond du Lac majoring in biotechnology, will present a project about DNA secondary structure and how it relates to DNA replication error rates.

Kutcher, a junior from Mounds View, Minn., majoring in biology, will present a project on the effects that the compound capsaicin has on C.elegens, nematodes, or microscopic soil worms. The compound capsaicin is believed to have potential for treating chronic pain in humans.

Erin Dahlke, a senior from Edgar majoring in chemistry and Jake Vergin, a junior from Rice Lake majoring in biology, will present a project on the organic synthesis of a ten-carbon piece of the large molecule Peloruside A; in particular, a carbon-carbon bond forming reaction called metathesis.

Jacob Hovden, a senior from Owatonna, Minn., majoring in health and human performance will present a project that compares and analyzes the National College Health Assessment Survey based on behaviors between smokers and non-smokers.

Jason McLean, a senior from River Falls majoring in psychology, will present their study examining changes in an animal's preference for a large reward over a small one as the wait for the large reward increases.

Lisa Johnson, a senior from Spring Lake Park, Minn., majoring in broad area business administration, will present a project on a study of UW-RF business students that measures personality differences and college student expectations.

Christa Nichols, a senior from Eden Prairie, Minn., majoring in chemistry, will present a project on a method to determine the amount of unreacted material left after the manufacturing process of a protective polymer film.

Susan Olsen, a senior from Woodville majoring in English broad area education, will present a project on the effects of the caste system in India on both males and females, focusing primarily on males.

Aida Pinero, a senior from Las Piedras, Puerto Rico, majoring in broad area business administration, will present a project on a baseline study of environmental awareness and practice among diverse businesses in Puerto Rico.

Gina Searls, a junior from North Freedom majoring in animal science, will present a project on data concerning the underlying biological cause of a muscle-cramping condition that occurs in about 5 percent of Thoroughbred horses.

The workshop, "Still Searching for America: Conversations on National Identity," is funded by a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities to consider questions about national identity. The project includes explorations of the evolving American character, including interactive ways to engage students in authentic intellectual activities in and beyond the classroom.

Highlights of the workshop will include a visit with the 10 to 26-year-old members of the dance troupe Groove NutZ Crew, a resource fair that offers a new History Alive! unit for only $100, break-out sessions and special technology sessions. There is also a one-credit option for graduate students who wish to earn a 700-level credit toward their MSE program.

Ensemble in the music department at UW-River Falls last week to begin rehearsal on the composition he created for the annual Commissioned Composer concert coming up this spring. The concert is scheduled for April 25 at 8 p.m. in the William Abbott Concert Hall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Center.

"I have been working with modern music for 30 years," he said. "My work would be representative of the 7th restructural cycle music developments that occurred in the mid-1960s. My work is directed toward exploring the interrelationship between improvisation and composition."

I wanted to come to River Falls now to rehearse with the students so they would have plenty of time to prepare for the premiere performance. The piece has aspects that are somewhat difficult, and I thought it would be worth the extra effort for me to come here ahead of time."

Each year a composer is commissioned to write a composition for students to perform, then he or she comes to campus for two or three days to speak to students in class, attend rehearsals of the composition, and spend some social time with students and faculty.

In what will be his first trip to the United States, de la Cruz will explain how U.S. policy is affecting the people of Colombia and the environment. His trip is sponsored by Witness for Peace, a politically-independent grass roots organization. Founded in 1983, it is dedicated to non-violence and working for peace and justice in the Americas.

Midwest, the civilian population is victimized by this practice. "For every acre of coca that is sprayed, another acre of edible crops is destroyed. Human health is endangered and the environment is affected, including the Amazon Rain Forest," he said.

Unemployment is 60 percent, and the economic situation is desperate. The only options people have are to go with someone who will pay them to fight or to grow coca. De la Cruz has personally been threatened with death in his country for speaking out against the situation.

A native of Colombia where he is currently director of the social ministries office of his diocese, de la Cruz has a master's degree in political science and international relations and is a specialist in conflict resolution. His talk will be interpreted by John Hunter, a Witness For Peace international team member who is based in Colombia.

UW-River Falls will drop three varsity teams and add two others as a result of an athletics module review, the University announced Friday. Chancellor Ann Lydecker said the changes will begin with the academic year 2002-03.

Lydecker based her decision on the recommendations of a campus-wide committee of faculty, staff, students and community members she empanelled to review the UW-RF sports module of 18 men's and women's teams. That committee was directed to review all programs for their contribution to the mission of the University, the impact on student athletes, gender equity, competitiveness, resources, opportunities for participation, and the sustainability of each sport with adequate facilities, coaching and competitive opportunities within the Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletics Conference.

Chancellor Lydecker noted in announcing the changes, "I've reviewed the report with an analysis of how we have historically moved and continue to move toward expanding our athletics opportunities proportionate to gender. While we will continue to provide opportunities for male students we will provide expanded opportunities for female athletes.

With the changes, UW-RF will offer athletic opportunities for male students in basketball, football, hockey, swimming, cross country and indoor and outdoor track and field. Women's teams will include basketball, hockey, softball, soccer, swimming, tennis, cross country, indoor and outdoor track and field, volleyball and golf.

Said UW-RF interim Athletics Director Rick Bowen, "It is unfortunate that this announcement must be made. In the short term it is very painful, but the long-term viability of the athletic department demands that we make some very difficult decisions. This happens to be one of them. The committee that made this recommendation was a broad cross section of the campus community that did an enormous amount of study.

The topic the community chose was water; water in all of its forms and what it means to the residents. Through various art forms they considered all aspects of water, including its usage, beauty, and pollution. The project kicked off last April on Earth Day, and was concluded in September.

Said Kallenbach, "When I first met Megan, I was impressed with her maturity and respect for the field of journalism. She's aggressively open to new ideas and really seeks them out. Her focus and willingness to learn will take her as far as she would like to go in this business."

UW-RF Assistant Professor of journalism Patricia Berg won the NBNA award two years ago for her documentary "Working from the Heart," an in-depth look at the lives of Wisconsin dairy farmers. Clarke also received the award of merit along with Jason Kenyon, a junior from Amery majoring in broadcast journalism, for their five-minute weekly newscast on WRFW, the University radio station, which covers national, international, state and local news.

She serves as news director for WRFW hosting the hour-long public affairs program "Let's Talk" that airs on Tuesday evenings from 5 to 6 p.m. The program covers topics such as parking issues, and, for the first time ever this year, election coverage for all the races in Pierce and St. Croix Counties.

Concerning her scholarship, Clarke said, "I wouldn't have received the award without the help of the faculty in the journalism department and the opportunities the journalism program offers. Without those opportunities, I would not have been able to accomplish the things I have."

Competition for the event was in two parts: a judging contest and a design contest. For the judging competition, students judged and evaluated plant material provided by Bachman's and other regional wholesalers that would be sold commercially, including cut flowers, flowering potted plants and foliage plants.

The beautiful and often eerie curtains of light in the nighttime sky known as the "northern lights" have intrigued people for millennia. Many legends, myths and superstitions have revolved around the northern lights, but it is only in the last 40 years that scientists have begun to understand what causes them.

"We are thrilled," said theatre Professor Margaret Swanson, who serves as chair of the department of speech communication and theatre arts. "The whole department has worked hard for 20 years to make this happen."

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker, "This is a marvelous opportunity for our theatre program to move ahead. The program will now have the focus and emphasis it has long deserved. It is a tribute to the hard work of the faculty and the dean who have through the years developed the program, knowing the day would come when it would earn the status of a major."

"The theatre is co-curricular, meaning that students from any major can be involved in its productions," said speech communication and theatre arts Professor Robin Murray, who is also director of the University Theatre. "Though we usually have 40 to 45 theatre majors and minors combined, we have about 90 students over a year's time who are involved at some level; onstage, backstage, designing sets and costumes, or publicizing events."

"Because we are close to the Twin Cities area," said Murray, "we can take field trips to theatres there. It is a nice connection for students, because that is where they would probably find internships."

The evening will begin with a social hour that includes wine and cheese tasting and a cash bar. Immediately following dinner there will be a dessert auction, featuring desserts from throughout the valley region. Tables can bid on the dessert of their choice to be served at their table. Also after dinner, there will be entertainment, a silent auction and a live auction.

The 140-member club promotes the dairy industry, provides contacts with other schools and industry professionals, and serves as a social organization. The dairy program at UW-RF has the largest enrollment in the nation, with 105 students enrolled as dairy science majors and minors.

Students toured the Ohio State Veterinary Hospital and its teaching and research farm, and attended educational sessions on biosecurity, fats in dairy foods, silage fermentation, and nitrogen utilization.

The consignors for the sale receive most of the sale price; however, a portion goes to the UW-RF Dairy Club, to cover such things as housing, auctioning, and advertising costs. Money earned also goes to fund trips, educational seminars, scholarships, and the club's spring banquet.

The program included workshops designed for dairy farm business management, a trade show and speakers. The keynote speaker was national television farm broadcaster Orion Samuelson, who spoke on "Playing in the Big Leagues." Each student was paired with a dairy producer and member of PDPW, who served as a mentor during the event.

A campus picnic on the mall from 10:30 a.m. to 1 p.m. will feature a Chinese calligrapher, a Japanese kite flyer, a local resident with Chinese woodwind instruments, and booths sponsored by 50 student organizations. The cost for the public to eat at the picnic is $5.50.

Events for the day will wrap up at the St. Thomas More Newman Center with a showing of "The Laramie Project," an HBO documentary on Matthew Shepherd, a University of Wyoming student who was murdered because he was gay.

The hearing will re-enact an actual case that came before the Council a few years ago, in which a 17-year-old woman, a victim of incest living in a small town in Minnesota, charged that her hometown weekly paper had re-victimized her by publishing the fact that her father had been convicted of repeatedly raping her.

Students in the class will act as Council members. After hearing the complaints and the newspaper's defense, the students will debate the case and make a decision as to whether the complaint is warranted. Following their vote, staff members will reveal what the Council actually decided in the case.

It is a non-profit, non-governmental agency whose mission is to promote fairness and freedom of expression in the news media grounded in responsible reporting and editing. To that end, it encourages the public to become more knowledgeable and demanding consumers of news and to hold the media accountable for stories they produce. It also encourages the media to be open about how they make news decisions.

According to Gary Gilson, executive director of the Council, Berg is one of seven new members of the public and the news media elected to the Council. The Council is composed of 12 members from the media and 12 from the public.

Members are nominated by the membership committee and elected by the News Council for a three-year term. Each member represents himself or herself only, and not any organization they are associated with.

Said Berg, "I'm honored to participate in the News Council. In this region we're fortunate to have the Minnesota News Council to help build a bridge between the news industry and audiences on both sides of the Mississippi.

A Prescott resident, Berg serves as advisor to the Student Voice, the campus newspaper, and teaches courses on media writing, news reporting, international communication and public opinion. Prior to teaching, she was Wisconsin correspondent for the St. Paul Pioneer Press and an occasional commentator for Minnesota Public Radio.

The mission of the Minnesota News Council is to promote fairness and freedom of expression in the news media through responsible reporting and editing. The Council encourages the public to become more knowledgeable and demanding consumers of news, and to hold the media accountable for stories they produce.

Baker presented a project on a collaborative, educational program between UW-RF and Harold S. Vincent High School in Milwaukee, sponsored by the Private Industry Council of Wisconsin to expose promising high school students to Earth and Environmental Sciences.

Vincent High School came to UW-RF to participate in a 10-day residential program consisting of laboratory and field-based study, classroom discussion, and evening and weekend cultural and educational programs. Baker hopes that in the second summer program in 2002, up to 15 students from grades 9 through 12 and several teachers will participate.

The South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River flows through the UW-RF campus, but the water quality of the river is less than optimum for trout due to city storm water runoff. The University, working with an engineering company, is evaluating options to restore wetlands by the stream for water-quality improvement, flood impacts, waterfowl habitat and educational purposes.

Keen incorporated his senior-level hydrogeology course students to begin a baseline study of groundwater conditions and the interactions between groundwater and the South Fork. All students participated in designing the project, installing wells and obtaining periodic water level measurements. Two students served as co-project managers, and along with other responsibilities, the students had to deliver their findings to Dale Braun, UW-RF campus planner.

Peters presented his project on the paleontology of the Rock Elm Disturbance in Pierce County. The Rock Elm Disturbance is a four-mile diameter semi-circular region that is a meteorite impact site. It is characterized by intensely fractured quartz grains, a rim faulted at high angles and a central basin fill grading into a gentle to steep central uplift.

Schott competed in persuasion, program oral interpretation, prose interpretation, impromptu speaking and impromptu sales. While Schott did not make it to the final round, she received 13th place in prose interpretation, 13th place in impromptu sales and 11th place in persuasive speaking.

Competing schools had up to six students participating, while UW-RF only had two. Although there are 29 students on the UW-RF Forensics Team that competed in more than one tournament, Lecturer Kathy Olsen, who is director of the team, said there was not enough money to take everyone to Kansas City. The decision was made to take the two students who had been the most active members.

Said Anderson,"We are happy to have Jim on the Advisory Council. He has been supportive of the College, serving on the Alumni Advisory Board and as a partner of some of the research efforts on the College farm. Each year, Agriliance hires three or four of our students for the summer, and he works with them."

Members of the Advisory Council provide assistance and advice to improve the agriculture, food and environmental sciences industry through the educational opportunities offered at UW-River Falls. They promote the College in its interaction with industry colleagues, community leaders, state and federal legislators, and the higher education community.

The Council provides advice to the College on a wide array of topics. It determines a mission and vision for the College, and develops a strategic plan to accomplish them. It helps develop curriculum and new program initiatives; assists with internships, placements, personnel searches, development efforts and scholarships; creates partnerships between industry and education; works on capital building projects and more.

"He's an outstanding educator, mentor and friend. These are only a few of the distinguishing assets of Dr. Kelm. He is a professor who challenges you to meet your goals, guides you to help you form your own decisions, and most importantly, listens to you when you need to talk. He is a true inspiration to the Animal and Food Science Department, and most importantly, to students."

Said Lydecker in announcing the award, "For 127 years, UW-River Falls has been a teaching institution. We take great pride in that mission, so much so that our most prestigious award is to celebrate those faculty who excel at our most fundamental value.

"Our students and recent alumni tell us that Steve Kelm is one of our very best faculty at ensuring that our students are engaged in learning. He will serve as a role model to all of us on how to give our best efforts so our students can learn here and thrive in their professional lives," Lydecker said.

Said department Chair Tony Jilek: "Steve is a great colleague and teacher as he is eager and willing to cooperate and to do his fair share or more. His concern for and attention to students is exceptional and his smile and laugh are contagious."

Kelm teaches courses in junior- and senior-level dairy management, dairy cattle evaluation, introduction to animal science, principles of animal breeding, orientation to dairy science, and senior seminar in dairy science. He also serves as an adviser for 50 undergraduates, he helps to coach the dairy cattle judging teams, and he is a co-adviser to the undergraduate dairy club. That latter responsibility last year earned him recognition as the National Advisor of the Year for the American Dairy Science Association.

Her works, inspired by the deep love of nature she developed as a child growing up in the coal-mining valleys of South Wales, have been commissioned by prominent orchestras and are performed extensively throughout the United States and the United Kingdom.

Her most recent work, a three-movement piece called "Sarsen," commissioned by the St. Croix Valley Symphony Orchestra, the Saratoga Springs Youth Orchestra and the community orchestra of Cedar Springs, Utah, is the first she has written for a college/community/youth orchestra. The May 14 program will also include works for choir, chamber music and instrumental solos.

Aubrey Hunt, a sophomore from Crystal Lake, Ill., majoring in animal science, placed second in hunt seat equitation over fences in the open category, and Sarah Myhre, a freshman from Decorah, Iowa, majoring in animal science, won the novice hunt seat over fences class.

According to animal science Assistant Professor Peter Rayne, who is the English team coach, both the UW-RF English and Western teams advanced to the zone competition by capturing Region 4 championships. A team becomes a regional champion by accumulating the most points over 10 shows. Individuals placing first through sixth place are awarded points based on their place. UW-RF sent teams, individuals and coaches to each show, as did the nine other colleges in the region.

The Western team includes Trisha Keller, a sophomore from Palmyra majoring in animal science; Jenny Delange, a sophomore from River Falls majoring in animal science; Andrea Nelson, a freshman from Galesville majoring in animal science with an equine emphasis; Amanda Arndt, a freshman from Prescott majoring in animal science with an equine emphasis; and Martine Bredl, a sophomore from Stratford majoring in dairy science. For the zone competition, Reichert substituted for Delange.

The English Team includes Hunt; Myhre; Adam Glas, a sophomore from Union Grove majoring in horticulture landscape design; Rhea Bretl, a sophomore from Appleton majoring in animal science; Sondra Loos, a freshman from West Bend majoring in pre-major social/science; and April Berkheimer, a junior from River Falls majoring in animal science with an equine production emphasis.

Hunt, a member of the English Team, is regional high point competitor. She will represent zone 6, region 4 at the national competition in New York, where she will compete for the Cachione Cup, a prestigious Intercollegiate Horse Show Association award.

Said Rayne, "These individuals and teams are poised to succeed and move on to the national competition because of many hours of hard work and a commitment to achieving excellence by all of the IHSA members."

Two students will be the first graduates of the new Master of Management program this year at UW-River Falls. Caroline Fisher and Michael Kretz, both from Hudson, doubled up on their workloads to complete their coursework for the three-year program in record time.

Kretz, a physician., didn't practice medicine while going to school, expects to graduate at the end of the summer as he completes a practicum. Fisher, who works as an office manager at River Falls Utilities, will graduate this spring.

Dean Barbara Nemecek,, of the College of Business and Economics, said the program is designed for working adults who have some experience in the professional or nonprofessional sector, usually in a management position.

An interdisciplinary program, the Master of Management program is rooted in business administration as well as the social and behavioral sciences, rather than math. No undergraduate degree in business is required.

Kretz, who worked as a medical doctor, may be one of the exceptions. Though his background is in medicine, he wants to build on that, creating an alliance between health care systems and educational institutions. He had no idea how to accomplish this when he began the program, but says he knows now.

"In the leadership class, I learned that I am a visionary leader; I want to change big things in life. I learned that it can take a long time to achieve some of these things and that I must be patient, be willing to share power, value the skills that other people have, and, above all, keep my eye on the ball."

Another project addresses obesity in children. It provides a body map index for age, a tool that a child can use to determine if he or she has a healthy body weight. If not, it offers resources to change that.

"The class sizes were small, and there was a nice rapport among the students," she said. The fact that classes are held in the early evening was helpful to her, because she works full time and has three children.

She has an undergraduate degree in organizational communication and sociology, and was working as an executive secretary when she entered the program. She recently was promoted to office manager, and hopes to move into a management position.

One result of this was her work with UW-RF undergraduate students for their senior seminar. The students, supervised by Fisher and advised by their professor, helped to develop a new employee orientation program for River Falls Utilities.

Potts originally predicted about 50 students to begin with, enrollment is at about 115. This is what he had expected after three or four years. Potts said five classes are offered fall semester, five are offered in the spring, and two are offered in the summer, so students can go through at their own speed.

A majority of the students live in Wisconsin and work in the Twin Cities metro area. "While we have done very little promotion in Minnesota, we plan to begin to do some," he said. "Much of our growth to this point can be attributed to word-of-mouth."

Thirteen collegiate dairy teams from universities across the nation participated in the competition. The team of students from UW-RF, all seniors, included Matthew Bendixen from River Falls, Michael Broker from Rice Lake, Michelle Frederick from Galesville, and Karl Nelson from Arena. The team was accompanied by animal and food science Professor Perry Clark.

For the competition, the teams each conducted a 90-minute on-site evaluation of a working dairy farm. They were provided with Dairy Herd Improvement Association data, as well as information on nutrition, health, reproduction and herd replacements, and fictitious information on the finances of the farm.

The students walked around the farm with clipboards and tape measures collecting data, then returned to campus to develop an overall evaluation of the farm, including its strengths and suggestions for improvements.

Said Clark, "This competition gives students hands-on experience in trouble-shooting management problems on actual working dairy farms. The experience is excellent preparation, as many of the students will be doing similar evaluations in post-graduate positions in the feed, pharmaceutical, genetics, and banking industries. The process hones their observation, analytical thinking, communication and people skills"

Said Lydecker, "Although it is just three years old, the award recognizes the crucial importance of advising to the educational experience. Good advising helps our students to select the right program; to choose the best courses to meet their interest areas while helping them to progress toward a degree; and that all-important assistance in lining up the right internships and then finding the right job after commencement.

Another student cited Schraufnagel's access to students: "He's always making time for me if I needed help with my schedule. He's been willing to check things out for me and he's always checking up on how things are going for me during the semester."

In addition to his teaching and research activities, Schraufnagel has been involved in numerous campus activities. In the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences, he has chaired the curriculum committee, Sustainable Agriculture Day, the public relations committee, and promotions and awards.

The thought-provoking play considers the emotional aspects of the epidemic on family and victims. It raises questions about our individual response to victims, the role of the media in our perception of the epidemic, and our desire to distinguish between "innocent" and "guilty" victims.

The production is one component in a series of activities sponsored by the departments of speech communication and theatre arts, psychology, social work, art and English. The activities will be held on the UW-RF campus between March 7-16 to enhance campus awareness of AIDS.

"Surface design art is playing with fabric and dealing with different types of dyes and techniques to create a wonderful piece of art," Ahmed said. "Basically it's dealing with pattern and images applied to the surface of fabric."

Most of her work for the show was done this year but a few pieces were created earlier in her college career. Much of her art reflects the influence of Arab culture, " It's a personal interest," she said. "My background is Arab and the influence I have had throughout my life is portrayed in my art work." Ahmed's future plans are to work in graphic design and do fabric design.

Trina Ward, a graduating senior from Rice Lake, Wis., majoring in broad area art, will exhibit her hand dyed and woven rugs, scarves, a blanket made of chenille, and some graphic pieces. Ward compiled these works over the past two years.

Six UW-River Falls faculty and staff members were honored by Gov. Scott McCallum at a reception at the governor's mansion in Madison recently for attracting the largest amounts of money to the campus through federal grants. UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker and Dean Gorden Hedahl of the College of Arts and Science also attended.

Said Lydecker, "We are extremely proud of our faculty and academic staff who receive federal grant money. To be funded, their proposals must survive a very competitive review process. Their ideas have generated dollars for science equipment and supplies, program development, support services, research and a number of other educational enhancements."

Faculty, staff and other representatives from the 13 campuses of the University of Wisconsin System, UW Colleges and UW-Extension also recognized for their expertise in bringing federal grants to Wisconsin.

Attracting more federal dollars to Wisconsin has been set as a major priority for the State of Wisconsin as part of its New Economy initiative that is addressing long-term economic growth. Wisconsin residents have traditionally sent more tax dollars to Washington, D.C., then the state receives back.

According to Bill Campbell, UW-RF director of research and grants, UW-RF typically receives up to $3 million each year in federal grants. The six people honored are those who have brought in the most grant money.

Campbell, who was one of the six recognized, in recent years has been the recipient of 28 grants totaling nearly $5 million from the U.S. Department of Education, U.S. Department of Agriculture and the Corporation for National Service to support a variety of educational programs at UW-RF.

Biology Professor Karen Klyczek, chair of the biology department, was given three grants from the NSF totaling nearly $566,000 to support her own research and the UW-RF biotechnology program. Klyczek ran two series of summer workshops designed to bring high school teachers up to date on biotechnology.

Angela Leckel, a graduating senior from Spooner, Wis., double majoring in broad area art and speech communications with a business emphasis, will display her photography and metals work that have been inspired by human relations.

The animals were consigned from farms in Minnesota, Wisconsin, and Iowa. The consignors receive most of the sales price, however, a portion goes to the sale sponsor, the UW-RF Dairy Club, to cover as housing, auctioning, and advertising costs. Money earned also goes to fund trips, educational seminars, scholarships, and the club's spring banquet.

The Wind Ensemble has distinguished itself at home and abroad. The 45-member ensemble, which is open by audition only to UW-RF students, draws talent from throughout the Midwest. Director Kristin Tjornchoj, in her eighth year as director of bands at UW-RF, holds a doctorate from the University of Minnesota. Tjornehoj is active as a guest conductor and clinician throughout the Midwest.

The UW-RF chapter of Delta Sigma Rho-Tau Kappa Alpha, the national honorary forensics society, sponsored the event. Tara Martini, a junior majoring in speech communication with an emphasis in education from Rochester, Minn., is the president of the fraternal organization. The tournament director was Professor James W.

As always, the concert will consist of a unique blend of choreography by students and guests. The jazz work of Twin Cities choreographer and dance faculty member Torrion Amie will be included, as will a historic reconstruction of two 1950s dance forms, the Bop and the Madison, by alumnus Lance Benishek. Benishek is a master teacher of American classic dance who conducts workshops on American dance forms throughout the United States and internationally.

Members of the University and the River Falls community are encouraged to attend performances Monday through Friday. Tickets will be available from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m., Monday, April 1, through Friday, April 12, at the ticket office in the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. Tickets will also be available each performance evening from 6-8 p.m. Ticket reservations are recommended.

Rene Kasper, a senior from Rice Lake, Wis., majoring in broad area art, will display her work in fibers, photography, and ceramics. Shari McWilliams, a senior from Kewaskum, Wis., majoring in fine arts with an emphasis in ceramics and metals, will present her works in ceramics, metals, and painting. Becky Bauer, a senior from Jefferson, Wis., majoring in broad area art, will showcase her work in metal, glass, and fibers. The senior exhibition is a required activity for art majors graduating with a bachelor of fine arts degree, as it gives practical experience in gallery techniques.

Weber is a senior from Bloomington, Minn., majoring in broad area art. Her works include an array of drawings, paintings, pottery, collage, printmaking, and computer graphics. Her collection of works represents the personal exploration she undertook to discover her unique artistic abilities. The senior exhibition is a required activity for art majors graduating with a bachelor of fine arts degree, as it gives practical experience in gallery techniques.

Said Cooper, "This was a chance for us to show dairy producers that UW-RF is interested in knowing what they are doing, so we can prepare students for the industry. Some of our students took their resumes along to leave with dairy producers or exhibitors at the trade show."

According to Nan Alderson, manager of show operations for the ACC, which is headquartered in New York, Engebretson's work was selected by the Council's advertising agency to represent the show. His work was chosen from that of approximately 250 artists who were selected by a jury of their peers for the privilege of exhibiting at the ACC show.

"We see this honor as a testament to the uniqueness of our work, but the quality of the slides we submit is also a determining factor," he said. "I continually remind my students that slides or photos of their work are the currency that artists use to obtain grants or gain acceptance to a show. The slides are all the jurors get to see. They look at five slides for 15 or 20 seconds and make a decision."

ACC shows are tough to get into, because there is a lot of competition nationally and the standards are high. "The fact that Jim was selected to exhibit at the show and his work was selected for use in promotion for the show is quite an honor," he said. "This speaks to the quality of the art program at UW-RF and the quality of our professors. By being practicing artists ourselves, marketing and selling our work as well as creating it, we are serving as positive role models for our students."

Padgett said the ACC shows provide an excellent opportunity for artists to showcase their work. Representatives from galleries and shops throughout the country attend, buying the work outright or taking it on consignment. The ACC show, in its 16th year in the Twin Cities, features the work of artists from all over the country who live in the United States. Expected attendance for the four-day period is 14,000.

The award will be presented during a ceremony to be held at Brittingham House, the official residence of UW System President Katharine Lyall, and will recognize nominees from each of the System's 15 campuses for their service to public higher education.

"This event will provide a special opportunity for the Regents to celebrate the excellence of the UW System and to reaffirm the importance of the individuals and organizations within and outside the UW System who are vital to our success," said UW System Board of Regents President Jay L. Smith of the awards ceremony.

People have been using the web along with textbooks for a few years now, but we are trying to capture as much of the educational potential of the Web as we possibly can," said Gladstone-Sovell. "We have fully integrated the site with the textbook."

One of the advantages of having the Web site is that things occur all the time that make books obsolete as soon as they are published, but the Web is always subject to revision. The authors will keep their book as current as possible by doing updates each semester.

Of particular interest are MicroCase? exercises, simple data analysis exercises such as examining the difference between liberals and conservatives on various policy issues; a virtual Constitutional convention, which allows students to debate provocative proposals, such as flag burning; and participation exercises where, for examples, students may answer a series of questions about where they stand on issues to determine their own political ideology. "The theme of the book is participation in the political process, why it is important, and how you might go about doing it," said Gladstone-Sovell. "The story of Max Neuhaus, who was elected to the school board as a high school senior in River Falls, is used as an example of this in the book."

It seemed important to Neuhaus that, since a school board make decisions affecting young people, the young people would have a representative or two with demographics similar to their own on the board. Neuhaus proved that young people can participate, and they can have their opinions heard. He said that whether by voting or by actively participating in politics, the opportunity to be involved is everywhere.

English Professor Nicholas Karolides as he leads his 12th tour, scheduled to run May 26 through June 10. The 16-day tour will feature the usual fine-tuned itinerary, including carefully-selected hotels and restaurants, and suggestions on how to spend free time and where to shop.

The tour begins in Athens with a cable car climb that yields a panoramic view of the city at the top of Lykabettos Hill, the highest point in Athens, then moves on to the exploration of Athens Acropolis, Delphi, Olympia, Mycenae, Epidaurus, and AcroCounth. The time in Athens ends with an optional theater experience at the Athens Festival in the starlit Herod Atticus Theater.

In Crete, the group will visit the Chania area in the West and take an optional hike down the Samarian Gorge, then explore the Heraklion area in the East and the Minoan palace at Knossos. The tour will conclude with a visit to the three Aegean Isles of Santorini, Mykonos and Delos.

Minneapolis and Athens, boat and air fare to the identified islands, motor coach for land travel, hotels, breakfasts, evening meals except in Athens, tour guides, entrance fees, airport fees, transfers, service charges and group gratuities.

Wade, "In 1972 when it originated, the event was a Dance Marathon, but it quickly evolved into much more. Now it involves 24 hours of contests, Olympic games such as floor hockey and basketball, karaoke, some dancing to live bands or music played by a DJ; and food."

Dance Marathon began at Penn State University and is now the largest student-run philanthropic event in the nation. More than 40 universities and colleges raise two million dollars annually through pledges, donations and sponsors.

The Children's Miracle Network is an international organization that raises funds for children's hospitals throughout the United States and Canada. Since it was established in 1983, it has raised $1.4 billion through fundraisers like Dance Marathon to help over 170 hospitals help more than 14 million kids.

Said Bredahl, a resident of Hudson, "My colleagues and student interns in the publications department deserve much of the credit for the work our group has produced. If the theory holds true that we are a product of our environment, I owe thanks for this award to the individuals I work with on a day-to-day basis."

Bredahl loves his work, and is doing what he has always wanted to do, which may explain why he has had so much success. Since earning a B.S. in art education at UW-RF in 1986, he has worked as a graphic designer at the University, and has been the recipient of five awards in visual communication for the UW System.

One of his most noteworthy accomplishments is the new visual identity he designed for the University, The project, initiated by Lydecker shortly after she took over as Chancellor in the fall of 2000, includes a University seal and logo, and re-design of the athletic logo. The new visual identity became official last April, and campus publications are in the process of being updated.

Bredahl's design group, a component of the publications office, provides a free service to campus, producing 400 to 500 projects each year with a turn-around time that averages two weeks. Bredahl's group can design anything from elaborate four-color pieces to simple, one-color projects such as tickets and flyers.

The Board is responsible for regulating social workers, marriage and family therapists, and professional counselors. It determines the education and experience required for obtaining credentials, develops and evaluates exams and establishes standards of professional conduct. The Board is currently composed of ten professional members with credentials for the professionals and occupations they regulate, and three public members.

Borup, a resident of Hudson, is enthused about the opportunity to serve on the Board, seeing her function as a link between UW-RF faculty and students and the community. " Working in the community and as an educator at the same time will provide a good balance for me ," she said.

The author of nine works of fiction and non-fiction, See has been awarded the prestigious Robert Kirsch Body of Work Award and a Guggenheim Fellowship in Fiction. She currently is at work on a new novel.

It began in the fall of 1996 with readings by student writers, then expanded to include other writers. Now, 40 to 100 people attend readings by authors, faculty and students. Typically, six readings are done each semester.

Cooper enrolled in the course because he is involved in leading the strategic planning efforts for both the animal and food science department and for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, and wanted to learn more about it.

"The topic of strategic planning is important and should be learned, applied, and taught in all extension program areas and beyond, within the University of Wisconsin System. I started out as a believer and have become an evangelist,"

The workshop was conducted by members of the Strategic Planning Program Team, which includes specialists and county agents from all four program areas within the Cooperative Extension Service. The course included one day on facilitation skills and three days learning the process of strategic planning for public and non-profit organizations.

The main goal is to generate strategic planning practitioners who can apply strategic planning to their own organizations, facilitate strategic planning for other organizations, and teach strategic planning to other practitioners.

Another goal is to build a strong institutional capability for applying strategic planning within the Cooperative Extension Service, and to establish a learning community of strategic planning practitioners.

Of the nearly 250 Extension faculty and staff members who have taken the course over the past five years, Cooper is the first UW-RF teaching faculty member to participate. Alicia Acken, a land use specialist from the Geography department with an extension appointment, also took the course with Cooper and 23 others.

Some two years into the project, the UW-RF program has been recognized as a national model by the Department of Education, and its success story is being featured on the DOE's Internet site, at www.pt3.org.

Tomorrow for Technology, education students at UW-RF have learned how to create an electronic version of the traditional student portfolio they are required to present during their student teaching seminar.

"We want each portfolio program to be unique, so we switched our Web editors to DreamWeaver to allow students more freedom in constructing their websites," said Lundeberg. "The students can download their websites onto a CD-ROM to send to prospective employers. "

"The use of video, or iMovies, has also emerged as an effective component because it is interactive and easy to edit.. In addition, students repeatedly review their work and see it in new ways when creating and editing iMovies, and they become better at critiquing their work."

"Some of our partnership schools in Wisconsin now want e-portfolios from prospective teachers. We are actually writing a proposal to extend our PT3 grant to allow teachers and others to help students transition their multimedia portfolios into a more job-oriented portfolio," she said.

Because the UW-RF budget provides for limited information technology help, the PT3 grant committee instituted the Technology Leadership Cadre, composed of tech-savvy students, to help UW-RF faculty and teachers in area schools integrate technology into their programs. The students in the TLC are all majors in elementary, secondary and agricultural education.

Lundeberg said the students in the TLC have gained valuable experience through the work they have done. "If you provide students with a network of others who can support them and give them increased responsibilities, they then become leaders themselves," she said. "A number of students have stated that being a member of the TLC has been the most important aspect of their education at UW-RF."

The PT3 program is in its third year. According to Zeon, at the end of year two it had served more than 1,530 students, coordinated over 162 workshops, and provided immeasurable assistance to individuals.

UW-River Falls is offering two interactive evening television courses during spring term, one in introductory geology and the other an international study seminar. Each will originate on the campus of UW-RF and be broadcast to three regional high schools.

It will be broadcast to Barron and Siren High Schools, and Unity High School in Balsam Lake. Teachers in the class will learn how to establish links with teachers and classrooms in other countries as a way of testing projects and ideas. The seminar will combine group discussion, on-line discussions with teachers and schools that are linked to participants, web research and the use of web resources, and interactive links.

As a regional director for IACLEA, Stevens works with the campus law enforcement departments of 296 institutions in 13 states, representing the views and concerns of her region to the board of directors for the organization. She communicates information to members about public safety, such as legislation that has a direct impact on how they do their jobs and disseminate information to their campus community, current trends on campuses, and decisions handed down by the board of directors.

While labor costs will remain the same as anticipated, proposals opened last week showed that bidders and vendors bid lower than expected as a result of higher construction materials inventories and by slashing their profit margins to obtain construction contracts.

"We are creating a vibrant, dynamic college that will help move our region and Wisconsin forward by producing highly skilled graduates. We'll also be better poised to provide continuing education to business and industry, and to provide business development assistance," Nemecek said.

Nemecek said the new College's consolidation in South Hall will bring 27 faculty and staff and 1,200 majors to that building. Its departments include business administration, economics, and computer science and information systems. Also relocating will be the Center for Economic Education, the Center for Economic Research, and the Small Business Development Center, which all will see an expanded mission to provide more services to the region's business community in such areas as business start-ups and management, research services, and economic development.

"Any time an academic unit has a facility it can call 'home' it tends to build collegiality and will build on an image within and outside the campus," Nemecek said. "We'll have a better working environment and atmosphere among faculty, students and other constituents who are using the College."

The South Hall renovations will allow the College to enhance its reliance on technology as an instructional tool through the rewiring and renovation of two laboratories that will house its instructional technology laboratory and a general access computer laboratory for CBE students. Murphy notes that the savings gained through the recent bids will enable the College to further upgrade the technology infrastructure and provide a classroom for larger lectures.

According to UW-RF Dean of Students Roger Ballou, this year's conference will narrow the focus on sex and the college student to investigate how students can build healthy relationships and avoid the pitfalls of unhealthy ones. A particular concern will be violence in college relationships.

Said Ballou, "The objectives are to learn how to recognize the characteristics and signals in college-age relationships that can lead to violence, how to educate students to understand these road signs and what they can do in response, and how to perpetuate good health and compatibility in the relationships they form."

Brier Miller, a licensed marriage and family therapist in Minneapolis, will define the dimensions and characteristics of a good, healthy, productive relationship, and how these qualities can be fostered among young adults.

The report was based on the results of the first national survey ever undertaken to gather information on environmental initiatives at U.S. institutions of higher learning. The survey generated 1,116 responses from presidents, provosts and chiefs of administration and operations at 891 of the nation's 4,100 colleges and universities.

Said Hagen, "We are always trying to save energy when we can by heating or cooling spaces only when they need it. We have switched to higher-efficiency lights that use less energy, and we have installed variable frequency drives that allow us to run air handlers for air circulation more efficiently.

"We have insulated various pieces of equipment, such as pipes and steam lines, to reduce energy loss, and we have electronic controls on many of our buildings that allow us to better control when equipment is operating, and to regulate the temperature of the buildings."

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker, "We look forward to continuing our energy conservation measures with the design and construction of our new student center, as well as in our day-to-day practices on this campus. Waldo Hagen, Campus Planner Dale Braun and Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance Virgil Nylander do a wonderful job of keeping our campus and our facilities environmentally sound."

"They thought it was an extremely attractive building and fit in very nicely with the general architectural style of our campus," Nylander said. "They were very excited about coming to campus when it is opened."

Hall. It will house 60 suites, each consisting of four private bedrooms, one bath, a living room and a kitchenette. Braun calls this transition living, because it is similar to apartment living, but it is still on campus.

Braun said there is a national trend for students to live on campus, probably because it is more economical and more convenient than living off campus. There are no concerns about parking, there are no utilities to pay, and online internet access is provided.

For the past 20 years, co-owners Paul Morlock and Tim Power of Law's Nursery have worked closely with horticulture faculty and students at UW-RF. The nursery has provided learning opportunities for students and the University has produced trained employees to work at the nursery.

Morlock and Power also made significant contributions to the Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association that have benefited students. Along with others in the MNLA organization, they initiated an industry-based scholarship program, sponsoring a $1,000 scholarship annually to one UW-RF student.

They have encouraged the participation of UW-RF horticulture faculty and students in the MLNA, inviting students to assist with the set-up of the MNLA convention and trade show in Minneapolis every January, where they will have opportunities to network with professionals from the region.

UPS recruits on campus many times during each semester. Over the years it has hired hundreds of UW-RF students as part-time workers. The company provides flexible work schedules, internship programs and management training programs.

During Student Employment Week at UW-RF, a celebration to honor students who work while attending school, UPS donates door prizes and give-aways and assists with job fairs. Since the event is self-supporting, the continued willingness of UPS to provide assistance is very much appreciated. UPS is also a leading member of the National Student Employment Association, having donated $40,000 to the organization last year alone.

UPS has contributed to the University in other important ways over the years as well, in career fairs, donatING the scoreboard for the Karges Physical Education Center, servING as corporate sponsor for benefit golf tournaments to raise money for the football team and has placed ads in the program books for UW-RF football games.

The Outstanding Service Award was established in 1983 to recognize those who have made significant contributions to the University in the form of personal time and energy, leadership, support, and/or monetary donations.

Lisa White, UW-River Falls adviser for multicultural service and student support services, pre-college program coordinator and multicultural disadvantaged coordinator, was recently honored with the Women of Color 2001 award for her contributions to the campus and the community.

She helps them to develop study skills, monitors their progress, and makes sure they are getting good grades. She also is the adviser to the African American Alliance, which helps students find opportunities for jobs and internships outside of campus, and encourages them to attend and give academic presentations at conferences.

White attended Grinnell College in Iowa, where she majored in sociology. "To do this type of work, it is helpful to have social studies skills and experience interacting with people," White said. "Accounting, counseling skills and creative thinking are also good."

Alvarez said White has made outstanding contributions both professionally and personally. "Lisa is always enthusiastically engaged in virtually every multicultural activity, from the annual picnic, to the student retreat, to the American Multicultural Student Leadership Conference and Unity in the Community," said Alvarez.

Minn., majoring in speech communication; Nathan Messina-Anderson, a freshman from Madison with a pre-major in social science; and Meghan Olson, a junior from Bloomer majoring in speech communiction, sing some of the best tunes from the Big Band era.

During the ceremony, Law's Nursery, Inc. of Hastings and United Parcel Service will receive Outstanding Service Awards in recognition of the programs and opportunities they offer to students and the support they lend to UW-RF campus activities.

It has also invited students to assist with the set-up of the Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association convention and trade show in Minneapolis every January, with opportunities to network with professionals from the region.

The company provides flexible work schedules, internship programs and management training programs. Some students have had paid marketing internships, and many have moved on to permanent management positions with UPS after graduation.

Graduates of UW-River Falls on Saturday were encouraged to use their new-found knowledge to appreciate the uniqueness of those who are most important in their lives and to make life better for others.

In a metaphorical speech laced with humorous stories from his life, UW-RF commencement speaker Geoff Scheurman asked the 335 graduates to seek out a "poet prince" that can become their gauge for the best way to deal with life's challenges and successes.

Scheurman, a professor of teacher education who is UW-RF's Distinguished Teacher, delivered his remarks to the candidates and several thousand family members and friends who attended the fall commencement ceremony on Saturday (Dec. 22).

Before joining the faculty at UW-River Falls in 1993, Scheurman taught middle school and high school in Douglas, Wyoming. He holds a doctorate in educational psychology with emphases in lifespan intellectual development, constructivist learning theory, and intrinsic motivation from the University of Iowa. His bachelor's and master's degrees are from the University of Wyoming.

That friend died recently at an early age due to cancer; but his impact remains as Scheurman weaves those life experiences into his own concepts of the world that are framed against the humanities through the works of Shakespeare, Crane and Steinbeck, the music of composer Don Ellis, or the poetry of Saint-Exupery.

"When we dropped you off at college for the first time and faced an empty seat at the dinner table, and listened to the silence emanating from the same room where you once annoyed us by perpetually tying up the phone, it was like a death in the family. And although some of us get second chances, there are no guarantees.

Counseling and school psychology Professor Judith Emmett will be on leave during the spring semester to develop counseling skills in counselor supervision, including pre-service supervision and in-service training needs of school counselors.

Chemistry Associate Professor Michael Kahlow will be on leave for the entire school year to study the enzyme ribonucleotide reductase at the University of Minnesota under the guidance of the National Science Foundation Research Site for Educators in Chemistry. His studies may lead to further research opportunities with NSF for summer 2003.

Biology Professor Bradley Mogen will be on leave during the fall semester to develop an original, disease resistance gene-screening protocol to combat scab, a wheat and barley disease. His work will involve enhancing molecular and tissue culture skills and identifying collaborative projects for future grants involving student research.

Geography and mapping sciences Professor Donald Petzhold will be on leave for spring semester to assemble the materials and prepare a book-length manuscript on the unique physiological properties, geographical distribution, and environmental importance of subarctic woodland lichens of the Quebec-Labrador region of Canada.

Chemistry Professor David Rusterholz will be on leave for the entire school year to work with the research group of Professor Rodney Johnson at the University of Minnesota to perform laboratory work on a synthetic organic chemical project, seeking to gain further knowledge in the areas of pharmacogenomics, combinatorial chemistry and computer-assisted drug design and modeling.

To receive approval for a sabbatical, tenured faculty proposals are evaluated on their merit. Preference is given to candidates who have made significant academic contributions to the university, including quality teaching, scholarly activity, and service to the university and the community.

After conducting an environmental audit of the buildings on campus, Rusty Callier, a 2001 UW-RF graduate with a degree in land use planning from River Falls and Phyllis Jaworski, a 2001 UW-RF graduate with a degree in animal science from Kaukauna, realized there was more that Wisconsin's public higher education universities could do through what is known as "sustainable design" to make its buildings more efficient to operate and more environmentally friendly.

Callier and Jaworski presented recommendations to improve existing building efficiencies. The Regents physical planning and funding committee was so impressed with the presentation that they asked the System Administration to explore incorporating sustainable design procedures into all projects.

Principles already contain concepts that encourage sustainable practices without being clearly defined or labeled as such, it is likely and appropriate that interest in the specific area of sustainability will continue. To ensure that existing and future generations of people involved in University facilities planning address those concerns, UW system Administration recommends that some minor modifications be made to the Physical Planning Principles."

Sustainable design, known also as "green architecture," is dedicated to the conservation of resources. Methods include using the fewest resources possible and using materials that will have the least impact on the environment, employing alternative fuels, minimizing water consumption, and using recycled products or those products that can be recycled. New buildings are planned to accommodate future additions.

Cain that an environmental audit is a way of tracking energy and water use and the amount of waste generated in a building, to identify those buildings that are inefficient. He audited the existing buildings on campus over a two-year period through a federal McNair Scholarship research project.

Callier, who was president of Resource Management Club, then joined forces with Jaworski, who was president of Eco Club, the other environmental science club on campus. They conducted research, then combined their information with the results of the audit and put together some recommendations.

"The students felt this offered a chance to move the University toward sustainability and set the example for the rest of the community and the UW System. When their audit was complete, they put together some recommendations."

Cain said the students first approached Chancellor Ann Lydecker with their ideas, and made their presentation to her administrative cabinet. She was enthused about the possibilities, and scheduled the students to present their findings to the Board of Regents during its visit in May.

According to Campus Planner Dale Braun, one of the first projects on campus will be the new student union, which will be where the Ames Building is currently located. The structure will be designed so that additions or renovations can be made easily. Bricks from the old building will be reused, and the steel will be sent to a recycling center. Various types of solar power are being considered as a partial substitute to traditional energy sources.

"Minimizing water consumption is also a high priority," said Braun. "A plan to collect rainwater for toilet flushing is being considered. This will allow for the drinking water to be used only for drinking."

Said Cain, "The hope is that the new student union will be a showcase of sustainable design for the UW System. On the walls, we hope to have meters that track water and electrical use, and show the dollar amount conversions for how much the use costs. It is even possible, through the renewable energy and energy efficiency technologies,, that the meters will run backward and the electrical company will buy our excess energy."

The cost for implementing sustainability measures is higher at the front end than that of conventional construction methods. However, the savings will come in the long term, in the form of decreased utility bills and less expense for future additions.

Librarians across the world who are shopping among literary journals for their stacks, and readers who are seeking insightful commentary on the best writers, will be turning to UW-River Falls for advice.

UW-River Falls English associate Professor Jenny Brantley was recently named editor of Literary Magazine Review. Brantley, who has been writing reviews for the magazine for the past few years, published the fall 2001 issue of Literary Magazine Review for the first time as editor.

Literary Magazine Review, a quarterly publication, reviews literary magazines such as Ploughshares, Spoon River Poetry Review and West Branch, that publish mostly poetry and literary prose, including imaginative literature, short stories and creative non-fiction. It also publishes essays that examine current trends in literary magazines and the changing scene of writing in the United States.

"The audience is libraries, writers and readers who are interested in contemporary, cutting-edge literature. They read Literary Magazine Review so they can decide which magazines they want to subscribe to, or which ones to send their work to. Readers can also learn where to find good things to read."

Said Dean Gorden Hedahl, College of Arts and Sciences, "I think this is a marvelous endorsement of the intellectual qualities of UW-RF, and more specifically, the literary skills of our faculty in the English department."

"I knew the editor, Grant Tracey, from my school years," she said. "Later, we became reacquainted when we met at a conference. When he became fiction editor of North American Review, one of the most respected literary magazines in the country, he asked me to take over as editor of Literary Magazine Review."

She said while Tracey was trying to manage two magazines, the subscriptions for Literary Magazine Review dwindled from one 1,000 to about 300, so part of her job is to bring it back around. Just this fall, she said, she has increased subscriptions by 20.

"My primary goals are to bring subscriptions back to 1,000 and to have a magazine that people want to subscribe to," said Brantley. Her other goal is to obtain contributions to help finance the magazine. "The people of River Falls are very supportive," she said. "They have generous spirits and care about making the area look good. It looks good for River Falls to be home to a literary magazine that goes out to libraries in Scotland, in Hong Kong and in Germany."

"The reviewers don't get any money, and neither do I," said Brantley. "We get to be published and to be part of the literary world. To be asked to write a review is an honor. Only people who are good creative writers and who are current with the writing scene are asked to review."

In addition to providing more visibility for the University, the magazine is a good resource for the students, Brantley said. It provides them with the opportunity to work on a professional magazine and to be exposed to other magazines.

Coordinating the conference is the UW-RF Campus International Ambassadors, said Philip Nelson, a senior from Cottage Grove, Minn., who is majoring in speech communications at UW-RF and coordinating the conference. The Association is taking the unusual step of hosting the event off-campus to increase the attendance of students from higher education institutions in the Twin Cities metropolitan area.

York and Washington, and the awareness that there is a need for understanding and unity among students of diverse cultures. The conference hopes to find ways for American and international students to have better interaction, but also to give campus organizations across the Midwest a chance to come together.

The University of Minnesota will hold an International Coffee Hour at the beginning of the conference, which hopes to bring in 200 people. An International Coffee Hour will bring different groups together, and will be a nice introduction to the conference, said Nelson. It will also serve as an icebreaker for students and faculty.

The International Student Association helps to make UW-RF students aware of different cultures that are on campus and to ease international students into the American culture. The Ambassadors provides that connection as an organization for having fun and socializing.

The idea to hold the event started back on Sept. 9 when Nelson and other students from UW-RF attended the University of Minnesota to talk about ways for different schools to socialize. A meeting was planned for Sept. 12, but was postponed after the terrorist attacks.

Nelson and other students from the International Student Association went to Brent Greene, the director of International Programs at UW-RF, and told him of their idea to have a conference with American and international students.

There are to be different speakers at the conference focusing on areas such as why Americans are retaliating militarily against individuals or countries for the attacks, solutions to the problem, and how international student organizations help relationships between Americans and International students, especially from the Middle East. Representatives from different organizations also will have time to talk about what has been happening on their campuses.

"We are very pleased with the new students who enrolled this fall. They represent a wide variety of geographic areas and are among the best prepared students, academically, in the University's history," Tuchtenhagen said.

Two events have been scheduled in the UW-River Falls series of public forums on people, religion, and cultures of the Middle East. The events, developed in response to the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks, are sponsored by the College of Arts and Sciences. They are free and open to the public.

Derfler is an international educational consultant, public speaker, archaeologist, historian, researcher, teacher and writer who for nearly 25 years has traced the development of Western religions from their roots in the Middle East and Eastern Mediterranean countries. He brings insight to current political and social events, bridging the past with the future to promote greater understanding between people from different faiths and walks of life.

The film looks at modern-day Afghanistan through the eyes of a surgeon and a war correspondent who joined forces to set up a hospital in a country torn by wars for the past 20 years. Against all the odds, the hospital was built in the Panshir Valley, where it serves an unending stream of casualties.

According to the distributor of the film, it provides a close-up look at life in Afghanistan today. Houses and schools have been burned, sons have been killed on the battlefield, and almost everyone is hungry. Women are beaten in the street if they are wearing sandals that show part of their legs. Tanks have conquered the mountains, soldiers are trigger-happy, and the country is covered with land mines that countless innocent victims step on every day. There are many harsh and graphic scenes in the film.

Dean Gorden Hedahl and Assistant Dean Terry Brown, who is an English professor, will each attend one of the showings to introduce the film and lead the discussion afterward. In addition, faculty with expertise on the topic will be in the audience to help answer questions.

Students will read a variety of works they have created, ranging from poetry to short stories. All those interested in reading can sign up outside the English department student lounge on the second floor of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

The Student Reading Series began in the fall of 1996 with readings by student writers, then expanded to include other writers. Now between 40 and 100 people attend readings by authors, faculty, and students. Typically six readings are done each semester.

Senft is known for his work on the Ringbom Stirling engine, an externally-heated engine that can run on any fuel with high efficiency in an environmentally friendly way. They can run on any type of heat source, including fossil and nuclear fuel, geothermal energy, waste heat, or the sun.

"I listened to President George Bush, who said that we need to carry on with our lives the best that we could," said Senft. Many people from other countries offered their condolences on the terrorist attacks.

December concerts presented by the UW-River Falls music department will include various selections to highlight the holiday season. All concerts will be held in the William Abbott Concert Hall in the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building on campus, and are free and open to the public.

Grace Cajiuat said, "As we try to make sense of our chaotic situation right now, I think this Filipino song is quite timely in reminding us of what really matters and the gift that already has been given to humankind, which is creation and the simple things in life."

Poetry will be read by members of the University community throughout the programs and various soloists will be featured. Cajiuat said the audience will have the opportunity to sing carols during the program. The concert will end with the orchestra and choir performing an arrangement of "Deck the Halls," by Chip Davis of Mannheim Steamroller.

Those wondering how to read the world's most accurate sundial, which graces the south face of the UW-River Falls Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, can learn from a free-standing plaque recently installed to explain the intricacies of its workings.

The sundial, measuring 30 x 60 feet and constructed of anodized aluminum, is the largest vertical-face sundial in North America. Because it is accurate to one minute on the hour at any given time of the year, it is also the most accurate sundial in the world. Most other sundials are accurate only to within 15 minutes.

Swensen saw a sundial on a castle in Heidelberg, Germany, while vacationing there with his family in 1970, and thought a sundial would be an ideal addition to the campus of UW-River Falls. He presented the idea upon his return, but there was no money available to fund the project.

Rather than numbers, the sundial has figure eight patterns, called analemmas, to tell the time. The shadow cast by the pointer, or gnomon, tracks the sun for about 10 hours each day . Five lines run across the analemmas and correspond with special dates. The top lines are the winter solstice and the bottom are the summer solstice. The straight line between them corresponds with the vernal equinox, around March 21, when daylight and darkness are equal.

The Foreign Agriculture Service, a division of the United States Dairy Association, set up the seminar to provide training for farmers of the Kharkiv community on dairy nutrition and forage management.

The FAS worked with the Ukrainian Animal Science Research Institute, a division of the Ukraine Academy of Agrarian Science, to set up the conference. Cooper said the Science Research and Exchanges Division of the USDA was asked to recruit speakers for the seminar, and probably contacted him because he spoke at a similar conference held in the Baltic nations last year. The USDA did not have a specific topic to suggest, but it wanted something that would be relevant, and raising good quality forage is a need in many countries.

He said he received a call on a Friday to see if he was interested, and turned in a three-page proposal the following Monday. He selected Cosgrove, who teaches forage management, as his partner. Though others had submitted proposals, the USDA chose to work with UW-RF.

Cosgrove said the trip was a great experience for him and it was an excellent opportunity for the University to get some international exposure. Although it's burdensome to work into his teaching schedule, "it provides me with some useful new materials for the classroom."

Collegiate Agricultural Education Conference and a conclave for Alpha Tau Alpha, an honorary organization for agricultural education majors, were held at the convention. These two groups sponsored the competitions for college students.

UW-RF student team members included Arlaina Gonske, a senior from Rice Lake majoring in agricultural education; Jill Schaffner, a junior from Fountain City majoring in marketing communication; Wendy Kannel, a junior from Spring Valley majoring in agricultural education; and Brad Berger, a freshman from Bonduel majoring in agricultural education.

Lanette Weiner, a senior from Sparta majoring in agricultural education, took first place in the Alpha Tau Alpha essay contest with her response to the question, "At the local level, how should we educate the general public on the need for secondary school programs in agricultural education?"

Four other students, all agricultural education majors, competed in Quiz Bowl, answering questions on the subjects of technical agriculture, professional education and agricultural education organizations. The UW-RF team, consisting of Christine Carrier, a senior from Saukville; Chris Ritscher, a freshman from Alma; Joel Kuehnhold, a junior from Wisconsin Rapids; and Beth Zuelke, a junior from Stratford, placed a close second in its first round.

Graham expressed pride in the accomplishments of the students, particularly because they competed with some schools that are much larger than UW-RF. "We are competing on a national scale with major universities and we are winning," he said.

Chaired by Gov. Scott McCallum, the State Building Commission approved a request by UW-RF and the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents to fund five buildings that comprise the first stage of the project. The action represents the final stage in the project's approval by the State of Wisconsin and means groundbreaking is likely to occur next fall.

Said Chancellor Ann Lydecker, "We're excited about our ability to move ahead with the actual construction of the first phase so that we can continue to develop our dairy science program, which is a leader in the nation."

Included in the proposal is a milking center with a double-six, herringbone parlor; lactating cow barn; a transitional cows barn; a flush-flume animal waste handling system with holding tank and settling basins; a machinery storage building; and infrastructure improvements for both phases, including electricity, water, roads and parking lots.

The University will be seeking another $4 million in the 2003-05 state biennial budget for Phase II of the center. That includes a feed storage and mixing facility; a young stock barn; an arena building; a classroom building and additional parking.

During the next two years, the College also will review plans and timelines for a future robotic milking operation. Gifts and commitments to the Dairy Learning Center have been generous and the College continues to pursue corporate and private support to meet a $500,000 target that is the University's share of overall funding.

The two-day summit was held at the Midwest Express Center in Milwaukee and attended by nearly 1,000 persons from around the state on Nov. 26-27. Coordinated by the University of Wisconsin System, the Summit reviewed successes over the past year in advancing the state's economy. Numerous presentations and panel discussions also were held to outline development, infrastructure and tax issues that impact the economy.

The Summit was prompted by statewide concerns that Wisconsin's economy over the next decades will fall seriously behind the nation and other Midwestern states unless its economy shifts to higher paying jobs by including more technology in existing industries and attracting and growing high tech industry.

Data presented at the Summit shows that Wisconsin per capita income lags behind the national average by about $1,400 and nearly $4,000 behind Minnesota. That means workers cumulatively are earning $7 billion less based on the national average and $21 billion less than Minnesota, which is nearly identical in its workforce size. Should this downward trend continue, by the year 2020 Wisconsin's average income will be equal to such states as Idaho, Montana, Alabama, West Virginia and Mississippi.

"The region had a very visible presence at the Summit with two excellent presentations by BioDiagnostics and the Alliance," Lydecker said. Those presentations and the networking efforts of others from the region means "the state is becoming more and more aware of the development potential of the Twin Cities-to-Eau Claire corridor."

Schultz was a panelist on the state's biotechnology and biomedical industry cluster, with panelists from the Madison biotech firm of Stratatech Corp., the Medical College of Wisconsin, and Mirus Corp. of Madison.

UW Extension Chancellor Kevin Reilly, who moderated the regional panel, noted that the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance demonstrates "a story that represents the positioning of communities, businesses and individuals to be successful in the future economy. It is at a crossroads place that points the way towards successful partnerships."

Regnier related her presentation to remarks by McCallum and other presenters who noted that one of Wisconsin's greatest strengths in drawing highly educated workers and entrepreneurs is the state's quality of life.

Since his relocation into the River Falls industrial park last year he has tripled the size of his accounts and has doubled his work force to 40 full-time positions and up to 20 part-time UW-RF student employees.

The event, sponsored by the department of history and philosophy, is a sequel to an earlier session on the topic held Oct. 16. The featured speakers are Associate Professor Charles Rader of the department of geography and Professors Edward Peterson and Betty Bergland of the department of history and philosophy. There will be a discussion period after the presentations.

Two of the talented writers are English majors who will present their senior readings; Jessica Matelski, a senior from Somerset and Bryan Mulrooney, a senior from River Falls. Three other writers who are English majors and will read include Clare Lockman, a junior from Roseville, Minn.; Joe Kilsdonk, a junior from Duluth majoring; and Shannon Pingel, a senior from New Auburn.

It began in the fall of 1996 with readings by students writers, then expanded to include other writers. Now, 40 to 100 people attend readings by authors, faculty and students. Typically, six readings are done each semester.

The logo was created by Hudson resident Tony Bredahl, art director in the publications office. It consists of two primary components: a bold representation of the university's acronym, UW-RF; and a circular graphic depicting the meandering Kinnickinnic River along with a stylized falcon, the university's mascot. The circle motif symbolizes the unending search for truth that occurs at UW-River Falls, a basic mission that engages students and faculty alike. The river and falcon symbols express the unique character of the university. The South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River runs through campus, providing both academic and artistic inspiration.

Last May was an exciting time on the campus of UW-River Falls. A new chancellor had just been inaugurated and the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents was scheduled to visit for the first time in eight years.

In between those two events, a severe hailstorm struck that caused huge losses throughout the community. One of the hardest hit spots on the campus were to the two greenhouses at the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

"The windows in the older greenhouses, which were made of glass, were completely shattered. Those in the newer greenhouse to the south were made of double acrylic, and most of the holes only penetrated one layer of the system," said James Murphy of the facilities management department.

Most student projects were a total loss. Many of the projects were ready for final presentation including the projects of a soil fertility class, whose students harvest their crops and report on them. Most faculty projects, housed in the newer greenhouses, were saved. Fortunately, the only damage sustained to computers was to a weather station on top of the greenhouse.

Since the inside of the greenhouses has been exposed to the elements since the hailstorm, there is damage to pipes, and the insulation that covers them still must be repaired. In addition, plants must be repotted, new cuttings must be taken, and the remaining glass shards must be removed.

Said Dean Bill Anderson, "Jim has engaged students in the learning process in an exemplary way. He has prepared them very well for their careers by responding to their changing needs with an array of practical, real-life experiences."

Zeon, who teaches multicultural education, educational psychology and introduction to middle and secondary education in the College of Education and Professional Studies, was selected by a committee of three former recipients of the award, with input from students.

Her award included an honorarium of $250, to be used for any professional seminars, activities, books, software or classroom materials. Zeon teaches foundation of multicultural education, educational psychology and introduction to middle and secondary education, and is involved with grant-writing projects, research and service within the college.

Upon receiving the award, Zeon said, "There is an incredibly rich environment at UW-RF in which to pursue scholarship and to work with students. We are also encouraged to reach out and serve the community. This is the best atmosphere a professor could ask for."

The prestigious award is granted to one student each year who is enrolled in an art education program in any Wisconsin higher education institution, and is a junior or senior with a grade point average of 3.0 or higher. The student must demonstrate leadership and commitment to the art education field.

In a workshop at the conference, Allen and several other art education students, along with Professor Lynn Jermal from the art department at UW-RF, will present a session on their involvement with Service Learning activities.

Allen worked last summer with a community mural team to execute a millennium mural in the Chalmer Davee Library on campus. The mural was a Service Learning project, for which Jermal was project coordintor. Allen helped to prepare the wall, finalize the design and draw it on the wall, and give it the final touches.

Said Jermal, "Sara is a delight to be with, full of generosity and joy, willing to work hard and help others. I feel she will be an excellent teacher, because she already has such a strong sense of professionalism. She is the kind of person we want to have in the field, and is an excellent representative for UW-River Falls."

Case-control studies in the U.S., Canada, and Europe have identified eating undercooked ground beef, visiting farms and handling animals on the farm as principal risk factors for becoming infected. Cattle manure, of which an estimated 1.2 billion tons are produced annually in the U.S., appears to be a principal source of the E. coli O157 problem. Animals, water and food that contact cattle manure are potential vehicles.

Doyle calls for more aggressive preventive steps on the farm, and he will discuss how effective control programs to substantially reduce the E coli infections requires intervention strategies throughout the food continuum, from farm to table. These techniques at the farm include competitive exclusion bacteria, innovative vaccines, bacteriophage, and targeted animal management practices addressing common points of contamination.

Consumers also have a role in implementing intervention controls in food handling and preparation. But Doyle states, unfortunately, that many consumers eat high risk foods, improperly handle and store foods, and ignore warnings regarding foods known to be unsafe.

Art for the auction will be donated by current and former students, faculty and emeriti, and artists from the community. Proceeds will be donated to the American Red Cross, which has guaranteed that all the money raised will be used to assist the victims in New York City.

Classes for Senior Outreach Studies at UW-River Falls are scheduled to run on Tuesdays and Thursdays for four weeks, beginning Tuesday, Oct. 23. The two courses offered this year will focus on the topics of agriculture and writing, and each will consist of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion period.

The world is dysfunctional, but artists can make it functional by interpreting it for us. These are the words of prominent sculptor Kinji Akagawa of Afton, whose philosophy is that love and care are the glue that bring people together, and that artists can unite us through the love and care that is manifested in their work.

Annual Outdoor Art Installation sponsored by the UW-River Falls art department the week of Oct. 8-12. During the first two days of the event students created temporary outdoor works designed to highlight specific sites on campus. The public was invited to view the installations during the last three days.

Akgawa was on campus Oct. 10, to conduct a walking tour of the outdoor installations students had created. His visit included a lecture and public slide show, in which he defined public art and discussed its role in the community.

His life's work has been to study relationships and to understand and express those concepts through his art. The art he creates for public places is designed to bring people together for a common experience.

"I use indigenous local materials, and incorporate nature whenever I can," said Akagawa. "I also use images from various cultures so everyone is represented, so we can listen to each other and come to a consensus about the kind of world we want to live in. This will be good for all of us, and good for the next generation."

Public art is a product of the modern world, he said. It has evolved through the changes that have come to society since the middle of the 20th Century; changes such as the civil rights movement and feminism.

The story of Crow and Weasel is rooted in Native American mythology. It tells the story of the adventures of Crow and Weasel as the twosome travels to far and fantastic lands in search of a new creature that is hairless and featherless, in fact, a new kind of creature who may be a human being.

Rich with poetic imagery, moving dialogue and dance, "Crow and Weasel" appeals to people of all ages. Like all good mythology, it uses simple storytelling devices to teach. It reminds us of our humility, our personal strength and the sanctity of life.

The play is based on a collection of stories by Barry Lopez and adapted for the stage by Jim Leonard, Jr. Set design and lighting is by Professor of Speech Communication and Theatre Ken Stofferahn. Costume design is by special student Moria Clinton, a speech communication major from River Falls, who has combined Native American imagery with her own powerful imagination to create interesting and evocative costumes.

"We are pleased to partner with the River Falls Area Chamber of Commerce to promote the Celebrate Winter on the Sparkling St. Croix campaign," Gov. McCallum said. "The communities? dedication, vitality, and proximity to major tourism markets will help the campaign meet its goals."

The St. Croix Riverway communities will use a multi-faceted campaign to bring travelers back to the area during the winter months. The Celebrate Winter campaign will feature a direct mailing to Upper Midwest media outlets, participation in winter sports shows, and the construction of a region-specific Web site.

Before heading to Ramer Field at 1 p.m to cheer the Falcons as they take on the UW-LaCrosse Eagles in the homecoming game, alumni and friends will be hosted at a complimentary continental breakfast in the deli area on the main level of Hagestad Student Center, from 10-11 a.m.

Tickets purchased for the football game will also provide admission to the hockey game scheduled for 7:05 p.m. Saturday, when the UW-RF Falcons take on the Marian College Sabres from Fond du Lac at Hunt Arena. Tickets will also be on sale at the door.

He has been awarded several fellowships and honors, including a Yaddo Fellowship, a MacDowell Fellowship and a Breadloaf Scholarship. He has twice been a finalist in the National Poetry Competition, and has been co-editor of The Laurel Review and asistant editor of The Georgia Review.

Members of the UW-River Falls Prairie Project Group, an interest group of teachers and local landowners, are keeping a watchful eye on the weather in the hope that they can conduct a burn this fall to protect three acres of original prairie land on campus. The burn must be conducted once the plants are dormant and conditions are dry, but before the first freeze.

Wahl Amphitheatre, on a dirt road leading to Campus Laboratory Farm No. 1, according to plant and earth science assistant Professor Eric Sanden. "This land is believed to be an original relic sight," said Sanden, a member of the group. "The land has been untouched because it is the site of an old railroad bed. The railroad tracks have been dug up, and the bed has been converted to a walking and biking path. The land around it has been left in an unfarmed and natural state."

Sanden said the burn will improve the conditions of the land, and will preserve it for the future. It will also prepare the land for new plantings of indigenous species, such as silver buffaloberry and butterfly weed in the spring; wild bergamot and yellow coneflower in the summer; and little bluestem and indiangrass in the fall.

The burn will get rid of unwanted weeds and will clean out the woody vegetation, he said. Once an initial burn has been made, there will be several years in a row where burning will be needed to get rid of woody species that are invading and infesting the area. After that, a maintenance burn will be done every few years to keep out the non-indigenous species.

Sanden said that Campus Planner Dale Braun has been very helpful in making sure that nothing disturbs the site, such as the plans for a new student center and a Health and Human Performance building. Horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss, another member of the group, has plans to develop an entryway garden filled with the indigenous species and name cards so people can identify what they see when walking through the land.

High School in Waupun. She says she designs classroom projects that push her students to hypothesize, experiment, and research. "This type of learning motivates students to dig deeper into subject areas," she said. "In my classes there are no losers, only constant learning trials."

Larson began his career at Freedom High School in Freedom in 1987, and moved to Freedom Middle School in 1998 where, he says, his love for children and teaching helped him to connect positively with students, both in and out of the classroom.

State Superintendent Elizabeth Burmaster said of the awards, "There are some who want to tear our teachers down. I say it is time to treat teachers like the professionals they are and recognize the important contributions they make in providing every child in Wisconsin a quality education."

Most of the pieces the group plays were written within the last 20 years, and many specifically for Zeitgeist. For the concert, Zeitgeist will perform pieces by contemporary composers Annie Gosfield, Roger Kleier, and Terry Riley.

Adlerian Psychology is a broad and comprehensive body of knowledge about human behavior begun in the early 1900s by Alfred Adler. At its core is the concept that all human activity is best understood in a social context. All people strive for a sense of belonging in the world and act on the useful or useless side of life, depending on their degree of interest in the betterment of the human family. When related to college students and their myriad of social relationships, Adlerian Psychology helps young people understand the value and process of living in a community.

As a part of his training at the Adler School, Ballou received a full tuition scholarship from the International Committee for Adlerian Summer Schools and Institutes to travel to Zuoz, Switzerland, during the summer of 2000 to attend the Dreikurs Summer Institute. There he studied Adlerian family counseling under Oscar Christensen and advanced lifestyle assessment under Miriam Pew. Christensen and Pew are noted Adlerian trainers.

Ballou has been dean of students at UW-RF since 1992. He has a bachelor's degree from the University of Maine, a master's degree from the College of William and Mary, and a doctorate from Purdue University. His areas of academic study have been college student development and marriage and family therapy.

In addition to his administrative responsibilities at UW-RF, Ballou leads an honors seminar each semester at the University where students learn the history and function of basic Adlerian concepts and how these can be applied in educational and family-life settings.

Ballou is also a licensed associate marriage and family therapist in Minnesota, a parent educator and trainer in Wisconsin, and a member of the American Association for Marriage and Family Therapy. Ballou and his wife Joni have one son, Graham, age 17.

The Foundation, a federally endowed program designed to strengthen instruction about the Constitution in the nations schools, will award generous fellowships in 2001 for master's degree-level graduate study of the framing and history of the U.S. Constitution. College seniors and college graduates who intend to become secondary school teachers of American history, American government or social studies are eligible for the fellowships.

Through a nationwide competition, James Madison Fellowships will be awarded to at least one legal resident of each state, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the other U.S. territories. After completing study under their fellowships, James Madison fellows are required to teach American history, American government or social studies in grades 7-12 for a minimum of one year for each academic year of graduate assistance they receive.

Constitution and Bill of Rights is required of all fellows, normally during the summer after the commencement of study. Fellows' attendance at the summer institute is paid for by the Madison Foundation.

The works of three UW-River Falls art faculty members are included in a seven-month display in Madison, with one of the works being selected for permanent exhibition by the University of Wisconsin System.

Seventeen art faculty members from the 26-campus University of Wisconsin System are represented in the first Brittingham Art Invitational. Brittingham House in Madison is the official residence of System President Katharine Lyall. Thousands of dignitaries, academic leaders and alumni from across the nation regularly visit Brittingham House as Lyall's guests.

All three UW-RF artists' works will be displayed there through April 8. In addition, one of three photos representing Heberlein's entries has been put on display in Van Hise Hall, which serves as the administrative headquarters for the UW System and serves as the board room for the Board of Regents.

Said Lyall of the invitational, "We have a tremendous amount of talent in our art departments on all of our two-year and four-year campuses, and the Brittingham Art Invitational is a wonderful opportunity to display this talent to the state."

"Obviously, I'm honored and feel very proud to be accepted as part of the permanent collection. I'm also delighted that River Falls is represented in the exhibit by three of our faculty. We're all excited that System has chosen to highlight the contributions of art on our campuses across the state."

"It seems particularly appropriate for these works to be exhibited in a university system setting," said Guest Curator Christie Charbonneau Wells, an oil painter and former curator of the Indiana State University Permanent Art Collection.

"For the individual artist, creating art often involves an immersion in self that can be an isolating experience. This exhibition provides an important opportunity to view current work and establish a dialogue among artists and a broader community."

"All of their works are very prominently displayed in Brittingham House and will be appreciated by everyone who visits there," Lydecker said. "I'm extremely proud of their artistic contributions and their reflection on our faculty and University."

Chancellor Ann Lydecker made the announcement on Aug. 27 at the opening meeting for faculty and academic staff, where she congratulated Mottaz and presented him with a check. He will also receive a plaque to commemorate the honor.

Said Lydecker, " Good advising is a critical component of the education we provide. It ensures that our students are able to move forward in a timely manner to graduate and to pursue successful careers. Professor Mottaz is always available to his students to answer their questions and to provide thoughtful advice.

Mottaz received another honor this year when, in a different ceremony, he was recognized as the 2001 "Outstanding Faculty Member of the Year in Social and Behavioral Sciences" for the College of Arts and Sciences at the University.

Their talents have earned them rave reviews and an armful of awards, including the prestigious Performing Arts Entertainers of the Year award. They have also been named Entertainers of the Year, Best Major Performance and Best Touring Production.

The faculty and students will create outdoor works designed to highlight a specific site on campus. The works may take the form of a colorful quilt made entirely of natural materials, a clothesline of photographs, or larger than life dancing pine needle figures.

This year the invited guest is Kinji Akagawa, an internationally recognized sculptor who focuses his work on art in public spaces. A professor of sculpture at the Minneapolis College of Art and Design, Akagawa will work on a guest installation with the art students.

Construction of the installations will begin Monday, Oct. 8. The finished installations can be viewed from Wednesday, Oct. 10, to Friday, Oct. 12. All who view the works are asked to please respect the artistic ideas and to not alter or damage the artwork.

Faculty Member of the Year" awards from the colleges for the fields they teach in. The faculty were selected for the awards by students, and the awards recently were presented by the deans for each of the colleges at their faculty meetings.

Associate Professor Jacque Foust, who teaches marketing in was named outstanding faculty member for the College of Business and Economics. Foust has taught at the University since 1985, and serves as the chair of business administration and accounting. Previously he was a vice president of Paine Webber Commodities in Chicago for 18 years.

Comments from the students who voted for Faust included: "Those students with experience in business-related topics were encouraged to share their experience with the class. Jacque was always willing to listen to school concerns and offer guidance or suggestions when appropriate."

College of Business and Economics Dean Barbara Nemecek, who is in her first year in the newly-created position at the University, said, "I was really quite pleased to be able to give this award to Jacque, especially because Jacque was instrumental in encouraging me to come to River Falls. He was the head of the search committee for a dean last year."

Said Foust of the award, "I feel very honored to receive this recognition from the College. This is an exciting and rewarding place to work because of our students and because of my colleagues who not only value students but also each other."

Duerst has been on the chemistry faculty since 1981, primarily teaching chemistry courses for non-science and elementary education majors. Throughout the 1990s, Duerst was project director for two major teacher enhancement grants sponsored by the National Science Foundation, totaling more than $700,000. She has also conducted teacher workshops and has led science presentations to more than 14,000 children in classrooms and libraries, and at Girl and Boy Scout meetings.

Mottaz, who has taught at UW-RF since 1969, previously worked as a social caseworker for St. Paul Family Services. His professional experience includes the publication of a number of papers on topics related to work and occupations, such as work satisfaction, work alienation and organizational commitment.

Studies program in addition to teaching speech communication. She is past president and current board member of the Organization for the Study of Communication, Language and Gender. In 1991, she was recipient of the Cheris Kramarae Outstanding Dissertation Award.

College of Arts and Sciences Dean Gorden Hedahl said of the award, "It is important to recognize and celebrate outstanding teaching, as that is the heart of our mission and one of the primary motivations for the faculty who have chosen to make their careers at UW-River Falls. This award is especially significant, as it is chosen by students who have graduated and who have entered the work force, so they are able to reflect on their entire University experience and recognize those who have made lasting impacts on their lives and careers.

"Keith, Marilyn, Cliff and Barb are all exemplary teachers and I am extremely pleased that their dedication and ability to inspire has been acknowledged by their former students. They also serve as models and representatives for the large number of quality faculty members who work as effective educators and mentors for our students."

Derfler has been a part-time lecturer for political science and history courses at UW-RF, and is currently teaching an outreach course there on the subject of ancient Near East. He also operates a private, nonprofit educational organization, Educational Resources Incorporated, whose mission is to promote understanding and tolerance between different ethnic and religious groups through innovative, interdisciplinary programming.

At UW-RF, the response to the terrorist attacks on Sept. 9 has been to bring students, faculty and staff together to talk through the trauma. The forums and gatherings have given them a chance to discuss what happened and why, and how the events will change the way they do business and live their lives.

Vern McGinnis, vice president of strategic planning and corporate services for GROWMARK, presented the award to Carlson in recognition of his dedication to students of UW-RF as a professor, adviser and friend. "Through your leadership in student internships and ag clubs, you have shaped their future and the future of agriculture," he said.

He has been the faculty coordinator for agronomy internships at the University since 1978, and has served on the College Recruitment and Retention committee and the University Public Relations committee.

The Falcon Pullers driver in the 800-pound class, Katherine Bakke, was a last-minute addition to the team. She was the only person who could drive the tractor and still make the designated weight requirement. The driver in the 1,050 pound class was Brian Peterson.

"The team learned a lot about design and presentations. They worked with sponsors, learned fundraising techniques, and learned how to work together at the last minute to make adjustments," said Assistant Professor Derek Whitelock from the agriculture engineering department who is the team advisor.

"This is a new student organization on campus. The funds not only benefit the students? personal growth, but the University as well. The team created and built a lasting symbol of the university in the tractor," said Ronning.

The Student Writing Series began at UW-RF in the fall of 1996 with readings by student writers. Now, 40 to 100 people typically attend readings by authors, faculty and students at each of the six readings each semester. This semester one more author, William Trowbridge, will read his work. There will also be three student readings, which operate in a first come, first serve manner.

Artists of various age, cultures and lifestyles recently united to create a mural at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Chalmer Davee Library. The artwork, "Find Your Dream," characterizes contemporary life and celebrates cultural and environmental diversity in the St. Croix Valley.

The mural, which measures 7.5-feet high by 18-feet wide, depicts and celebrates life in the St. Croix Valley region at the turn of the millennium, said Chalmer Davee Library Director Christina Baum. The mural invites viewers to consider the importance of the environment and dreams, and to serve as a visual time capsule of life at the start of the new millenium.

For two weeks, these high school science teachers from around the United States and the world studied about a revolutionary astronomy project located a mile below the ice sheet on the world's southern polar cap.

AMANDA is a revolutionary style of telescope whose goal is to map the universe by tracking neutrinos as these infinitesimally small particles pass through the earth. The project was launched in 1994, with the present mile-deep telescope completed in 1999.

Said Pettersson: "I was looking for projects that would add more of an environmental dimension to my classes." As he began to surf the Internet for classroom ideas one he came across was for the Polar Ice Caps. At the site he saw a link that said "Grants for Teachers."

Pettersson intends to incorporate numerous dimensions into his classroom including science, the humanities and social sciences that will introduce topics as narrowly focused as AMANDA to the more general, such as polar exploration and expeditions as well as humanity's use of natural resources.

UW-RF's Madsen said the AMANDA workshop, in its second year, is intended to help high school teachers reverse the national trend of decreasing numbers of young people who are choosing science as a career.

"The key thing from the workshop is to let young people know about all the really amazing things going on in the sciences," Madsen said. "When I was a student, you read about things from 200 years ago; about things that were already done.

The institute featured four speakers over a three-day period who addressed the issue of representations of Native Americans in film, and the use of film as a classroom teaching tool on issues of racial diversity.

"Into a more public forum," she said. "I reach a much wider audience." Her work has also allowed her to give Native Americans a voice in films about themselves, a different perspective from many other filmmakers. All footage shot in Native American communities and research gathered is shown to the people who are subjects of the film. Everything, including the music that is chosen, is shared.

Green said many filmmakers over the years have shot footage of Native Americans and then taken that footage back to the studio with them, leaving the community without a true voice in the final product.

Another speaker, Charlene Teters, stressed to the educators that it is important to view Native Americans in a modern context, not simply emphasizing history 100 years old. As a graduate student at the University of Illinois, Teeters gained national attention in her efforts to depose Chief Illiniwek as the university's mascot.

Promoting teacher and student awareness in film of major ethnic groups is the major goal of the institute. The areas of study were African-American, Asian-American, Native-American and Latino-American cultures, films and books. The 24 participants discussed how to implement visual and multicultural literacy into their classroom curriculum. Facilitated by UW-RF English Professors Carole Gerster and Laura Zlogar, keynote speakers included nationally recognized authors, film makers and scholars.

Set amidst the scenic St. Croix Valley, UW-RF is a four-year public comprehensive university of 5,800 students located in western Wisconsin about 25 miles from Minneapolis-St. Paul, Minn. The accessibility to the Twin Cities provides attendees with cultural and recreational opportunities while attending the summer film institute.

Gerster and Zlogar are co-authoring a book for high school teachers about teaching multi cultural and visual literacy in the classroom. "Teaching Visual/Multicultural Literacy in the Secondary Classroom," will include teaching techniques and curriculum submitted by teachers attending the seminar and essays provided by keynote speakers.

Weekend activities that are available will include campus tours, a tour of the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp facilities, a jazz concert, a performance of "Moon Over Buffalo" by the St. Croix Valley Summer Theatre, a barbecue and a banquet.

Alums also will have an opportunity for specialty tours or presentations, including the Swensen Sundial, the new Wyman Education Building, Greenhouse, Glass Labs, and food sciences. There will be a special presentation by Physics Professor Jim Madsen on his travel to the South Pole to participate in the AMANDA telescope project.

The celebration continues with a "Dignitaries Platform Address," allowing each governor to express views on tourism in the region, and the importance of bi-state alliances like this one. Also attending are Wisconsin Department of Tourism Secretary Moose Speros and Minnesota Office of Tourism Executive Director John Erdman.

The historic St. Croix Valley and Osceola Railway train departs at 2 p.m. with the Governors and guests for a 90-minute round trip train ride. The breathtaking views of the St. Croix River Valley from Osceola, Wis. to Marine on St. Croix, Minn. are one of the many reasons tourists are attracted to the region.

Institute is designed to promote awareness of the representations of four major ethnic groups in film. The groups represented in this Institute are African American, Asian American, Native American and Latino American.

This year 24 secondary education teachers from across the country are attending the institute. The aim of the Institute is to promote awareness of minority culture, ethics and values in film. Teachers of English, history, social sciences and film are selected to attend the NEH Institute through applications, essays, and recommendations by school staff and administration. This year over 300 teachers applied to participate in the Institute. The participants will develop their own curriculum based on the information they learn at the Institute and will involve promotion or reversal of ethnic stereotypes through film.

"We examine how high school teachers can use film effectively to help their students understand both the ever-changing dynamics of America's cultural diversity and the role of film in shaping those dynamics," said Gerster.

In the College of Arts and Sciences, two faculty members were granted tenure changes and seven were promoted. Tenure was granted to Assistant Professor Kristin A. Tjornehoj of the music department. Assistant Professor Sandra J. Ellis of the journalism department was granted tenure and promoted to associate professor.

Two promotions and a granting of tenure were awarded to associate professors in the College of Education and Graduate Studies. Florence A. Monsour and Geoffrey W. Scheurman promoted to professor, and Associate Professor Margaret M. Phinney was granted tenure. All three are in the teacher education department.

In the College of Business and Economics, there were three promotions. Associate professors Hamid Tabesh and John R. Walker of the economics department were both promoted to professor. Ahmad Abuhejleh of the computer science and information systems department was promoted from assistant professor to associate professor.

Though the workers are industrious and reliable, farmers are finding it difficult to train them because of the language differences. It is especially important for the workers to know some English so they can understand safety-related issues on the farm and have the skills necessary to communicate with doctors and to pay bills.

English to speakers of other languages this summer, with an emphasis on tutoring at a dairy operation. Graduates of the courses will put their new skills to work tutoring Spanish-speaking employees on Wisconsin dairy farms, during the months of July and August.

Said Katrina Larsen, outreach program manager at UW-RF, "There will be one tutor per farm, working with anywhere from seven to 15 people, depending on the size of the farm. Each tutor will work for 25 hours, distributing the learning over a three- or four-week period. The tutors will have lesson plans and work sheets, and they will work in a classroom set up somewhere on the farm, such as an office, a break room or a garage. They will probably work in the barn as well, identifying things by their English name."

Larsen said the tutoring project benefits everyone involved. Non-English speaking workers are helping to make it possible for Wisconsin milk producers to meet production. The workers who come here are earning much more than they could in their own countries. They send much of what they earn back to their families, and when they can, they bring their families here. They also provide the farmers with connections to more workers when they need them. The tutors learn a valuable skill that they can take with them and use in other situations, as well.

The classes will be held from June 18 to 29, and they can be taken for undergraduate credit, graduate credit or no credit hours. Tutors will teach the basic skills of reading, writing, speaking and listening , as well as strategies for learning a second language and the variables that influence the learning of a language.

The cost runs from $200 to $627, depending on the level. A high school diploma is the only prerequisite for enrollment. A stipend of $250 is provided to tutors who complete the field experience, to help defray their costs.

Bergh is a graduate of Weslayan University in Middletown, Conn., where he was enrolled in the Science in Society program and received an award of distinction for his thesis project, "Ecological Agriculture in Minnesota." He has enhanced his knowledge of organic food production in the years since with numerous workshops and training classes.

The list of publications, presentations and advisory situations through which he has shared his expertise is extensive, ranging from appearances on a Minnesota Public Radio "Midday" broadcast to presentations at organic farming conferences, to consultations for the Latvian Ministry of Agriculture in the Republic of Latvia.

Members of the Advisory Council for the College provide assistance and advice to improve the agriculture, food and environmental sciences industry through the educational opportunities offered at UW-River Falls. They promote the College in its interaction with industry colleagues, community leaders, state and federal legislators and the higher education community.

Advisory Council Members are appointed to renewable three-year terms, beginning and ending in June. In addition to their expertise, members donate their time, travel expenses and other expenses. They make a significant contribution to the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences.

Wahl plays the acoustic guitar and harmonica, with a lighthearted sound that appeals to any age group. Wahl, a professional performer for six years, tours the Midwest performing at fairs, festivals, colleges, universities, casinos, corporate parties, coffee shops and bookstores.

Jazz saxophonist Doug Little is a member of the group "Motion Poets" and is also a celebrated composer. In 1998, Little was awarded the McKnight Fellowship by the American Composers Forum. He is the youngest recipient and the only jazz composer to receive the award.

UW-River Falls counselor Gretchen Link received the distinguished social worker award from the Wisconsin Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers in recognition of her professionalism and dedication to her students. The award was presented to Link at the annual NASW convention in Milwaukee on May 11.

According to UW-RF social work Professor Ruth Kalms, who nominated Link for the honor, "Gretchen Link is a strong advocate for students and others needing counseling here on campus. She has a quiet, articulate manner that allows both staff and students to hear her and then develop a helping relationship with her."

Since 1981, Link has been a senior counselor for career and counseling services at UW-RF, where she helps students cope with a myriad of problems that include depression, physical and sexual abuse, drug and alcohol poisoning and abuse, and other personal or academic problems.

The Wisconsin Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers is the largest organization of professional social workers in Wisconsin, representing over 2,500 professionals. Wisconsin NASW members are employed in a variety of settings, including public and private human service agencies, schools and colleges, mental health facilities, hospitals, nursing homes, industry and private practice.

Admissions Director Alan Tuchtenhagen said his department would particularly be interested in processing admissions applications from returning, older students and high school graduates from western Wisconsin.

Tuchtenhagen noted that UW River Falls has some unique programs that are not available at many other universities, such as biotechnology, geographic information systems, environmental science, Teaching English to Speakers of Other Languages, horticulture, as well as food science and technology.

Beginning this summer, educators from Wisconsin and Minnesota are asking, "Who are Americans?" The search for answers is the topic of discussion during "Still Searching for America: Conversations on National Identity," a curriculum development and demonstration project funded by a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities.

The technique portion offers hands-on teaching opportunities to help participants extend these conversations to their own students. Teachers learn from the expertise of local and regional scholars in the subjects of American and world history, American literature and film, as well as specialists in the field of education.

During the project, participants will design and implement lessons on the "Search for the American Identity" in their own classrooms and then present an in-service plan with matching support from their home district. During each of these activities, teachers work with mentors from UW-RF and enjoy access to resources via a lending library and national website devoted to the project.

Project director and UW-RF teacher education Professor Geoffrey Scheurman, suggested that teachers must find ways to deal with issues related to citizenship and history: "The focus of the seminar is on understanding the changes that have taken place over time and helping teachers to develop authentic ways to bring important discussions about American culture to their students."

History Professor Kurt Leichtle, seminar co-director, described the need to redefine the American identity: "There is a cycle that exists for identity, which coincides with historical periods." He went on to explain how American culture has struggled for a sense of singularity in a nation so tolerant of diversity. According to Leichtle, seminars covering highlights in American History with special emphasis on patterns and case studies since 1945 will help teachers understand these cycles.

Scheurman added, "Innovative teaching techniques will be emphasized to help teachers and students make sense of the many images of America that have confronted people throughout history, from famous documents to popular media." Referred to as "authentic instruction and assessment," these methods of analysis are as important to learning as the facts. Students develop skills to interpret and negotiate the meaning of information rather than learning by rote.

Scheduled for 2002 participation is Barry Beyer, a nationally recognized leader in critical thinking from George Mason University in Fairfax, Va., who will help teachers develop ways to implement standards without sacrificing student thinking.

Lydecker at UW-River Falls . Brown, who most recently was an instructor in the political science department of Indiana University of Pennsylvania, will provide daily assistance to the chancellor on a wide variety of assignments that focus on internal and external relations.

In the two weeks that he has been here, he has truly impressed me with his ability to quickly identify key issues of our campus and state, and immediately engage in action and follow-through. I am extremely happy that he has joined our leadership team."

His responsibilities will include assisting with preparation for meetings, special events and functions; coordinating institutional planning and accreditation; conducting institutional research; and monitoring state and national policy development, to name a few.

He has worked as a graduate assistant and a graduate research assistant in public and international affairs and business administration; as a senior market analyst and independent franchise development consultant for Coldwell Banker Real Estate in Atlanta, Ga.; and in management positions at a variety of companies in California.

Beck feels she made a significant contribution to the University with her strong support for the Great Ideas in Humanities course, which reflected her academic background and her enthusiasm for interdisciplinary studies.

She says the most noticeable changes at UW-RF are the status of women (there is no longer a dress code, or curfews for women in the residence halls); the cyclical passion of students (it was strong in the 1960s, then mellowed, and has become strong again ); and the reality of a market-driven curriculum that may threaten liberal arts and general education programs.

Concerning change, Brictson is not sure things have changed as much as they have remained the same. UW-RF students still come from small Wisconsin towns and the Twin Cities. Many of them are still the first in the family to attend college, and most still work to pay for their own education. UW-RF faculty are as dedicated as ever to their students.

He says his most significant contribution to the University has been his work on the Employee Assistance and alcohol and drug education programs, and the development of human relations course activities in the College of Education.

The positive change he has seen on campus is the plan for new buildings and the remodeling of old buildings. However, he is concerned about the reduction of counseling services provided to students, because if students have to use a local mental health service they will need insurance that covers it, and they will receive a mental health diagnosis.

Helminiak developed the health fair for second graders that was an annual event for 18 years, until it became too expensive and time-consuming. Between four and five thousand kids from 56 schools within a 100-mile radius of the university attended. He felt what the youngsters learned at the health fair were important to their emotional and social stability.

He thinks the most noticeable change on campus is that faculty and staff are not always as nice as they should be to students, and treating students well is part of providing them with a meaningful experience and a well-rounded education.

Henderson hopes to be remembered as an outstanding teacher who had a positive influence on students. He feels that being part of the building of an outstanding academic department was his most significant accomplishment.

Larson said there have been tremendous improvements in the physical facilities since he arrived on campus, but expresses concern that the pressure put on young faculty to do research will endanger the traditional emphasis on excellence in teaching at UW-RF.

She has enjoyed watching them grow, and has appreciated their eagerness to learn. Soares says she has learned a great deal from her students as well, and many of them remain good friends with whom she keeps in touch.

Soares once fantasized about an electronic French dictionary that would give her the French definition and English translation of a word. Now, by bringing a CD into her classroom and booting it up at the beginning of class, she can make her fantasy come true.

Schoolteachers learned how to integrate popular software packages into their classrooms at "Spring Fling Technology Thing: Project-Based Integration of Technology Conference," during a Spring semester workshop at UW-River Falls.

A total of 102 people attended the conference, including teachers, vendors, presenters and members of the Technology Leadership Cadre, UW-RF education students who help faculty and teachers use various kinds of technology in their classrooms.

Workshops in three break-out sessions were designed to show teachers what technology is available to them and how they can use it. Some of the options included the chance to learn to create videos with digital cameras, design a web page, use PowerPoint for presentations, or use PhotoShop to create graphics with photos.

There was a keynote address on "How the Internet is Changing How We Learn and Teach," by William A. Draves, who is one of the foremost authorities in the world on online learning. Draves is author of "Teaching Online" and "Learning on the Net." More than 3,000 teachers have taken his online courses on teaching, making him the most popular online teacher in education in the nation.

Three faculty and staff members and 40 students were inducted during a banquet and ceremony. They were welcomed into the society by the chapter president, Professor Ian Williams of the plant and earth science department. One faculty member, Associate Dean Mary Manke of the College of Education & Professional Studies, who was already a member of the Society, was inducted into the UW-RF chapter.

The keynote speaker was UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker, who spoke about excellence, and how excellence fosters excellence: excellent faculty produce excellent students, who in turn exhibit excellence in what they do.

Four key administrative positions have been filled at UW-River Falls, following conclusion of national searches and approval of the selection for the institutio's No. 2 administrator by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents on May 11.

Those selected include a new provost and vice chancellor for academic affairs, a founding dean for the College of Business and Economics, a dean of outreach and graduate studies, and an assistant chancellor for university advancement.

University and a doctorate in Germanic linguistics from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. She also has a master's degree in German linguistics from the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign and a bachelor's degree in German from Denison University, from which she graduated magna cum laude.

Most recently, Coombs held the position of vice president for academic affairs at Oklahoma City University, Okla., where she provided leadership in the planning, organization, administration and evaluation of the total education program in seven schools of the University.

Coombs served as vice president of academic affairs and dean of the college at Central College in Pella, Iowa, and was associate academic dean at Concordia College in Moorhead, Minn., from July 1990 to 1994. She was responsible for curriculum development, the faculty development program, special academic programs such as the honors program and international education, as well as summer school.

Coombs is a member of the American Council of Academic Deans. She has been a member of the Board of Directors since 1999 and has published a number of books and articles, most dealing with the German language and culture.

Barbara Nemecek will serve as founding dean and chief academic officer for the newly established College of Business and Economics. She will provide intellectual leadership to the College, and will represent the University in regional economic development activities. Nemecek will oversee the planning and budgeting processes, make recommendations on budgets, personnel, programs, services and related matters, and she will conitnue to coordinate accreditation activities within the College.

Nemecek has an extensive record of involvement in community and professional activities, including membership on the board of directors for Sigma Beta Delta, Marketing Management Association and Society for Case Research.

Leon M. Zaborowski was named the dean for the newly created position of outreach and graduate studies, responsible for the delivery and evaluation of both graduate and outreach programs. He will develop graduate degree programs, certificate programs, credit and non-credit courses, and international programs.

Prior to that, he was director of the Rochester campus of Winona State University in Winona, Minn, and he was director of educational telecommunications and associate provost of continuing education at the University of Massachusetts in Boston.

Thomas J. Knutson, has been selected in recognition of his career accomplishments and years of dedicated and exceptional service to others in teaching conflict resolution and interpersonal and organizational communication. The award will be presented by Chancellor Ann Lydecker at the UW-RF spring commencement ceremony on Saturday, May 19, at the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education and Recreation Center on campus.

Knutson holds a doctorate in speech communication and educational psychology from Indiana University. He is a professor of communication studies at California State University in Sacramento and is a visiting professor at Bangkok University in Thailand. He also conducts a communication consulting practice in Sacramento.

Knutson is widely published. He has presented papers and speeches at scores of conferences and in scholarly publications. His research has ranged from such diverse topics as a comparison of Taiwan and U.S. rhetorical sensitivity and conflict style, to Russian democratization and cultural values, to communications training for retail sales people, to communication styles for pharmacists.

Said Chuck Brictson, director for development and alumni relations and president of the UW-River Falls Foundation, "I am very pleased with the naming of Thomas J. Knutson as our distinguished alumnus for 2001. Dr. Knutson and I were classmates and fraternity brothers in the early 1960s, and I have followed his career with great interest. He has made many contributions in the field of communications that have had an impact in Russia, Thailand and Korea, as well as the United States. He is an extraordinary individual, clearly deserving of this singular recognition from his alma mater."

As part of the honor for being named Distinguished Alumnus for 2001, the University will hang an original portrait of Knutson in the Alumni Hall of Fame, which is located in the Hagestad Student Center.

Scheurman received accolades from graduating seniors and recent graduates who nominated him for the award. Among the many comments were:"Dr. Scheurman was the most motivating teacher I ever had in my college career. He is passionate, knowledgeable and genuine. He helps his students look outside their normal way of thinking."

"Dr. Scheurman is a highly dedicated teacher who models the kind of teaching and learning environment that undergraduate and graduate secondary education students can learn from. He brings high energy, enthusiasm and a sense of humor to the work in which he engages."

Jim Harsdorf, who has contributed leadership and service to the University as well as to the agricultural community as a whole, was recognized with the award by the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences at UW-RF.

Said Dean William Anderson, "Jim has been a friend and champion of the College for years. He has employed several students on his Pierce County dairy farm, and provided them with great educational experiences.

"I have known Jim for less than two years, but I have known few others who have had such a positive effect on this college. He and others on the College Advisory Council have provided solid advice on curriculum and other issues important to college strategic planning."

Bahr was selected for the honor of delivering the commencement address from a group of 10 students. Each spring semester, all commencing undergraduates are invited to apply to the Faculty Senate External Relations Committee for the privilege. They must include a letter of support from two faculty members, a resume, and a draft of their proposed speech.

The committee reviews the applications, invites in students to do deliver their speech in an audition, and then sends a recommendation to the chancellor, who approves the selection and extends the invitation to speak.

Bahr returned to school in the fall of 1999 as a full-time student because she wanted to change careers. "I wanted to understand the economy and the economic perspective. I also returned for personal growth," said Bahr. She served as vice president and president of the Student Economic Society at UW-RF, and achieved dean's list honors two semesters.

Janna Cowen, professor of economics, and Jacque Foust, chairman for the department of business administration, nominated Bahr for the honor of delivering the commencement speech. Cowen, who is the adviser for the Student Economic Society, noted that Bahr held a successful career as an information technology trainer prior to returning to school. She also credits Bahr as being an active participant in the classroom and in co-curricular activities. " Not only will she speak in an articulate manner, but what she says will be worthwhile," said Cowen in her recommendation.

Before her return to college, Bahr spent 14 years in the corporate world as an information technology trainer teaching system software for projects in accounts payable, budgeting, case management, coding software and estimating for such clients as the St. Paul Company, Medtronics and the U.S. Postal Service.

The formal inauguration and installation ceremony for Lydecker was the culmination of a week-long event during which the University celebrated its 126-year tradition of teaching, scholarly research and community service with concerts, lectures and forums.

UW-River Falls students at a private reception in April. The event took place during Inauguration Week , a week of special activities on campus to celebrate the formal installation of Lydecker as the 14th chancellor at UW-RF.

Callier developed and implemented the first campus environmental audit, a benchmark study on the state of the UW-RF environment. He also initiated and completed an assessment of parking problems at the University. A proponent of"Green Architecture," Callier presented a program detailing the benefits to the chancellor and faculty, and to the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents during that body's visit to UW-RF in May.

David Chell is a senior majoring in math, secondary education. Kaye Schendel from the Student Leadership Center nominated Chell. He is a non-commissioned officer in the Minnesota Army National Guard. His other activities include the Student Senate and the InterFraternity Council, and the freshman orientation program "Common Experience for Freshmen," which he organized.

Rebecca Mathison is a senior with a double major in horticulture and agricultural education. She was nominated by her adviser, Professor Terry Ferriss of the plant and earth science department, for her drive, determination and contagious enthusiasm.

Jensen of agricultural education, nominated Shliep. She has distinguished herself by demonstrating a high degree of commitment and dedication to her work and her studies, and she demonstrates exceptional professionalism.

Steele, who plans to teach biology , was a motivating force in the Vote 1998 and Vote 2000 projects, which she organized to have greater student participation in elections. She has been characterized as giving 110 percent to all that she does. As a member of the Student Exchange Program, Steele attended the University of Massachusetts at Amherst. Her excellent leadership skills have taken her to conferences for the U.S. Student Association Congress several times.

Ramos? non-fiction entry "Daughters of Eva" is a biographical sketch of her grandmother, created by combining memories of her childhood with her recollections as an adult. She integrated Spanish and cultural references in hopes of creating a portrait of her grandmother in the context of a place and culture very different from that of America.

Computer science major Chou Yang, a junior from St. Paul, won second place in the visual arts competition and a $3,000 scholarship. His moving charcoal drawing "Behind the Wires" depicts a life experience in a refugee camp. An elderly Hmong lady is witnessing the departure of loved ones, and experiencing the pain of being left behind. She reaches through the barbed wire, attempting to hold on to the last sight of them. Her life is now filled with darkness.

In her project, "An Era of Identity Crisis for Multiracial Youth," Whitner considers the more than 100,000 multiracial babies who are born annually in the United States and the importance of society respecting and appreciating their merged differences. She concludes that through understanding and respect, the children will develop a positive self-concept and succeed in school.

"Introduction to Food Safety and Microbiology" is an introductory course designed for high school and middle school teachers of biology, family and consumer education or agriculture; food quality technicians or supervisors with limited microbiology knowledge and experience; and extension workers with contacts in the food industry.

Through lectures, demonstrations and practical exercises, the course will provide training in a variety of new and traditional approaches to achieve microbiological safety in the manufacture and distribution of food products.

The course will emphasize basic principles of microbial ecology as applied to the practices of hazard analysis critical control point (HACCP), epidemiology, predicative microbiology and laboratory quality control.

The registration fee for each course taken as non-credit is $500 for the first participant from an organization, and $350 for a second and/or third attendee from the same organization. The fee for courses taken for graduate credit is $500 for each participant. The fee for both options includes written materials, lab fees and break-time refreshments. Pre-registration for both courses is recommended.

Glenwood City School District received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for an agency. Teachers at the middle school in Glenwood City have undertaken a variety of projects with their middle-level students, including forest management, stream cleanup, work with the elderly in a retirement home and more.

"This is a district that has done an extensive job of integrating service learning," said Florence Monsour, director of Wisconsin Partnerships in Service Learning and nominator of all the recipients this year, Kari Klocke, who received the Service Learning Award of Excellence for a student, is a junior from Hayfield, Minn., majoring in broad area art education. Klocke contributed close to 200 hours to design and paint a mural for a River Falls book store. She contributed another 44 hours at the middle school in New Richmond, providing assistance to the art teacher.

She has served on the service learning implementation team since its inception, and has made four national presentations and one local presentation on the merits of service learning Monsour said of Kalms, "Ruth is a role model to her students."

Sally Berkholder received the award in the academic and support staff category for her efforts to inform students about service learning and provide information to nonprofit agencies. "Sally has been instrumental in the growth and development of service learning on our campus," said Monsour.

The Service Learning Award of Excellence is sponsored by two grants: the 2x4x8 grant and a grant from Wisconsin Partnerships in Service Learning. The award is granted annually for each of the four categories.

"Of all the social issues in the United States, education remains at the top of the list," said Chancellor Lydecker. "People are deeply concerned with ensuring that young people have the best education possible at the K-12 level. They want to know, too, that young people will be successful in their higher education experience. Our presenters for these panels represent the latest thinking about the challenges and opportunities that educators face today."

P-16 Partnership is an agreement between a pre-school through grade 12 system and a higher education institution, grades 13 to 16, to improve the quality of teachers. Those who train students to teach work closely with the schools, grades pre-school through 12, where future teachers do their field work. The school and the university collaborate to develop the training the students will have.

Zimpher, a distinguished scholar in the field of education, is nationally known for her work with P-16 Partnerships. She will be drawing on her scholarship and her experience, and will lead a panel discussion to bring in the experiences of other individuals.

Said Lydecker, " Public universities are confronting new challenges in the rapidly-changing context of the 21st century as they strive to provide life-long educational opportunities to students. Dr. Tinsley will be joined by higher education leaders from this region in discussing some of the issues they all face on a daily basis. They will also describe strategic approaches being taken nationally and locally to ensure that public higher education will effectively fulfill its mission in the future."

John Edman, Director of Tourism for Minnesota, to address bi-state funding issues and grant matching policies. If the grants from each state are in compliance, all communities in the Alliance will benefit. Edman pledged his support to the Alliance during a meeting in Stillwater in February.

We have the geographic location, the population and the product. There are other states out there that just don't have it," said Speros. "We have a great product and great hospitality in the St. Croix Valley. The more product you have, the more customers you will have," said Speros.

Council for Social Studies Service Award on March 23, at a luncheon during the annual convention in Milwaukee. The award is given each year to one person in recognition of service and scholarly contributions.

She said one thing she has gained is knowledge. Social studies is such a broad area, and there is so much to know. She attended conventions and participated in workshops, bringing new ideas back to the classroom.

The Service Award was created in the memory of R.J. (Jim) Snavely, who died of brain cancer. Snavely, who had worked as a curriculum director for a public school in Wisconsin, had made significant contributions to WCSS.

Scholarship Fund, Inc., Dougan met all the criteria necessary to qualify for a scholarship. He is planning a career in the horticulture industry and is an excellent student who received strong recommendations.

"The industry is often thought of as part-time or seasonal," he said, "but the fact is, there is other work to do in the off-season. Some examples are holiday decorating, snowplowing and removal, selling firewood, running a greenhouse, and repairing and rebuilding equipment."

Forum coordinator journalism Professor Patricia Berg said there is change on the national political horizon and as campaign finance is debated, and Americans need to address these issues and bring them to a local level to be discussed as well . Moderators for the discussion are Berg, and political science department Chair Tracey Gladstone-Sovell.

"Issues of violence and racism still exist today. We wondered what we could do as a university to address these issues. The students have worked together to present the concert and give the Chancellor an action plan after the oratorio,"

"A Child of Our Time" will be performed by the UW-RF Concert Choir and Orchestra in the Blanche Davis Theatre with both concerts at 8 p.m. Tickets are available at the door and are $4 for adults and $2 for students. in the Twenties, but their use at university events disappeared over time. We are hoping to use the inauguration as a means of re-instating them."

Environmental preservation is becoming a concern as rapid growth and development occur along the St. Croix Valley corridor. Some of the challenges that will have to be met involve ground and surface water, particularly the management of wastewater treatment and maintainance of quality drinking water.

The UW-River Falls campus chapter of Habitat for Humanity will build a shed on campus April 23-27 to give to a local owner of a Habitat home. Construction will occur during the weekdays in the parking lot on the west side of South Hall.

Habitat homes are built with only the necessities, so most homes are without garages or storage sheds. UW-RF students are providing a homeowner with the gift of a shed, while at the same time raising awareness of the campus organization and the amount of poverty in the world.

Habitat for Humanity was created to eliminate poverty housing from the world by making decent shelter a matter of conscience and action. The mission of Habitat for Humanity is to establish affordable housing, build and rehabilitate homes, and raise funds to allow the organization to continue its work. It is building today for a better, safer and happier tomorrow.

A group of 12 students attended the event, accompanied by Terry Ferriss, plant and earth science professor in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences at UW-RF. For the competition, students judged and evaluated plant material that would be sold commercially, including cut flowers, flowering potted plants and foliage plants "Students are taught the importance of quality in the production of plants, in post-harvest and in retail," Ferriss said. "They must be able to identify plants of quality, and if there is a problem, to determine where along the line the problem began. That is what floral evaluation is."

Jessie Bruss, a sophomore from Green Bay majoring in horticulture; Becky Mathison, a senior from Woodville majoring in agricultural education; Melanie Welles, a junior from Ixonia majoring in horticulture; and Michelle Stay, a sophomore from Foley, Minn., majoring in horticulture, who was an alternate.

Four other students participated in the trip, although they did not judge or design: Melanie Melander, a senior majoring in horticulture from Unity; Kari Neubauer, a senior from Menomonie majoring in broad area agriculture; Amanda Schwake, a senior from Maiden Rock majoring in horticulture; and Patricia Sobieck, a junior from Oneida majoring in horticulture. These four students represented River Falls as part of the planning committee for next year when UW-RF will host the contest.

Thursday for three hours during February and March, and some Saturdays. Then they competed with each other locally to earn a place on the team. Twenty three students tried out for the team, and the top 12 made it."

Ferriss said the trip provided an opportunity for our students to network with their peers from across the country, and to experience some of the horticulture in another part of the country. It also provided them with some new cultural and life experiences.

UW-River Falls student Josh Sykora recently received a scholarship sponsored by the Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association. Sykora is a junior from Bloomer, Wis., who is majoring in horticulture with a landscape design option.

To be eligible for a MNLA scholarship, applicants must possess a satisfactory grade average, present letters of recommendation from instructors and employers, and submit an essay stating their career goals and objectives. The scholarships are designed by MNLA and its member companies to help grow future leaders in the nursery and landscape industry.

Glady is a senior from Wykoff, Minn., who is majoring in horticulture with a professional option. The scholarship she received was co-sponsored by Bailey Nurseries, Inc., a wholesale nursery grower in Newport, Minn., and a longtime MNLA member.

St. Croix Valley artisans in a variety of mediums. A silent auction also will be held. Items featured for silent auction in the past have included stays at bed and breakfasts, dinner gift certificates from area restaurants and gift baskets. The auctions are scheduled from 9-10:30 p.m.

Hundreds of faculty, staff and representatives of higher education institutions participated in a ceremony at the Robert P. Knowles Center of UW-River Falls on Saturday for the installation of Ann M. Lydecker as the 14th chancellor on April 28.

Lydecker outlined her 10-year vision for the University in an inaugural address, saying that she intends to build on the traditions that have been established by her predecessors while at the same being responsive to the rapidly changing environment.

The University will continue to enroll undergraduates who have demonstrated their academic potential, she said, while increasing the numbers of students of color and international students, until its student population reflects more closely the population of the Upper Midwest.

It will also serve larger numbers of non-traditional students who want to enroll in courses during evening and weekend hours through the establishment of an Office of Outreach and Graduate Studies, with a dean to provide leadership.

Building on the tradition of providing quality academic programs and campus experiences, Lydecker said, the University will assess programs to ensure that they are relative, effective, and responsive to national trends and local needs.

To continue the tradition of instructing effectively, technology will be integrated into the program whenever necessary. Through a new outreach office, the University will offer some courses and programs in conveniently-located off-campus sites.

Lydecker closed by announcing that she and her husband, Bill, are establishing two endowed scholarships. The first, in memory of the father and deceased mother, is the Lloyd and Alberta Ruesink Endowed Scholarship, to be awarded each year to a sophomore or junior pursuing a career in English or agricultural education.

Falls faculty, who served as chief marshal for the inauguration ceremony. More than 50 educational institutions were represented in the procession, as well as an equal number of student organization representatives, about 150 UW-RF emeriti, faculty and staff members, Regent Lolita Schneiders who was presiding officer for the ceremony, participants in the ceremonies, and Lydecker.

Margaret Millen Swanson, professor in the Department of Speech Communications and Theatre Arts and chair of the Faculty Senate, presented Lydecker with a photograph of South Hall, the oldest building on campus. Leslie Bleskachek, chair of the Academic Staff council, and program manager in television services, presented the chancellor with a bust of Daniel Webster that was rescued during a raging fire in 1897 that consumed the original Norman School building at the University.

Adam Clasen, a sophomore from Cudahy who is majoring in biology and serves as the Student Senate Association president, presented a rocking chair to Lydecker, symbolic of the hope that her tenure at UW-River Falls will be a long one, and that she will grow old in her position.

Also, in an informal ceremony preceding the installation ceremony, Lydecker, joined by chancellor-emeritus Gary Thibodeau and Chancellor-emeritus George Field, presented the University Service Medallion to 50 faculty and staff with more than 25 years of service.

If predictions are accurate, the cou.nties of St. Croix, Pierce, Pepin, Polk and Barron in Western Wisconsin will be fully developed by the year 2040. Whether this is good news or bad new is highly subjective, but the fact remains: there will be significant growth, and the way it is managed will determine the future of the region.

Tappen defined the regional growth issues as a decrease in open space; stress on infrastructure, such as water supply, sewers and roads; traffic congestion; stress on government finances; increased housing costs and loss of wildlife habitat. He stressed the need for intergovernmental co-operation among the counties to resolve the issues.

Flogstad said the Mississippi River Planning Commission would like to see all the communities develop individual plans, which would then be coordinated with those of other communities at the county level.

Sheridan said Pepin County is probably the smallest county, with the least population density in the state, but residents are well aware that there are about four million people just across the river and expansion may be moving their way .

Fodroczi reiterated the importance of good planning, but noted there are some wild cards that could affect their plans, such as another bridge across the St. Croix River, a casino in Hudson, municipal wastewater capacity, possible farmer retirement programs, fuel costs and transit, and the real estate market.

Anna, bought acres of swamp land, then sold it as farm land to those who were willing to invest their life savings. Once the money had been collected, the pair vanished and the buyers were left with worthless property.

Trust in the workplace, a topic of particular interest to human resources managers, business owners, team leaders, training specialists and plant managers, will be addressed at a free presentation by Tom Wunder, president of Influence Systems, Inc., a training and development firm in Boulder, Colo.

During the 1990s, the population of St. Croix County in Western Wisconsin grew 26 percent. During the same period, the population of the Twin Cities grew 17 percent. Clearly, the majority of growth in the region is occurring along the St. Croix River, and there is little doubt that it will continue to increase.

Harsdorf addressed the conflict that sometimes arises when farmers and other landowners are criticized for selling their land to developers, particularly for elderly farmers whose land sales amounts to their retirement account. "Landowners have the right to capitalize on their investment," he said. "We have to look at how planning affects food producers. Like everyone else, they need to be profitable."

Kari pointed out that if the rate of growth continues, in 20 years there will be 500,000 more people in the 19-county metro area. Three of those counties are in Wisconsin: Pierce, Polk and St. Croix. "We need to work together," he said. He expressed concern that if there is too much clustering, the region could run out of land for cost-effective development.

Arendt wrapped up the conference with a workshop at which he provided participants with an actual plot map and had them to apply the principles they had just learned for organizing subdivisions with land conservation in mind.

Forward Wisconsin, a unique public-private marketing firm, is a not-for-profit organization responsible for out of state business marketing and attraction of new business to Wisconsin. The budget for Forward Wisconsin is $1 million, more than half of that funding is provided by the private sector. The rest of the funding comes through a state contract with the Department of Commerce.

A key relationship between the agency and UW-RF is biotechnology. Wisconsin is rated as one of the Top 10 biotechnology states in the nation. Wisconsin's recent state-wide New Economy summit in Milwaukee identified biotechnology as a critical sector in which Wisconsin holds a commanding edge for future development.

Twelve years ago, UW-RF launched a biotechnology program as an interdepartmental major, offered by the departments of biology, chemistry, plant and earth science, and animal and food Science. As the use of biotechnology increases with the invention of new consumer products and services, so will the demand for graduates.

In addition to biotechnology, Reigstad, cited a Forward Wisconsin study that noted western Wisconsin is ripe for development in such areas of high technology computer-based programming as plastics and forestry. With biotechnology, all three are in the top 10 targeted areas for growth in the state, Reigstad said.

New academic programs at UW-RF and educational partnerships with the region's technical colleges will provide the highly educated workforce high tech industries are seeking, Lydecker said. She added that relocating or developing those industries also will help to stem Wisconsin's "brain drain" of highly skilled, highly paid residents who migrate to other states.

UW-RF plans to expand its credit transfer undergraduate and graduate agreements with two-year institutions to provide more seamless opportunities for growing the technical skills of the region's work force, Lydecker added.

The St. Croix Valley's proximity to the Twin Cities, its well-educated labor force and UW-RF faculty consulting expertise and the availability of student interns are a large part of soliciting businesses to locate. Quality of life issues such as the proxmity of River Falls to the Twin Cities for easy acceess to cultural activities, the region's rural lifestyle and small-town atmosphere will help attract new businesses to the region.

"We want to know what UW-RF's strengths are to provide the greatest growth and economic opportunities," said Platt-Gibson. "We want to do whatever we can to show the rest of the world what UW-RF can do."

"The panel will provide a forum at which key planners for the St. Croix Valley can give each other an update on what they are doing, and share the priorities and concerns that are unique to their particular areas, " said Jacque Foust, associate director, School of Business and Economics, and chair, department of business administration.

Foust will ask panelists to discuss how they project the rate of economic growth, inflation and population. It would be interesting to know if their methods are consistent with one another, and also if their assumptions are consistent.

Among other things, he wants the planners to consider the impact of their plans on the quality of life in the area. They will be asked to respond to questions such as, "How much will we pay for taxes and services?" and, "How will the planned development affect the environment, particularly the air and water, and will there be noise pollution?"

Customers of the planning agencies are invited to the discussion, including planning commissioners, city council members, school boards, banks, emergency services and realtors, as well as the general public.

Regional planning agencies in Wisconsin and the Metropolitan Council from Minnesota will share their long-range plans for the area in a panel discussion on "The St. Croix Valley of the Future" on Thursday, April 26.

Panelists to discuss how they project the rate of economic growth, inflation and population. Among other things, he wants the planners to consider the impact of their plans on the quality of life in the area. They will be asked to respond to questions such as, "How much will we pay for taxes and services?" and, "How will the planned development affect the environment, particularly the air and water, and will there be noise pollution?"

Apparently, Bodenburg was on a winning streak. Her team won its track meet at Laverne University, in the Los Angeles area. Then, on Saturday, March 21, the entire team went for the taping of "The Price is Right." Bodenburg was the only person from the team who was chosen to be a contestant, and she became the big winner for the day.

The show began with Bodenburg and other contestants bidding on prizes. After winning that round, she went on the stage alone to play a dice game for the car. There were pictures of cars on the dice, and she had three chances to roll five "cars." She did it on two rolls.

The tournament director was Professor James W. Pratt, department of speech communications and theatre arts. Director of Forensics at UW-RF is Instructor Kathleen Olsen, also in the department of speech communications and theatre arts.

The Dairy Quiz Bowl is based on the concept of "College Bowl" games, where two teams compete and the winner takes on the next team, until only one team remains, according to Perry Clark, professor of dairy science at UW-RF. Clark accompanied the students to the convention. A typical question for the Dairy Quiz Bowl, Clark said, would be something like, "What is the major volatile fatty acid produced in the rumen of a cow?"

Members of the winning team included Elsa Arnold, a freshman majoring in agricultural business, from Caledonia, Minn.; Rachel Bakeberg, a sophomore majoring in agricultural business, from Waverly, Minn.; Dennis Bangart , a freshman majoring in dairy science, from Auburndale, Wis.; and Jennifer Drinkall, a sophomore majoring in dairy science, from Lanesboro, Minn. The students were selected to participate in the competition through a testing process.

In addition to the Dairy Quiz Bowl, there were "ag olympic" games at the conference, just for fun. Students competed good-naturedly in a hay bale stacking competition, and in a milk chugging contest, which was won by Jeff Lambrecht, a senior animal science major from River Falls. The convention also offered a career fair, where students could talk to representatives from the dairy industry about potential careers.

As always, the concert will consist of a unique blend of guest and student choreography. Twin Cities choreographer Torrion Amie will ad a unique dimension to the concert with original music to accompany his dance. UW-RF Dance Theatre alumni Kimberly Johnson and Ricardo Suarez from Minneapolis will return as guest choreographers, to add their inventive and technically demanding works to the program.

According to Zhe, the University Dance Theatre is comprised of students from a variety of major areas of study. "Most participate in the Dance Theatre as an extracurricular activity, out of a love of the performing arts, and for dance," she said.

"The Regents were extremely supportive of our proposals. Many of them participated in the recent Wisconsin New Economy Summit in Milwaukee, and they recognized our campuses' activities as the kind of 'quick response' in higher education that is critical to positioning the state for the 21st Century economy," Lydecker said.

Milam, who has served as interim director of the School of Business & Economics as well as provost, during spring semester will develop action plans, follow-up activities, and funding proposals for advancing regional economic development.

Lydecker noted the state economic summit outlined a massive plan of action that will take up to five years to put into place as Wisconsin ensures it keeps pace with extraordinary technological changes.

UW-RF will continue to provide regional leadership on key issues identified by state leaders in business, industry, government and education. This week the University hosted a regional follow-up forum to explore solutions to providing continuing workforce development for quality jobs. In March it will host a forum on encouraging entrepreneurship and identifying the sources and techniques for attracting venture capital investment in regional New Economy businesses.

UW-River Falls has signed an agreement with Great Plains, a Fargo, ND-based business management software developer, to join Great Plains? Education Alliance Network. This network enables colleges and universities to provide Great Plains? business management software as a key component of accounting curriculums.

"This will be the first time a mid-range accounting software has been used in a class at UW-RF," said Dawn Hukai, assistant professor in the business administration department. "The software will give the students experience in a program that they may be using eventually in their employment."

For Melissa Donnay a senior majoring in elementary education at UW-River Falls, the opportunity presented itself last fall. Her father was gravely ill and in need of a liver transplant, but there were no livers available to him. Time was running out, so Melissa bravely made the decision to donate part of her liver. On Oct. 17, Melissa and her father, Mark, participated in a living donor transplant at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn.

Said Dr. David Brandhagen, a hepatologist at the Mayo Clinic, "Melissa is a remarkable young woman with a maturity beyond her years. Though she understood the issues and risks involved in the surgery, she was committed to her decision to go through with it."

Mark Donnay had been sick for four years with primary sclerosing cholangitis, a rare liver disease that affects only about one person in 100,000,. As the disease progressed, it became apparent that he would eventually need a liver transplant. Mark has type O blood, the most common type. This made it unlikely that he would get a cadaver liver from a person who had died, because so many others were ahead of him on the waiting list.

Throughout the process, Melissa managed to stay in school and continue to work toward her degree. "The University has been so understanding and willing to work with me," said Melissa. She lived at her home in Norwood, Minn., while student teaching a second-grade class at Trinity Lutheran School in nearby Waconia.

This allowed her to be with her 15- and 17-year old brothers, Chad and Brandon, in case a cadaver liver became available for her father. It also allowed her 20-year-old sister, Stacy, a UW-RF junior majoring in pre-elementary education, to stay in school. Then, when the living donor transplant became an option, living at home was definitely the most convenient arrangement.

McCollum said it was a particular pleasure to help Melissa because she is so helpful to others. Faculty members at Trinity commented on her willingness to help the teachers there and her positive attitude, considering the stress in her life over the past year.

Several dozen faculty, staff, students, alumni and friends have been planning the Inauguration Week activities since the beginning of the academic year. They are emphasizing the traditional values of the University as a comprehensive institution whose students, faculty and staff work at engaging students in continuing educational experiences. That mission extends into life-long learning and cultural experiences in which the University shares its expertise with those throughout the St. Croix Valley and Wisconsin.

Research Day, the Wisconsin Art Education Association Spring Conference, and a meeting of the Chancellors of the University of Wisconsin System. High School counselors also will be invited to a reception by the Admissions Department and Chancellor Lydecker. Displays of UW-RF history and partnerships will be exhibited, too.

Physical Education & Recreation Building on April 28. It will feature performances by all UW-RF music ensembles, a processional in academic garb by faculty and staff as well as higher education institutions from throughout the Midwest and national Learned Societies, as well as students.

Minnesota Office of Tourism Director John Edman promised to lend his personal and professional support to the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance, which includes 20 communities in Wisconsin and Minnesota.

Schoolteachers will have the opportunity to learn how to integrate popular software packages into their classroom at "Spring Fling Technology Thing: Project-Based Integration of Technology Conference," scheduled for Saturday, March 31, at UW-River Falls. The conference will be appropriate for teachers of all grade levels and for all types of course content.

"We will show teachers what technology is available to them and how they can use it," said Debra Iversen with University Outreach. "The conference is not just about theory; teachers can gain hand-on experience in the lab. They can learn to create videos with digital cameras, design a web page, use PowerPoint for presentations, or use PhotoShop to create graphics with photos."

There will be three break-out sessions, with a wide variety of topics for participants to choose from. The sessions will be led by staff and faculty from schools and the University, as well as UW-RF education students from the Technology Leadership Cadre (TLC) whose function is to help faculty an teachers use various kinds of technology in their classrooms.

More than 3,000 teachers have taken his online courses on teaching, making him the most popular online teacher in education in the nation. Draves has been the keynote speaker at education conferences throughout the United States, as well as in Japan, Australia, Europe and Canada.

Project-Based Technology," a two-credit graduate-level course. There will be an organizational meeting for the course from 3:30-4:30 p.m. the day of the conference, at which students can learn about the class and meet the instructor.

Students and alumni have stories about the impact a UW System institution made on their educational and professional growth. UW institutions are located in communities that depend on UW support. The collaboration of the institutions, alumni, students and community leaders has resulted in UW Day.

"When you have people from the campuses coupled with the communities and businesses we serve, community leaders, alumni and students who value the education andwhat their education through the UW System has done for them in terms of making them successful, you have a story. Many of our alumni stay in Wisconsin instead of going somewhere else to use their education. That is the impact of the institution and the story we want to tell," said UW-River Falls Chancellor Ann Lydecker.

At the events and activities showcasing UW Day , "Most people will see in one tremendously powerful, impacting day just what the university is, how diverse we are and how we encompass this entire state," said Lydecker.

Constructing the framework for future relations between Wisconsin government officials and the UW system is another primary goal of UW Day. Featuring the UW systems to legislators, alumni, the general public and showing the economic impact at the state, regional and community level is part of UW Day, said Lydecker.

UW system make to the state, including intellectual, cultural, social and economic growth. All the UW System institutions have bonded together to demonstrate their future impact on the state as a whole and to show their uniqueness. "We want people to realize this is an investment in the future of our state, educationally and economically," said Lydecker.

"How do you talk with legislators about maintaining an appropriate level of funding at our educational institutions so that the same quality of education can continue to be delivered or improved?"said Lydecker.

Films is an open-mike session for students, faculty, staff and administrators to read a favorite line and/or show a video clip of their favorite line by or about women in film. The event will be held in the breezeway of Chalmer Davee Library on Friday, March 9, from 3:30-5 p.m. Jenny Brantley, English professor, will facilitate the session.

Braun said also that security screens will be installed on all windows at the basement and first-floor levels, to enhance the safety of students. Parker Hall is designated all female, and Crabtree Hall is male and female.

The project is part of an ongoing maintenance program to extend the useful life of the nine residence halls on campus. To ensure that adequate student housing is available during the school year, the window replacement is scheduled for the spring and summer months of 2002 and 2003.

"Many people are aware that our work force is getting older. But I don't think that those in business, industry, government or education realize what a radical and dramatic change is under way. It is absolutely mind-boggling. A lot of people don't realize the depth of the change.

Locally, Ludeman noted that Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties are experiencing the same kind of rapid and significant population change that has occurred in the suburban counties of Waukesha, Racine and Ouzakee counties that ring Milwaukee.

Ludeman said that he will provide substantial demographic profiling information on the St. Croix Valley and its potential implications for the work force, educational needs and infrastructure such as housing and transportation.

Summit in October and Wisconsin's statewide New Economy Summit in November that are exploring the most effective means to incorporate information technology and technology infusion into local economies, and to train a highly skilled technology workforce.

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker noted that both the regional and state summit participants reported high confidence in the quality of education and training provided by K-12, technical colleges and the University of Wisconsin System.

The panel will be followed by group discussions on identifying concerns and developing action steps to lead to greater partnering "to build better jobs and improve education so we can build an economy that attracts able people to western Wisconsin and keeps them here," Manke said.

Brantner has worked at the University for 10 years, most recently as groundskeeper for Facilities Management. Though he performs many duties, he can most often be found on a riding mower during the growing season, or removing snow from the sidewalks during the winter. His expertise and pride in his work are evident in everything he does.

Students at UW-River Falls posted impressive showings in national contests during the fall 2000 judging season. Several individuals received national recognition for excellence in dairy judging skills.

Jerseys, and fifth team in the Brown Swiss breed. Carla Ruzic enjoyed a spectacular day, finishing as the second individual overall and first -place individual in oral reasons. Ruzic placed in the top ten individuals within four of the six dairy breeds. Betsy Bianchi also posted outstanding results, finishing as 11th-place and seventh-place individual in the overall contest and oral reasons segment, respectively. Ruzic and Bianchi were recognized as All-Americans with finishes in the top 25 individuals overall, while Lambrecht and Jacobson missed All-American recognition by a mere 10 points.

A team of juniors and seniors competed in the intercollegiate contest held in conjunction with the North American International Livestock Exhibition. The contest was held in Louisville, KY, on Nov. 5, and featured 17 collegiate teams.

Jason Schroeder was the high individual on the team, and finished as the 17th individual overall. Cara Dueholm also finished in the top 20 individuals, with a top 10 finish in two breeds. Jeannie Winkelman was sixth high individual in the Ayrshire breed and Joe Meyer was sixth high individual in the Jersey breed.

The dairy cattle evaluation teams at UW-RF are coached by Dr. Steve Kelm, department of animal and food science. Janelle Jensen, a UW-RF student from Owatonna, Minn., and Dr. Perry Clark from the department of animal and food science provided valuable assistance to him during the fall judging season.

Foster Cemetery rests among overgrown grasses and trees. The cemetery, deeded by Eli Foster to Trinity Episcopal Church in 1856, was later given to the City of River Falls by the church. The lopsided headstones of city founders dating back to the mid-1800s are incorporated in the conservancy area, awaiting preservation.

Four UW-River Falls environmental science and management students recently climbed the steep hillside with plans to restore the cemetery to its natural state and develop a management plan for the historic area. They will accomplish this through Wisconsin Partnership in Service Learning, a program that redefines what it means to be an educated person by blending the course work of students with the work of civic agencies to meet community needs.

Professor Kelly Cain, who directs service learning projects in the department of plant and earth science, values contributing to the social good over receiving personal economic gain. He highlights three motivations for teaching with service learning components.

During 1999, students worked with River Falls city planners to develop a seven-acre area slated for low-income housing. The project involved thinking critically about the community, according to project member Adam Snegosky.

Service learning includes three criteria: assessing community needs, devising a plan to meet the needs and carrying it out, and evaluation. During the evaluation, the personal and community benefits surface.

River Falls planner Tony Steiner agrees that service learning is a valuable approach to education. Steiner welcomes student input on his projects, teaches the process of city planning, and recognizes the benefits of cooperating on actual community projects. "I am not a teacher, but we all have a responsibility to help others learn," said Steiner.

The University relies heavily on public schools to help it prepare students for teaching. According to the teacher education department faculty who nominated here, without Linda Beedy the University would not have been able to maintain the field component of teacher education. Her commitment to UW-RF has been the mainstay of the student teacher program.

Beedy was surprised by the announcement of the award. "I felt I was only one of many teachers who has supported the program and has been willing to work with the students. It has been a learning experience for the pre-student teachers as well as for me," she said. She is thankful to the University for the honor, and to the professors and students from the education department for the nomination.

The group formed the cooperative in 1997, in anticipation of reduced coverage by Medicare for ambulance services. The cooperative helped them lower operating costs to compensate for the cutback by allowing them to purchase ambulances, medical supplies, office equipment and other products at volume discounts.

The co-op accepts members from North Dakota, South Dakota, Iowa, Minnesota and Wisconsin, and is open to organizations that provide emergency medical services, regardless of size or structure. Currently, it has 90 members, and other areas of the country are showing interest in replicating the program.

A number of workshops will be offered, with topics that include forest landowner co-operation, e-commerce for small businesses, farmstead dairies (cow and sheep-goat), emerging crop oil developments, farming as a public event, challenges and opportunities in the organic industry, small-farm resources, "green" labeling, and marketing a local identity.

UW-River Falls is accepting applications for spring semester, scheduled to begin Jan. 22. Students interested in attending spring term are advised to apply as soon as possible, as enrollment is limited. Registration for new students is Jan 17.

Their visit provided an opportunity for representatives from the Extension office and the University to exchange information, and to inform Chancellor Ann Lydecker, who joined UW-RF in August, about the partnership that exists between the two entities.

"We were exploring the ways that UW Extension and UW-River Falls work together," said Lydecker. "As the University expands its role in providing education to non-traditional students and expands its activities related to regional economic development, this cooperation becomes increasingly important."

The exchange, which took place in the morning on the campus of UW-RF and in the afternoon at the Pierce County UW-Cooperative Extension Office, focused on partnerships that are currently in place and looked to possibilities for the future.

Said Reilly, "We knew we had worked in cooperation on many different activities over the years, but they had not been quantified or summarized before. When we saw a list of them, we realized we have an incredibly strong partnership."

Sciences at UW-RF, UW-Extension is involved in teaching non-traditional audiences, people who are not pursuing a college degree, while UW-RF teaches traditional students, those who are pursuing a degree. Faculty members in his college have joint appointments, which means they teach both in the classroom and in the field.

UW-Extension, with headquarters in Madison, employs 1,668 people, including county office and campus-based people (those who have joint appointments). The four divisions, Cooperative Extension, Continuing Education Extension, Broadcasting and Media Innovations Extension, and Business and Manufacturing Extension, share a common mission: to bring university resources and research to Wisconsin residents wherever they live and work.

Heyn will present a five-minute combination of a scene and a monologue, which she was allowed to select. Her scene will be from "Keely and Do," by Jane Martin, performed with scene partner Ona Spille, who is also a student at UW-RF. Her monologue will be the character "Rosalind," from "As You Like It" by Shakespeare.

Culp will present a five-minute combination of a scene and a monologue, which he was allowed to select. His scene will be from "I Hate Hamlet," by Paul Rudnick, and his monologue will be from "Assassins," by John Weildman and Stephen Sondheim.

Culp will also perform in scenes from "Stuff," an improvisational production created by UW-RF students. It was directed by Ken Stofferahn, professor of speech communication and theatre arts, with UW-RF alumnus Joshua Will as assistant director. "Stuff" was presented to the public last fall at the University.

While most of us are anticipating a magical visit from a jolly fat man who comes from the North Pole in a sleigh, a physics professor at UW-River Falls will be packing for his departure on Christmas Day for the South Pole, where he will immerse himself in another kind of magic: the mysteries of science.

To install AMANDA, astronomers melted holes two feet wide and more than a mile deep in the Antarctic ice cap. In these holes they buried nearly 700 sensors that compose what Scientific American magazine called "the weirdest telescope in the world;" a telescope that looks down while others look up.

Sweden, Belgium and the United States. To this point, the project has spent about $10 million. It has been funded by the National Science Foundation in the form of grants to the University of California at Irvine and the University of Wisconsin at Madison, among others, with support also from the Swedish Wallenberg Foundation and DESY, a German national laboratory.

Antarctica is the ideal place to operate the telescope. It is a land mass, with a layer of ice over it that is two miles thick. Because ice is a totally sterile medium, almost completely free of radioactive materials such as potassium, it is a friendly place for neutrino detectors.

Madsen said many of the facilities for the project were already in place at the South Pole. The National Science Foundation operates a research station there, with an infrastructure that is comparable to that of a national laboratory.

Last August, teachers attended classes on the campus of UW-RF to prepare them to introduce the exciting science of the AMANDA project to their students. The classes, taught by Madsen, Halzen, three graduate students and one high school teacher, focused on the creation of activities to use as classroom projects.

As innovative as AMANDA is, it is only a prototype, and scientists are already looking ahead to new possibilities. They are building a new detector, comprising nearly 5,000 modules scattered through a cubic kilometer of ice. It is known as IceCube, and it is capable of detecting neutrinos from the farthest edges of the universe.

The history of science shows that forays into new energy regions have invariably resulted in the discovery of new phenomena. Because neutrinos are the only messengers that can provide direct information about the most violent cosmological events, it is an exciting possibility that something completely unexpected will be discovered as a result of exploration with AMANDA and IceCube.

Students at UW-River Falls probably are not as sexually active as their fellow students think they are. This is according to Alice Reilly-Myklebust, coordinator of student health services at UW-RF, who referred to a survey of the sexual activities of students.

Issues addressed by speakers at the conference included an overview of sexual activity among college students, a discussion of sexual development and sexual orientation, and a look at the ways women are objectified through media and advertising. The conference concluded with a discussion of the responsibilities that college and university faculty, staff, and health care providers have to students.

In his keynote address, sociology Professor John DeLamater of UW-Madison described the stages of sexual development, beginning when children develop a sense of being male or female and begin exploring their bodies, through adolescence, when they should begin to realize that they have control over the sexual aspects of their bodies and their sexual behavior.

In young adulthood, he said, sexuality and relationships are important. Sexual orientation has probably been established, and they will set sexual standards: for example, they may practice abstinence; they may be somewhat permissive, having sexual relations only with someone they love; or, they may be permissive without affection, believing it is OK if you want to do it.

Sociology Professor Michael Obsatz at Macalester College in St. Paul, in a discussion of women being objectified by the media, said we are creating a society of predators. Each minute, 1.3 women are raped, and one in three women will be raped in her lifetime, he said.

Science and Athletics, shared his insights as a panelist, saying he talks about love with his students. "We talk about all aspects of love: passion, intimacy and commitment, and try to understand what love is," he said.

One challenge is to help students understand how these components fit together to form a whole person. Other challenges are to provide students with the information they need to make informed decisions; the correct terminology for parts of their anatomy, the risks and practices of various types of sexual activities, and how to communicate with sexual partners.

Ehlinger summed up the responsibilities for the group, reminding them that their role is to help prepare students for life. They must work together as a community, sharing information and teaching, he said. They must help students feel safe to abstain from sex if they wish, or to engage in sexual activity if that is what they choose to do.

Schultz joined UW-RF in 1978 as an assistant professor, teaching courses such as micro and macroeconomic principles, introductory statistics, econometrics and forecasting, managerial economics, statistical applications in business and economics, and the computer in business . In addition to teaching, Schultz serves as the director of the UW-RF Center for Economic Education within the School of Business and Economics serving school districts through western Wisconsin. The center provides assistance to K-12 educators to enhance their teaching of the structure and operations of the U.S economy. Schultz assists with graduate level courses, seminars, workshops, and lesson plans. He is also a resource for teachers.

Schultz participates in numerous University and departmental activities that include service on the faculty and academic staff development board, assessment committee, institutional studies, and research & grants committee.

Pat McConville, assessment worker in Pierce County, has noticed that she and her co-workers work together more effectively now. "Since attending these workshops together, we have a more uniform approach to our work," she said. "We use the same terms and similar methods of solving problems."

The purpose is to contribute to the quality of services being provided to children and families served by child welfare staff. In doing this child welfare personnel go through a comprehensive competency-based training program.

UW-RF's social work program, said, " We work together on this training system that involves pre-and post-workshops activities so that participants can use what they learn in workshops when they go back to their agencies."

This year the program trained 288 social workers, 40 supervisors, 18 directors or deputy directors, and 29 professionals in other areas, such as foster care coordinators and case aides, in its second year.

Through a statewide partnership, standards can provide support through consistent and quality training. One goal is to discuss the delicate balance between providing a safe environment for the child and maintaining family connections. It will also focus on legal issues and how to best deal with children in neglected or abusive homes.

"This program is a philosophical base for training to follow," said Mary Thompson, supervisor of the child, youth, and family unit at Pierce County. "Everything leads from one training workshop to another."

Partnership for Children and Families, centered out of the social work program at UW-Green Bay. Two years ago when the program was expanded, the social work program at UW-RF was chosen as the site for the Western Wisconsin Partnership.

The Milker Skills Workshop is an interactive, hands-on workshop designed to help dairy producers and employees achieve a better understanding of harvesting milk and the factors affecting milk quality. The two-day workshop will cover raw milk quality, udder health, prevention and control of mastitis, milking machine function and milk room management.

Xiong said, "Being female and of Hmong ethnicity, I want to be a good leader and demonstrate good and respectable leadership skills so I can be a role model for all students, but especially for young females of minority background. I know that for many young females, college seems so far away and so unreal. I want them to be aware that they can also set high standards and achieve high goals, and that the dream of someday going to college can become a reality."

She has made significant contributions through her leadership at UW-RF, serving as a hall council representative and as president of the Asian American Student Association. In this capacity, she has not only demonstrated her excellent organizational skills, but displayed talent in bringing diverse groups of students together, particularly reaching out to other multicultural student organizations.

UW-RF Community Action Theater Troupe, which presents plays, panels, and diversity training sessions for college students. She also initiated a cultural reading program at an area elementary school. Xiong has worked in the admission office where her special interest is in the recruitment of other Hmong women.

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker said she was pleased that Xiong was recognized for her efforts to strengthen the campus's diversity. "We always welcome an opportunity to celebrate the achievements of our students. I'm especially pleased that Gao Xiong has been recognized statewide for her accomplishments."

UW System President Katharine Lyall noted, "The award gives us an opportunity to recognize and support women of color in the UW system and to thank the faculty, staff, students and community leaders who are striving to make our campuses a better place for women of color to work and study."

Silicon Logic Engineering, and several energy companies. For the business community, the summit is a great opportunity to meet with leaders of government and education to influence future state policy."

Also available at the website are the first "white papers" commissioned specifically for the summit and designed to help inform the discussion in Milwaukee. More of these briefing and background documents will be posted during the next two weeks.

The website also now features public comments submitted via e-mail. This feature is intended to give participants and observers a forum for discussing the white papers, the seven principal themes addressed by the summit, and related topics.

The summit will open on Wednesday, November 29 with presentations summarizing the regional listening sessions held this fall throughout Wisconsin. This will be followed by a "town hall" discussion and a reception featuring remarks by Governor Tommy Thompson.

At 4 p.m., a general session will address how Wisconsin can build a distinctive brand image for itself. This will be followed by a recognition reception for the persons who contributed white papers to the summit.

The summit concludes with two sessions that summarize the more than two days of discussion and suggest the next steps that need to be taken if the ideas coming out of the meeting are to be implemented.

The one exception is cranberries, which have dropped dramatically in price, from $60 a barrel to $13 a barrel, due to overproduction. "But the lower prices are not being passed on to the consumer," Smith said. "We are still paying high prices for cranberries."

Turkey prices, on the other hand, have increased 5 cents per pound over last year to about $1.10 per pound, Schraufnagel.said. However, many grocers will continue to reduce this price as a loss-leader to attract holiday shoppers.

The price for a pound of ground beef went up four cents to $1.64. The price trend for pork is mixed. This year, the retail price for a pound of ham has gone down four cents to $2.02, but the price of pork chops has risen 35 cents, to $3.18 this year.

Professor Steven Watters of the UW-RF animal and food science department said the increase in beef prices is due in part to a shortage of calves. There has been a shortage of feed over the past year or two, he said, which has caused ranchers to reduce their herds.

The other reason for higher prices is the increased costs of the meat handlers and distributors. "The people who kill, buy and cut the meat are having to pay more for wages and insurance," Watters said, "and that cost is passed on to the consumer."

He noted a trend that could also contribute to higher prices, saying, "People are going back to higher quality meat. For health reasons, they may eat smaller pieces, or not eat beef very often, but when they do, they want it to be juicy."

Prices for dairy products have remained pretty stable since last year, according to Ranee May, UW-RF dairy plant manager. Wisconsin is still the No. 1 state in cheese production, and nears the top in milk and butter production. Wisconsin also has the second largest number of dairy cows, next to California.

Then, there is the ever-present Christmas tree to consider. Approximately 35 million real Christmas trees are sold in North America each year. According to Professor Mike Kaltenberg, in the plant and earth science department at UW-RF, about 3 million of those trees will be produced in Wisconsin this year. The state ranks sixth in production in the nation, he said.

Kaltenberg said prices this season are expected to be about the same as last year, when they ranged from $3.96 to $7.23 per foot. The most popular varieties of real trees in order are the balsam fir, Fraser fir and Scotch pine. The trend toward shorter needles, which began a few years ago, is continuing.

"The new varieties of poinsettia are not even recognizable as poinsettias to many people," said Terry Ferriss, UW-RF professor of plant and earth science, referring to three new varieties, which are curled, ruffled and multi-colored.

University students will have the opportunity to learn and identify many of the plants in the prairie. It could also be an advantage to high school students who will travel the path to a new River Falls high school under construction on nearby Cemetery Road. The school, which is scheduled to open in fall 2001, could also involve the plot into into high school classes, as well.

Although no funding is available for the project, it's not lacking in volunteers who have devoted their time to help with the burning, pulling weeds and chopping trees. The prairie project has received a grant from the UW-RF collaborative research, scholarly and creative activity to inventory the plants in the prairie.

Some 150 different vegetation species in the area, which is a broad diversity compared to other prairies. Among some of the native prairie grasses that have been identified are needle grass, love grass, Indian grass, big bluestem, little bluestem, and panic grass. Wild flowers remnants discovered contain the monarda, blazing star, goldenrod, prairie cone flower, bird's foot violet, prairie smoke, evening primrose, prairie rose, yarrow, hoary puccoon, heath aster, flowering spurge, western sunflower, and the round-headed clover.

According to Ferriss, prairie sections will be burned periodically to destroy invasive woody and weedy plant species.. The fires do not harm the native plants, which typically have deeper root systems.

Members of the club will display their collections of rocks, minerals, fossils, gems and equipment. Geology staff and students from the University of Wisconsin-River Falls will also have displays. UW-RF participants will answer questions regarding minerals, lapidary, rocks, fossils or other aspects of geology.

Participants will gain information on over 200,000 grants worth $10,000 or more. They will also discover new views used by foundations and other reviewing grant suggestions. The workshop will enable participants to exchange grant plans, seek others to partner with for grants and learn about the formation of a regional foundation. Deborah Fugenschuh, executive director of the donors forum of Wisconsin, and Karen Gotzler, project manager of Wisconsin Giving, will be the program speakers.

More than 120 UW-River Falls education students are practicing their teaching skills this fall in 49 cooperating Wisconsin and Minnesota school districts and preschools as student teachers and interns.

The play addresses "affluenza," in which the dogged pursuit of objects turns the good life into the goods life. Among the 16 students in the company that developed, wrote and perform the sketches are Gwen Heyn, Mike Culp, Amie Williams and Becca Anderson.

She has been practicing Zen meditation and teaching seminars in writing for the past 25 years. People from around the world attend her life-changing workshops, and she has a reputation as a great teacher.

UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker, who will be chairing the St. Croix Valley forum, said that while Wisconsin's current economy is strong there are underlying factors which are indicating future problems if they are not addressed.

"Economic and demographic changes over the last few decades and forecasts of continued change signal some potentially stressful times for Wisconsin's economy in the not-too-distant future," Lydecker said.

Trends in the growth and composition of income, consumption, employment, business creation and population raise important questions for the Badger State that demand a closer look, Lydecker noted. They offer guidance for a strategic vision that can capitalize on the opportunities of the New Economy.

Preliminary research indicates that Wisconsin may be falling behind other states in the race for lucrative high-technology jobs. For example, Wisconsin's per-capita income of $25,079 is below the national average of $26,412, despite the highest labor participation rate in the country. That shortfall, which already translates into $7 billion of lost buying power in the state, is growing.

According to Lydecker, "At the St. Croix Valley Regional Forum, we will assess where Wisconsin fits into the global marketplace, which strategies offer the most promise, where the greatest opportunities lie, and what we should avoid.

"We will explore those topics in relationship to traditional or emerging sectors of our economy, including manufacturing, agriculture, service, and professional as well as the areas of biotechnology and high technology," she said.

Olympic equestrian competition includes three disciplines, dressage, jumping, and three-day event. Blinks will be competing in dressage. Dressage is much like it was during the Renaissance, often described as horses performing ballet.

One of her instructors, animal science Professor Larry Kasten, said he's not surprised at Blinks' success because she was a rare student who brought apparent talent and skills to train horses even during her college years. As one of Blinks professors in the UW-RF horse science program, he noticed she had "a tremendous work ethic, the drive and the competitive nature" she needed to gain her present position on the Olympic team.

Western Wisconsin's proximity to the Twin Cities are a distinct advantage to economic development. But the region's distance from the decision-making centers of Madison and Milwaukee are definite weaknesses in its ability to create an atmosphere for expansion.

Those contrasts are among many that were identified by a score of regional economic and education leaders during a recent gathering as they set the groundwork for a St. Croix Valley Regional Economic Forum to be held on Oct. 4 at UW-River Falls. More than 100 leaders are expected to attend from Barron, Pierce, Polk, Pepin, and St. Croix counties.

"There weren't any surprises in the issues that were identified," Lydecker said of the 34 distinct observations contained in the SWOT analysis. "What was important is that for the first time these were identified from a regional perspective.

System Board of Regents. "I hear people all over the state talking about it, and a great deal of thought is going into the preparation of the listening sessions, the white papers, and the meeting itself. I think the end product is going to be a useful game plan for the new Wisconsin economy."

Nationally recognized speakers have been invited to address the summit, which will be attended by Governor Thompson, legislative leaders, top Wisconsin CEOs, and community leaders. Among the planned outcomes is development of a collection of "Best Ideas for Wisconsin's Future" that can help guide the state's strategic economic planning. "The summit is being held to open a dialogue about the economic future of Wisconsin," said Katharine Lyall, president of the UW System. "We're soliciting input from government, business, labor, higher education and the statewide community. From that, we hope to create a set of realistic goals -- a `road map' of Wisconsin's path into the 21st century."

A summit registration form is now available on-line, along with other information, at www.wisconsin.edu/summit. Cost to attend the summit is $119 on or before October 31, and $149 thereafter. This fee includes several meals and a set of materials. Blocks of hotel rooms have been reserved for those who need them at the Hilton Milwaukee City Center and the Hyatt Regency Milwaukee. The special "Wisconsin Economic Summit" room rate is $89 per night.

The U.S. team quotes Blinks on winning the Bronze, as saying, "I had every part of my body crossed, rooting for Christine. With all that pressure, she did just and unbelieveable job. She really is a hero. I can hardly believe that I'm an Olympic medalist."

Recalling Blinks' academic career, Kasten noted, "When she came here, she was a gifted rider. She was a very talented woman," said Kasten, "There are a small percentage of students who have the talents and skill to train horses.

"She has a tremendous work ethic, drive and competition by nature," said Kasten, who instructed Blinks at UW-RF. "She learned her basics here. We gave her a good foundation in horsemanship and tools to build on."

Faculty and students will create outdoor works of art, which are designed to highlight a specific site on the UW-RF campus grounds. Large and small, whimsical and serious, each artwork is designed to be temporary and to vanish without a trace after three days of public viewing.

Last year the art department celebrated it's creativity with over 40 installations that were enjoyed by taking a stroll through the campus. Visitors might discover shadows that have become permanent; a colorful quilt made entirely of natural materials, or larger than life dancing pine needle figures. In past years guest artists and art department alumni also joined the festivities by creating outdoor installations.

For example, Belgium artist Christo's wrapped islands; walks and buildings use synthetic materials designed to withstand the elements, which are then recycled into other uses. But British artist Andy Goldsworthy's sculptures use only natural materials that immediately after fabrication begin to react to the chance conditions of weather and season and are left to naturally disintegrate.

These contemporary artists are exploring ideas that will only be experienced by others briefly, but memorably. Often these works also allow the process of collaborating with others to become an important part of the artistic process.

Beginning installation construction will start on Wednesday, Oct. 4. The finished installations can be viewed from Friday, Oct. 6 to Tuesday, Oct. 10. Viewers are asked to please respect the artistic ideas and to not alter or damage the artwork.

"The record enrollment shows that we are viewed as a quality institution that provides a great education by highly talented faculty and staff in some very focused programs," said Chancellor Ann Lydecker. "UW-River Falls is playing a vital role in educating traditional students and adult learners. We are getting western Wisconsin's best and brightest, and we are making them even better."

These freshmen indicators put UW-River Falls in the top half of the 13 University of Wisconsin System campuses for the quality of its incoming students. "Wisconsin has one of the finest public higher education systems in the nation, and so this puts us among the best of the best nationally for the quality of our students,"

Tuchtenhagen noted that UW-RF is in the second year of Plan 2008, which seeks to increase enrollments of students of color. He explained that the University is seeking to provide access to all students while also ensuring that majority students benefit from a diverse campus environment that reflects the modern workplace.

Three faculty members at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls have received the College of Arts & Sciences Outstanding Faculty Awards. Recognized in the area of arts/humanities was English Professor David Furniss; in mathematics/sciences was biology Professor E. Katherine Miller, and in social sciences was psychology Professor Daniel Linwick.

Faculty members and students selected Miller, Furniss, and Linwick for the honor through nomination. Nominations focused on excellence in teaching, understanding, helpfulness as advisers, and their ability to motivate students.

Furniss joined the faculty in 1987 and teaches such courses as Freshman English, sophomore literature, advanced composition, literature for adolescents, and has taught an honors section on the Vietnam War and reading and writing skills courses for master's candidates from Taiwan.

Modern Language Association, the Wisconsin Council of Teachers of English, and the National Council of teachers of English. He reviews for The English Journal and he has participated in more than a score of scholarly presentations or published activities.

Linwick came to UW-RF as an assistant professor in 1987 teaching courses in general psychology, research methods, behavior modification, learning and animal behavior. He also established the UW-RF animal learning laboratory, and has researched animal cognition. Prior to joining UW-RF, Linwick taught laboratory courses with a learning focus at the University of Minnesota. He also worked with educationally disadvantage minority students as a member of the Martin Luther King program staff. He also was an applied psychologist in the developmental disabilities program at the Brainerd Regional Human Services Center.

Miller received her bachelor's degree in biology from the University of California at Santa Cruz, doctorate in cell and molecular biology at University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center at Dallas, and she conducted postdoctoral research associate at Baylor college of Dentistry in Dallas.

At UW-RF Miller has served on numerous department, college and University committees. These include the Faculty Senate disability advisory, Faculty Senate external relations, Arts and Sciences curriculum, Facility Senate multi-cultural advisory, and the McNair Scholars search committee. She also is a college camp instructor, supervisor of the animal research faculty, and is an advisor for pre-professional students.

His dedication and desire to teach has not gone unnoticed. As a member of the UW-River Falls faculty for 32 years, animal and food science Professor Dean Henderson was recently recognized as the top teacher in the nation in his area of expertise.

"I have always admired his ability to truly interact intellectually with students and other clientele," Sebrank said. "He has the ability and enthusiasm to not only capture and hold student interest, but get them excited as well."

In 1969, he was responsible for developing a food science curriculum, and changing the focus of the department to animal and food science. At one time during his career, he was the lead instructor for 14 different courses.

Sebranek believes Henderson always leaves a positive impact with students and other professionals."Everyone who has had the opportunity to work with Dean has come away with a strong impression of optimism, enthusiasm, and willing cooperation," Sebranek noted.

Henderson stays active with his students by associating with many student organizations. He has served as adviser to the Block and Bridle club, Alpha Zeta, Food Science club and Campus 4-H. Henderson also helps his students find internships, averaging 12 placements per year since 1976.

Wisconsin, were selected to have their artwork displayed in October at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, the central region location for the Crayola Dream-Makers national program "Millennium Odyssey."

The students? assignment as part of "Millennium Odyssey" was to create artwork designed to share their thoughts of the past and dreams of the future. Out of 372 regional entries, these 15 students ranging from kindergarten through sixth grade were chosen and are from eight different schools in Wisconsin. At the conclusion of the exhibit, their work will be put permanently on display in Washington, D.C.

In 1984, Binney & Smith, makers of Crayola products, introduced the Dream-Makers program to help art and classroom teachers enhance the role of hands-on art activities as an integral part of the kindergarten through sixth grade school curriculum. Since then, more than 14 million students and tens of thousands of teachers have been involved in activities related to the Dream-Makers program.

"My creature is half bull and half octopus. My creature has to be in a bubble for protection," said Brielle Macbeth, a third-grader from Baldwin. "My creature is an underwater creature for protection."

"UW-RF was selected to host the Crayola Dream-Makers program because of its reputation for excellence in the arts and their community to strong educational programming in the schools and community throughout their art education program," said Diann Berry, director of art education and the Dream-Makers program.

Norrgard has been a film maker for some 18 years and offered her opinions during a Summer Film Institute at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. Sponsored by the National Endowment for the Humanities, the national institute is educating 22 high school teachers on how film influences racial opinions and stereotypes.

Los Angeles, of Chumash Tribal descent, who, as a child was "adopted out" and separated from her family after her parents died in a tragic car accident. Disturbing dreams and visions propel Laura on a journey of self-discovery. Through a twist of events she is reunited with her Chumash family and culture.

Some themes in the film deal with cultural traditions that the Chumash tribe follows. One custom the film recognizes is whenever a member of the tribe takes something from the earth for items such as medicine or food, they always have to put something back.

Native Americans face a few difficulties when studying to be a doctor. Cutting a corpse is against Chumash cultural beliefs and is "the number one reason why Native Americans drop out of medical college," Norrgard explained.

The cast and crew were primarily American Indian or First Nation descent representing a variety of tribal affiliations and heritages. American Indian professionals working in the film industry filled key roles such as writer, producer, executive producer, art director, and music director.

Besides being best short video for the American Indian Film Festival, the film also received an honorable mention from the Red Earth Film & Video Festival in 1997. The video also was nominated in 1997 for a series of awards such as best dramatic short for the Dream Speakers Film Festival, best independent short film/video from the Minnesota Film Board, and was a producers guild finalist for the Santa Clarita International Film Festival.

Norrgard realizes that making these films is providing a stepping-stone that allows Native Americans to tell their stories of traditions and customs. She realizes she is, "providing a tool for a lot of other voices out there to be heard."

The Tuesday classes feature presentations by UW-RF faculty and emiti professors speaking. Classes will be held on four Tuesdays beginning on Sept. 12 in the Presidents Room in the Hagestad Student Center.

Augustine arrived in 1968 and served as University bookstore cashier and later bookstore manager. When the bookstore became privatized and was leased to Follette Book Company, she became head of interlibrary loan at Chalmer Davee Library.

Her career highlights include receiving a sabbatical in 1995 to live and conduct research in Trinidad. This led to presentations at four international conferences and triggered the development of an international network of professional colleagues.

He found that three aspects of the University have changed during his time at UW-RF. First, the physical expansion of the campus and increases in the number of studnets; .a substantial increase inthe chemistry department of instrumentation; and an increase in the number of women taking chemistry classes. He noted he recently had a chemistry laboratory section with some 19 female students, and only one male student.

"Dakota Memory," a book combining his vocational and avocational interests, and "Abandoned" Now Stutter My Orphan," which is a fact-based novel exposing a research experiment gone awry. Halverson is responsible for developing the only program for the study and treatment of communication apprehension in the Upper Midwest. He also has developed a long-standing program for stuttering therapy and research at the University. Halvorson is also a member of the UW-RF athletic hall of fame.

The most noticeable changes for Halvorson include physical changes such as the location of the Ramer Field track. He said when he first set foot on the track it was located at Rodli Commons. Also, the students ate in the South Hall cafeteria, located in the present football office.

Another change Halvorson has seen is in the different attitudes the students have had during the years. He mentioned the students going through the apathetic/fun Elvis Presley-era. Then, the students took on a more rebellious Vietnam-era attitude and questioned the relevance of everything. In the 1980s the students seemed to maintain some loyalty to the University motto, "Where the Free Spirit Prevails," and during the 1990s, Halvorson saw the students having a more career-oriented perspective.

He considers serving as biology department chair as his most significant contribution to UW-RF. During his time as chair there were several new hires, including three of the four current long-time biology staff members.

Prochnow has worked with faculty to develop an interdisciplinary undergraduate program--marketing communications; seven programs in two colleges are involved in this program. He also created the School of Business and Economics, which combined three departments previously within the College of Arts & Sciences.

He feels setting up the advanced lab in the physics department is his most significant contribution to UW-RF. He also is responsible for the design and completion of the Swensen Sundial located on the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.

Cooper and Kelm participated in the SAD programs as well as the meetings of parent societies. Cooper is currently the first-year adviser for the Midwest Regional ADSA-SAD and Kelm recently completed the first year of a three-year term as faculty adviser to the national student affiliate organization.

Kasten was an invited speaker in a symposium addressing equine program needs within an animal science department. His presentation was titled, "Developing a horse program to meet the needs of industry."

Telfer served as president of the national ADSA-SAD in 1999-2000 and presided over SAD functions during the week. She also delivered a presentation in the undergraduate paper contest that was well received and received first place for her paper in the dairy production category.

He was one out of 84 nominees. He impacts many students each day and makes a personal effort to reach out to his advisees. Marketing communications Professor Stephen Olsen is the first recipient of the UW-River Falls Adviser of the Year award.

Advisees that submitted comments about Olsen included: "Awesome advising skills; open, friendly and approachable; very knowledgeable in his expertise; committed to the achievement of all students; providing the reassurance of our self-worth in the job market; having a sincere interest in his students' coursework and their lives."

The UW-RF Faculty Senate initiated the award because the institution has recognized outstanding teaching through the Distinguished Teacher Award. The Senate felt it was appropriate to recognize good advising and appointed a selection committee to seek out an adviser of the year.

A reception welcoming 22 high school teachers and their families on July 3 marked the opening of the month-long University of Wisconsin-River Falls Summer Film Institute emphasizing the depiction of minorities in film.

Directed by Professors Carole Gerster and Laura Zlogar, the institute is funded through a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities. "Picturing American Diversity: Cinematic Representations of America's Ethnic Minorities" will present film and the images created by film as a learning tool to be incorporated into high school classrooms across the country.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau welcomed the group and spoke about the unique learning environment UW-RF has to offer, referring to the location, staffing and commitment to educating others. He stressed the importance of learning about diversity and using film as a teaching tool to promote the educational experience.

English Professor Nicholas Karolides, noted the commitment UW-RF has to film studies, and the importance of the impact of film on society. Karolides, associate dean of the College of Arts & Sciences, who acted as the reception's master of ceremonies, uses film as a learning tool in his classes, and instructs students in University's secondary education teacher training program on the merits of using film in their classrooms.

He said too many students reach the college level and see film as little more than a visual aid. Film should be taught as literature, not simply used as an aid in the classroom. He said the film institute would underscore the importance of film to both high school teachers and students. "The cinematic representations of diversity are vitally important in today's culture," Karolides said. The study of film, the images created through films and how best to teach others what they are viewing is the purpose of the institute.

Renee Evans, a high school teacher from Crownpoint, N.M., was among those excited to be in River Falls and anticipating the seminar. She has been using film in her classroom to complement literature, such as "Of Mice and Men," "To Kill a Mockingbird" and "The Outsiders." Her students view the film, read the book and then discuss the differences.

"Continental Harmony" is the first-ever 50-state new music commissioning project in the United States designed to reaffirm the importance of community life and the vitality of the arts in society. St. Croix ArtBarn, in Osceola, Wis., was selected by the White House and the National Endowment for the Arts to commission a piece for this celebration.

"River Spirit" is a 17-minute piece expresses the importance of rivers in the history and future of Wisconsin. The piece explains the beauty and color of the St. Croix River, which serves as the boundary for Wisconsin and Minnesota.

The St. Croix, which is a National Scenic Riverway, is protected for its entire length by an Act of Congress, and is the only river on the North American Continent to be protected for its entire length.

Wis. The piece describes the endless cycle of water with a brook forming into a raging river and evaporating, and then having another brook form. "River Spirit" tells this through a four-movement piece, with the first two movements incorporating both a choir and orchestra, with the last two movements relying on voices.

The commissioning of the work represents the first time all 50 states, including the District of Columbia, have a guest composer chosen by a selected arts organization in the state to compose an original piece. This program is funded by a $500,000 grant from the National Endowment for the Arts.

Naylor began his research for "River Spirit" in late October when he visited the St. Croix Valley region for a week to get a feel for the atmosphere. He also obtained help composing his piece from local writers, receiving between 80 and 100 poems describing the beauty and life of the St. Croix River. Naylor incorporates text from seven poems in his piece.

Visitors and staff at UW-RF will have to contend with the usual amount of construction traffic, dust, dirt, and noise, but Hagen feels the end results are always worth the inconveniences during the summer.

Hagen listed four significant projects underway this summer: a floor cooling system and bleachers for ice hockey activities in Hunt Arena; data communication wiring in five residence halls; updating equipment in food science laboratories; and working on heating plant controls. Hagen said the projects are on schedule and will be completed on time.

This summer marks the first in many years where a major new building was not being constructed on campus. However, many new buildings are soon slated to begin construction. One project that has been approved and will begin construction next summer of a new $9 million residence hall. It will feature suite-style living with four students per suite, and will be fully funded by student fees.

A proposed health and human performance building valued at $20 million is in the initial stages. Presently, Hagen said, the University is seeking state planning funds. If approved, students will pay 15 percent of the cost, with the balance coming from state tax dollars.

Funded through a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities, it includes high school teachers from across the nation to promote awareness of the value and methods of representing ethnic minorities on film. The Institute is facilitated by UW-RF English Professors Carole Gerster and Laura Zlogar.

Some 22 teachers were selected, with nearly 300 inquiries regarding possible attendance to the Institute. Participants are chosen based on letters, essays and recommendations from school staff and administration. Those selected will incorporate materials from the Institute into their curriculum in such areas as history, English, social studies and film, and demonstrate how films have promoted or reversed racial stereotypes.

The National Endowment for the Humanities has provided support for programs and projects that reach millions of Americans to preserve and study cultural heritage, while providing a foundation for the future.

Sponsored by University Outreach, the program is designed to provide academic enrichment classes for students who show high academic potential, motivation and talent. University faculty and other specially selected instructors throughout local communities taught the classes.

A new feature this year gave students the option to stay overnight in residence hall rooms. Schuchter believes this gives students a better feeling for university life, and in the future will make the program more accessible to students outside the River Falls area.

Augustine, who will be retiring at the end of July, has been a vital part of the University for 32 years. She served as bookstore manager for her first 25 years, and spent the rest of her time as head of interlibrary loan at Chalmer Davee Library.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau had flattering compliments for Augustine. "Mary has served the entire University in the most exemplary manner," Thibodeau said in announcing the award. "Her knowledge, competence, and commitment to this University are to be commended."

"When I became head of interlibrary loan, I thought I had died and gone to heaven," Augustine exclaimed. "I was surrounded by books, and became part of a challenging and gracious department of the library."

Augustine is a member of the Wisconsin Library Association and in 1998 became chair-elect of the interlibrary loan roundtable, and chair in 1999. "I feel so fortunate to have been able to assist patrons in their search for information,"

"I have had very wonderful co-workers who are dedicated to service as much as I am," Augustine said. "They practice diversity unconsciously, not because it is demanded as an execution of their duties, but because it is an intrinsic part of their natures."

Those who know Thibodeau best tell of a chief executive officer who excelled in his position during those years. They cite his vision, intelligence, integrity, keen wit, guiding hand as a mentor and friend, and his downright stubbornness when advocating for the campus in Madison.

"A challenge in public higher education is that we have to build a case for our resources. There are a lot of good places to spend money. The chancellor has to sell higher education, and higher education specifically delivered from this campus.

"The faculty are concerned with academic quality, but they have to rely on the chancellor to sell it for them. That's a heavy responsibility. The chancellor has to spend a lot of time with legislators and other decision-makers explaining how students grow, and the return to the state. Legislators are not just spending money; they are looking for a return on the investment."

When he steps down on Aug. 1, he will turn over the campus to Dr. Ann Lydecker, who is serving as provost and chief academic officer at Bridgewater State University in Massachusetts. Lydecker was selected as a result of an extensive national search, and brings a regional perspective through her previous teaching and administrative experience at Mankato State University and Gustavus Adolphus College in Minnesota.

That's a result of Thibodeau's ensuring the campus was well-managed financially so its resources could be focussed on its most critical area of academics by putting resources into classroom support and faculty development.

The University has also remained true to its historic mission of keeping its doors open, Thibodeau noted. Some 60 percent of UW-RF's students are the first in their family to attend college, a figure which is half again as high as the national average. While throughout Thibodeau's tenure admission standards have increased dramatically, the institution has not lost sight of its role of providing access.

So those who are late bloomers in high school can come here. But at the same time, we have continually raised the bar higher in terms of expectations from our students. So the competencies that we have set for our students at graduation are second to none in the University of Wisconsin System."

When they leave here as graduates, those students are receiving a degree that is respected regionally and nationally because of faculty strength, excellent facilities, and an appropriate curriculum, Thibodeau said.

"If you look at our faculty, we are a comprehensive university that often is described as regional. My response is that that's true, but that we have a national reputation in a number of selected areas. And the numbers of those areas where we will have a national reputation will continue to grow in the future. It will grow because of the credentialling and the entrepreneurial spirit of our faculty.

"If you look at a comprehensive university of 5,000 students, you would be hard-pressed to find such an institution like UW-River Falls that has faculty with the number of terminal degrees as we have, with their array of academic preparation, and with the willingness of the faculty to participate in interdisciplinary instruction and other entrepreneurial efforts in pedagogy.

He predicts that providing access to students at an affordable price will remain a high priority. But the institution will have to explore new areas, including a strong commitment to offering programs and continuing education at times and through methods that are convenient to students of all ages. That means, he says, an increasing reliance on Internet-based delivery of courses, as well as expanded evening programs.

The academy is responding to that, he said. "Faculty are enterprising in their significant use of high tech. They are providing opportunities across a whole array from the use of technology as a pedagogy (teaching technique.)"

Into the distant future, efforts to expand external funding will be critical, as the University continues to see a shift in state funding from state-supported to state-assisted public higher education, Thibodeau said.

The ability of the campus to generate additional funds through alumni donations, corporate underwriting, and external grants will be crucial to maintaining the quality of the classroom experience, he said.

While many of Thibodeau's colleagues write texts, his choice of subject matter is unusual. Many administrators write about management, leadership or financial techniques. Few are published in their area of academic expertise.

First published in 1987, Anatomy & Physiology, has been a best-seller, with numerous printings, including translations into Spanish, Italian, Japanese and Chinese. It is considered the national standard in introductory courses for undergraduate students of human anatomy and physiology. In 1994 it was selected by the Text and Academic Author's Association for its William Holmes McGuffey Award for Textbook Excellence & Longevity in the highly competitive college textbook marketplace.

During his 15 years at UW-River Falls, Chancellor Thibodeau built lasting relationships with others as a mentor, colleague and friend. Here are their reflections on Thibodeau's leadership style, as well as their favorite recollection of working or socializing with him.

I benefited tremendously from Gary's leadership style because he was secure enough to relinquish some of his authority to others so they could carry out their responsibilities effectively. His team approach to management tapped the unique talents of each of us. These conditions allowed one's own leadership capabilities to flourish.

One of Gary's most endearing strengths was the scientific approach he took to problem solving. He absorbed all of the available information on a issue before making a decision. Decisions were generally final. He was firm but fair.

His resolve and persuasive skills paid great dividends for the campus community, though few knew the work he did behind the scenes to bring in the resources and recognition the campus needed to move forward.

A leader needs to make the tough decisions and he did that knowing his decisions were the best for the long-term health and vitality of UW-River Falls and its students. That's not to say he didn't personally anguish over the difficult decisions, but the institution was always at the heart of what guided his decisions.

I have known Gary since I arrived here 12 years ago. He was the first to really reach out, welcome me, and make me feel part of the UW System team. I have always been impressed with his deep understanding of the many issues we face in higher education, his knowledge of the UW System, and the sage, practical advice he always provided.

I have known Gary Thibodeau for slightly more than 15 years. I was a student representative on the Search & Screen Committee that helped hire him. As a Student Body President, I also worked with him closely in his first year on campus.

One thing that impressed me, and the other members of the Search Committee, was his firm commitment to serving students. He had, and still does have, a remarkable way of bringing every important discussion about the University back to how it affects the students. When he was asked in a recent forum to identify his primary constituency, he named the students because they are at the center of the University's mission.

As a leader, I have always found it very easy to work with the Chancellor, mainly because of his personal characteristics. He is always willing to discuss issues and listens very carefully to what is being said. As student body president, I worked with him on many issues, including the intramural fields, renovating the student center, lobbying the legislature, and so on. He demonstrated a willingness to make tough decisions, but always after carefully explaining the rationale behind them. That type of leadership helps maintain a level of trust on campus that is important to the success of the institution.

Gary was hired. In that capacity, my duty was to work primarily with the vice chancellors, not the chancellors. However, when I became UW System president, I got to know Gary better and we have worked together extremely well ever since.

Gary is an extraordinary higher education leader who balances good management with insightful leadership. He led UW-River Falls through some tough times of the 80's and early 90's, when the campus and the entire system were undergoing significant budget cuts, and more recently through much better times when it has been possible to invest in the future through building renovations and improved faculty salaries. Gary has helped UW-River Falls align its strategic planning with its budget allocations to the benefit of the campus and the UW System.

There are a few terms that help describe him and they are: kind, generous, ethical, intellectual, hard working and insightful. I feel very fortunate to have had a boss who mentored me when I started my administrative career and who allowed me the freedom to act independently as I gained experience.

The one thing that stands out with Gary is consistency. I cannot think of a single event, but you sort of always knew that if he was working on a new building or some other project that was critical for the campus and required an interaction with System or the Legislature, that it would eventually happen.

There was a sense that our relationship to System and the external players was in "good" hands. This is extremely important for a campus like UW-RF, which is 250 miles away from the center of the state political processes.

One of the most humorous moments of my time at UW-RF was when someone decided to have Gary, Virgil Nylander, and myself participate in a homecoming parade from the campus to the football field. Gary led the way on foot with Virgil and I driving lawnmowers directly behind him. A ragtag group of about 20 others followed. Gary walked into the stadium with his flat top held high while Virgil and I attempted to pop wheelies with our lawnmowers.

Among the many things he has done that stand out is something few current students know about. He spent his first year at UW-RF living in Hathorn Hall, something that was much appreciated by students at the time.

I think that his willingness to live in the residence hall helped set a positive tone on campus, and sent the message to students that the Chancellor was not only concerned about student issues, but that he had first-hand experience dealing with many of those issues and had a firm understanding of the University environment in which students live and learn.

There is one searing memory that I will never forget. We were at the Capital meeting with the State Building Commission in the Governor's meeting room asking for approval of the Davee Library remodeling project. The Governor's staff had recommended that we receive fewer dollars than we needed for this project.

When it was the Chancellor's turn to present our case he sat at one end of this long table with the Governor at the other end. The Governor's staff made their recommendation and then the Chancellor countered with all the reasons why we should receive the funds we had requested. It soon became apparent to everyone in the room, including the Governor, that Chancellor Thibodeau was not going to leave the table until UW-River Falls received what it needed.

The end result of his actions was that we did receive the additional funds to remodel our library. I'm not sure where the Governor found the additional funds; I was both delighted with the funds and thankful that I didn't have a heart attack on the spot.

Gary has become famous for his leadership in honoring retiring campus chancellors with humor and with heart. He has been every new chancellor's friend and advisor--I know his chancellor colleagues will miss him.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls recently received national recognition for geology projects involving the Rocky Branch of the Kinnickinnic River in River Falls and the Hay River Watershed in Prairie Farm.

Jennifer Erdman, a geology major from Augusta, researched the Hay River Watershed as part of her geology senior seminar class. Her research, the first ever conducted on the watershed, did not find significant pollution problems.

For three weeks Keen and his students researched the Rocky Branch, which is usually 4-5 meters wide and a half meter deep. The bed is sand and gravelly with some submerging aquatic vegetation. The students examined the river to learn about rock sedimentation and erosion. "I feel this is a good project because students get exposed to science and gain learning experience," Keen said. "It is important for them to learn how to evaluate and study rivers."Keen feels most students are a little hesitant when starting this projects such as this because they must develop their own research questions.

Erdman completed her project during February and April of 1999 at four locations in the Hay River Watershed near Prairie Farm. The watershed is located within glacial till plains and surrounded by agricultural lands about an hour northeast of River Falls.

Americans faces health care challenges on a daily basis. They are concerned with transmitted diseases like influenza and strep, or food-borne illnesses like salmonella. But they may never consider the real threat of a deadly imported viruses that could affect life in the Midwest.

The idea that the world has become smaller through technological advances has long been a reality. Now, people have easy access to remote areas never before visited by humans. Emerging infectious diseases from exotic locations now have the potential of traveling just as easily and quickly as the people or animals who become infected with them.

This is one of the reasons viruses such as an Ebola-Reston outbreak among monkeys in Reston, Va., are still hot topics. The Jaax's managed the Reston research team that contained the outbreak, and they became the basis for the book, "The Hot Zone," by Richard Preston, and the movie, "Outbreak," starring Dustin Hoffman and Rene Russo.

"Reston served as a wake-up call to this country to say we are unprepared to deal with an outbreak of this scope," said Jerry Jaax. "We need to look at what significant shortcomings we have in our public health systems. Local, state and national response is under review to improve our handling of potential outbreaks.

Potential diseases may come from Mexico into Texas through transmission by mosquitoes. On the East Coast the transmission of West Nile fever is being watched in migratory birds, and is a possible threat to humans. Ebola viruses are believed to be passed up the food chain.

They can be extraordinarily lethal. Ebola-Zaire, for example, has a 90 percent mortality rate in humans. Fortunately, the odds of the virus actually surfacing in Wisconsin are slim, .according to the Jaaxes. "Ebola-Zaire responds well to containment. It is not an easily transmitted disease. However, there are other diseases where we are not so fortunate," they noted.

United States would be vulnerable to an infection. The threat lies in the huge stores of the virus that were manufactured by other nations, including the former Soviet Union, as well as some rogue Third World nations, and stockpiled for biological warfare. If America destroys its stocks, where will it obtain the virus to create immunization stores, the Jaaxes and others ask.

Colonel Nancy Jaax noted, "It is very important, through adequate surveillance, to watch these diseases. These types of diseases are not easy to treat. Some of these diseases were thought to have been beaten and surveillance dollars were cut back. A critical issue in these emerging nations is that they be monitored very closely, because that is the place one of these viruses is most likely to occur."

Colonel Jerry Jaax pointed out that surveillance is expensive. "It requires infrastructure, and people want their dollars spent in other areas. Surveillance, on the surface, looks like it is not worth the investment you are making in it when you don't have something to deal with. But, when it happens, then all of a sudden, it is a big event because when people are affected it could mean the difference between life and death."

Fortunately for U.S. citizens, the Jaaxes and their colleagues serve as gatekeepers against potential virus outbreaks. Nancy Jaax still spends much her of time in the U.S. Army medical research facility at Fort Dettrick, Md.

Her passion is the research and knowledge of the Ebola virus and the opportunity to don a biosafety space suit, walk into the containment unit and begin manipulating a lethal virus that literally has no cure. Trust in the equipment and the procedures to contain a hazard like Ebola come very naturally to her.

Jerry Jaax is now researching at Kansas State University in argicultural bioterroism, a closely intertwined subject to global health. He feels there is a significant vulnerability in this country for agricultural-bioterroism, which would translate into economic terrorism. "The implications of bioterrorism or a straight emerging disease outbreak that could decimate cattle, hogs wheat or rice would be devastating to the U.S." It's possible to destroy a portion of the food chain, resulting in a major world wide economic impact.

While the potential exists for an outbreak at any time, the Jaaxes ended on a positive note. It does not necessarily appear that viral outbreaks are any worse than in the past. Viruses have been around for generations. However, as the Jaaxes noted, the presence of pervasive world-wide media now means that we have extensive information on every outbreak.

The program will be launched next fall and offer three evening courses totaling eight credits: Organizational Theory & Behavior; Business Law, exploring both contract and human resources; and Human Resource Management, offered respectively on Monday, Tuesday and Wednesday evenings.

"This is an evening program for working adults. So there will be many steps taken to make it convenient for them, including the times that courses are scheduled, and even how they enroll and obtain their books."

According to Potts, a student will be able to enroll in four courses per semester and three summer courses and complete the program in 12 months. Two courses per semester would lead to completion in 2.5 years. However, he and Foust noted that they expect many students to enroll in only one course per semester because of competing demands from their professional and family responsibilities.

Another convenience for adult learners is that the program will marry traditional classroom courses with web-based and web-enhanced courses. By the Fall of 2001 up to four courses will be offered completely on the Internet to provide students the convenience of taking them either at home or at their business as their daily schedule allows. The program is built around 80 management competencies that are divided among 11 required courses. A unique feature of the program is that students may be able to demonstrate that they already possess the competencies covered in up to 15 credits of coursework and receive credit for those courses.

Professor James Engebreton was one of the 120 artists whose work was chosen by jury to participate from among 1,650 applicants. He displayed about 70 pieces of his artwork, ranging across a variety of sizes, shapes, and imagery. Engebreton is known for his carved and sandblasted work. He uses traditional glass blowing techniques combined with more contemporary processes to create one-of-a-kind and limited production pieces.

Engebretson started working with glass in 1968 and fell in love with the materials and process, and 32 years later he stills enjoys it. Engebretson said of his nomination, "It is an honor to be selected. I look forward to being in the company of my artistic peers."

He attended graduate school at Rhode Island School of Design. After graduating he opened his own studio in Vermont and five years later he moved to Hudson and started teaching at UW-RF. Engebretson teaches part time at UW-RF and at the University of Wisconsin System Field Station at Pigeon Lake. The rest of his time is spent in his studio.

Dean Gorden Hedahl of the College of Arts & Sciences at UW-RF said, "Jim creates fascinating and very impressive glass pieces that deserve recognition. Inclusion in the Smithsonian exhibit is an individual accomplishment, but it also reflects very positively on the department and University. UW-RF has an outstanding glass program with many fine and productive faculty, alumni, and students. Our undergraduate glass studio is unique and this selection indicated that some of the best work in the county is being done in River Falls."

The glasswork that Engebretson displayed is a result of a unique working, creative partnership, with his wife Renee. Each of them plays a distinct role, with James developing the form for the glass and Renee creating the surface design. Together they participate in about seven fine art shows around the country each year. Other recent accomplishments are a Fellowship from the Wisconsin Art Boards and a commission from Northwest Airlines for a glass piece that is installed in the SeaTac airport in Seattle, Wash. Their work is also featured on the front cover of the 2000 Wisconsin Art Museum and Gallery Guide.

Gary A. Thibodeau with an extensive legacy to contribute to the 125-year history of UW-River Falls. Those who know Thibodeau best tell of a chief executive officer who excelled in his position during those years. They cite his vision, intelligence, integrity, keen wit, guiding hand as a mentor and friend, and his downright stubbornness when advocating for the campus in Madison.

"Gary is an extraordinary higher education leader who balances good management with insightful leadership. He led UW-River Falls through some tough times of the 80's and early 90's, when the campus and the entire system were undergoing significant budget cuts, and more recently through much better times when it has been possible to invest in the future through building renovations and improved faculty salaries. Gary has helped UW-River Falls align its strategic planning with its budget allocations to the benefit of the campus and the UW System."

Throughout Thibodeau's tenure admission standards have increased dramatically, but the institution has not lost sight of its role of providing access. "We have tried to maintain a balance as an avenue of opportunity for our students.

So, those who are late bloomers in high school can come here. But at the same time, we have continually raised the bar higher in terms of expectations from our students. So the competencies that we have set for our students at graduation are second to none in the University of Wisconsin System."

The Chancellor's Award is the highest non-academic honor a student can receive at UW-RF. It is given to students for their leadership and service to the University during the course of their time on campus.

During her four years at the University, Gaede has been extensively involved in many areas of University life. She has been a member of Alpha Sigma Alpha Sorority for the past four years, serving her sorority in many different capacities such as Scholarship Chair, Philanthropy Chair, Ritual Chair, and Chapter Vice-President.

In addition, she has been very involved in Panhellenic Council during the past three years, most recently serving as its president. She was one of a select group of women to hold the title of Recruitment Counselor for Fall Recruitment 1999. In conjunction, Gaede was initiated into the Order of Omega, the Greek Honor Society, this spring.

She had the unique opportunity for three years of serving a Resident Assistant in the University's residence halls program. During this time, Gaede's enthusiasm for the job further strengthened her passion for helping others. Gaede has been appointed as the Crabtree Residence Hall Manager for next academic year.

As a student leader in the University's residence life program, during the past semester Gaede worked diligently as the Student Training Manager for the Student Leadership Development and Programming Center. In this capacity, she developed training modules for future student Orientation Leaders, Resident Assistants, and other student paraprofessional staff.

Throughout her three years at UW-RF, Jurgens has been involved in many aspects of campus and community life. Jurgens has been a Student Association Student Senator for three consecutive years and currently serves as the Student Association President. Through these student government experiences, Jurgens has also been extremely active with the United Council of University of Wisconsin Students and the United States Student Association, which represents students statewide and across the nation. Jurgens was recently given the "Delegate of the Year" Award from the United Council of University of Wisconsin Students.

In addition, Mundt's experiences in Student Government have allowed her to have significant impact across the campus. For Student Senate, she has served as the Student Welfare Chairperson and Director of Finance and Operations. During the current academic year, Mundt served in the role of the Fees and Facilities Board Chair. In this capacity, she was extremely involved with students, faculty, and staff in the development of the concept document for a new $20 million student union at UW-RF as well as contributing to the development of the new $26 million Health and Human Performance facility. In addition, this academic year she served as the student representative on the University Space Planning Committee.

During her four years at UW-RF, Nelson has been extensively involved in the life of the University. Nelson has been an active member of the Student Alumni Association for the past three years and has served as the organization's President and student ambassadors team leader, in addition to being a member of the fundraising and alumni relations committees. In 1999 Nelson was named the "Outstanding Member of the Year" for her service, commitment, and dedication to the Student Alumni Association.

During Schaffner's four years at UW-RF, he has maintained a high level of participation in a variety of campus activities. Leadership positions in the Agricultural Education Society, Alpha Tau Alpha, and the Alpha Gamma Rho Fraternity have provided Schaffner with a wealth of experiences and opportunities.

Highlights in these organizations have included working with younger members on their personal development; being a member of a national winning debate team; and attending State and national leadership conferences. Special appointments for Schaffner have included to two University governance committees. These are the College of Agriculture, Food, and Environmental Sciences Curriculum Committee and the Search and Screen Committee for a tenure track position in the Agricultural Education Department. These allowed Schaffner to represent students' interests.

FFA members to develop their leadership skills and awareness about opportunities in agriculture. He was also selected in the fall of 1998 to represent the State of Wisconsin as their National FFA Officer Candidate. In both these roles, Schaffner served as an advocate for both Agriculture and Agricultural Education across the State of Wisconsin.

During his five years at UW-RF, Zeitler has been involved with a variety of campus organizations. As president of the Student Geography Organization, he spearheaded fund-raising efforts and organized the annual map painting on the playgrounds of local schools. In addition, he coordinated many organizational field trips and banquets.

Zeitler has shared his knowledge of Geographic Information Systems with University faculty and staff through his participation in a GIS workshop and is currently working on a project with University Outreach.

As a Resident Assistant in the campus residence halls, he supported student involvement in a variety of campus activities and he played an important role in the success of Johnson Residence Hall's "Hallapallooza," a campus-wide event offering live entertainment, food and a volleyball tournament for students.

Zeitler has taken advantage of supplementary academic programs offered to University students to foster their academic and personal growth. First, he experienced life "out west" by attending the University of Wyoming through his participation in the National Student Exchange Program. Next semester he will tour Europe and study land reclamation through the Semester Abroad Program.

In addition to his travels and work with the Geography Department and residence life, Zeitler has been an active member in the Rodeo Club and the Men's Volleyball Club, in addition to hosting a radio show on the campus radio station, WRFW.

The program features the premiere of Spear's "Legacy" for Wind Symphonic Ensemble, as well as several other selections by the composer. The commissioned piece, written for symphonic and wind ensemble and three solo percussionists and was composed to commemorate the 125th Anniversary of UW-RF, which is being celebrated this year.

Spears is a former professor of music at Arkansas State University and has studied with Blyth Owen, Alan Sout, and Anthony Donato. Spears has written over 250 works for band, choir, orchestra and chamber ensembles. His compositions have been perfromed and recorded worldwide and Spears is considered one of the most well-known American composers of wind and percussion music.

The commisoned composer program is the longest continuously running project of its kind in the nation. It was initiated in 1967 by UW-RF retired faculty member Conrad De Jong when he commissioned Vincent Persichetti to compose "Celebrations" for chorus and wind ensemble. Other composers who have beeen part of this project over the years include John Cage, Morton Feldman, Ross Lee Finney, and Fisher Tull.

The cost of the workshop is $200 per person, which includes the two-day workshop, two lunches and a take-home manual and video that will help dairy producers and their employees evaluate the strengths and weaknesses of their dairy operation, and find ways to improve their dairy's milk quality. The Wisconsin Milk Marketing Board will provide a one-time stipend of $75 per farm to help pay the cost for the first participant from a farm that attends the workshop.

The Tuesday class, "Morning With a Professor" will feature presentations by several UW-River Falls professors speaking within their area of expertise. Classes will be held on four Tuesdays beginning on April 25 in the President's Room in the Hagestad Student Center.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls on May 10 will celebrate 125 years of providing higher education, life-long learning opportunities and community outreach to the east metro area and western Wisconsin.

"We have a proud tradition of being a true point of access to opportunity for those who have passed through our doors over the past 125 years," Thibodeau said. "We are extremely proud of accomplishing our mission of helping people to grow as individuals and professionals and to become engaged in a life of the mind."

Education Association and it is a Center of Excellence in Undergraduate Education in Chemistry and Physics. In the past decade, students in its College of Agriculture have won 10 national championships in such diverse academic competitions as soil science, dairy science, floriculture and general knowledge.

Thompson will join in the official naming ceremony of the new $6.5 million education building. Wyman was associated with public higher education for more than six decades that began in 1932 at the State Teacher's College in River Falls.

Hagestad Student Center. This will be an opportunity for alumni and University friends to thank Thibodeau for his 15 years of service as chancellor. Thibodeau will retire on Aug. 1. Refreshments will be served.

Aleisha Troendle, a junior conservation major from North St. Paul who is chairing the event, said, "Unity in the Community provides educational opportunities for students, faculty and the community to experience different religion, races and ethnicity."

Wyman was associated with public higher education for more than six decades that began in 1932 at the State Teacher's College in River Falls. During those decades Wyman served River Falls and Wisconsin higher education as a professor of history, scholar, author, publisher, administrator and benefactor.

"Walker Wyman was a remarkable person. He was a master teacher, a prolific publisher, and a wonderful mentor to his students and to his colleagues. He had a real love for this campus. Achieving the naming of this building for Walker Wyman is one of the high points of my career through 15 years of service here as chancellor; that is how strongly I feel about this," Thibodeau said.

The National Education Association cited the College as one of the 10 most innovative teacher education programs in the nation for its field-based experiences for student teachers in partnership with surrounding school districts and for its use of technology in teacher training.

Wyman, at the time of his death in March 1999 at the age of 91, had recently published his 23rd book, "Great Legends and Stories of Mid-America." He was a contributing author to many other books, in addition to publishing scores of scholarly works and publications. An avid diarist, Wyman had written over 100 personal journals, which he donated to the State Historical Society archives.

Wisconsin-Whitewater during a period of extensive growth to accommodate a generation of "baby boomers" seeking a university education. During his tenure, more than 3,000 persons were added to the student body and 20 new buildings were completed or started. The campus mall there is named in his honor.

Wyman's contributions earned him numerous accolades, including designation as the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents "Centennial Distinguished Professor of History." At UW-River Falls his support of the arts is memorialized through the Wyman Performance Series named for Wyman and his wife Helen, who illustrated many of his books.

Award of Merit from the Western History Association for his distinguished contributions to the cause of western history; an Outstanding Educator award from the Wisconsin Association of School Administrators; and was a Distinguished Professor of History at UW-RF.

Located in the Chequamegon National Forest on the north shore of Pigeon Lake, the field station summer session is a combined effort of five University of Wisconsin campuses. Managed by UW-River Falls, this unique setting provides an excellent academic experience as well as an opportunity for recreation.

July 2-8. James McKahan of UW-RF teaches this two-credit course that requires students to assemble a drawing field kit, create an illustration notebook and collect specimens from nature to draw in the studio.

Team leader is Dutch Van Den Heuvel. It offers instruction and lab experiences to counselors, teachers, administrators and human service providers on designing and implementing guidance programs in K-12 schools and technical colleges.

"As a way of life, the family dairy farm may be doomed, and I wanted to capture it before it was gone," said Berg. Berg visited five small dairy farm families in Minnesota and Wisconsin and asked them about their lives and how they are surviving in today's economy. She also consulted three dairy experts at UW-RF and farm safety experts.

What she found is the numbers of young farmers are decreasing as farms grow in size. Many farm owners simply must grow accordingly and that puts many of them into managerial roles, instead of doing the hands-on work they are accustomed to. Farmers don't relish this, but have come to accept it.

"People who do this work think of it as a way of life and they find joy in it. What I found were eloquent, hard-working people who want to spend time with their loved ones doing work they can be proud of," said Berg.

"Dean and I agreed that our primary goal in this piece was to step back and let the voices of the dairy farmers come through," Berg said. "I'm so pleased that NBNA thinks we succeeded. It was a wonderful experience from start to finish."

Open to the public, the health fair is to inform students and community members of important health related issues. Interactive booths, presenters or screen tests will be offered from various businesses, organizations, and agencies.

Participants will have the opportunity to register for door prizes that will be awarded on a point system. The points will be accumulated at the different booths by participating in actives, games and by answering questions.

Investments by FNB and other donors will support our efforts to strengthen economic development through the education and training of both our degree-seeking students as well as the workforce. I am very grateful for their support," Anderson said.

It will be located at the Mann Valley Instructional Farm about four miles northwest of the University's main campus. Included in the facility will be technology-enhanced classrooms with electronic outreach capabilities.

They, too, savor the educational opportunities that will become available for their employees and clientele. Rather than holding training sessions at hotels or conference facilities, they can bring their employees to a high tech/high touch facility that allows for global connections as well as meaningful hands-on experiences."

Anderson continues to look for Dairy Learning Center investors. "We need additional cash donations and equipment to ensure project completion." Anderson welcomes conversations with prospective investors who wish to showcase their equipment at the new facility. They can reach him at 715/425-3784.

Bridget Finke, a graduating senior who is a double major in speech communication and business administration, will deliver the 125th anniversary commencement address at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls on May 20.

Finke's speech, "Which Bridges to Cross...," will discuss the most notable innovations and events of the 20th Century and the implications they present for the 522 UW-River Falls students who are to become the first to commence in the new century and millennium.

She was supported in her application by emeriti Professor Gerald Matteson of the agricultural education department and a former assistant dean of the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences, and by Professor Suzanne Hagen, of the speech communication & theatre arts department and a former assistant dean of the College of Arts & Sciences.

School, and had "never observed a high school student who was so articulate, expressive and confident." At UW-RF, Matteson recruited Finke to be his student assistant in his Leadership and Group Dynamics class, supervised her as a student worker in the agriculture education department, and advised her in the Agricultural Education Society. Through those experiences, Matteson noted, "I have not know anyone who would be a better Commencement Speaker."

Hagen acted as an academic adviser and professor to Finke, who she found to be an outstanding student. She also supervised Finke's internship with the New Richmond law firm of Doar, Drill & Skow. Said Hagen, "Bridget's perceptive, extremely bright, thoughtful and very articulate. Her classroom oral presentations are of the highest caliber; I really have to work to find suggestions for improvement."

The competition consisted of four separate sections and the champion was selected based on a composite placing in each of the sections. Students complete a written exam, display skills in a laboratory practical, give an oral presentation, and compete head-to-head in a quiz bowl.

According to Professor Steven Kelm, who coaches the team, "The contest is a very fair representation of what the students are actually learning compared to what they are expected to be learning, and it measures how students perform in those expectations."

According to Professor Anthony Jilek, a team adviser and the animal and food science department chair, "To be able to do so well with the big name agriculture colleges says a lot about the quality of our program, students, and faculty."

Professor Karen Klyczek becomes the 37th recipient of the most prestigious award presented by the University to recognize excellence in fulfilling the University's 125-year-old primary mission of undergraduate education.

At UW-RF, Klyczek teaches a wide range of courses, including cell biology, immunology, virology, molecular biology, microbiology, introduction to biology, and animal cell culture. She also is a member of the University's interdisciplinary biotechnology program that reaches scores of students across two colleges and numerous departments, as well as biotechnology teachers and agriculture instructors across Wisconsin and Minnesota.

I know her to be extremely committed to her students and to teaching and advising them. She is an articulate campus leader in the efforts to involve undergraduate students in research, scholarly and creative activities. Dr. Klyczek is a wonderful role model and an excellent representative of the many dedicated teachers at UW-River Falls."

Klyczek has been extraordinarily successful at attracting nine state and federal grants totaling $1.45 million from such agencies as the National Science Foundation, National Institute of Health and the Eisenhower Math & Science Education Act to develop curricular materials for classes in biology and biotechnology. Often these funds are used to train returning K-12 teachers in the sciences and biotechnology, as well as for UW-RF undergraduates.

In addition to her teaching and administrative responsibilities as department chair, Klyczek continues to be active in scholarly publishing and presentations, with more than three dozen to her credit.

She also is an active consultant locally and nationally. Among her many professional contributions have been to provide assistance as the regional coordinator for the University of Wisconsin System BioLink Project; as a reviewer for the National Science Foundation Instrumentation and Laboratory Improvement Grant Program; adviser to the National FFA Agricultural Biotechnology Education Initiative, advisory board member of the Wisconsin Youth Apprenticeship Program in Biotechnology; consultant to the River Falls School District Interdisciplinary Biotechnology Course Development project; consultant to the Wisconsin CESA Districts 10 and 11 Biotechnology Curriculum Development Project; and adviser to the National Science Foundation Undergraduate Biotechnology Curriculum Development Project.

Klyczek joined the faculty after completing a post-doctoral cancer research fellowship at the Temple University School of Medicine in Philadelphia. She holds a doctorate in biochemistry from UW-Madison and a bachelor's degree in biology and chemistry from Augustana College.

Since her graduation in 1979 with a degree in music education, Steiner's talent has garnered her the opportunity to perform with the Met and many other opera companies around the nation and the world. She has shared such stages as Carnegie Hall with opera and classical music icons Luciano Pavarotti, Placido Domingo, Jose Carreras, Marilyn Horne, Zubin Mehta and Mirella Freni.

UW-River Falls. In 1980 she entered the Metropolitan Opera Auditions in Minneapolis, which seek to identify promising performers, and became the youngest person to ever win the competition. As a result she was invited to perform as guest soloist with the Apollo Mens' Chorus at Orchestra Hall in Minneapolis and with the Des Moines Metro Opera Company in Iowa.

Steiner next moved to Chicago to pursue a master's degree in the nationally acclaimed music program at Northwestern University, and continued her professional performances by appearing with the Chicago Lyric Opera Company and Chicago Opera Theatre. In 1985, she entered another Met regional competition and again took first place.

Steiner also has performed in many charity concerts and has returned to Wisconsin for performances, including at UW-River Falls. This year she will perform in Withee to help in its celebration of its 150th anniversary.

According to CAFES Dean William Anderson, "Rod Rommel is very deserving of this year's distinguished agriculturist award for a number of reasons. As a member of CAFES advisory council, which is made up of industry, education, association, and alumni stakeholders, he has provided valuable imput for the College in a wide array of topics, including but not limited to, strategic planning, curriculum, technology, and facility development. He recently spearheaded an effort to procure a sizeable investment from Farm Credit Services in support of UW-RF new Dairy Learning Center." The architectural design process for the $3.5 million Center has just begun.

Some of Rommel's other accomplishments include serving as a director and board member for the Wisconsin Federation of Cooperatives, as an adviser on the UW-River Falls Agriculture Advisory board, and as a trustee on the Seventh Farm Credit District Retirement Trust Fund.

Ramirez's "Misa Criolla", featuring freshmen Mike Reich, of Cameron. The other half of the program will be acappella masterpieces from the Renaissance to the 20th century. Chamber Singers, a smaller group from the Concert Choir membership, will also perform. Cudd and the New Music Ensemble, will be featured in a work they performed last semester.

Scott has spoken to thousands of students throughout Wisconsin and Minnesota over the past seven years about this unprecedented tragedy known as the Holocaust and why it is relevant to Americans today.

Lydecker has been at Bridgewater State College since 1992. She started as the founding dean of its School of Education and Allied Sciences. Three years later, she was named acting vice president for academic affairs and was permanently appointed to the position in 1996.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau said the major is a reflection of the University's commitment to societal needs and to its dedication of finding effective approaches to accessing faculty expertise in new academic settings.

"Society is on the threshhold of extensive reconsideration of how to build sustainable communities that minimize our impact on the environment and on natural resources. Our new major will incorporate our exceptional strengths in the sciences across the entire University to broadly train our students in all considerations of the environment so that they can immediately and effectively make a substantial contribution to resolving these important concerns," Thibodeau said.

The environmental science major will draw from faculty expertise from both the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences and the College of Arts & Sciences. Six departments are represented: Plant and Earth Science, which was recognized with the University of Wisconsin Board of Regents Award for Teaching Excellence; Chemisty and Physics, which is designated as a Regents Center of Excellence in Undergraduate Education; as well as the departments of Biology, Geography and Agricultural Engineering Technology.

Graduates will have widespread employment opportunities in the environmental sciences, including some with a distinct agricultural emphasis, as well as a solid base to pursue an advanced degree. Employment opportunities could include management of water quality, air quality, solid waste, or hazardous waste; independent consulting; regulatory agencies; pollution abatement; compliance auditors; and corporate environmental health and safety technicians.

CAFES Dean William Anderson says graduates will have strong success at finding employment. "We will be capitalizing on our strengths in six different departments, which is very unusual for colleges nationally. We will be creating broadly trained graduates who will help the industries affected by environmental sciences to upgrade the quality of their work force."

Students will be educated to address environmental issues that requires them to be well-versed in interdisciplinary technical information gathering, analysis and remediation techniques, to communicate their findings clearly to others, and to work comfortably with extensive state and federal regulations in a socially responsible way.

Students will take 36 credits of study in the major, and will be required to participate in a new freshman colloquium that will introduce them to employment opportunities and fields of study. Hands-on service-learning experiences also are built into the programs, with many students participating in field experiences both in the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River that traverses the campus, as well as in the St. Croix River watershed.

Of the latter, Keen noted that those in the environmental sciences often are confronted with difficult communication scenarios. As professionals, they must be adept at gathering and interpreting scientific data and then explaining it to others, including specialists and the general public. Those in the profession often are called on to translate their findings to laypersons in potentially hostile settings.

"That's inherent for the major since technology changes over time and our graduates will have to grow in their skills as the need requires. They will be broadly educated so they can change as their specialty area advances," Kaltenberg noted.

"In environmental areas, issues are becoming much more complicated," Cain noted. "Substantial progress has been made on addressing some of the issues that could be easily resolved. Now society is addressing the more complex issues that require both a science and a social consideration. There is a need for students who can take on these responsibilities to effectively address new challenges."

Cain added that environmental problems do not respect political boundaries: a problem created in one community can affect many others, whether they are cities or states. "There is a need for graduates to deal with the environment and the social sensitivities as problems cross those boundaries. If you are used to dealing in that arena, there are a lot of opportunities."

Norway and was the first potter to receive a prestigious Bush Fellowship to advance his studies. In Japan the media described him as an "art God." He has been a guest artist at more than 70 universities, including the Chicago Art Institute, the Bariff School of Fine Arts, and the Oslo School of Art in Norway.

Johnston hopes people will leave the exhibition feeling satisfied with what they see. "I hope people will see good pots and fall in love with them," Johnston said. "I want people to want to take them home, and use them in their everyday lives."

The opening reception is on March 18 from 4-6:30 p.m. Sales will be limited to one of Mackenzie's works per household during the opening reception. Additional works may be purchased after March 18 but will remain on display until the close of the exhibition.

The first part of Philip's lecture will detail the experiences of working on telescopes in the Soviet Union. He also will describe how new devices and techniques have made telescopes more effective, as well as some of their current problems.

Issues impacting world-wide health including the highly contagious Ebola virus strains, genetically modified foods and health care interventions will be debated April 17 at a day-long symposium at UW-River Falls. The event is free and open to the public.

The keynote speakers are Colonels Nancy and Jerry Jaax who are experts in the field of medical defense against chemical and biological agents. Panel discussions will include "Health Care Intervention," by Miriam Harriet Labbok, MD, of the U.S. Agency for International Development, and "Genetically Modified Organisms" by Anne K. Vidaver, professor and head of plant pathology at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, and Gabriela Flora, program associate on agriculture biotechnologies at the Institute for Agriculture and Trade Policy in Minneapolis, Minn.

The Jaax's are best known for their work in the successful containment of the 1989 Ebola outbreak in Reston, Va. This outbreak occurred in a quarantine facility among imported monkeys, and is believed to have been spread through airborne particles. There are four known types of the Ebola virus including Ebola-Zaire, Ebola-Sudan and Ebola Ivory Coast that have caused deaths among humans. The fourth type, the Ebola-Reston virus was not transmitted to humans.

Genetically Modified Food raises issues about health, environment, ethics and economics. The debates over the human consumption of Genetically Modified Organisms (GMO) have led to burning of fields in India and rigid labeling concerns in Europe. While this is a major concern overseas, little has been heard about the use of GMO in the U.S. until a 1999 report revealed GMO corn pollen sickens Monarch butterflies. Politically, the U.S. has backed the development and use of GMO in the food supply, and GMO based food has been marketed to consumers with little publicity of public awareness.

Like an array of glittering gemstones on black velvet, individual performances will highlight the Spring 2000 Dance Theatre Concert at UW-River Falls April 12-15. The facets of ability, grace, strength and talent are combined with choreography, costumes, music and lighting to create a unique vision expressed through dance.

The main object of Dance Theatre is, "not just to dance, but to create," according to Karla Zhe, director of the Modern Dance Theatre. Each of the jewels polished for this concert offer separate, distinct expressions of diversity through dance.

Modern Dance Theatre promotes dance as a part of life, involving mind, soul and body. While the gems produced for the spring concert are unrelated creations, each performance linked by the golden filigree of producing thought provoking work. Dance Theatre is a student run organization, with more than 40 members.

To become a member, students must audition in the fall. About 20 students are enrolled in the Dance minor at UW-RF, which offers a wide variety of activities connecting students, the River Falls community and the Twin Cities area as well.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls Professors Margaret Swanson and Robin Murray worked diligently for seven years to make their book "Playwrights of Color," come alive. During those years, the book went from an idea to a concept and then finally was published by the Intercultural Press.

The book is named after the theater diversity class that Swanson and Murray created eight years ago. "Playwrights of Color" resulted from a need for a guiding tool that professors can use when teaching about diversity in the theater. The book consists of 15 plays written by playwrights of color, 14 from the United States and one from Canada. Each chapter focuses on a single play and has background material to enhance the student's understanding and appreciation of both the dramatic work and the cultural or ethnic perspective of the playwright, Swanson said.

In addition, all chapters include an overview of the historical, sociological, cultural or political background relevant to the play. Playwright biographies and important production companies' descriptions are included the book's chapters.

Some of the book's plays were commercial successes, while others were critical successes and financial failures, according to Swanson. Swanson notes there is a wealth of plays available, but that the decision to include a play does not suggest that she and Murray thought that it is better or more important than other plays that were excluded. She added, though, that the plays they selected have much to teach.

By listening to the voices of playwrights of color, all of us can learn more about the pluralistic society in which we live, understand the issues that divide us and come to a fuller appreciation of cultural diversity, Swanson said.

Marjorie Devon, director of the internationally recognized Tamarind Institute of Lithography, Albuquerque, N.M. This respected institution is both a fine-art print studio and publisher as well as an educational institution. Known as an engaging lecturer, Devon will present a slide lecture on the beginning of the feminist art movement in the United States and the types of work being done by contemporary women artists. "Women's Work Is Never Done" can be heard at 7 p.m., March 1 at the William Abbott Concert Hall at Kleinpell.

The play consists of a series of monologues, each to be performed by a different actress who addresses some aspect of women's experience. The characters come from different backgrounds and different parts of the country. They vary in age, education, and social class. In life, they would never have encountered one another. What they have in common is their gender, a factor that profoundly influences their experience.

Among the various characters are an actress, a snake handler, a baton twirler, and a host of other interesting individuals, all of whom share their stories with the audience. Some of the characters are very funny and others are deeply moving. All of them describe their experience in ways that are surprising and interesting.

Johnson, a sophomore from Baldwin, will coordinate the lighting, and Moria Clinton., a freshman from River Falls, will supervise the costumes. Sound design will be by Scot Moore, a junior from River Falls.

Lake; and Nathaniel "Than" Astin, Albany. Hewitt, uses prints and weavings to express her life growing up in the rodeo circuit with her family. Using hot glass, Astin, creates richly colored vessels and explores his inner child through imagery referencing comic books, super heroes, and their archenemies.Through prints, artist books, and metals, Pieper engages the viewer to reflect on the treatment of self, others, and the world around them.

Resumes for the candidates and their complete campus visit schedules soon will be posted on the Web at: www.uwrf.edu/chancellor_search A 17-member campus/community search and screen committee, chaired by Suzanne Hagen, professor of speech communication and theatre arts, submitted its recommendations to President Lyall on Feb. 3.

Regents on Thursday that the University should be allowed to grow modestly over the next six years. Each UW System campus has been presenting its proposals to the Regents, who are expected to act later this year and set enrollment targets by campus for the years 2001-2006.

"With the strong academic credentialing of faculty, the quality of our programs and our facilities, and the fact we are the only University in the St. Croix Valley,means that the potential for this University is phenomenal," Thibodeau said. "This University is looking at an extraordinary future."

According to Thibodeau, the proposal will strike a balance between maintaining quality of academic programs and ensuring the UW-RF's historic role of providing access. Sixty percent of UW-RF's students are the first generation in their family to attend college, while the national average is 40 percent.

"We don't want to lose our tradition of access, but we have set the bar very high in the outcomes we expect from our students when they leave here," Thibodeau said. High expectations in outcomes require sufficient resources to ensure a quality education, he said.

With predictions of a continuing expansion of its knowledge-based economy, the region will demand that UW-RF "include room for flexibility. A public higher education plan should have the opportunity for change. The Board of Regents will insist on it," Thibodeau said.

UW System, an electronic gateway to the more than 20 million books, journals, maps and other documents housed in campus libraries statewide," said Orr. "Today, I'm pleased to report, that vision is fulfilled."

Students and faculty can use the web based "Voyager" system to view the card catalog, remotely check out books from other campuses and have them delivered to their home campus by delivery trucks that operate between the campuses. Access to the card catalog is available via the web at any time, accommodating both on-campus and distance learners. Wisconsin residents who are not students can work with their local campus to check out materials.

"The Voyager library system means that students and residents throughout this area now have the same library resources available to them that are available to students in Madison or throughout the UW System," said Clausing.

"Good planning and hard work by the librarians coupled with financial and political support from the State, the Board of Regents, the System and campus leaders enabled this project to be completed on time and on budget," said Meachen.

The Library Automation Task Force began its work in 1996, establishing goals that the system make library resources "accessible, available and affordable," said Kathy Pletcher, associate provost for information services at UW-Green Bay and co-chair of the task force.

Ed Van Gemert, assistant director at UW-Madison's Memorial Library, coordinated the implementation process, and each campus has a library automation manager who guided the effort on campus, working with catalogers, circulation staff and reference librarians to build local systems.

The first of five finalists for the position of chancellor at UW-River Falls said Friday that she sees solid strengths in the institution because of its campus atmosphere and its clear-cut mission statement of providing undergraduate education. Leah Harvey, vice president for student and academic affairs at Metropolitan State University in St. Paul, spent the day meeting with students, faculty, staff and community members. The University is seeking a replacement for Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, who announced in August that he is leaving the position after 15 years for health reasons. A decision on the 14th leader of the 125-year-old institution is expected from the UW System Board of Regents in March.

She noted, though, that the University is in the same circumstances as other public and private institutions. "There are three critical issues in higher education: resources, resources, resources," Harvey said at an open forum. "With the exception of very few colleges and universities, all institutions are stressed.

Other important issues, Harvey said, are finding a meaningful way to incorporate technology into education and to ensure students are comfortable with its use; to educate students to be articulate, critical-thinkers who are good citizens; and to make sure the campus is hospitable to diversity.

Harvey's career at Metropolitan State has been a progression of growing responsibilities, which paralleled the expansion of the university from a few hundred students to its present enrollment of 8,500. She started as a faculty member teaching statistics and program evaluation and began her administrative career as chair of the business and public administration department.

She noted there are differences between the two institutions, although they are just 25 miles apart; but she said that they are growing more alike. Metropolitan State started as an upper-division institution providing courses for non-traditional commuters, while UW-RF is a residential campus predominantly teaching recent high school graduates.

As UW-RF moves forward, Harvey said, she would be a collaborator seeking input from within the governance structure on campus. She added, "There can never be too much communication." She concluded, though, that as chancellor she would be willing to make the tough decisions once she has listened to varying points of view.

The University is seeking a replacement for Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, who announced in August that he is leaving the position after 15 years for health reasons. A decision on the 14th leader of the 125-year-old institution is expected from the UW System Board of Regents in March.

Dobney is the second of five finalists for chancellor at the 125-year-old university. Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau announced in August that he will retire this year for health reasons. The UW System Board of Regents is expected to make a decision on the new chancellor in March.

During an open forum, he recited what he termed as a "depressing list" of challenges to higher education: declining public resources, an underappreciation for the performance of faculty and staff, difficulties in achieving diversity among students and faculty, and competition from cyberspace institutions.

"The greatest challenge of all facing us is to restore a sense of optimism about higher education" within the institution itself, Dobney said. "I think that we need to reaffirm the value of what we do, and to re-invigorate ourselves as a culture to be enthusiastic about our jobs and to look forward toward every academic year.

"It's really important to remember that what we do is among one of the most important things that anyone in society does. It may not be recognized by anyone else, but we have to recognize it in ourselves and we have to celebrate the fact that we are major contributors to society, even if we aren't rewarded that way."

Dobney noted that universities like UW-RF must find a way to collaborate with educational institutions that only exist in cyberspace. Recognizing that UW-RF is exploring the potential for workforce development and graduate courses via the internet, Dobney said that faculty should be provided the time and resources to develop those delivery methods for non-traditional students.

But I think times will be good for universities like River Falls because they offer a residential experience. Education for 18-22 year olds is not just about knowledge; it's about acculturation and socialization. All the prognosticators out there who say universities are an anachronism really don't understand the university."

Throughout the course of the day, Dobney argued that public universities must copy the approach of private institutions in pursuing significant outside funding from alumni and corporations. At Michigan Tech, Dobney related, he played a key role in formulating the priorities and strategies for a $140 million capital campaign that has reached its half-way mark.

Dobney noted that in his previous position at Washington State he spent a lot of time lobbying legislators. His current job doesn't include those duties and he said that he misses them and welcomes the challenge of building legislative support for UW-RF initiatives. He said that at least half of his time would be spent off-campus on fund-raising and lobbying decision-makers, and so his management style would be to delegate responsibilities for campus day-to-day activities.

"My first rule is that I don't have time to do my job, much less yours," Dobney said. "So I don't intend to micromanage anyone. I think it's important for me to get to know the people and to be comfortable that they are competent and that we're on the same page as to where we are going.....I will assume that you are doing your job competently unless I hear otherwise.

Dobney began his academic career teaching history at St. Louis University and then held positions as the director of its summer school programs and acting associate dean of its graduate school. From there he went to Loyola University in New Orleans and directed special programs and was dean of continuing education and the city college. Dobney then spent six years at Washington State University in Pullman as vice provost for extended university services before assuming his current position as chief academic officer at Michigan Technological in 1993.

Dobney said he was attracted to UW-RF because the position is a logical career move and UW-RF intrigued him because of its diversity of majors and students, and its connection to the University of Wisconsin System.

"As I looked around at the jobs that were advertised, there were a few that seemed interesting-and this was one of them. It seemed to me that River Falls was one of the more attractive campuses in terms of places to work and places to lead. You have good stability in terms of leadership, you are in good shape financially, and in student demand. It is a very attractive opportunity."

Williams, who is interim president of St. Cloud State University in Minnesota, is among the finalists to replace Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau who announced his retirement last August for medical reasons.

"found that I truly enjoy it. The reason is that I'm talking about the university with legislators, potential donors and community leaders about something that I feel passionate about. It's something that I've grown up with, that I know thoroughly, and that I believe in. Therefore, playing that public role is something that I enjoy."

Williams said that UW-RF is confronted with many of the same challenges as other higher education institutions: public skepticism about the need for higher education campuses with the availability of cyberspace universities; accountability, productivity and responsiveness; pressure to pursue new markets that can adversely skew institutional missions; declining public funding; and infusing technology into the university without a stable funding source to pay for it.

She said most of those issues can be addressed in a positive manner that remains true to UW-RF's core values. Williams said it could be painful at times as the academy is forced to undergo reallocations of resources. She added those internal steps also must be coupled with entrepreneurial ways to access outside resources through fundraising and grants.

"Higher education is important; we benefit millions of students," Williams said. "What we need to do both in terms of the political processes and in terms of the market is to ensure that the capabilities, the capacities and the strengths of what we have to offer are going to be a continuing source of societal benefit while recognizing that society's needs are still evolving. We are facing a changing environment, and we have to change with it."

According to Williams, the University should monitor and measure student learning, education outcomes, community service and the value of research. Meaningful information, she said, would lead to two results. The first, she said, is that it will allow the University community to make better decisions about programs and services. The second is that it will provide the information to convince legislators and donors that UW-RF remains a solid investment.

University. There she became assistant to the president and acting affirmative action officer, and then assistant dean of the graduate school. She moved to Western Illinois University to assume the dean's position for graduate studies and research and also served as dean of the school of graduate and international studies. Williams then joined Arkansas State University as dean of the graduate school and director of organized research and also served as interim vice president for academic affairs. She joined St. Cloud State as its chief academic officer in 1997 and was named interim president last June.

Kurt Geisinger was born into higher education: his father taught college, his mother was a college librarian, his brother is a doctor and professor, another brother teaches, and his wife is a psychology professor.

Falls on Thursday. "I'm very close to education. I support education." Geisinger, who is the academic vice president at Le Moyne College in Syracuse, N.Y., was the fourth finalist seeking to replace Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, who announced his retirement last August after 15 years due to health reasons. "I really happen to believe in what we're doing," Geisinger said of his pursuit of the chancellor's position. "I really philosophically believe deep in my heart that education is a calling or a mission and something that people do because we want to improve the world.

"I have a very balanced perspective on what a college and university is. What we do is very important work: that is, trying to improve society and the lives of individuals. That is ultimately why I want to be chancellor."

Geisinger said he was happy when he first won tenure to teach, and was pleased again when he was named a department chairman. He said he also enjoyed the challenges, despite the stresses, of rising through administrative positions to his current role as a chief academic officer.

A bonus as a senior administrator, Geisinger said, is the ability to see tangible results of his efforts as opposed to the longer time it may take to see the impact of former students on their profession and society.

Hillard, who directs the Title III project, noted, "The grant greatly enhances the University's capacity to develop and support new programs to meet the region's needs. UW-River Falls put together a very innovative Title III grant and was fortunate to receive monies from this very competitive national grant."

Prior to receiving the Title III award, the University conducted a year-long study that involved the participation of hundreds of public and private firms from across western Wisconsin and the Twin Cities area. The study identified the workforce development and training needs of employees and the interest of employers in supporting life-long learning programs. Hillard said the survey response shows that employers strongly support employee development, training and education at levels above the national average.

Croix National Scenic Riverway and communities on the Upper Mississippi. Many of those counties have experienced more than 20 percent growth in the first half of the decade. Accelerating business and industry expansion-with most counties experiencing a jump of over one-third in the number of new employees-also has created needs for post-secondary education in such diverse sectors as high-technology manufacturing, finance, insurance, real estate, and services such as health care and government.

Development Institute. This will assist employers to determine their future needs in workforce planning and training. The Center also will provide competency assessment of potential employees for employers as they expand their workforces, and to provide customized training.

This high-tech 3M spin-off is seeking short-term training programs for managers and employees. That project will allow UW-RF to access Imation's renowned "Competency Dictionary" database describing the competencies needed to execute those jobs and to assess employee skills status. This project will provide UW-RF with the employee evaluation tools and assessment database to assist other private industries, non-profits and government agencies.

Additionally, according to Prochnow, UW-RF in March will have a new staff member on board to serve as an outreach program manager to work with business and industry as a result of the grant. That person also will oversee coordination of delivering courses through technology, whether through Internet-based learning or the Outreach Learning Center.

An Outreach Assessment Specialist also has been assigned to the program to assist advanced students to fast track their previous education and work experience to earn an undergraduate degree with less time on campus, Prochnow noted.

The shortage of those who are properly trained to teach English to non-native speakers in Wisconsin also is significant. The Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction reported that in the 1996-97 school year, 37 university students graduated with the necessary teaching skills. During the same period, the DPI issued 72 emergency licenses for English as a Second Language and 91 emergency licenses for bilingual education to Wisconsin schools and districts.

UW-RF English department Chair Richard Beckham notes that the need for such teachers is not only found in Wisconsin and Minnesota K-12 classrooms, but also in private institutes and businesses that teach English to adult non-native speakers.

There is a larger perspective involved for the immigrants, Beckham says. "As a major metropolitan region and two states with growing populations of non-native speakers, language skills are important considerations for schools and industries.

UW-RF has an established track record of working with non-native speakers through a variety of student exchange programs and has offered an option in TESOL for many years. In December the University graduated its first student with a minor in TESOL, Cheryl Holter of River Falls. UW-RF hopes soon to receive permission to develop TESOL into a master's program, too. Coordinating the major are English Professors Annette Klemp and Carl Gao. Klemp worked in the English Language Institute at the University of Oklahoma, and then coordinated a several-year program to teach English to community college teachers from Taipei who attended UW-RF to earn master's degrees. Those graduates then attended other American universities to earn their doctorates before returning to Taiwan.

University and in Riverside, Calif., before coming to UW-RF. Klemp notes that one of the greatest fallacies about language is the assumption that someone who speaks and writes English can help educate non-native speakers. "Knowing the language doesn't mean that you know how to teach it to others," Klemp said.

The 39 credit major includes up to eight semester hours of a foreign language with an intensive core in such courses as the theory and methodology of TESOL, language and linguistics, English structure, language acquisition, tutoring techniques, and phonetics. Majors also are required to participate n a cultural component that could include the UW-RF European Semester Abroad program, its Mexico tour or an internship.

Last summer she worked under Gao's supervision in concerted tutoring of Japanese high school graduates as they prepared to enter college at UW-RF or other universities this year. She continued to tutor several of them through the Fall semester.

Most had an excellent command of English grammar and sentence structure. Her task was to help them conceptualize what they wanted to express. She also assisted them with fine-tuning their technical skills, such as sentence structure, vocabulary and word choices. For example, some of them routinely misused or omitted articles from their writing, such as "the," "a," and "an," although they used them when speaking.

Courses include principles of managerial finance; building marketing relationships; modern economics; principles of microeconomics; film aesthetics; civil war and film; senior capstone in social science; Mexico: a cultural experience; sociology of diversity; deviant behavior; fundamentals of oral communication; business and professional communication; independent study in speech communication and theater arts; weight training; badminton; health and fitness for life; and karate.

"I've always been interested in the good for all, and I've always been geared towards working in public service," said Whitner, a Minneapolis resident who attends UW-RF as an evening graduate student.

Whitner was recognized for more than 30 years of work in human rights and mentoring to others. Her experiences ranged from placing her life on the line as a Freedom Marcher in Mississippi in the 1960s to serving as a Peace Corps volunteer to writing tutorials that help majority foster parents understand the racial and cultural needs of minority foster children. Whitner was nominated by UW-RF Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau and Lisa Reavill, the director of the academic success center, who felt she was the perfect candidate because of her long list of achievements.

Thibodeau said of Whitner's nomination: "Jacquelynne Whitner is an exceptional role model in her efforts to provide public service and to support others. She has witnessed and continues to participate in numerous important historical events that are advancing our society. We all can learn from her example."

During the Freedom March movement Whitner experienced first-hand the prejudice of being banned from restaurants and public accommodations because of the color of her skin. She saw the retaliation people of color losing their homes or property for asserting their constitutional right to vote.

"Resistance ran amuck of itself," Whitner said. "The majority showed total resistance towards integration. They didn't care about killing. People of color lived in fear and lost their houses and property for simply wanting to vote."

Multicultural Leadership conferences in 1998 and 1999 in which she won a second place award in prose writing and a first place in poetry. She also works with emotionally disturbed mothers and has developed a curriculum for non-minority foster parents to assist them when caring for minority foster children.

"I advise the parents to learn as much as they can about their child's culture and to expose their child to that," Whitner said. "Also, the parents should find a person of that culture to be a special friend to their child, and one that they can use as a cultural reference."

While at UW-River Falls, Whitner has been a mentor and guide to student women of color, participates in pre-college summer programs for young people of color and worked in the Admissions office. Last May she graduated with a bachelor's degree in English with a minor in ethnic studies. Whitner is now working toward her master's degree in counseling and school psychology in the College of Education & Graduate Studies.

Whitner feels she believes that everyone is obligated to give back to society as long as they are alive. "If you're not doing something productive while you're here, what are you doing here?" Whitner rhetorically asks.

The Minnesota chapter recognized Vasavada for his lengthy outstanding service with the section and the profession. The chair's award is an annual award of the section and was first established in 1987.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Chalmer Davee Library will feature work by art education and dance student Mary Aguilar of Frederic. Her work, whether sculpted, drawn, painted, or photographed, primarily uses the female figure as subject matter. Her exhibit will be displayed in the recessed lobby display case from Dec. 13-17. The display may be viewed during the library's normal hours, 7:45 a.m.- midnight.

The outstanding service award, sponsored by the University's Alumni Association, was established in 1983 to recognize individuals or groups who have made significant contributions to the mission of the University. The contributions may include personal time and energy, leadership, support and/or monetary donations.

"These individuals and groups are being honored for giving a great amount of time and effort to make this University thrive and be one of the best in the University of Wisconsin System," Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau said.

Through the UW-RF career services office, Treinen has hired a number of UW-RF students for internships and permanent positions. Also, Treinen has served as the employer representative on career service's advisory board and is a mock interviewer for an annual career workshop to help prepare students in their internship/job search.

Kinnickinnic, River Falls and Troy brought the University into existence. By lobbying to get the Normal School in River Falls and working diligently to rebuild the Normal School after the original building burned, their strong commitment was observed at the University's beginning and still remains today. The people of these communities are being recognized for their dedication and long-standing commitment to the University.

Swain and Kabes will establish a marketing resource system that provides marketing assistance, ideas, information and procedures to help current and potential alternate agriculture farmers develop and evaluate individualized marketing plans to capitalize on their products. Once the information is compiled, it will be available for surfers on the web.

The web site will contain the marketing system and links to other pages on the subject of alternative farming and other entrepreneurial ideas. The purpose is to allow individuals to gain information in the fastest and simplest manner possible.

To guarantee that all people are able to take advantage of this resource, the Managing Information with Rural America, or the MIRA organization, has integrated youth and senior citizens into the program. High school students will train senior citizens how to use the computers and the Internet. Once trained, the seniors will serve as resources at these sites to farmers interested in improving or establishing their businesses. Sites will also be available in agriculture departments in high schools.

Currently, farmers only get an average of 24 percent of the income potential from consumers. That means there's still an average of 76 percent that's available for the farmer to collect. That's what we're going to help the farmer get."

The concept of value-added marketing is taking raw products and coming up with an innovative approach to increase the amount of profit. In other Wisconsin communities Swain and Kabes have implemented various schemes to help farmers to use this concept. Some examples are shared-use kitchens where farmers can rent time to process and market jams and jellies, having mini dairies, or marketing meat and dairy products. Value-added products allow the farmer to directly market to the consumer.

An alternate farmer is someone who produces commodities not normally found in conventional farming operations. Products such as organic vegetables, herbs, ostrich or deer meat, and dairy goat products are all examples.

Swain and Kabes are compiling information for the site by meeting with high school vocational agricultural instructors, city administrators and librarians, and University of Wisconsin extension agents, developing a questionnaire, and conducting a survey.

Students in one of the largest university dairy science programs in the nation will now graduate as majors in that industry. The University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents on Friday (Nov. 5) approved the formation of a dairy science major at UW-River Falls. Students in that program presently are graduating as animal science majors with an emphasis in dairy science.

The major will incorporate a number of changes in the current program, according to Animal & Food Science Department Chair Perry Clark, who is one of four faculty members in the dairy science program.

"That means the graduates must be well-trained. It will require more in-depth education in the technical aspects of dairying and overall management skills in such areas as personnel management, fiscal management, and using the futures market. It takes a more broadly educated person to manage a dairy operation these days," Clark said Another trend, he said, is the increasing reliance by dairy operators on consultants in such areas as nutrition, reproduction, health and breeding. That requires well-trained students to serve in the capacity of consultants, Clark said.

An important change will be the addition of an introductory course that will emphasize the various business-related aspects of the dairy industry, provide an overview on accounting, management and personnel issues, and help to direct students into the most appropriate upper-level business courses for their career path.

Other changes will include the requirement of an internship for graduation, creating a separate senior seminar specifically for dairy majors, and establishing a cooperative learning relationship with the nationally recognized Dairy Fellows program at Cornell University in New York.

Clark notes the Cornell relationship will lead to Dairy Fellows working with upper level UW-RF students on dairy farm business analysis and farm tours, and to send students to Cornell for similar experiences there. He said he expects UW-RF students to gain from this by having student interaction with another leading national program in a non-competitive setting. Often, he said, these students only interact when they are representing their universities in national competitions.

The $3.4 million new Center includes seven structures featuring a milking parlor and rapid exit stalls, modern free stall barns for the 80-cow milking herd and heifers, a special needs barn for maternity stalls, bunker silos for forage storage, a feed shed for hay storage and commodity bins for feed storage, a building for a new technology nutrient management system, teaching classroom and laboratory facility and a pavilion/arena for shows and contests.

Coupled with the Center, the new major "will provide enhanced visibility to the dairy offerings within the College," Anderson said. "We expect this greater visibility to result in larger student numbers and more graduates who will seek careers in Wisconsin's world-renowned dairy industry."

Nationally accredited ethnic minority scholars and independent filmmakers will be guest lecturers at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls next summer in a five-week institute on the depiction of minorities in film.

Gerster notes that the studying of ethnic minorities in film is important because America has a penchant for reinventing itself as a multicultural nation, and film images provide an excellent means to examine those changing views.

Gerster adds that racial tensions remains high in American culture, but as minority film makers debunk racial stereotypes it presents an opportunity to have young people, who are highly influenced by visual images, to re-evaluate their impressions about others.

It can be found standing in the middle of the library at the back wall and may be seen during the library's regular hours. Lerfald, a broad area art major and coaching minor, is a member of the University's Falcon football team and is a native of Kenyon, Minn.

Moe, a freshman majoring in animal science, has been active in FFA for many years. She is involved in the Wisconsin Shorthorn Association and the National Shorthorn and Main Anjou Associations. She has shown cattle since she was 8 years old at the local, state, and national levels.

More than 97 UW-River Falls education students are practicing their teaching skills this fall in 43 cooperating Wisconsin and Minnesota school districts and preschools as student teachers and interns.

UW-RF draws students of color from all across Wisconsin and Minnesota but the biggest draw is from St. Paul, Minn., he said. UW-RF is a desirable option for Twin Cities high school graduates because of its location and its affiliation within an internationally recognized University system, he added. UW-RF has an excellent working relationship with St. Paul public schools and their programs, which are encouraging more students to attend college, he said.

With refocused recruitment efforts and additional programs for students of color, UW-RF will continue to see a steady increase in its number of multicultural students, according to UW-RF Admissions Counselor Carolyn Brady, who coordinates multicultural outreach for prospective students and their families.

"The entire campus and community is richer because of the diversity of our student population," Brady said. Diversity makes all students more well-rounded and employers are seeking graduates who can adjust and thrive with people of all backgrounds, she said.

With the increased students of color enrollment this fall, UW-RF is on track in meeting its 2008 planning initiative, Brady said. Brady visits area high schools as part of a recruitment process to encourage prospective students to think about college and consider UW-RF. She works with community organizations to assist with translations and tries to involve students of color in her presentations.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls chemistry faculty members Marilyn Duerst and emeritus-professor John Hill have written a unique children's mystery book that bridges the gap between science and literature.

The reader can join the Crimecracker Kids as they dream up a plan to nail the thief at their small town's summer festival. Not until the final chapters, though, will the field of suspects be narrowed and will the reader be sure of the identity of the kitchen powders stolen from the Bake Shop. Because the children get actively involved in the mystery, they want to read, according to Duerst and Hill.

The book is best suited for elementary to middle school classrooms and could be read in about two weeks. Duerst, who lives in New Richmond, has been a member of the chemistry faculty at the University since 1981. As a mother of six daughters, she has been intimately involved in education at all levels for more than 25 years.

Hill lives in River Falls and is a member of the Society of Children's Writers and Illustrators. In addition, Hill is a grandfather to three children with whom he shares his excitement of learning chemistry.

Sorenson received the award because of his involvement in both residence hall and campus activities. Sorenson serves as the Crabtree Hall Wing Representative and Residence Living Committee Secretary. He also organized an activity in a Crabtree Hall wing. In addition, Sorenson works with the students leaders and professional staff in the Leadership Center of the Hagestad Student Center.

Campuses around the nation use the award to recognize individuals who develop programs and make contributions to their residence halls and campuses. To be considered for the award, students are nominated by individuals on the campus and voted on by their fellow residence hall leaders.

Senior Lance Loverrink, a fine arts major with a concentration on painting from South St. Paul, Minn., assembled his senior art show, "by Color, by Light," of his paintings and drawings that deal with the composition of rooms, architectural settings, and the human figure. Loverrink's work will be on display Dec. 5-11.

Senior art major Angela Soucy of Hudson will display her collection of black and white photographs that capture organic forms found in nature. Soucy's work may be viewed at the Library during regular library hours from Nov. 28-Dec.

Composer George Gershwin was born in Brooklyn in 1898. Gershwin taught himself and began to compose songs and musicals in his early teens. Gershwin creatively connected jazz and classical music in his concerts. He became famous in 1924 after he wrote "Rhapsody in Blue" as a concerto for piano. Gershwin's success led him to continue composing for musical theatre. Some of his most successful musicals include "Strike Up the Band," "Crazy Girl," and "Of Thee I Sing." He also wrote Hollywood musical scores before his death in 1937.

Music critics said of their appearance, "The performance was powerful from the opening. The audience was swept away by the pure natural sound of the piano combined with the lightness of the guitar and the profound sound of the cello."

Benoit Charvet is the primary arranger for Le Trio Gershwin. Throughout his life, Charvet has studied the piano, flute, bass, and cello. His talents allow him to improvise, compose and arrange many styles of music for the group and others. He has composed several music themes for movies and television series.

Guitarist Alfred Street has traveled around the world because of music. He has performed in more than 400 concerts around the U.S and Europe. Streets' talents allowed him to record four CD's and appear on both European and American radio and television shows.

The third group member Jean-Noel Roux has been around music since birth. Born into a family of musician, Roux studied under Maestro Aldo Ciccolini at the Conservatory of Versailles, the Ecole Normale of Music de Paris, and the Paris Conservatory. He is interested in a wide variety of music and has played pop and jazz in clubs.

Together the group brings Gershwin's music to life once again. "All three instruments were successful in conveying all the spirit, magic and swing of Gershwin where a whole symphonic orchestra is usually needed," said the critic for the newspaper Le Perche in France.

The degree is listed first, followed by the student's major emphasis or option in parenthesis. For example: ANSC (dairy) means the student received a Bacheler of Science degree in Animal Science with a dairy emphasis. All degrees in the College of Agriculture are Bachelor of Science.

Cottage Grove, Minn. -- Beatrice E. Vasterling, master of science in education degree in elementary education; Michelle L. Siewert, master of science in teaching degree in communicative disorders; Philip J. Kuemmel, master of science in education degree in reading.

Three factors play a significant part in students choosing to enroll at UW-RF, according to Tuchtenhagen. These include the location of the campus within the Twin Cities metropolitan area of Minneapolis-St. Paul, the 19-1 faculty-to-student ratio and the variety of strong academic programs.

Lyall will be accompanied by University of Wisconsin System Regent Toby Marcovich, an attorney from Superior, who will chair the Special Regents Committee charged with screening candidates recommended by the campus committee.

Under the process, the committee will conduct a nationwide search for Thibodeau's replacement. That committee will recommend at least five candidates to President Lyall and the Special Regents Committee, each of whom is qualified and could serve as the next chancellor. President Lyall and the Special Regents Committee select and interview finalists, and make their final recommendation to the 17-member Board of Regents, which makes the final appointment.

Karges Center, the campus gymnasium, will house 100 employers from 10 a.m.-3 p.m.who are seeking to recruit interns and permanent employees. Occupational areas being represented range from animal science, food processing, education, government, law enforcement, financial institutions, non-profit organizations, retail sales, manufacturing and marketing communications.

From the intellectual roots of "Political Correctness" to a secret study on stuttering, to an overview of the arts, area seniors will have a full range of lectures to attend during the next installment of Senior Outreach Studies at UW-River Falls.

Nov. 16: Jerome Halvorson, from the department of communicative disorders, will give the final presentation of the Tuesday classes. His presentation is titled "The Monster Study: Stuttering and Other Communicative Disorders."

The conference touches on issues relating to farmstead dairy. Dairy professionals, experts, and educators will discuss what it takes to start a farmstead dairy, how to produce, market, sell and make a profit with a product.

Gerd Stern of Marketplace Opportunities will deliver the keynote address, and the day will also features a presentation by Wisconsin Secretary of Agriculture Ben Brancel, who discuss how to add greater value to marketed products.

Jim Janke, St. Croix County Community Development agent, will discuss state and local issues facing the farmstead dairy and Bill Wendorf from UW-Extension Food Science will talk about environmental issues. Jim Path from Center from Dairy Research and UW-River Falls Professor Larry Swain will discuss the equipment and facility needs for a farmstead dairy. Swain will also present the economics of farmstead production.

Regi Heise from FoodComm will discuss best marketing approaches, and there will be sessions on artisan cheese, multiple product marketing, and on-farm production. There also will be session on various models for custom processing arrangements.

"Romeo and Juliet" will appeal to a variety of audiences for many reasons, according to director Meg Swanson. "This show will make Shakespeare live! This production company focuses on making the story accessible and the action and language clear," said Swanson.

The workshop is an interactive, hands-on session designed to help dairy producers and employees achieve a better understanding of harvesting milk and the factors impacting milk quality. The two-day workshop will cover raw milk quality, udder health, prevention and control of mastitis, milking machine function and milk room management.

The desire to try something they have never experienced before and to learn about different cultures led 24 University of Wisconsin-River Falls students to participate in the University's Semester Abroad Program this fall.

The students began their experience traveling together to Paris, where they stayed for a week to become familiar with some to the cultural differences, foreign currency, and the public transportation system of trains, subways and buses. After Paris, the students traveled to the sites of their research projects or internships.

Students participating in the Semester Abroad Program are required to complete a faculty-approved project of their choice or an internship. Students who select the project option submit a 60-80 page paper on what they learned and accomplished.

The Chalmer Davee Library showcases and exhibit areas will feature the works by Cortney Mosley, a senior art major from Menomonie. Mosley created an interesting display of color photographs and various memorabilia from her European semester abroad experience through the University in the Fall of 1997.

Maplewood, Minn., senior art major Paul Diederich will have his artwork featured in the Chalmer Davee Library display case Nov. 7-13. Diederich has created an installation piece, with colored stone lithography prints and hand-painted shoes.

Following the reception, an appearance by the Minneapolis based Karma Sluts, whose music will appeal to young and old alike, will celebrate the opening of the show. Music begins at 8 p.m. at the Village Hall directly across the street from the gallery.

The Moscow Boys Choir was founded in 1957, and since 1966 has been under the direction of Ninel Kamburg. The boys receive both musical training and general education at a special school in Moscow and are hand-picked from more than 400 students at the institution.

To kick off the Millennium, they will present a special holiday program to audiences throughout the holiday season. They also will perform some of the traditional holiday songs from previous tours, such as "We Wish You a Merry Christmas," "Silver Bells," excerpts from Handel's Messiah, and from Bernstein's "Gloria" and "Kyrie." The Moscow Boys Choir has received laudatory reviews from music critics around the United States.

A critic from the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel noted: "The Moscow Boys Choir gave an articulate, polished and precise performance of a challenging and varied program. A superb blend and the kind of ensemble cohesiveness that comes from years of working together made them soar."

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls German club and modern language department is showing an informational video series to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the Federal Republic of Germany (West Germany) and 10 years since the Berlin Wall was torn down.

The video series is free and open to the public. It will continue through the middle of December. There will be two showings of each video in Room 238 of the UW-RF Kleinpell Fine Arts Building with an accompanying question and answer session.

In addition to depicting the hardships citizens faced after the Wall was built, the video series will give an historical overview of the Federal Republic of Germany from its birth to its presence today.

Travis D. Bown, of Barron, is majoring in animal science with a meat animal emphasis at UW-RF. He has worked on his grandfather's dairy farm since he was young and he has raised beef for eight years, which he markets at the county fair.

Amy B. Brooke, of Baldwin, is majoring in animal science with a meat animal emphasis at UW-RF. She grew up on a dairy farm and became interested in beef cattle at age 11. Today she has eight purebred and eight grade Angus. She has exhibited cattle at the county fair for the past five years.

The Dance Theatre will perform its fiery piece, "La Bomba." All three ensembles will combine to perform Ariel Ramierz's "Misa Criolla." Tenor Michael Reich, a freshman music major from Cameron, Wis., will serve as caller in this folk mass that is based on the traditions and rhythms of Latin American dance music.

To improve the students' living conditions, nearly $700,000 of improvements will be made on the voice, video, and data telecommunications plants. Each room will receive a voice jack, two data jacks, and a video jack.

One significant benefit students will receive is the increase in computer speed. The new wiring will allow students to get 10 million milli bits per sec (mbps), which is a 400-fold increase in the speed of the current system. This increase will allow students to complete coursework more efficiently.

Students at UW-RF already have the ability to take more than a score of courses using technology to view lectures over campus cable television network or to participate in coursework via the Internet. According to Campus Planner Dale Braun, this is just the beginning of web-based classes. Braun predicts an explosion in the use of technology as professors put exercises on the Web for students to download at the their convenience.

According to Registrar Judy George, enrollment numbers will not be finalized until Sept. 15. She indicated that UW-RF is likely to add several dozen more graduate students as many attend classes for the first time next week.

Admissions Director Alan Tuchtenhagen noted that the increasing demand for admission to the University means that it likely will be closing spring semester enrollment early. Last spring the institution also experienced an enrollment record, and that will likely lead to a closing by Dec. 1, Tuchtenhagen said.

He attributed the dramatic increases to UW-RF's reputation for strong academic programs, quality faculty and dynamic growth in the University's service area of its west-central Wisconsin location in the Twin Cities metropolitan area.

Two federal grants worth nearly $400,000 have been awarded to UW-River Falls to help it to attract economically disadvantaged students to attend the University and to prepare economically disadvantaged UW-RF students for graduate school.

According to Viechnicki, the new director will target recruiting 50 high school students from Arlington High School in St. Paul. "My hope is there's a mix of students based on socio-economic factors and potentially first-generation college students," Viechnicki said.

"We hope the program will help those students to build good study habits and to dream dreams about attending a university, and to have their parents push the students to save some money toward college," Viechnicki said.

During the program, the students will regularly visit the campus on Saturdays during the academic year to participate in enhancement courses in such areas as communications, speech, writing and the sciences; college information sessions, tutoring, and recreational activities. They will also participate in a six-week residential experience on campus during the summer.

"This will afford an opportunity for students who may not have ever thought about going to a college or university to experience a campus so they can in fact make it a reality. We know that for some students, the best way to get them into college is to get them onto a college campus," Viechnicki said.

The McNain program will launch at UW-RF next January with a competitive process similar to achieving a scholarship, and selecting students by the end of the spring semester. Individually, the selection will carry a value of about $6,000 for each student.

Those selected will participate in a summer research project either on campus or in a corporate setting and receive a $3,200 stipend for the effort, along with funding for their tuition, room and board. Working with a faculty member, those students will then prepare a scholarly research paper and be provided financial assistance to attend a conference to present their work. They also will be given the chance to teach under faculty direction at UW-RF.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls will celebrate its 125th anniversary through a variety of performers and speakers in this year's Wyman Series, "An Ecletic Celebration." s Grammy award winning pianist George Winston will start the series on Sept.

Winston's pieces reflect his impressions of the changing seasons and come from a wide range of musical sources, such as rhythm and blues. UW-RF students may attend the event for $10 while non-students pay $15. Tickets may be purchased in advance at the Hagestad Student Center, or at the door on the night of the performance. A food drive will be held in conjuction with Winston's concert, and those attending are asked for bring a non-perishable food donation to the show.

That project has teamed UW-RF with teachers in the River Falls, Hudson and Prescott school districts, as well as St. Bridget's in River Falls, to use information technology as a teaching tool. It was recently recognized as a national model by Microsoft and the American Association of Colleges of Teacher Education.

Additionally, Lundeberg was cited for her many research publications, scholarly presentations and leadership role in professional organizations. She also is active in numerous College and University governance committees.

One of the students who supported her nomination noted: "I am grateful for both Dr. Lunderberg's instruction within the class setting and her modeling of the teacher as a reflective instructor who also dedicates considerable time to researching effective ways of introducing information within the classroom setting. Dr. Lundeberg is a skillful instructor, an able resarcher, and a gifted human being who shares her skills and abilities with all of her students and colleagues."

She holds a bachelor's degree in English from the University of Illinois, a master's in reading education from UW-La Crosse, and a doctorate in educational psychology from the University of Minnesota.

Great music united the band members one night in Santa Monica, Calif. "Nothing brings people together like Irish music. That's where we found ourselves laughing with each other and talking mostly about music," recollects Lonsdale. "The music made us feel welcome in a city of strangers, playing together the music that we loved."

The thundering tunes of the band attracted Randy Gerston, the music producer of James Cameron's Titanic. Gerston wanted something raw, loose, and danceable to capture the personality of the steerage passengers.

Last year's performance had UW-RF audience members dancing in the aisles and offering two standing ovations. The performance this year will prove to be just as good, says Schendel, who remembers: "They rocked North Hall."

It will be open for tours from 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. on Wednesday, Oct. 6. Self-guided tours that last about 30 minutes can be taken at any time during the day. Refreshments are available following the tours.

According to Dean Karen Viechnicki, the facility will continue the tradition of excellence in teacher education that led to the founding of the University 125 years ago. The institution was founded as a Normal School in 1874 to train teachers for the Upper Midwest.

The National Education Association has cited the College as one of the 10 most innovative teacher education programs in the nation for its field-based experiences for student teachers in partnership with surrounding school districts and for its use of technology in teacher training. Last year the College was designted at national model in excellence in the use of technology by the American Association of Teacher Education and Microsoft. That recognition was based on its partnering with the River Falls, Hudson and Prescott school districts and St. Bridget's School in River Falls to expand the use of technology as a teaching tool in K-12 classrooms.

"I think that it is important to recognize and celebrate outstanding teaching, as that is the heart of our mission and it is the primary motivation for the faculty who have chosen to make their careers at UW-River Falls," Hedahl said in announcing the awards.

"John, Carole and Doug are all exemplary teachers and I am extremely pleased that their dedication and ability to inspire has been acknowledged by their former students. They also serve as models and representatives for the large number of other quality faculty members who work as effective educators and mentors for the students at UW-RF."

Buschen, who is being recognized for the second time with the College's award, joined the faculty in 1966 with a doctorate from Indiana University. He teaches art history and the interdisciplinary senior capstone in the humanities. He has previously been recognized with the UW-RF Distinguished Teaching Award.

Among the comments from alumni who nominated him was, "Dr. Johnson was my adviser, as well as my professor for several classes. He was a great help in boosting my confidence, he was a trusted person to turn to, and he was a great teacher."

The Kinnickinnic River, endangered bird species, the wolf population and other topics will be on the agenda as UW-River Falls hosts the 43nd annual conference of the Association of College and University Biology Educators.

The conference is set for Oct. 15-17 and will serve as a forum for undergraduate biology education issues. Each fall, biology faculty from undergraduate institutions across the country meet to share ideas and experiences related to teaching and learning biology. ACUBE is the only national organization focusing on biology at the undergraduate level.

The program will draw about 100 faculty members and includes keynote speakers, paper presentations, workshops, and field trips. Those arriving early will attend a pre-meeting field trip led by UW-RF biology Professor Clarke Garry, who has undertaken a survey of all aquatic insects in the Kinnikinnic River and its tributaries. His presentation is "The Natural and Not-so-Natural History of the Kinnikinnic River Watershed."

This year's conference theme is "Integrating Process and Content: Flexibility for the Future." Many of the presentations will focus on balancing the teaching of science content facts with skills such as experiment design and computer-based analysis.

Temporary site-specific art has become a popular expression of creativity in the 20th Century. Belgium artist Christo, for example, creates walks and buildings made of synthetic materials designed to withstand the elements and which are eventually recycled. Another artist, Andy Goldworthy, uses only natural materials to build sculptures that begin to disintegrate immediately after fabrication.

These artists use many unique tools to build art that leaves a memorable impression on its viewers. Working with others has become an important step to the artistic process for artists involved with site-specific art.

Rebecca Blotz, a recent graduate of Brookfield Central High School, has been named the recipient of the 1999-2000 Chancellor's Scholarship for Excellence by Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau. The scholarship is given annually to an incoming freshman who has demonstrated both academic excellence and leadership ability in school and community activities.

The award is a full-tuition, renewable scholarship for a maximum of four years, totaling approximately $12,000. The selection process for the scholarship begins in the spring when freshman applications are reviewed for ACT scores of 28 or higher.

Applications for the scholarship are then sent out to students inviting them to send letters of recommendation and examples of leadership abilities. A University scholarship committee reviews the applications and chooses the recipient.

Blotz was selected based on her academic rank in her class and her high school and community activities that included editorial editor of the school newspaper, color guard captain, National Honor Society student tutor, co-captain for varsity volleyball team, and camp counselor.

Elyce E. Moschella, a foreign language teacher at Brookfield Central High School, was among Blotz' nominators. "I have had the opportunity not only to teach Rebecca but to appreciate her many talents in an academic arena, in co-curricular and community activities and in her personal relationships with peers and faculty," said Moschella. "Regardless of the classroom course, the sport or the activity, Rebecca gives a solid and consistent effort. The product is always her best."

Barry Glashagel, of the Wisconsin Department of Commerce's bureau of manufacturing and technology department, will present the workshop. Glashagel worked in private industry for 25 years before moving to the commerce department in 1994.

A hall manager is responsible for the operation of a residence hall facility housing 200-400 students and for supervising five to 11 undergraduate resident assistants. Hall managers are charged with the promotion of student learning, leadership development, and community development in the residence halls.

Over 25 students applied for hall manager positions at UW-River Falls. Through a competitive application and interview process, recipients were evaluated and selected on the basis of leadership and communication skills, campus involvement, academic success and ability to relate to others.

Falls student life program and works specifically to develop and enhance community living for students of a particular residence hall floor. The residence assistant is generally responsible for assisting students individually and in groups, and is the primary facilitator who works with students in the development of their residence hall community.

Falls. Through a competitive application and interview process, recipients were evaluated and selected on the basis of leadership and communication skills, campus involvement, academic success and ability to relate to others.

Provost Robert L. Milam said Rebhuhn "has many outstanding credentials, experiences at the University, but also importantly, she has many years of experience in public schools. Dr. Rebhuhn has been with UW-River Falls since 1991 where she has been an admired faculty member of the Department of Psychology."

Psychology chair Rik Seefeld noted that Rebhuhn made major contributions to the department as an excellent teaching and through her administration of the learning disabilities certification program for teaching candidates.

Continuing Issues: Story telling and Creative Teaching is a course that will explore creativity in the performing arts and objects. Participants will learn techniques for telling stories, reading stories and for teaching students to tell stories.

The course will focus on positive discipline techniques that work, not only in classrooms but in families, as well. Participants will master a series of very effective human relation skills that help avoid power struggles and foster a classroom atmosphere of cooperation, responsibility and respect. There is a registration fee of $15 for refreshments and materials, plus tuition. The registration deadline is Friday, Oct. 23, and there is a maximum of 30 participants.

Continuing Issues: Cruising the Information Superhighway will help participants develop an awareness of how telecommunications can be used as a tool and curriculum resource while learning the fundamental skills needed to effectively navigate the Internet. It is worth two undergraduate/graduate credits.

This course will provide information, techniques and strategies that help to overcome and cope effectively with the many stresses bombarding teachers and others on a daily basis. There is $20 registration fee for refreshments and materials plus tuition. The registration deadline is Friday, Oct. 29.

Service-Learning will introduce students to a teaching method and education philosophy that connects learning with service. Key concepts to be discussed are: involvement of youth in the learning process through planning (youth-voice), helping students to identify a real community need, connecting meaningful service and identifying the recipients of service, reflection/planning and evaluation The course is offered for 1-3 undergraduate/graduate credits in Conference Room C at the Regional Development Institute building. The initial meeting will be on Monday, Sept. 27, from 4:30-6:30 p.m. and the remainder of the course will be arranged. The instructor is Stan Potts.

Continuing Issues: Increasing Student Self-Esteem participants will learn how to recognize the causes of low self-esteem, use classroom activities to build self-esteem in four areas, motivate all types of students, teach students self-monitoring, create an accepting classroom, examine expectations for students and recognize destructive behavior problems.

A study partner is needed for this course. This is someone who is not enrolled in the course but has committed to work with a participant in completing discussions and activities. A study partner's name is needed. If enrolling in a groups of two or more, send all registrations together and designate a group leader to whom materials will be sent. For additional information, contact Dr. Judy Cooper at 1-800-383-9504. Fall registration for the self-paced video courses will be Sept. 2-Nov. 11. Projects will be due Dec. 1.

International Economics I is worth one graduate credit and will focus on several topics related to international economics. The topics discussed will include: why people and nations trade, trading around the world, the United States and world trade, and trade barriers and their consequences.

Issues in Education can be taken for one-three graduate credits. It is designed to provide practitioners with background and perspective relative to emerging contemporary issues facing the profession and the schools.

Supervision of Student Teachers and Interns (Supervision of Field Experience) is worth three graduate credits and will cover the pedagogical, human relations and assessment skills related to supervising pre-service students in teacher preparation programs. Access to a computer and the World Wide Web is required.

American National, State, and Local Government is offered for three undergraduate credits. It is designed as an examination of American government at the national, state and local levels. It includes an assessment of the key philosophical and ideological roots of the American experience, the components of the policy making process, as well as major actors and institutions in the American political system from the national, state, and local levels of government.

Fundamentals of Oral Communications (Public Speaking) is designed as an introduction to basic concepts of speech communication with experiences in oral expression and listening. The course is worth three undergraduate credits.

Introduction to Theatre and Drama will study the values of theatre art in general culture, with an analytical consideration for the various elements of drama, the elements of physical contemporary theatre, and a brief historical survey to give perspective and understanding to today's theatre-goer.

In mid-August, Thibodeau was diagnosed with colon cancer. He underwent surgery for the disease at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn., and returned to River Falls a few days before the meeting. He said he will launch an aggressive treatment regimen in September to continue to combat the illness.

He told the assembly that he had been considering retiring within the next two years, and that his health condition influenced his decision to do so this year. He said he has spoken extensively with University of Wisconsin System President Katharine Lyall and other decision-makers and felt confident the University would weather the transitional year.

"I feel good about the strong leadership in place in the University; I have for a long time. With telecommuting and some office flexibility, I'm going to be able to function quite well. I ask for your help and your understanding as I go through this process of treatment."

During the next year, Thibodeau said, he expected the University and University of Wisconsin System to launch a nationwide search for his successor. He said that he hoped the campus would spend the year conducting the internal climate and needs assessments to help it position itself for its next strategic planning process.

Lyall) long before my current health problems surfaced about the timing of this announcement. But it was either make the announcement now at this meeting, or at the latest, a year from now. So I am making it now to let you know that when you gather here at the beginning of the next year that it will be with a new chancellor.

"It is a very exciting time for the institution. And it's going to involve a year of intensive work on part of the search and screen process in terms of what it is you want to look for in terms of leadership for this fine institution.

"I think I can truly say that this University has never been more viable than it is right now because of the people sitting here. We have in this institution a place we can be proud of. We have come from being simply a member of the cluster campuses to a leader. We are the envy of the cluster campuses in terms of our ability to secure funding for physical projects, and the strength of our academic programs, for the strength of our faculty and staff, and for the potential growth of our students when they come to us and when they leave us. And I think all of us can be very proud of that."

During Thibodeau's term as chancellor, the campus has headed into new areas of fulfilling the Wisconsin Idea of undergraduate education, research, and community service. Among them: improvement of the faculty through a renewed emphasis on continuing research and scholarly pursuits; record student enrollments with incoming students among the best prepared for college in the institution's history; and physical plant improvements of more than $50 million, including the renovation of Historic South Hall, renovation of the Chalmer Davee Library, construction of a state of the art Teacher Education Building, and approval to construct a new Dairy Teaching Center.

Outreach activities to business and industry also expanded under Thibodeau's tenure, with the founding of the UW-RF Regional Development Institute and the recent addition of a Small Business Development Institute.

Last year Thibodeau led the University through an unconditional 10-year reaccreditation by the Commission on Institutions of Higher Education of the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools. A site visit team for UW-RF's major accrediting agency cited nine strengths for the University, including the institution's long-range strategic planning process "Reach for the Future." The team noted " 'Reach for the Future' will, we believe, be a noted milestone in the history of the University."

In that process, Thibodeau called for a review of all academic and administration departments, leading to restructuring of the University's three colleges and the formation of a new School of Business & Economics. The campus-wide decision-making process, which remains in place, redirected more than $2 million from salaries into faculty development, classroom and laboratory support activities, and an infusion of information technology across campus.

Those touring will have the chance to see each of the 28 buildings on campus and see all the physical changes that have occurred. The tour will include stops at Laboratory Farm No. I, Ramer Field, and the Swinging Bridge.

There are numerous additional opportunities for spotlight tours throughout the weekend. These include a tour of the new College of Education & Graduates Studies Building, Food Science tour, greenhouse tour, as well a Swensen Sundial tour and a South Hall Open House.

As a personal counselor Link provides a variety of different counseling needs for students. She works with issues regarding self-esteem, roommate and family problems, as well as depression and anxiety.

Link also is involved with many areas on campus, providing services to faculty and staff. She coordinates the employee assistance program, participates on the Faculty Academic Development Board, coordinates the National Testing Program for ACTs, and helps with GED testing.

She also provides training and consultation services to residence hall managers and resident assistants who coordinate daily life for the nearly 2,000 students who live on campus. She is available to them for emergency situations that may arise outside of her normal office hours.

Link will be recognized at the University's faculty and staff meeting that traditionally starts the school year in August. She also will receive an honorarium from the UW-RF Foundation and will be the campus nominee for the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents professional excellent award.

Specific tour routes for the St. Croix Valley won't be revealed until they are passed out to participants during the tour. Knowles and McDonell are careful in selecting the roads that guide the tour's path, and they have visited the St. Croix Valley several times in recent months to map out routes and to meet with tourism leaders and business owners to include tour visits to events, attractions, businesses and entertainment.

Sunday will wind down the 1999 WCC by dropping the tops one last time until next year's Wisconsin Convertible Classic Tour. Participants will leave Hudson on Sunday for a special destination for the last day's run and will wrap up the tour with prizes and awards.

Convertible owners also share a lifestyle: free spirit about life, according to Knowles. He said free spirits are especially found in the Midwest, where many consider owning a convertible impractical because of winter weather, but whose owners consider their car a necessity for enjoying life.

As education majors, students complete a comprehensive program of study in general education as well as extensive academic study in one or more subject areas. Education students will also complete a rigorous series of field-based professional education courses and experiences.

Designated by the National Education Association as one of the top 10 innovative programs in the nation, teacher education programs at UW-RF are accredited by national and state organizations including the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education, the North Central Association, the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction, and specialized national professional organizations.

From three practices with the New Orleans Saints to the popular autograph night with players and coaches, the ninth season of the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp will offer plenty for football fans.

W. H. Hunt Arena and the Knowles Center. The Chiefs use the two buildings as locker rooms, training rooms, for weight training purposes and meetings. Tours of the facilities are available during the practices.

One of the most popular events during camp is Family Fun Night, which is moved to a new night. It will be on Thursday, Aug. 12. This is the only night practice the Chiefs hold during camp. The gates will open at 4 p.m., with autographs of coaches and players at 6 p.m. and practice at 7 p.m. The evening will feature many free items for kids, and with a fireworks display at the end of the practice.

The workshop is an interactive, hands-on experience designed to help dairy producers and employees achieve a better understanding of harvesting milk and the factors impacting milk quality. The two-day workshop will cover raw milk quality, udder health, prevention and control of mastitis, milking machine function and milk room management . The workshop will be conducted by UW-Extension specialists Pam Ruegg and Larry Baumann. The workshop is being sponsored by the UW-RF dairy outreach program, UW-Madison department of dairy science and UW-Extension.

The cost of the workshop is $200, which includes the workshop, two lunches and a take-home manual that will help dairy producers and their employees evaluate the strengths and weaknesses of their dairy operation, and find ways to improve their dairy's milk quality.

From Wisconsin! The troupe is comprised of over 30 student musicians between the ages of 15 and 20. The Kids From Wisconsin are officially designated the "musical goodwill ambassadors" of the State of Wisconsin.

Concert-goers can snack on brats from the concession stand or are invited to pack a picnic and are encouraged to bring blankets and lawn chairs. However, grills and alcoholic beverages are not allowed.

William Anderson will assume the leadership of the second largest undergraduate non-land grant agriculture program in the nation on Aug. 1. He replaces Gary Rohde, a former Wisconsin Secretary of Agriculture who is retiring after guiding the program for 18 years.

"Dr. Anderson brings enthusiasm and visionary leadership to a college noted for its strong academic programs and committed faculty. We look forward to his contributions, and to the positive visibility he will bring to the college and university in Wisconsin and throughout the nation."

He noted that his respect for CAFES started early in his career while he was a faculty member at the University of Minnesota-Waseca campus. Anderson routinely sent graduates interested in transferring to a baccalaureate institution to CAFES. "UW-River Falls has a great reputation, and I recommended the campus very highly to graduates who wished to further their education."

UW-River Falls to see if there were any positions open, because I knew of the calibre of the faculty and had seen the facilities on previous occasions. About the same time, I received an invitation to interview for the Director/Associate Dean position within the College of Agriculture at The Ohio State University, and I accepted that position shortly thereafter."

He said that he formed personal acquaintanceships with many CAFES faculty through professional conferences, in addition to collegial relationships when some of those faculty previously taught at UM-Waseca. That made it an easy decision to apply for the dean's position, he added.

He noted that he's pleased to be able to continue his career in education while having the opportunity to impact Wisconsin's agricultural industry. "I also want to be in the position to support agriculture in Wisconsin, which is the state's No. 1 industry. It has an incredible impact on the state's economy."

One of Anderson's special interest areas is forage crops. "The thought of working in Wisconsin with its acres and acres of alfalfa, corn silage, and pasture, as well as the dairy and other livestock that depend on these and other forages, is very appealing. And to work at one of Wisconsin's premiere institutions of higher education that is nationally respected for its practical instruction in production agriculture, agri-business and agricultural education is also very satisfying."

Anderson's appointment will provide him the opportunity to substantially influence the future of agriculture in the Upper Midwest. The UW-RF College includes 1,350 students and 66 faculty and staff with a $3.8 million annual budget. The College contains five academic departments: agricultural economics; agricultural education; agricultural engineering technology; animal & food science; and plant & earth science. They offer 14 majors and 16 minors of academic study, as well as interdisciplinary programs in biotechnology and in marketing communications.

Internship Programs, with faculty and students partnering with business and industry. For over 30 years CAFES has worked with employers in agricultural business, the agricultural sciences, resource management, education and government to provide students with real world work experiences.

Outreach programs will continue to flourish under Anderson. "I am very interested in community outreach. That includes serving placebound students via distance learning, and serving the agricultural industry via work force training. I'll partner with anyone that wishes to create a win/win situation for the students."

Wisconsin's dairy industry. He will be seeking approval this fall from the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents to offer a dairy science major. That is likely to be considered in October when the Regents visit UW-RF to conduct their monthly business meeting.

Prior to his appointment at Ohio State University, Anderson held appointments in the department of agronomy at the University of Minnesota - Waseca, where he earned the rank of professor and served as discipline leader.

At Ohio State, in addition to his administrative duties, Anderson has continued to teach in the field of agronomy. He has frequently published in professional journals, and made numerous presentations at professional meetings. He has served as a career and student club adviser, coached intercollegiate crop judging teams, conducted educational research, supervised interns and supervised college farm activities. Currently, Anderson is the chair of the Technical Agriculture Association, an affiliate of the National Association of State Universities and Land-Grant Colleges.

Caflisch arrived in 1961 as a student, and then joined the University staff in 1983. She holds two degrees from UW-RF: a bachelor's in elementary education and a master's of secondary education in supervision and instructional leadership.

Her career highlights include meeting many educators and personnel from UW sister campuses, as well as UW-RF. She received the Chancellor's Award of Excellence in 1992 for exceptional service by a support staff member.

Charpentier joined the psychology department faculty in 1965 after earning a bachelor's degree in psychology from Hope College and a master's in general clinical psychology from Ohio University. He later earned a doctorate in social foundation of education from the George Peabody College for Teachers and a doctorate in educational psychology (social/personality) from the University of Minnesota.

His career highlights include receiving a Wisconsin Teaching Improvement Grant, being a visiting research fellow in social psychology at Harvard University, presenting at the William James Symposium during the centennial year of the American Psychological Association, and hosting at UW-RF the annual meeting of the International Society for the History of the Behavioral Sciences.

Charpentier noted that no particular event stands out over his career. Rather, he cites several contributions. These include in 1968 working with faculty to initiate a request to have the University take greater action to meet minority needs, and then serving 20 years on committees devoted to human relations. He also participated in the re-structuring of the psychology major and served on the planning committee for the psychology wing of Centennial Science Hall, and designed its behavior laboratory. Finally, Charpentier cites his work on the transition from quarters to semesters, general education courses revision, and bringing internationally known social psychologists to campus as visiting professors.

Davis joined UW-RF in 1966 after earning a bachelor's degree in physical education from Southern Connecticut State College and a master's in physical education at Penn State. He later earned a doctorate from Indiana University and continued his post-doctoral studies at the University of Minnesota Medical School in the department of neuroanatomy and cellular biology.

His significant accomplishments include the development of human anatomy classes, involvement in the curriculum, academic responsibility for the department's programs, overseeing the University's conversion from quarters to semesters, and serving on University committees.

He cites more diversity, greater emphasis on quality instruction and better facilities. "Chancellor Gary Thibodeau deserves a great deal of credit for his visionary leadership and commitment to both faculty and students," Davis said.

His accomplishments at UW-RF include serving seven years as history department chair, 16 years as the state director for the University of Wisconsin Soviet Seminar that took over 4,000 Wisconsinites to the Soviet Union, and five years coordinating the state China Seminar. In addition to these activities, Feinstein was a prolific writer, authoring or editing dozens of books, book sections or scholarly articles on varied topics addressing the history, cultural, political or social issues of the Soviet Union, Soviet Jewry, Israel, and the Holocaust.

He has seen many changes at the University, including a shift from interest in history as a formal discipline to a broad field social studies area. That did not lead to a better program, and Feinstein feels that student quality declined because of a lack of academic curiosity, peer competition and reading interests.

Feinstein adds that close student-teacher relationships have been eroded over the past 15 years through increases in teaching loads because of bureaucratic and financial guidelines. Those teaching loads make it more difficult for faculty to maintain currency in their disciplines and to travel. Tight funding and state policy directives to make higher education self-supporting makes it difficult for UW-RF to find the resources to continue international travel experiences for educational purposes and to bring noted speakers to campus.

His career highlights include teaching courses in forage crop production, for which Wisconsin is a national leader. Greub also initiated several courses, including one in integrated pest management. He also cites three decades working with the internship program, supervising over 400 student interns with dozens of employers. A particular honor was being the Wisconsin Forage Council's Outstanding Educator of the Year, and sharing in the department's recognition by the Board of Regents as the outstanding academic department in the 26-campus University of Wisconsin System. Finally, Greub was recognized as the CAFES Outstanding Faculty Member in 1998.

His most significant accomplishments include teaching courses critical to the success of agriculture in Wisconsin and the Midwest at a university and college with an international reputation for its programs in agriculture. He adds, "I'd like to think that I have helped in a significant way in meeting one of humankind's most basic needs: the production of food."

His career as a psychologist in the counseling center allowed him to provide a wide range of services to students. He also had the opportunity to broaden his international perspective through 17 years working with international students and watching them develop during their stays. Hamann also noted his opportunity to lead three Soviet seminars during the communist regime and immediately following its collapse was a personally broadening experience. Another area was the chance to coordinate programs for challenged students to further their skills and accomplish their goals.

He adds, "Counseling students was my most enjoyable experience. Seeing students learn to solve their problems, change their characteristics that hinder them and building the character necessary to enter the world of work was rewarding."

Hamann's most significant accomplishment was receiving a million dollar grant from the U.S. Dept. of Education to broaden Career Services internships for students and see it implemented throughout the University.

In the late '60s, students struggled with the definition of themselves and their places in the world. They discussed their philosophy and searched for the meaning of themselves. Into the 90s, students search for how they would work, and what skill they needed. They struggled increasingly with a changing support system of home and community."

His career highlights include development numerous geological field experiences to various parts of the United States and the world; chairing the plant & earth science department for 17 years; serving as a UW Extension groundwater specialist aiding citizens at large; and working with dedicated, excellent students.

His most significant accomplishments included "watching students mature as they moved through the program and found rewarding jobs; and assisting the department grow and mature into one of the finest on campus."

Her career highlights include twice being nominated for teacher of the year and receiving honorable mention; recognition by the Minnesota Council of Social Studies for developing curriculum on economics for elementary students; and receiving a Woman of Color award from the University of Wisconsin System.

The most noticeable change has been the reduction in the number of persons of color on campus. "I feel every effort should be made to recruit and maintain qualified people of color in all areas across campus."

Alpha Tau Alpha; designing an agricultural literacy course for K-8 teachers offered in four locations in Wisconsin with 340 teachers completing the course; and initiating parliamentary procedure workshops in Oshkosh, Marshfield and UW-RF. Through three decades he also supervised over 600 internships and provided academic and personal counseling for thousands of students.

His most significant accomplishments were course development, initiating two student organizations, and parliamentary procedure judging and workshops, which included judging 20-30 districts with 8-10 sections, providing the judges and writing abilities questions for all levels.

Norwood arrived in 1988 and holds a bachelor's in art & English and a master's in education administration from Southern University in Baton Rouge, La., and a doctorate in administration of higher education from the University of Nebraska at Lincoln.

His career highlights included serving 18 years as dean of CAFES, responsible for 14 academic majors taught by 66 faculty members to 1,350 students. For six years Rohde left the University to serve as secretary of the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection. There he oversaw an agency with 800 employees with numerous influences on agriculture and policy, which included leading trade missions to the Far East and South America and participating in federal policy conferences and White House briefings on agriculture.

His most significant contributions included providing leadership for academic programs and general development of the College; initiating its name change to reflect its offerings; and developing dairy initiatives including the dairy science major, Dairy Teaching Center and dairy outreach program; developing the Ag. Alumni Association; recruiting outstanding faculty and staff; and assisting in the development of a strong image and reputation for CAFES.

The most noticeable changes were increases in enrollment, new building and facilities, growth in the numbers of faculty and staff, and the visibility and strength of the agriculture, food and environmental science programs.

According to Waldo Hagen, director of facilities management, construction work takes place year round on campus; however the level of activity increases during the summer. Though not as busy as last year, the campus will still have its share of noise, dirt, dust, fumes and traffic to contend with this summer, says Hagen.

Furniture is expected to arrive on June 28th, with minor maintenance items to be undertaken by the custodial staff. Faculty and staff are expected to begin moving into the new building on Aug. 1. Landscaping is underway and will be completed next year.

The project cost $280,000 and is providing four new technology equipped classrooms along with an overhaul of the corridors. Currently, workers are finishing the floors and installing door frames and doors to the classrooms.

Four residence halls are receiving new wiring this summer. The rewiring will provide each room with two computer accesses, new cable TV hook up, and a new phone system. The cost of this project is $420,000.

The work on these halls will be $1.4 million. The Stratton Hall bathrooms are being gutted and the shower and toilet facilities are being redone. The primary electrical wiring also is being redone in Stratton Hall. The center section of Hathorn Hall is having its primary electrical system redone this summer.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau says he is very impressed with the work efforts on campus as the improvements move forward on a timely basis. Thibodeau adds that UW-RF has been successful in maintaining the physical part of campus, which he says is necessary for faculty and students.

It was clear that as a legislator with a campus in her district that she was one of the most knowledgeable and well-informed members of the caucus during the debate. I want to publicly express my appreciation to her for her leadership role in this," Thibodeau said.

"Although his district does not include the University, over 100 students are enrolled here from the 28th Assembly District," Thibodeau said. "Rep. Pettis' vote certainly demonstrated his commitment to providing a quality public higher education system for his constitutents, whether they are enrolled at UW-RF or at another campus."

The budget initiatives will ensure that UW-RF can continue to maintain its flexibility in responding to requests for education via new technologies, such as distance learning or World Wide Web-based courses, Thibodeau said. Further, the caucus moved to ensure that financial aid would be increased to UW-RF's neediest students, while it also took steps to provide additional taxbreaks to students and to employers who pay for their employees' continuing education that is related to their work.

Restored the Governor's recommendation of expanded management flexibility for the UW System Board of Regents. This flexibility, known as a "continuing appropriation," will enable the UW System to improve access to courses for non-traditional age students and businesses, as well as offer more distance learning programs through information technology.

Restored the student match for the "Madison Initiative," a three-way partnership of the state, students and private donors designed to keep UW-Madison competitive with peer institutions. Failure to restore these funds would jeopardize millions of dollars in private contributions.

"Restoring our flexibility to serve working adults who need college courses to maintain a professional license or prepare for a new career will help keep Wisconsin on the move. The demand for a skilled workforce exceeds the supply of available talent. We must do our part to help workers continually upgrade their skills. With this flexibility, the UW System will be able to serve more students of all ages."

"I am also pleased by the support in the caucus for restoration of the full match for the private challenge grant contained in the Madison Initiative. No other state I know of has forged such a creative partnership with its public university alumni and donors. It's an innovative approach that will keep UW-Madison among the top research universities in the world. We cannot afford to lose this opportunity, one that will benefit the whole UW System."

Lyall continued, "As the budget moves on to the Senate, I hope that chamber will also improve on the actions of the Joint Finance Committee. The state is the ultimate winner if the UW System remains among the top public higher education systems in the country."

The fun-filled event begins with food, music, face painting and kids football competitions for prizes. Hot dogs, brats ,burgers, grilled chicken breasts, chips, cookies, sno-cones, soda, and beer will be available.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls has announced that a dairy industry specialist is the recipient of its 1999 Distinguished Teacher Award, the highest honor that can be bestowed at the institution.

Food & Environmental Science. Clark becomes the 36th recipient of the most prestigious award presented by the University to recognize excellence in fulfilling UW-River Falls' primary mission of undergraduate education.

Selection for the award is through polling of graduating seniors and recent graduates. Clark will be recognized at the Spring graduation ceremonies and will be invited to deliver the 1999 Fall Commencement address.

Dean Gary Rohde of the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Science says, "Dr. Clark is a good teacher. He is demanding, fair and identifies well with the students. He reaches out to students and really talks to them."

Clark also has been active in many University and College committees. He is a member of the new Dairy Teaching Facility Planning Committee and fund-raising sub-committee, as well as chair of a departmental committee to develop a new dairy science major.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau. "We often say that the University extends beyond our classroom walls. This is another example of how we are streamlining the process to make our expertise available to businesses and industries in the Twin Cities metropolitan area and western Wisconsin. We believe that it's important for us to share our expertise beyond the campus boundaries."

The database is a free resource for businesses both large and small. Businesses will find the directory useful for finding prospective collaborators, to leverage their existing research and development efforts, to keep up to date with basic science and academic research, to communicate directly with researchers who possess the expertise they need, and to develop business and strategic marketing plans.

System were Ted Knous, associate dean for research and graduate studies at UW-Stout, and Mark Kinders, public affairs director at UW-River Falls. Kinders led the public launch of the database, sharing the information with thousands of business associations, chambers of commerce, manufacturers and others across Wisconsin who are seeking expert assistance.

The database replaces a printed directory of UWS faculty experts that was launched nearly two decades ago. With the advent of electronic databases, Kinders said, the directory can be immediately refreshed by faculty and staff as their research interests expand, and it can be published electronically at a lesser cost than the printed version.

The institute consists of workshops that will be taught by professional horseman, representing a wide variety of background and experiences. Those who attend will be able to learn such thins as horse management and training, colt training, and riding school instructing. There will also be two youth horsemanship camps.

Will A. Dahl, who has headed the WMMB for the past 16 years was recognized with the award, which is presented annually by the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences. Dean Gary Rohde presented the award at the CAFES banquet in recognition of Dahl's significant contributions and vision for the long-term growth and success of Wisconsin agriculture.

Dahl was raised on a dairy farm in west central Wisconsin in Blair, and still maintains an interest and ownership in his home farm. His academic career began at UW-Whitewater, where he earned a degree in accounting. He completed his master's and doctorate in agricultural economics at UW-Madison.

Dahl served as assistant administrator and director of the bureau of economics development in the marketing division. His responsibilities included market development, international marketing, coordinator of economic analysis of policy issues affecting agriculture, and seeking potential markets for new products.

Wisconsin dairy farmers. Its mission is to increase the sales and consumption of Wisconsin-produced milk and dairy products through marketing, dairy product promotion, research and nutrition education programs.

"He is a highly energetic, friendly and outstanding leader in the food and agricultural sector. He has been very effective in building partnerships with businesses, educational institutions and state agencies."

Garry has been collecting samples from the Kinnickinnic River since February and will continue to do so throughout the remainder of this year, producing an inventory. The following year he will gather samples from other subwatersheds and tributaries including: Nye, Ted, Kelly, and Parker Creeks, as well as the Lower, Middle and Upper Kinnickinnic, South Fork and River Falls.

By gathering this information Garry hopes to create a baseline for what insects are in these waters, such as mayflies, stoneflies and caddisflies. The inventory could then be used to detect possible changes in the watershed in the future.

The "Kinni," as it's affectionately known to local residents and trout fishers, is consistenly labeled as one of the best trout streams in the Midwest, with more than 6,000 fish per mile. But the stream's watershed is undergoing continous change from the development associated with its location in Pierce and St. Croix counties, which are part of the metropolitan area of the Twin Cities of Minneapolis and St. Paul. The two counties are among the fast growing in Wisconsin.

Garry explained that when the population goes up, more houses are built and less water goes into the ground. This produces more run-off, which may decrease the life of insects and fish. Garry said the problems related to run-off are temperature changes, sediment or erosion and pollution. By studying the insects in the river, problems such as these could be monitored based on insect populations.

Garry brings extensive field experiences to his research. He previously was funded by the National Geographic Society to study insects in the Canadian tundra and boreal forest because of its similarity to the Upper Midwest's geology before the last ice age, some 25,000 years ago. His work studying insects is being utilized by other scientists as a yardstick in their efforts to accurately date other geological and anthropological discoveries in the region.

Garry is donating his time and travel for this effort. He became interested in the complete inventory project as a result of using the Kinni and its South Fork, which runs through the campus, as a classroom over the past six years for his UW-RF entomology classes to determine water quality.

The project will consist of continuous sampling and identifying. This includes collecting samples 1-2 times per weekend and spending 2-3 nights a week at the microscope examining the specimens. Garry will prepare a final report that will be presented to the Wisconsin Department of Natural Resources for its use.

"Many people don't have the patience or the inclination for a project like this. I hope to bring a technical look to it. You have the outdoor experience, plus bringing the science to it. Hopefully it will help preserve the stream," said Garry.

Behnke has taken an active role in campus and community activities, including the Agricultural Education Society, Falcon 4-H, Horticulture Society, Alpha Tau Apha, and Student Senate, through which she was willing to assist students, community members, and teachers alike.

She worked in the agricultural education department as a teaching assistant for the section on parliamentary procedure. She co-chaired the production and editing of the parliamentary procedure video tape developed by the Agricultural Education Society for high school students and was selected to be the Outstanding Freshman, then treasurer, and finally president of the Agricultural Education Society. Her five-year involvement with the Agricultural Education Society varies from Campus Clean-Up to the Ag Technology contest.

Conclave one year. In addition, she was a member of the Student Senate for a year and a half where she served on the budget, Student Organization Relations, and Reallocation and Review Subcommittees to improve students' environment and the University's services.

Behnke's leadership reached beyond the campus to 4-H and FFA members around the Wisconsin. As a Falcon 4-H member, she served as president and treasurer and assisted with programs that enhanced high school students' leadership and interpersonal skills. Serving as a former state FFA officer, she had the opportunity to work with FFA members from around Wisconsin and the nation to assist in developing their teamwork and leadership skills.

Jeremy A. Dais is a fourth-year senior majoring in speech communication with an emphasis in business communication and a minor in English professional writing with an emphasis in business and government. Mary Halada, assistant to the vice chancellor for administration and finance, nominated Daus for the Chancellor's Award.

Through the past four years, Daus has been involved in many different areas of University life. Jeremy is a brother in Sigma Tau Gamma Fraternity and is its executive vice president and Judicial Board chairman. Not only is he very involved in his fraternity, but he also volunteers his time in the community with the River Falls Area Ambulance Service. He has been working as a nationally registered Emergency Medical Technician for the past two years and hopes to join the River Falls Fire Department in the very near future.

Daus has also been extensively involved in the athletic department's athletic training program. For the past four years, Jeremy has mainly been active with the Falcon Football team, functioning as the senior trainer for the past two years. Jeremy will be back for a fifth year assisting trainer Gary Eloranta as his senior trainer with responsibilities in budgeting and training new student trainers about sports medicine. He also received an internship, because of his involvement in the training room, with the Sports Medicine Department for the Kansas City Chiefs during its summer training camps at UW-RF.

Giese is a graduating senior from Colby, majoring in agricultural marketing communications. She was nominated for the Chancellor's Award by Melissa Abramowitz of the Student Leadership Development and Programming Center.

During her years at the University, Giese has been actively involved in many aspects of student life, especially with new students. Currently, she is serving as the hall manager for Grimm Residence Hall and has been a Resident Assistant and Community Coordinator the previous two years.

She also served the College of Agriculture, Food, & Environmental Sciences through her position as the co-editor of its newsletter, The FencePost. She is involved in the Agricultural Communicators of Tomorrow student organization and participated on the Poultry Judging Team.

Guptil is a senior who is double majoring in political science and economics and hopes to graduate in the Spring of 2000. His activities at the University in the last four years have included, a representative on Johnson Hall Council, a Resident Assistant in May Hall, president of his fraternity, Phi Sigma Kappa, a first-year orientation leader, vice president of the Student Senate, and his current service as president of the Student Senate.

Guptil is receiving this award not just because he was very involved, but for what those activities have done for him. Guptil believes that being involved and giving time to organizations made him more well-rounded and a better person.

Not only did getting involved in activities at the University teach him a great deal about life, but he tried to pass on the knowledge and energy he got from his experiences at River Falls to other students.

Newman is a senior graduating with a degree in English and a minor in professional writing with a creative writing emphasis. She was nominated for the Chancellor's Award by Professor Richard Beckham, chair of the English department.

Newman came to UW-RF three years ago as a transfer student and has enjoyed being active in both the University and the surrounding community. At the University, Newman has served in many capacities: as the vice-president of Sigma Tau Delta, the International English Honor Society; the student representative on the search and screen committee for a new creative writing professor; as an editorial staff member and editor for the student literary magazine, "Prologue". She has also worked as an intern in the grants and research office and as a tutor in the writing center for the past two years.

Besides being an active student at UW-RF, for the past three years Newman has worked as an apprentice at Rising Sun Farm, an organic farm four miles east of River Falls, where she lives in a one-room cabin with wood heat and no running water. This experience has taught her to appreciate the simple things in life.

Parrott is a senior majoring in elementary education with minors in early childhood education and Spanish. Mark Meydam, assistant director of admissions, nominated her for the 1999 Chancellor's Award.

During her four years at UW-River Falls, Parrott has dedicated herself to being involved in many aspects of the life and growth of the University. As an admissions office intern, she worked with faculty and staff to design and execute a new on-line web registration program for new freshmen and transfer students. In addition to coordinating the summer registration program, Parrott also has been extensively involved in the volunteer tour guide program.

Her experience and leadership with the summer registration and tour guide programs allowed her to not only be an ambassador for the University, but to also follow through with more broader involvement with new students. She continued her work with new students as a R.O.A.D. Crew Leader. In this capacity, Parrott concentrated on welcoming and orientating incoming students. She also worked one-on-one with at-risk new students as an upper class mentor. Through the Student Alumni Association, Parrott visits high schools to speak to graduating seniors about the college experience and answers questions they may have about college life. This past fall at the state conference for the Student Alumni Association she gave a presentation on stress management for college students.

What sets Platson apart from many other University students are the efforts he has put forth to create linkages from UW-River Falls to the surrounding communities.Some examples of these linkages include volunteering at the River Falls Turningpoint for Victims of Domestic Abuse where he was selected Volunteer of the Year in 1997; working with the Families and Schools Together program in River Falls; being a committee member for the Pierce County Family Community Partnership; mentoring area youth and playing a central role in the development and implementation of the "Each One, Reach One" mentoring program in Pierce County; and working with the Pierce County Chapter of the American Red Cross.

In all of his numerous endeavors, Platson has represented the UW-River Falls in a very professional and positive manner and has demonstrated substantial initiative in creating a positive community perception of the institution.

Schlichter has been involved in many aspects of institutional life. Last year, he was a Resident Assistant in May Hall, and this year he serves as the Undergraduate Hall Manager of West Hathorn Hall. His current project in Hathorn is to plan the annual HOGthorn Family Hogroast for the building's residents and their families.

Last year he was awarded a University of Wisconsin System undergraduate research grant. With this grant, he helped to establish Campus Organic Recycling, otherwise known as the composting project. Working with Professors Butler and Gerald Nolte, they began systematic composting of wastes from the residence halls and public areas of the Hagestad Student Center.

During her four years at the UW - River Falls, Sharma has been extensively involved in many aspects of University life. Susan was a member of the Diversity Awareness Committee of the Student Senate for two years and played a key role in implementing the yearly campus diversity festival, "Unity in the Community."

She also served as co-vice president of the Latino Student Organization for two years and helped sponsor various Latino activities. Aside from her committee involvement, Sharma actively participated in being a student mentor for two years, mentoring freshman students of color.

During her years at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, Smith has been extensively involved in many aspects of the life of the University. She has been an active member of African American Alliance, and served as its program chair for two years. She has also been on the UW-River Falls Student Senate for two years and is currently the Director of Diversity Issues Subcommittee.

In addition to her shared governance activities, Smith's campus involvement has included two years as a Resident Assistant in the University's student life program and a regular worker at the circulation desk in the Chalmer Davee Library.

In the past three years at the University, he has been involved in many aspects of University life. In the Student Senate, he has been a Freshman Senator, Shared Governance Vice President, and Senator of the Term. He has served on numerous committees, ranging from Textbook Services to the New Residence Hall Project.

He is also highly involved in the Agricultural Education Society, currently serving as the president. His participation with parliamentary procedure during his years on campus is vast, from helping with workshops, to judging, to assisting in teaching a college level course.

According to UW-RF adviser Linda Alvarez, the conference represents "an opportunity for students of color to present scholarly papers and to network with other students throughout the UW system." Seminars and caucuses are conducted on various issues for each racial group.

At the convention, UW-River Falls students earned five out of the 12 prizes for four different artistic categories. These students are: Jackye Whitner, an English major from Minneapolis, was awarded first place in poetry; Por Yang, a computer systems major from St. Paul, was awarded first in visual arts and second in prose; Tuyen Bui, a computer systems major from River Falls, was awarded third in visual arts; Cha Thao, an art education major from St. Paul, was awarded third in poetry.

Think If They Saw us Today?" A graduating senior, Whitner's poem addresses all cultures and how they need to look into their past. Whitner explains, "In each culture there are things that our ancestors have done that we should learn from."

Yang earned two awards for a dress he made for the visual arts category and a third place in prose for his life experience in Vietnam as a young boy surviving the war and his efforts to escape the country.

Bui, also a Vietnam native, won third in visual arts for his glass work, a three-dimensional piece based on traditional Vietnamese art. He also participated in a Community Action Theater Troupe where student participants write, produce, and perform interactive skits reflecting cultural diversity relating to present day issues.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls agricultural education department was recently recognized by the Wisconsin Association of Extension 4-H Youth Development Professionals for meritorious service.

The recognition was based on the department's extraordinary efforts in conscientiously and academically promoting the Extension idea and the 4-H Youth Development Profession. The department also has been instrumental in providing a variety of resources for Extension professional and faculty members, and directing UW-RF students in providing assistance to the 4-H movement.

There are many ways that the department has worked with the WAE4-HYPD. The main way has been securing internships for agricultural education students with Cooperative Extension offices throughout Wisconsin.

UW-RF students also work with 4-H leaders from different clubs as facilitators on a business level. Also, students attend camps and work with youngsters. Through their involvement, UW-RF students have created the "Falcon 4-H Club" to work with other clubs in the River Falls area and with the students' home towns.

The department also has local 4-H youth development professionals speak to agricultural communications classes on a regular basis. These lectures include mock interviews, county fair judging workshops, and basic career lectures.

The cruise will begin in Stillwater, Minn., and will cruise the St. Croix Valley for approximately two and a half hours. Guests will get to ride on the beautiful paddlewheeler Andiamo Empress. Wisconsin Gov. Tommy Thompson and Minnesota Gov.

The New Richmond Middle School Band will perform on the dock for entertainment before the cruise. While on the cruise guests will be entertained by the Spirit of Harmony Barbershop Quartet. There will be a short program where both governors have been invited to speak. Dinner will be served on board with a menu of roasted chicken or beef and parsley potatoes. There will also be a cash bar for drinks.

The cruise is open to all hospitality and tourism businesses. The cruise will board at 5:30 p.m. at the south end of Main Street in Stillwater. The Andiamo Empress will leave at 6 p.m. and return at approximately 8:30 p.m.

The decision to build the institution was made in April 1874 at the conclusion of an inspection visit by the Wisconsin Board of Regents. After surveying the community they announced that River Falls would be selected over many other communities around Wisconsin as site of the fourth Normal School. Its mission was to educate teachers for the northwest.

Its founding was particularly noteworthy because of the widespread cooperation that led to the Regents' decision. Thibodeau points out that the townships of River Falls, Troy, Clifton and Kinnickinnic, as well as community leaders, pledged $25,000 toward the Normal's construction, as well as the land to build it upon.

The ceremony will open at noon with a community-wide bell-ringing. It will be followed by remarks from Thibodeau, visiting dignitaries, and the reading of resolutions or commendations from Governor Tommy Thompson, the Wisconsin Legislature, and the River Falls City Council. The University Chamber Singers also will perform three songs: "Alma Mater," an early school song; the "Pledge Song" that was introduced at the 50th anniversary celebration; and the present UW-RF Fight Song.

Also planned for display are artifacts that will be retrieved from a time capsule placed in the cornerstone of North Hall when it became the second building on campus in 1914. This year the University plans to construct a new time capsule that will be sealed at the conclusion of the 125th anniversary year. Thibodeau noted that the public is invited to join in taking refreshments following the ceremony.

The exhibit features a collection of acrylic paintings that express the evolution of the figure and the natural environment. This exhibit may be viewed at the large showcase in the Chalmer Davee Library during regular building hours.

The UW-RF commissioned composer project began in 1967 and has featured internationally known composers including John Cage, Leslie Bassett, William Albright and Fisher Tull. The commissioned composer is chosen each year by students and a faculty advisor.

Zaimont is a professor in Composition at the University of Minnesota. Her music is characterized by its expressive strength, dynamism, and rhythmic vitality and is frequently played across the U.S. and abroad. Zaimont's music has been performed at the Lincoln Center, Carnegie Hall, Merkin Hall and other major auditoriums on three continents.

Many of her compositions have won national and international awards including the Guggenheim Fellowship and the Maryland State Arts Council Fellowship. Zaimont's orchestral music received a gold medal at the Gottschalk Centenary International Composition competition in 1972.

She is the subject of nine doctoral dissertations as well as the subject of individual chapters in the books, Women Composers and Performers and Conductors of the 20th Century. Zaimont has been featured in major articles in such professional journals as "the NATS Journal" and "Music Educators Journal." She is also a frequent judge at composition competitions.

As a faculty member of Baltimore's Peabody Conservatory of Music, Zaimont was awarded the teacher of the year award. Ms. Zaimont also held the post of Professor of Music and Chair of the Music Department at Adelphi University from 1989-91 where she was awarded a distinguished teacher award.

The concert will offer a variety of dance styles including a high energy hip-hop dance choreographed by Torrion Amie and a Middle Eastern belly dance by Jocelyn Gorham. Both Amie and Gorham are UW-RF faculty members.

Featherston is known as a lecturer, workshop leader, writer, cultural critic, and filmmaker and has lectured throughout the United States and Europe on social theory since 1982. She has addressed issues such as sexism, racism, reproductive rights, women's spirituality, multicultural democracy, heterosexism, women's rights, gender violence, and multicultural alliance-building.

She has worked with the Green Party and the ISD in Germany to end neo-facist violence, coordinated the "Children Having Children" Conference in conjunction with the National Council of Negro Women to address the fundamentals of teen pregnancy, devised diversity training materials for battered women's shelters, and taught journal writing techniques as a form of narrative healing. She has also appeared on radio and television in the U.S. and abroad.

Students and faculty will have the opportunity to read poetry from their favorite deceased poets as a means to raise funds for the "Bring a Writer to Campus Fund," faculty will be charged 25 cents per line while students will be asked for a donation.

Pieper, an art education major from Rice Lake, has used images and text that invokes a response to the world around us, past and present. The images are intended to "make each of us think about how we treat the world and other people," according to Pieper.

The works will be displayed in the small recessed case located to the right of the entry to the main library. They can be viewed during regular library hours: Monday to Thursday from 7:45 a.m. - midnight and Friday from 7:45 a.m.-4:30 p.m.

More than 125 UW-River Falls education students are practicing their teaching skills this fall in 37 cooperating Wisconsin and Minnesota school districts and preschools as student teachers and interns.

In her talk Karolides is expected to discuss a variety of issues such as environmentally sound land-use planning and building design as well as cost-effective construction practices. This speech comes at a time when the blueprints for the new River Falls High School could be influenced by ideas of this kind.

Alexis Karolides is a registered architect with the Rocky Mountain Institute in Colorado, a premier research and educational foundation. She came to the institute with six years of experience in commercial, institutional and industrial architecture.

"We're using the competition for educational purposes. Part of our departmental mission is to improve student oratory skills," said James Pratt, of the speech communications and theatre arts department at UW-RF.

The merit awards board of Project Innovation honored LeCapitaine with a wall plaque recognizing the value of his article titled, "Schools as Developmental Clinics: Overcoming the Shadow's Three Faces."

In addition to his recognition from Project Innovation, LeCapitaine was invited to present the article at the International Council of Psychologists conference in Australia and at a Harvard University this spring.

The journal also has asked LeCapitaine to write a second article for its readers. He intends to have that article focus on school psychologists and their power to work with high risk students and the community. There will be an emphasis on the healthy social development of students with the involvement of families and communities.

LeCapitaine is the chair of the department of counseling and school psychology at UW-River Falls. He received his doctorate from Boston University in 1980 and is involved with a variety of psychology and counseling associations.

He went on to say that despite his outside involvement in the psychology community, including a book on personal and psychological development that he is in the process of writing, he wouldn't want to take a sabbatical.

Practicing what he preaches, LeCapitaine says he encourages his own students to learn their strengths and weaknesses in the classroom. He says that they know the academic side as well. Theory, practice, and principles fall into place as the students develop their own personalities.

Attorney Susan Steingass, the 43rd president of the State Bar of Wisconsin, spoke Wednesday at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls of the pioneering contributions of Wisconsin women who practice law.

The first female attorney registered in 1879 after a bill was passed to allow women to practice in the Wisconsin Supreme Court. The 150th woman registered in 1943. These women were abolitionists, advocates, wives, and mothers. Their battle to enter the courts was not an easy one and they slowly conquered many of the barriers that stood in the way.

Despite these bias she hasn't been held back in her field. She is a partner of the Madison firm of Habush, Habush, Davis, and Rottier. She practices in the areas of personal injury law, professional malpractice, and tort litigation.

As Bar president, Steingass represents the interests of 18,600 licensed attorneys in Wisconsin. She took the oath of office in last June and became the second female president in the 120 years of the bar.

The show will feature ice skating students of all ability levels in costume, with a musical background. Solos and group performances will include "Celebration," "Disco Inferno," "YMCA," "In the Navy," and "Funky Town."

The workshop, "Writing the Natural World," will focus primarily on writing poetry with the woods and water of University of Wisconsin System Pigeon Lake Field Station as inspiration. Students will read and discuss the work of contemporary and traditional poets who use nature as their inspiration, will have solitary writing time, and draft workshops with the group. Each day, a new technique will be introduced to serve as the focus of writing.

Forest. Bogs, abandoned fields, cattail marshes, lakes, streams, and other aquatic habitats scatter the area. This region allows students to create, relax, and enjoy the beauty of Wisconsin while earning credits.

Brantley grew up in North Carolina. She received a doctorate in English and a master's degree in creative writing from the University of Nebraska. Her degrees enabled her to teach at the University of Nebraska, the University of Louisiana, and the University of Helsinki before coming to UW-River Falls.

Originally from Springfield, Minn., Weiss graduated from St. John's University and taught for one year as a foreign language teacher. He then moved to Superior and became a purchasing agent at an industrial supply company.

"This program gives journalism professors the ability to do their dreams," said Berg. She used that grant money to report, write, and produce two in-depth radio features with the help of producer Dean Kallenbach, of Wisconsin Public Radio.

The first feature, titled "Working from the Heart: dairy farmers talk about their lives," will be broadcast in August on WHWC, a WPR affiliate in Eau Claire. The one-hour program will start with the playing of the documentary followed by 25 minutes of call-in questions. Berg hopes that farmers will phone in and share their own perspectives on their work.

The 34-minute piece examined the work of dairy farming in the Midwest. Berg visited five dairy farm families in Minnesota and Wisconsin and asked them about their lives. She wanted to find out how the small family dairy farm is surviving in today's economy. What she found is the number of young farmers is decreasing as farms grow in size. Many farm owners simply must grow accordingly and that puts many of them into managerial roles, instead of doing the hands-on work they are accustomed to.

In her researching, she also consulted three dairy experts at UW-RF and three farm safety experts. Berg had been reporting and writing this feature since the last summer. Production started in January.

A second feature is currently underway. According to Berg, it tells the story of "a largely invisible population of women living in northern Pine County, Minn." These women are waiting for men who are serving time in Sandstone Federal Prison. This was of particular interest to Berg, who comes from that area.

"I wanted to find out why they wait and how they survive," said Berg. She plans to start getting background information and find several potential major subjects. The following 8-10 weeks will be used to interview these subjects repeatedly. No date for final release has been set yet.

Pratt applied for the position when he saw an advertisement in the directory for the ALA announcing the current director had retired and inviting members to apply. He was interviewed at the ALA's national convention in Albuquerque and was announced as the new director at a banquet there.

Pratt describes the ALA as an international organization with a strong presence in Europe and Japan that recognizes the importance of listening. "Listening is often seen as the forgotten communication skill," says Pratt. People spend more time listening and have very little training in it, compared to their training from an early age to read and write.

The ALA, formed 20 years ago, strives to build awareness for listening as a communications skill. Some of its members are trainers or consultants at listening improvement programs offered by businesses and organizations to their members.

Pratt feels he was selected in part because of his participation and accomplishments in the American Forensics Association. That organization, which Pratt also serves as director, has a 95 percent membership renewal rate. Pratt insists the if someone doesn't renew he is "very tenacious" about it. "I am not going to let people not renew without a fight," he remarked.

An innovative performance dance company that uses masks, puppets, stilts and stylized movement to create original pieces on themes of universal importance will take up residency at UW-River Falls April 26-30.

Hawaii's Monkey and the Waterfall Dance Theatre is the first professional company to be invited to work with students. Their work fuses Eastern and Western performance styles into an original and highly theatrical mix which combines exuberant humor with moments of powerful emotional gravity.

While in residence in River Falls, the members of the "Monkey and the Waterfall" will do presentations in classes, work with students on an original production titled "Exchanging Faces," and perform their signature piece, "The Monkey and the Waterfall."

According to Robin Murray, director of the University Theatre, "This is a very exciting opportunity for everyone-both students and the members of the River Falls community." She points out that the "work that the Monkey and the Waterfall does is very different in style and content from what we usually do. Everyone involved will have a unique opportunity to learn both about theatre and about cultural diversity through an artistic medium."

Meg Swanson, chair of the speech and theatre department, says "We are so delighted to welcome these interesting performers to campus. They have a great deal to give to all of us, and I know that it will be an excellent adventure for all involved."

A Honolulu critic applauds her "amazingly fertile imagination..." A San Francisco reviewer described her as a "powerful artist with a great deal to communicate and a vast repertoire of techniques at her disposal."

Guthrie is an internationally recognized expert on the geochemical effects of potential hazardous minerals, such as asbestos. As a distinguished lecturer of the Mineralogical Society of America, he speaks across the country and abroad.

In "Mineralogy of the Lung," Guthrie will give an overview of the mineralogical and biological effects of mineral induced diseases. This will include a discussion of the risks associated with exposure to dust derived from natural resources. In addition, Guthrie will present results from collaborative work aimed at understanding why the zeolite erionite is so cancer-causing.

Before joining the staff at Western Michigan University, Guthrie worked at the Los Alamos National Laboratory. He studied the geochemical aspects of potentially hazardous minerals, the geochemical evolution of concrete, and various environmental issues.

He was the associate editor of the magazine American Mineralogist for three years. Currently he is the chair of the Mineralogical Society of America, a special interest group that promotes environmental mineralogy.

Legends and Stories of Mid-America." He was a contributing author to many other books, in addition to publishing scores of scholarly works and publications. An avid diarist, Wyman had written over 100 personal journals, which he donated to the State Historical Society archives.

Thibodeau, himself an accomplished textbook author, said that he had written to Wyman to note that his many works can be found in the bookshelves and on the coffee table in the chancellor's office. He added that "even more impressive are the influences you have had on your students."

Thibodeau added, "Walker Wyman's presence on campus is almost tangible in terms of his interaction with students. He is unique to the academy: he truly loved the life of the mind. He was absolutely bonded with this campus. This campus community has long admired Walker Wyman and he will always be fondly remembered by all on campus.

Wyman founded the University Press and was a prolific contributor, both in his publications and in generously donating his royalties to maintain the press. Norman noted that Wyman remained a tireless author well into his retirement, regularly at work in his campus office writing or editing.

"What Walker was expert on was finding the interesting stories to tell of real people," Norman said. "Some historians would write about larger issues, like the Normandy Invasion or World War II, but he was one of those historians who believed history was best told through the small story, the common person."

Wyman said in interviews following publication of several of his books that his interest in individual histories was sparked while pursuing his master's and doctoral degrees at the University of Iowa in the early 1930s. He explored the diaries of migrants during the California Gold Rush of 1849-50. "I was hooked," he explained. His research became the basis for his third book, "California Emigrant Letters," published in 1945 by Bookman.

"The Lumberjack Frontier" (1968, University of Nebraska Press), is his most widely recognized for its historical and social contribution. It was selected by the English-Speaking Union for its Ambassador Book List for interpreting "the lives, backgrounds, regions and culture of America to the people of other countries."

Born on a farm in Danville, Ill., on Dec. 7, 1907, Wyman often marveled at the tenacity of the common men and women who made America, whether as a rancher, lumberjack or as a farmer eking out a living on a "hard scrabble farm." As long-suffering and persistent as they were, hardened by years of battling the elements, they were given to delightful myths and a subtle sense of humor.

It led Wyman to chronicle their realm of lore and myths in nine books, whose topics ranged from witching for water and precious minerals, to bear and wolf stories, to hunting and fishing legends, to the origins and stories of mythological creatures. One such example is the "Hodag," a fire-breathing monster with the body and head of an ox, pointed spines, and alligator's tail reputed to roam the deep woods north of Rhinelander.

Wyman once told the Milwaukee Journal-Sentinel of his interest in cultural traditions, legends and myths. "Folklore is a branch of social history. History is man's experience, I guess, and if you know history, you have the benefit of many men's experience."

He added in another interview that the work of a folklorist often ventured outside the rigor of the traditional historian: "There's no effort made to check authenticity." The job of the folklorist, he was quoted as saying, is only to record stories that exist in the oral tradition.

Honors were piled upon Wyman for his many contributions to Wisconsin and the Upper Midwest. He received an honorary doctorate of laws from Illinois State University; an Award of Merit from the Western History Association for his distinguished contributions to the cause of western history; an Outstanding Educator award from the Wisconsin Association of School Administrators; and Distinguished Professor of History at UW-RF.

A UW-River Falls faculty committee has been meeting weekly to work out the design of the University's $3.4 million new Dairy Teaching Facility. The new structure was approved for construction recently by the State Building Commission.

Groundbreaking is expected at UW-RF's Mann Valley Farm in the spring of 2000, according to UW-RF campus planner Dale Braun. It will include seven structures featuring a milking parlor and rapid exit stalls, a modern free stall barn for the 80-cow milking herd and heifers, a special needs barn for maternity stalls, bunker silos for forage storage, a feed shed for hay storage and commodity bins for feed storage, a building for a new technology nutrient managment system, teaching classroom and laboratory facility and a pavilion/arena for shows and contests.

An additional $500,000 was added to the project for siting and to construct a model waste handling facility to reduce the possibility of groundwater and air pollution. That component will serve as a demonstration model to Wisconsin's dairy farmers, particularly in western Wisconsin where rapid development is placing homes and businesses in closer proximity to farms.

The center represents a major investment in the dairy industry, which comprises the largest component of Wisconsin agriculture, according to Dean Gary Rohde of the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

He noted that UW-RF offers the largest undergraduate dairy program among the 110 programs offered universities nationwide. According to Rohde, 144 students are enrolled in the dairy option program, which soon will be upgraded to the status of a dairy science major because of the state's commitment in the new facility.

"The importance of that is that these are the future rural leaders. They will be managing and operating these important farm businesses throughout Wisconsin and Minnesota," Rohde said. "They will become the rural leaders in the next 20 to 30 years, serving on the schools, county and town boards.

The Dairy Teaching Center, according to Rohde, also will be used for training programs for dairy farm employees, education workshops for industry personnel, regional dairy judging contests for high school students, applied research projects, extension out-reach activities and field days, livestock and dairy cattle sales, dairy-related educational activities for grade school children, and farm tours for the public, foreign visitors and special interest groups.

According to campus planner Braun, once plans are completed this fall the public will be provided an opportunity to comment on the project through three environmental impact public hearings. Written comments also will be taken.

They will be reviewed by the University of Wisconsin System Administration, which must approve final siting and construction plans. The Wisconsin environmental impact process mirrors federal requirements.

Braun noted a final site on the laboratory farm has not yet been selected since the planning team is exploring whether the waste treatment system also can be designed to accommodate the farm's swine, beef and sheep operations.

Bluestone has earned an international reputation for his programs that explore the diverse reaches of the classical guitar. A humorous and witty Bluestone charms his audiences with his insightful and often spontaneous commentary on the music, its composers and historical context in English or Spanish.

Bluestone loves to play for children, seniors, and the ill-anywhere that music will bring joy and ease burdens. He loves the challenge of opening young minds to classical music and is an advocate for the arts. Bluestone enjoys the challenge of helping build bridges within communities between arts and business groups.

Krey, a professor in the College of Education & Graduate Studies, designed her book to assist teachers in the selection of children's books representing the NCSS 10 thematic strands of social studies. These thematic strands include the major ideas that come from history, geography, political science, economics, and the behavioral sciences.

The idea for the book came to Krey when she started receiving the same questions from her undergraduate and graduate students at UW-River Falls. Her students were asking if she knew about children and young adult books that represented various social studies topics.

Krey began to see the need for a list that teachers and future teachers could consult for their studies. Her book can assist the teachers, local social studies curriculum committees, and librarians who are in search of quality books to teach social studies themes.

Krey believes that children's books have great potential in the social studies curriculum. She points out that children's books can expand a student's knowledge of events that aren't experienced first-hand, it can provide a perspective that include human emotions, it offers a holistic picture of human events, it can distinguish differences between facts and the human characteristics of people involved, and it gives the opportunity to identify with characters, events, and emotions that they may be able to relate with.

The collection of books are divided by chapters that cover culture; time, continuity, and change; people, place, and environment; individual development and identity; individuals, groups, and institutions; power, authority, and governance; production, distribution, and consumption; science, technology, and society; global connections; and civic ideals and practices.

Krey says she set out to find exemplary books which were high quality pieces of children's literature that could be suggested to classroom teachers to help them accomplish the teaching of the 10 thematic strands.

The criteria for her selections was the book's potential for constructing at least one of the strands, how interesting the books are in a variety of ways, the accuracy of the books and the absence of misconceptions and stereotypes. She also reviewed the book's representation of a multicultural view of the world, high literary quality, whether the books contain illustrations or photographs that support the text, and if the books are developmentally appropriate for children ages 5 to 11. After reading most of those books, Krey found over 500 that fit her criteria.

Krey has been involved with many social studies organizations. She is the chairperson of the national selection committee for "Notable Children's Trade Books in the Field of Social Studies," and she is a past president of the Wisconsin Council for Social Studies.

A two-week intensive training program in information technology support was conducted in which three UW-River Falls students participated. A total of 40 UW students from all campuses participated in this pilot program funded by the University of Wisconsin System.

The program included comprehensive training on supporting desktop computing and was conducted at the Madison Area Technical College. As part of the program, the students were transported to Madison and housed in the UW-Madison residence halls during their two weeks of training. All of the students who participated in the pilot program successfully completed the program and were awarded certificates acknowledging their accomplishments.

According to Mr. Smith, "The pilot training program was a huge success! All of the students involved indicated that they received a very positive experience and learned a lot. We anticipate receiving considerable benefit from their increased knowledge and experience. One of the more gratifying comments made by the students upon their return to campus was that they were surprised and impressed by how much more advanced UW-River Falls' IT services are than many of the other UW campuses. It tells me that we are doing many things the right way."

He added, "The main reason for this pilot program was to begin a process of addressing our need for trained information technology support staff by training and utilizing our own student resources. This is a win-win situation.

The campuses benefit by receiving trained student help and not having to hire as many permanent staff. The students win by becoming trained, certified and more marketable once they graduate. The pilot is being viewed as such a tremendous success that plans are now being made to double the size of the program for next year and expand it considerably more in the next biennium."

Included in the ceremony were the University's first diplomas to 42 participants from the new School of Business and Economics which was formed by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents in 1996.

On March 10 the University of Wisconsin-River Falls students and community will have an opportunity to hear several professional programs related to the role of today's media. These presentations will feature prominent figures in media speaking about various topics in journalism.

Future and Funding of Public Radio" at 10 a.m. Davis-Rehm took over the reigns at WPR last July. She worked previously in public radio in Seattle and she was also a business manager at a small publishing company. She will be putting on the presentation with the help of WPR's Western Wisconsin Regional Manager Dean Kallenbach.

The Minnesota News Council will also be doing a special program. The MNC is a non-profit organization whose mission is to promote fair, vigorous, and trusted journalism where the public and the media can discuss journalism standards. It conducts hearings on complaints against the media as an alternative to lawsuits.

Then at 2 p.m. The news council will hold a mock council meeting where students will assume the roles of council members and debate an actual case that was previously decided before the MNC. They will debate the complaint of a young woman who had been raped by her father who complained that a small-town newspaper re-victimized her by writing a story that named her father and indicated her age, although her name was not given.

Traditional flamenco dance tells the story of Gypsies from Southern Spain and their struggle. "It is about their passion for the music and the dance," said Sheila Terryll, administrative director at Zorongo Flamenco Dance Theatre.

The Zorongo Flamenco Dance Theatre is one of the premier American flamenco dance theatres. Located in Minneapolis, they offer lessons, lectures and performances on Spanish music, literature, dance and history.

The Wyman Series selects one dance production a year, and flamenco is new to the series, said Kaye Schendel, Wyman Series coordinator. "People, students especially, should take advantage of these arts performances while they are this affordable,"

The review was conducted last year by a team of six visiting university presidents, senior administrators and faculty. They spent 2-1/2 days on campus meeting with students, faculty, staff and community members to determine the quality of UW-RF's academic programs; the consistency of its mission statement with its actual practices; the effectiveness of its organizational human, financial and physical assets; its potential future effectiveness; and whether it demonstrates integrity in its practices and relationships.

The administration and faculty are focused on students and undergraduate education, and are recognized regionally for the effectiveness of the quality of education and the achievements of its graduates.

UW-RF's "students are a delight. They are very supportive of the faculty, staff, and administration. They like the campus. There are clear signs that new students enter with, on average, increasing levels of academic achievement and ability."

"The team applauds the campus community for its success at planning for the future. 'Reach for the Future' (UW-RF's strategic plan) will, we believe, be a noted milestone in the history of the University."

Thibodeau also noted that he was pleased that the accreditation self-study process enabled the University to focus in on areas "where we had unique strengths. It is an exceptional document that is going to serve the institution well."

The self-study, through the governance process of students, faculty and staff, agreed that future emphasis should include increased student retention rates; multicultural diversity; technology, classroom and laboratory upgrades; expanded student internships and professional experiences; equal opportunity; and aggressive pursuit of external funding to support the educational experience.

Founded in 1895, the NCA is one of six regional institutional accrediting associations in the United States. Through its Commission it accredits and grants membership to educational institutions in the 19-state North Central region.

Through its accreditation process, NCA provides a review to higher education institutions on their program strengths or needs for improvement and provides accurate and useful information about higher education institutions to potential students and their families.

According to Glenda Morris, UW-RF special assistant to the chancellor on equity and compliance, Abrahamson's speech will be a "great opportunity to hear one of our premiere leaders." Morris, who is an attorney, is a member of the UW-RF Women's History Month activities planning committee that is sponsoring the event.

She became the first woman to serve on the court and only the third to serve on any Wisconsin bench. In 1975, one year before Abrahamson was appointed to the court, women comprised only three percent of the Bar. Today that figure has risen to 25 percent.

Abrahamson has been in Wisconsin law for 37 years. In the last 23 she has been a leader in a court system dominated by men. Throughout her career she has faced the challenges of her position and shared her experiences with others.

Abrahamson was appointed to the Wisconsin Supreme Court in 1976 and was the only woman to serve on the court at that time. In 1979 she won her first election to the court and was re-elected in 1989 to a 10-year term. She was made chief justice in August 1996, the first woman to hold this position, and serves as the administrative leader of the judicial system throughout Wisconsin.

They also set rules of professional conduct for Wisconsin's 18,600 licensed attorneys and the standards for admission to the Wisconsin Bar. The court oversees a judicial system budget of $91 million, as well.

She has been a member of numerous boards and councils such as the U.S. Department of Justice DNA Advisory Board, the American Law Institute, and the American Judicature Society, where she has been vice president. She is also the Chair of the Planning and Policy Advisory Program that handles the long-range planning for Wisconsin courts.

That's 36 more students than last spring, and the numbers are likely to continue climbing. Prospective students have until next Monday to complete their enrollment process. The process was eased for that possibility this semester as all students registered for classes via the Internet for the first time in the University's history. That could mean surpassing the all-time spring enrollment record of 5,257 students set in 1992.

If that happens, it would follow a record institutional enrollment set last fall, and it has University administrators predicting next fall's student body will be the largest in the institution's 125-year history.

A combination of strong academic reputation, higher quality students and dynamic regional growth have led administrators to project that the student population next fall could be as high as 5,800 students. That would top by nearly 200 this past fall's previous record of 5,617 students.

Also, based on application submissions, enrollment could be closed by the end of the current school year. According to Tuchtenhagen, as of Jan. 1, applications were running almost 20 percent ahead of last year's record.

Vice Chancellor Virgil Nylander said the potential for crowding is an important consideration in reducing next year's freshmen class size. He noted there will be fewer seats in part because this spring's graduating seniors comprised one of the smallest classes when they enrolled, thus providing for fewer available seats when they commence.

Another key consideration is that the University's higher admissions standards have resulted in better prepared students who are more motivated to continue on through graduation. Nearly 90 percent of this year's freshmen were in the top half of their class. The retention rate for freshmen to sophomores-a critical decision-making year for students to determine if they will continue with their education-has seen a 10 percent increase over the past two years.

Chancellor Thibodeau noted that credit for UW-RF's students' success at the institution also must be shared with the school districts that send it students from western Wisconsin and the Twin Cities eastern metropolitan area.

"What I'm pleased about is that our University's success is dependent on the local districts also being successful. We think we've worked well with our high school colleagues to ensure their graduates have an appreciation for our admissions standards. Those high school students are coming to us better and better prepared for college."

Thibodeau said the University has taken substantial steps to ensure UW-RF can accommodate the record numbers. "We have been increasing our productivity and efficiencies to educate more students. We've incorporated technology, new pedagogical (teaching) techniques and highly effective management to the educational process."

But Thibodeau cautioned that the University must continue to receive adequate state funding from Wisconsin's executive and legislative branches during the current legislative session if it is to keep pace with demands for enrollment.

Over the past decade, the portion of state tax dollars allocated to public higher education has been dropping in proportion to all state funding as more money has gone to property tax relief, corrections and other considerations.

Studies show that teacher quality is the most important factor in P-12 student achievement. But how do we know that our children's teachers enter the classroom ready to help them learn? Professional accreditation is one way to ensure the public that schools of education are graduating well-qualified teachers ready for today's classrooms.

Studies has proven its commitment to producing quality teachers for our nations's children by achieving accreditation under the performance-oriented standards of the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education, the organization responsible for professional accreditation of teacher education.

While there are almost 1,300 colleges and universities engaged in teacher education only approximately 500 are accredited by NCATE. Those accredited institutions produce two-thirds of the nation's new teacher graduates.

"It's always heartening to have an affirmation on the quality of your programs from an external accrediting agency. That is particularly validated when you take into consideration that the group that reviewed us through a campus visit consisted of educators with national reputations in teacher education.

NCATE-accreditated schools must meet rigorous standards set by the profession and members of the public. NCATE standards expect accredited schools of education to ensure that subject matter content, and how to teach it, is a priority; to emphasize school district collaboration; to ensure that candidates can use technology in instruction; and to prepare teacher candidates to teach students from diverse backgrounds. The standards also require the school of education to design a conceptual framework for each program that is based on current and established research and best practices.

Graduates of the program consistently reported that they felt prepared for the demands of the teaching profession and and that their experiences throughout their program and the unit's faculty members had made a positive impact on both their professional and personal lives."

As evidenced from display projects and feedback from student teachers, undergraduates students and cooperating teachers, UW-RF candidates are well prepared to assume the roles for which they have been trained. Faculty members were cited for teaching students the instructional techniques they will actually apply in the classroom when they assumed K-12 teaching positions.

CEGS Dean Karen Viechnicki did not join the college until after the acceditation review was completed. However, she said she was impressed with the positive comments made in the final report. She was pleased to note that the depth and breadth of the efforts to engage UW-RF faculty, students and public school personnel in the integration of theory and best practice was cited in the NCATE Board of Examiners report.

NCATE is recognized by the U.S. Department of Education as the professional accrediting body for schools, departments, and colleges of education. On-site visits, document review, and accreditation decisions are all carried out by professionals from the education community, including teachers, school specialists, and teacher educators, as well as members of the public and education policymakers.

For more information about the University of Wisconsin-River Falls College of Education and Graduate Studies teacher education program, visit the web site at www.uwrf.edu. More information about NCATE is available at www.ncate.org.

Giovanelli has played the horn for nine years, with a list of accomplishments that includes receiving 14 first place scores at the Wisconsin high school Solo/Ensemble Competitions. She also has performed with the All State Band at Stevens Point, the Indian Head Honors Band at Eau Claire, and her Medford Area High School pep band and marching band.

The seminar will be held in Rodli Commons on Jan. 23. by Richard Lovie, a nationally known speaker who has presented keynote sessions throughout the United States and Canada. He holds three degrees in special education. He has appeared on national television and was honored at the White House.

The former Wisconsin Secretary of Agriculture announced his decision in a letter to Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau on Dec. 2 and informed the College faculty this week. The retirement will take effect on July 31.

"My association with the University has been a very rewarding and a professionally satisfying experience. I have been extremely pleased and proud of my association with UW-River Falls since the mid-60's. It has been an honor to have served the past 18 years as the Dean," Rohde wrote Thibodeau.

"In leaving the College at the end of this academic year, I feel that it has a strong complement of undergraduate programs, an excellent faculty and staff, an enthusiastic student body, and a high degree of visibility with employers and alumni who have supported our efforts. I have worked hard to build on the many accomplishments of my predecessors and believe the College is recognized as having an excellent reputation for quality academic programs and graduates."

For the next decade he taught classes, served as an extension marketing specialist and as assistant dean before he was tapped by the State Board of Agriculture and former Gov. Patrick Lucey to serve as Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, Trade and Consumer Protection. For nearly six years Rohde held the position as head of the 800-member department responsible for the state's agricultural programs and policies.

College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Science. He is recognized nationally as a leader in the broad field of agriculture and is considered a pioneer in the creation of cooperative and creative linkages between the University, agribusiness entities, and governmental agencies that impact on rural communities and people.

"Dr. Rohde has made lasting and critically important contributions during his tenure at UW-River Falls. He is a personal friend and colleague and I will miss his good humor, positive outlook, and administrative skills. Of course, his ongoing leadership and involvement in many areas will continue to impact in a positive way on the University and on Wisconsin agriculture after he leaves the Dean's office. I wish him and Helen much happiness and continued success in the years ahead," Thibodeau said.

Rohde indicated he intends to remain in the River Falls area and may be interested in some short-term consulting with regional agribusinesses or governmental agencies, in addition to some part-time teaching activities.

"Economic literacy is intrinsic to an understanding of the global economy and emerging markets. America's leadership will play a significant role in the formation and guidance of these varied markets and economic forces. Our young people and those who teach them need and deserve fundamental economic knowledge. The center will assure that our students receive this economic education," Erickson said.

"The University can provide good assistance to the smaller districts that don't have an economics teacher on their staff. In our service area, there is a scarcity of well-qualified teachers for this. The school districts do not have the necessary resources to assist teachers in economics education,"

The Center will be funded through private donations to the Wisconsin Council on Economic Education. As a result, teachers will be trained by faculty in the UW-RF School of Business & Economics. Area teachers will be eligible to participate in workshops, seminars, and graduate programs, with the Council underwriting up to half of the tuition cost for college credit courses.

Council President Bill Isbister said the 35-year-old Milwaukee-based organization is dedicated to promoting economic literacy in young people throughout Wisconsin through nine centers such as the one at UW-River Falls.

According to Isbister, the Wisconsin Council is one of 48 state organizations which seek to ensure that future employees are economically literate so as to be more productive workers and informed citizens. The state organizations are affiliated with the National Council on Economic Education.

Educational assistance delivered by UW-RF faculty will emphasize factual, comprehensive and nonpartisan programs stressing widely recognized principles of economics, according to Professor Neal Prochnow, director of the School of Business & Economics.

"The students who have graduated from these programs and the faculty who have responsibility for these programs have had neither the recognition nor the visibility that they deserve. The students graduating this Fall as the 'first class' of the School of Business and Economics is a significant step toward providing the recognition that has been long over due," Prochnow said.

Now a professor at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, Pratt is being recognized for the 40 years he's devoted to forensics. The American Forensic Association recently gave Pratt its most prestigious award, the Distinguished Service Award.

However, a critical factor was Pratt's financial acumen that rescued the organization from dissolution because of declining membership. "Professor Pratt, along with help from several other notable individuals, saved AFA from financial disaster," says Herbeck.

AFA was practically bankrupt in the 1980's. Pratt personally guaranteed a loan that helped AFA pay off its debts and took the time to encourage members of AFA to renew their membership. Pratt not only rescued AFA from bankruptcy, but also managed to double its memberships.

According to Herbeck, Pratt has been with AFA for such a long time most people assumed that he had already won the national award. He went on to say that one could argue that Pratt should have received this award any of the past 15 years. "Pratt has done a phenomenal job serving AFA," says Herbeck.

Volunteering for AFA as their executive secretary, Pratt says that he would not be able to do his job without the support he receives from UW-River Falls where he conducts AFA activites in addition to his teaching assignments and coaches the UW-RF forensics team.

He went on to say that the University also has sponsored travel for his research and recognizes and acknowledges its value. Pratt says he particularly enjoys his relationship with his students. "I take joy in my students' accomplishments," says Pratt.

Gordon Hendahl, dean of the College of Arts & Sciences at UW-River Falls, says that he was extremely pleased to learn of Pratt's recognition from the forensics community. Hendahl says such awards only come after distinguished service, and too often those contributions go unnoticed.

The band, which is based in Los Angeles, will be in River Falls for a one-night concert that is sponsored by the Helen and Walker Wyman Concert and Lecture Series. The concert is free to students and $5 to the general public. Tickets will go on sale at the door one hour prior to the concert's start time.

"Gaelic Storm specializes in a mix of fast-paced traditional Celtic music, dance music, and songs all performed with energy and enthusiasm," said Genevieve Williams, music critic from the Internet site, amazon.com, one of the largest sources of media over cyberspace.

"We were all travelers from someplace else who came together at the pub for the promise of companionship, conversation, and the music of course," said Lonsdale. "It was really inevitable that we'd end up on stage together playing the music that we'd loved so much."

Lonsdale said that filming the movie was an amazing experience. "We all felt a little awestruck about the immigrants who had sailed and died on Titanic," he said. "In some way playing this music was a testimony to them. Even though they didn't survive the crossing, their cultures did, and the music continues to thrive in the New World."

The four-day classical tour will begin in Delphi, with stops at the Monastery of Ossios Loukas, a museum, and the site of the Pythian games. Other highlights include passing the area where Oedipus slew his father, the site of the original Olympic Games in Olympia, the Epidaurus, and Agamemnon's citadel at Mycenae with its Lion Gate.

From Crete, a morning flight will take travelers to Mykonos where they will have the opportunity to visit the islands of Cyclades and Delos. The rest of the time may be spent shopping, looking at other sites, or basking in the sun on the beaches.

"Childhood Depression & Suicide" is a course designed to provide practical information on the characteristics, diagnosis, and treatment of depression in children and adolescents. The course will be taught by Professor Doug Smith at the Hudson High School. This course is offered for one graduate credit and will be held Mondays 5-7:30 p.m., May 3-May 24. Registration deadline is April 16 and there is a limit of 25 registrants. This course will be considered a summer class. Students are requested to call for summer tuition before registering.

Self-paced video courses that will earn two undergraduate/graduate credits are also available this spring. "Student Groups! High Performance Learning" is a course where participants will learn student grouping strategies.

They were joined by nearly 2,000 family members who celebrated the two-hour ceremony that also witnessed a first for the University as 42 paricipants received diplomas from the new School of Business and Economics. Nicholas Anderson of Grand Rapids, Minn., was the first baccalaurette recipient for the School, which was formed by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents in 1996.

At UW-RF, he teaches such undergraduate courses as science techniques in elementary education, middle schools and secondary schools, as well as graduate courses in elementary school science. His specialization in environmental issues was reflected in his address.

"As you prepare o begin your professional careers you will be in the same situation" of choosing between technological solutions or independent thinking, Pepi said. "What you must come to terms with are the dark forces of technology that are pulling us apart."

Pepi explained that his concern was that the rapid advance of technology has led to technological thinking that affects how people perceive the world and how they relate to it. Individuals and relationships to others are becoming removed from the process. The result is a reduction of people and items as "nameless, faceless raw materials." There is too much emphasis on quick gratification of peoples' appetites driven by market considerations.

As a simple example of how quality can quickly go by the wayside, he contrasted the modern and old-fashioned ways of making popcorn. Today, he noted, it is quickly cooked in a mircowave. In the past it required a family decision that included choosing the right wood, selecting the kernels and sharing the family experience of cooking the food. "Only the best materials would do."

"Technological thinking is destroying our connection to the things that have made us what we are. We are hand-crafters. We must appreciate things as things, rather than as raw materials over which we exercise our power."

Pepi said he was neither advocating a return to old-fashioned ways nor rejecting the advance of technology. Rather, he urged the graduates to limit its influence in their own lives and to practice their professions as handicrafters.

An English professor who specializes in researching the history behind censored works and analyzing the implications to an informed society has been named the recipient of the intellectual freedom award of a Wisconsin librarian's association.

The intellectual freedom awards are given to individuals or groups who have met or resisted attempts at censorship and have otherwise furthered the cause of intellectual and academic freedom. Previous winners include public and school librarians, teachers, administrators, school board members, authors, parents, bookstore owners, community groups and students.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, in support of the nomination, noted: "I know of no one in Wisconsin who champions free thought more than Dr. Karolides....If we did not have dedicated professionals like Dr. Karolides to remind us continually that education includes many viewpoints we would have weakened libraries and a less-informed society."

Karolides was cited for his long-standing research and dedication to dissecting the implications of censorship. He is the author of three books exploring censorship, with the most recent published this year: "Banned Books: Literature Suppressed on Political Grounds."

According to Registrar Judy George, the course offerings are not only popular with UW-RF students, but also are appealing to students at other universities who will be spending their holiday break in western Wisconsin and the east metro area.

Registration is through Dec., 23, or by the first day of class. Mail registration must be completed by Dec. 14 to ensure processing. Enrolled UW-RF students may sign up through the Registrar's Office or via the Internet. Former students must apply for re-entry via the Registrar's Office, and new students should apply through the Admission's Office.

Courses include introduction to biotechnology, fraud examination, principles of managerial finance, the computer in business, culture and business, principles of microeconomics, senior capstone social science, elementary statistical concepts, general psychology, introduction to sociology, sociology of diversity, deviant behavior, business and professional communication, racquetball, weight training, badminton, karate, health & fitness for life, outdoor recreation for winter, wrestling coaching, basic life support and CPR, content area literacy in middle and secondary schools, and freshman honors seminar.

The impact of the Russian Occupation on Germany drawn from previously classified secret police files written after World War II is the topic of the most recent book written by UW-River Falls history Professor Ed Peterson.

"Russian Commands & German Resistance: the Soviet Occupation 1945-1949" draws on recently revealed Soviet documents that outlined the efforts and to subject Germany to totalitarianism after the end of the war and its failures that ultimately led to the collapse of East Germany.

The work shows what was attempted by the apparently totalitarian Soviet State in East Germany and what Stalin had achieved by 1949. Although the new Communist government had apparently been a totalitarian victory, there were many limitations on what had been achieved with Russian tanks and Soviet secret police.

The best source he has found has been the Secret Police (Stasi) files, which include what it did to try to prevent a revolution and how their reports on the discontent show that at least two years before the Fall, public discontent was a real threat to the regime.

Peterson says he finds these reports so fascinating that he continues to research them and will return next summer to Berlin and Magdeburg. Making the summers complete, he assists his wife Ursula in her family histories research, also primarily in east Germany. This usually means in villages, from which ancestors had left in the 19th century.

His second work, "Retreat to Victory," argued that the power of the American conqueror had also been limited, but that American occupation leaders had the good sense to let the defeated Germans pursue their own agenda, which resulted in a democratic and capitalist society, very supportive of the United States.

When that was finished in 1978, he applied to the East German government to study the Russian occupation. That request was denied, so he used memoirs and espionage gathered in the West to describe all parts of Germany in 1945, in "The Many Faces of Defeat." That third book described conditions also in the Russian and Polish areas.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss has been cited for excellence in teaching by the U.S. Department of Agriculture and the National Association of state Universities and Land-Grant Colleges.

Sciences, Ferriss focuses on helping students become competent professionals who will shape the future of the profession. In recognition of Ferriss' significant professional accomplishments and exceptional teaching abilities, she has been honored in the past by UW-RF as a recipient of the American Society for Horticultural Science's Outstanding Undergraduate Educator Award, the college's Outstanding Teacher Award, the Bronze Award from the Wisconsin Garden Club Federation, and she has been named the UW-RF Distinguished Teacher, the highest award presented by the University.

Ferriss' courses range from introductory horticulture to senior seminars, employing innovative teaching materials and methods. Ferriss also has established and advised student organizations, assisted students competing for regional and national horticulture scholarships, and coordinates students participating in horticultural internships.

During her 19 years at UW-RF, Ferriss has actively participated in course design, initiating five new horticulture classes, including one taught through distance-learning interactive television. She has incorporated technology into her classes including computerized greenhouse environmental control and landscaping systems, and computerized production and cost analysis systems.

The USDA teaching award was authorized by the U.S. Congress in 1977 and amended in 1990. The program generates nominations from a large spectrum of departments in agriculture, natural resources, veterinary science and human sciences.

Each year more than 50 faculty members are nominated and then evaluated on their abilities in the classroom, innovative teaching methodology, service to students and their profession, and scholarship.

According to Professor Kristin Tjornehoj, who will conduct the orchestra, the concert also will provide entertainment for families from three regional shelters. They will be sponsored through a $750 UW-RF service learning grant, according to Jill Javor, a sophomore from Apple Valley, Minn., who is coordinating their visit.

Soloists include music faculty members Kathryn Moen, who will perform organ works by French, German, and American composers, and Joy Scheib, a mezzo soprano who will sing while accompanied on the piano by Lillian Tan.

Two years ago Cordua began the sites indexing task in earnest to coincide with the Sesquicentennial, following formal research of nearly 150 sources that took 10 years to complete. Informally, Cordua had been gathering data since he arrived in Wisconsin 25 years ago. The last index of this kind was completed about 1900 and was much less formal.

The index in Rocks & Minerals is organized by location, and is particularly geared to amateur rock collecters. The index also may help aid teachers and researchers educationally and recreationally. He also notes that there has been a resurgence of rock collecting, and Cordua hopes the listing will help bring more tourists to Wisconsin.

Library at UW-River Falls Dec. 6-13. The exhibit features her works in clay through which she has created the tribal story teller and various pots simulating those of Native Americans. The exhibit will be held in a glass table case and may be viewed during regular library hours.

Susanne Finstad, an art major from Burnsville, Minn., will display a weaving in the table show case in the library from Nov. 30-Dec. 5. This piece was woven into narrow strips and then hand stitched to create one larger piece.

This annual art sale includes artwork of UW-RF art students, alumni, current and retired faculty, and local professionals. Proceeds are distributed in part to the Student Art Society and to the Art Scholarship Fund.

The sale features a unique assortment of items for collectors or for those seeking items for holiday gift-giving. These include glass, ceramics, jewelry, fibers, painting, printmaking, and photography, providing an opportunity for the public to purchase handmade artwork while supporting university students and programs.

"This award is a reflection of the educational and cooperative relationships between the University and the communities that comprise the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance. Many people share in this award."

Five student interns and a recent graduate played a crucial role in designing the underlying technology for the Chiefs site, enhancing its graphic look, and providing the daily content that drew fans throughout the camp.

During the 1998 camp, the site received 1.9 million hits on such pages as daily updates uploaded from the sidelines after each practice, team roster, practice schedule, training table menus, special events, feature stories, electronic guest book, and a Webcam that was used to upload more than 1,500 photos from the sidelines.

According to Kinders, the purpose was to create a compelling site by providing intensive information that far surpasses what any traditional media covering the camp could provide. This ability to look "inside" at information unavailable to mainstream media would provide a connection to motivate Chiefs and NFL fans to plan a trip to training camp.

Chiefs fans in visiting other events and attractions in the St. Croix Valley after attending team practices. Since then it has expanded dramatically to include a searchable database of amenities in the Valley to assist tourists to plan their visits year around, as well as a calendar of events, maps, and index of community attractions with links to tourism-related businesses that are on line.

He noted the site experienced over 160,000 hits leading up to the camp. It also was used as an electronic ordering site for the Alliance's promotional packet, with thousands of visitors responding to the Alliance's and UW-RF's advertising and publicity efforts in the Midwest to draw tourists.

Mann Valley Farm would be used as cropland to support UW-RF's planned $2.8 million Dairy Teaching Center north of the county highway. State funding approval is expected for the new center with adoption of the state budget in July.

Wisconsin System Board of Regents and the State Building Commission. "Those are the typical procedural steps to finalize transactions such as this," he said. Approval could occur as soon as February, he said.

"The School District has enjoyed a cooperative relationship with the University for many years," Smith said. "A land exchange is just one more example of the potential for the community when the two organizations work together."

Primary responsibility for the survival of the family falls on the shoulders of young Alexandra, who uses both new and traditional skills in her efforts to cultivate the land. How she succeeds in transforming the landscape and creating a fertile farm where there was once nothing but wild grasses is the subject of this play.

The play is very true to Cather's novel, describing the immigrant's experiences of romantic love, tragic death, and transcendent forgiveness. Above all, this play glorifies the land while reminding us of the smallness of our personal sorrows and our continued dependence on the natural world.

Professor Margaret Swanson, who directs the play, says she was drawn to it because it speaks to the tenacity of the human spirit. "It is hard for us to imagine," she says, "the terror that the vast unsettled prairie must have evoked in those early settlers. Certainly there was nothing like it in the European countries they had left behind. It must have been all they could do not to turn tail and run in the face of such an awesome place."

Music director Grace Cajiuat is intimately familiar with the American prairie, having gone to college in South Dakota. The inspirational music that is incorporated in this production fully evokes the power of the landscape.

Ken Stofferahn, who designs the sets, also grew up in South Dakota and brings his own experience of the prairie to his work on this production. His simple set will catch the stark beauty of the desolate countryside.

Minnesota's 19th Century settlers. The play represents the cultural diversity among this assortment of Europeans. "This production reminds us," Swanson says, "that America is-and has always been-a nation of immigrants."

More than 86 UW-River Falls education students are practicing their teaching skills this fall in 37 cooperating Wisconsin and Minnesota school districts and preschools as student teachers and interns.

Student teachers receive University credit for their work, which continues for one academic semester. Interns receive both credit and salary, are on contract with cooperating schools and assume greater responsibilities than student teachers.

Olson, long time professional artist and designer, recent MFA recipient and current member of the art faculty at St. Catherine's College in St. Paul, exhibits Matrix, her response as a contemporary woman at mid-life to the inner call of creativity. The work honors the past, engages the present and looks to the future.

McWatters Padgett, who makes her art with both words and images devotes full time to paying attention to life as she lives it and documenting through words and pictures the experience she treasures. She works with her husband, artist Michael Padgett, on shared projects involving travel, art, history and education.

Kimberly Young of Milwaukee has created an arrangement of rocks collected from the shores of Lake Michigan that will be on display in the Chalmer Davee Library from Oct. 26-Nov. 1. The arrangement may be viewed anytime during regular library hours on the first floor near the government documents section.

A member of the physics department faculty, Prochnow presently serves as interim director of the School of Business & Economics, a position that he assumed after retiring last spring as the dean of the College of Arts & Sciences. He joined the University in 1964 and holds a doctorate in nuclear physics from Duke University.

Alumni supporting Prochnow's nomination wrote: "Awesome project learning-type teacher. Good role model and great person who actually is involved in the community and outside the classroom." Another contributed, "He is an excellent role model and teacher. He has high expectations and is willing to help students meet those expectations. He answers questions and welcomes students in his office. And his eyes light up when he is teaching because he likes the subject and is enthusiastic about sharing his knowledge."

Science Foundation Young Scholars Programs, and he represents the University to Women in Engineering Program Advocates Network, an association dedicated to increasing the number of women who enter engineering.

Those who nominated Blodgett noted, "Dr. Blodgett served as my adviser over several long and difficult years in my undergraduate career, and was extremely supportive of my non-traditional student status. As an instructor, he excelled in explaining the unexplainable, and simply made learning a fun experience."

At UW-RF, she coordinates the Learning Disabilities teacher certification program and supervises graduate practicums. She teaches courses in exceptional children, the gifted child, introduction to learning disabilities and mental retardation.

Another noted, "Dr. Rebhuhn has experienced in her career and research a vast array of exceptional experiences that when presented in class engage student interest and inspire dedication to make a difference in the special education population, as she has! She has motivated me to pursue my master's in special education."

McNamara has been a member of the University faculty since 1970 with an assignment split between the English and journalism department. He teaches freshman English, children's literature, literary genres and freshman English composition. He has taught introduction to mass communication in the journalism department since 1976.

In addition to his teaching assignments, McNamara was a columnist and sports writer for the Red Wing Republican Eagle for more than 20 years. Related to that at UW-RF, he is a member of the Faculty Senate athletic committee that oversees athletic issues and gender equity compliance.

An alumni who supported McNamara noted, "I had Professor McNamara my freshman year for English. He takes a bit of getting used to, but he's a great professor and really changed and challenged my outlook in college!"

The exhibit features her handwoven rugs and handmade garments constructed of fabric she printed or painted herself. The exhibit may be viewed at the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building in the display cases next to Gallery 101 during regular building hours.

The senior's exhibit is titled "A Collection in Printmaking" and may be viewed in the library during regular building hours in the wall case adjacent to the Harriet Berry Gallery. It includes the various tools and materials to create each piece.

One faculty member noted, "I was struck by her competence and professionalism, and my respect for her has only grown over the years." Another nominator said, "Her ability to troubleshoot complex problems is impressive, to say the least."

As network specialist, Nelson contributed her talents to develop many components of the University's cyberspace presence. She helped develop and implement campus web pages and policies; she supervised implementation of major web site features such as the undergraduate course catalog and calendar of events; she installed and supported databases, scripting languages, development tools and discussion boards used by web page authors and course instructors; and she supervised student programmers in their development of web pages and applications.

Nelson shared in national recognition through a Silver Medal presented by the Council for the Advancement and Support of Education for her computer support to the bi-state St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance.

Administration. In network management, she was a key contributor in the design of the campus network topology; she installed, configured, and managed network routers, switches and hubs; she came up with a system that monitored, detected, and reported problems; she designed, implemented and maintained network security; and she supervised student technicians that assisted in network management.

In Unix Systems Management, she installed and managed many servers that provided services to the campus; she wrote scripts, programs, and web pages to implement automatic account activation and maintenance for students and staff; and she developed procedures, programs, and scripts necessary to manage multiple servers.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering professional development credit outreach seminars for teachers this year in subject areas such as building balanced reading programs, setting up discipline techniques, giving attention to deficit disorders, using the Internet, mathematical problem solving, and teaching in the energized classroom.

"Cruising the Information Superhighway" is a two-credit hands-on seminar that will help participants develop skills needed for the use of the Internet and will give them an awareness of how telecommunications can be used as an instructional tool. This includes instruction in the areas of E-mail, news groups, and the World Wide Web. Marla Hall will be the instructor.

Groups! High Performance Learning," is one of the seminars that teaches the most advanced, most successful student grouping strategies. Participants will learn the skills to create highly functioning student learning groups in a classroom charged with enthusiasm, high motivation, and quality end products. "Issues: Creating Student Self-Esteem" is the second seminar that will teach strategies to raise self-esteem, including recognizing destructive behavior and the causes of low self-esteem. Both will be instructed by Dr.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau attributed the increase to numerous influences, but most notably to the reputation of the strength of academic programs and the expertise of the faculty who deliver them, in addition to the University's and community's inviting atmosphere.

"The River Falls area has some very positive aspects. We are in an ideal location. We have a beautiful campus in a beautiful town, and this is a very supportive community for our students. Families pick up on that right away when they visit."

Cities metropolitan area of Minneapolis-St. Paul. Its dynamic growth, coupled with an increase in Echo Boomers entering college-the children of the Baby Boomers who swelled campuses in the 1960s-also are contributing substantially.

This year's freshman class is one of the largest and brightest in the institution's history. Its 1,210 members have an average ACT test score that is higher than the state and national averages, averaging 22.68, and nearly 90 percent graduated in the top half of their high school classes.

"It's increasingly important for students and their parents to feel that they are at a University with an excellent academic reputation in a world-class higher education system. They want to be among the best of the best,"

"I regularly hear from high school counselors and others about the loyalty of our alumni in recommending the University. They tell me they routinely are meeting successful people who went here, and that we have very loyal alums who talk us up."

In the announcement, Emmett was cited for her teaching excellence and contributions to her department and college. These include her significant publication and presentations regionally and nationally; ongoing work with St. Croix Valley schools; service on numerous University committees; grant writing activities; and high student formal evaluations and extensive personal notes of appreciation from students.

Emmett joined UW-RF in 1991 teaching courses in career development, school counseling, cross cultural counseling, counseling skills for teachers and school-to-work programs. She also supervises counseling practices and internships.

She brought nearly 20 years of experience as a school teacher, with experience as a science teacher and as a project coordinator for career development and internships for gifted students in the Rockford Public Schools.

Her extensive publications have included articles in scholarly journals on such diverse topics as career decision-making factors in gifted young adults, open meetings in elementary schools for promoting peaceful schools, the concerns of Wisconsin school counselors, and the teaching of career counseling to counselors. Emmett also has presented widely on counseling to numerous school districts in Wisconsin and Minnesota, as ell as Pennsylvania, Illinois, Oregon and Missouri.

The St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance will be celebrating the 5th anniversary of the Alliance with a cruise on the Scenic St. Croix River on Wednesday, Aug. 12. Nineteen cities formed the Alliance five years ago to promote the St. Croix River Valley as a destination for visitors.

The Steamboat Inn in Prescott will host a post cruise party, featuring entertainment, food, and special price on beverages. Buses will be available to return guests to Afton, or participants may make the return trip by boat.

LeBreck's career highlights have all involved educating and program development including courses within and outside of the department (Interdisciplinary Aesthetic Education Program), projects within the school district (Project FIESTA: Gifted in the Arts), and summer programs for gifted young people (College for Kids).

LeBreck developed the first College for Kids program in 1982 and directed that program for eight years. From 1985-89, she worked collaboratively to establish the River Falls Area Network for Gifted and Talented Education, which sponsors workshops and training. She has received numerous recognitions for her work with gifted and talented education.

Among the most noticeable changes Michaelson has experienced includes the positive improvement of a dramatic increase in the many students who travel abroad for an international experience. Less positively, he indicated is her feeling that there has been a de-valuation of faculty in favor of money as a bottom line in education.

Choir and Chamber Singers, with more than 2,000 University students from all disciplines participating over the years. He led the choir on numerous international tours, including seven to European, three to Canada and four to the Far East. Wold also initiated the UW-RF Alumni Choir, which he took on three European tours.

As a voice teacher and choral director he has guest conducted or lectured to thousands of high school during visits or at festivals across Wisconsin, Minnesota, Montana and Iowa. He also developed the annual Medieval Banquets held for more than 25 years each December.

"I've had a deep love for this school. I hope I've shown a commitment for it. I think the most important thing is the relationships between students and teachers. My feeling is to try to give as much as you can and just do your work and do it as well as you can. We really have good students here.

For the seventh year in a row, the faculty and students of the UW-River Falls art department will be creating outdoor works of art that are designed to highlight a specific site on the campus grounds.

Visitors might discover a colorful quilt made entirely of dried flowers and leaves, or a larger than life dancing pine needle figures. In past years guest artists and art department alumni have also joined the festivities by creating outdoor installations.

British artist Andy Goldsworthy's sculptures use only natural materials such as rocks and leaves which immediately after fabrication begin to react to the chance conditions of weather and season and are left to naturally disintegrate.

The Sesquicentennial celebration is set for the weekend of Sept. 26-27, with many locally planned events. The activities will be boosted by a number of Wisconsin Sesquicentennial events that were commissioned to help the Badger State celebrate its 150th birthday.

The River Falls performance launches the Chautauqua's statewide tour of the new 2+hour show. It will tell Wisconsin's historical story in musical form with original songs and stories and through more than 1,000 slides gathered from public and private collections. There will be a special segment on the founding of River Falls.

Public Library. Geology Hall of Fame member Bill Cordua looks into the past and future of Wisconsin's geological heritage through lecture, slides and displays. Learn more about our state's commercial and scientific geological sites as well as great locations for collecting samples.

Public Library. Local historian Ursula Peterson presents this slide show documenting the history of River Falls. Through selected images and narration, an illustrated 150 years of city history will emerge.

UW-River Falls. An original, two-act play and photo exhibit telling stories of pioneering Midwest farm women. Through letters and diaries, these women share their emigrant adventure, childhood, school days, daily work, summer festivals, religion and home life. Tickets are $5 for adults; $3 for students/seniors.

Curator and UW-RF painting instructor Julie Baugnet coordinated the show which includes photography and paintings. Baugnet says, "This show is an excellent example of the diverse interests that individual artists have in documenting the land.

The story of the Hatfield-McCoy feud is recounted and the story of Mrs. O'Leary's cow and the Chicago Fire. The work also includes the tales of the origin of bourbon whisky and how Gen. Omar Bradley used it as a secret weapon when the Russian and American armies met toward the close of World War II.

The chancellor made his remarks in the opening address to some 400 faculty and staff that marks the start of the academic year. Classes begin next Wednesday, Sept. 2, for an estimated student body of 5,426 students. That will include one of the largest and best prepared incoming classes in recent years, with an estimated 1,200 first-year students.

He noted that higher education will have to continue to intensively compete with other state initiatives, including property tax relief, K-12 funding, corrections and welfare reform. He said it will be up to the academy to educate legislators and the executive branch to re-emphasize public higher education and to recognize the urgency of providing funding in face of the extraordinary changes in education because of expansive use of technology and the explosion of information in a global society.

The chancellor outlined the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents budget request that was forwarded last week to Gov. Tommy Thompson that calls for a 3.4 percent increase in state taxpayer dollars, for a total of $43.4 million. It also has set tuition at 4 percent per year.

Despite these challenges, UW-RF remains strong, Thibodeau said. He noted that the University through its strategic planning process reallocated $1.2 million last year to departmental budgets. The plan has targeted shifting 12 percent of tax dollars from salaries into academic and department support by next year. Thibodeau said the University is closing in on that target with 10.3 percent in base reallocations.

He also recited a host of capital improvement projects that are either underway or planned over the next several years. The 11 projects total more than $30 million in new buildings, remodelings and classroom improvements.

"We're really honored to be recognized in this manner by the Rural Partners," said Alliance President Mary Claire Olson, who is the president of the Hudson Area Chamber of Commerce and Visitors Bureau.

"The Alliance is proud of its accomplishments and as a result of them sees a really bright future for tourism as an economic development engine for the St. Croix Valley. It's great to have such an important organization single us out for recognition and to hold us up as a model to other tourism collaboratives."

Judging criteria included demonstrating the spirit of partnership or collaboration in making it a success, how widespread and long-term the positive impact is for the communities, and how the Alliance would serve as a model for other communities.

Kinders noted that since inception, the Alliance communities have worked collaboratively with the Wisconsin Department of Tourism, the Minnesota Office of Tourism, and UW-River Falls with extraordinary success.

Boat Cruise to provide visibility to tourism; launched an award-winning Web site; held educational workshops in marketing and in Web site development; conducted a Media Familiarization Tour; and represented tourism interests to the National Park Service Lower St. Croix National Scenic Riverway Planning Task Force.

Students may attend the Thursday evening lectures at the UW-River Falls campus or at Chippewa Valley Technical College in Eau Claire. Field experiences will be held in River Falls on Monday evenings and Saturdays.

The course includes lectures and field study of the characteristics that make hydric soils and wetlands unique environments. Formation and interaction between hydric soils, wetland vegetation, and hydrology creating specific wetland types will be studied. Functions and values of wetlands to society and the regulatory aspects of wetland use and protection will be considered.

Hazardous Waste Operations and Emergency Response will be offered for two graduate or undergraduate credits, or can be taken as a noncredit, certification course. The course meets Hazardous Operations Certification.

Each program will last through four sessions, with meeting times of 9:30-11:30 a.m. in Room 137-138 of Rodli Commons. Classes are open to those 55 years of age or older. Each class period consists of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion period. Parking is generally available in the Rodli lot by permit issues on the first day of class.

He was the only non-Minnesotan to receive a fellowship this year. He also had the distinction of being selected as one of two clay media artists to receive an award for the first time in the history of the fellowship.

The Bush Arts Fellowships were initiated in 1976 to provide artists with significant financial support to enable them to advance their work and further their contribution to their communities. Awards are made in seven categories every other year from applicants from the Dakotas, Minnesota and western Wisconsin. The program is funded through the Bush Foundation, which was created in 1953 by Archibald Granville Bush, the sales and general manager of the 3M Company, and his wife Edyth.

A resident of Martell Township east of River Falls since 1973, Johnston also maintains his art studio there. At UW-RF he teaches studio courses in clay as well as general art education. An acknowledged master potter, he has exhibited throughout the United States, Japan, Norway and Chile. His works are included in private and corporate collections in America, Japan and Norway.

Johnston holds a bachelor of fine arts from the University of Minnesota and a master of fine arts from Southern Illinois. He also studied extensively under the Japanese master Shimakoa Tatsuzo, and has been named a visual arts senior fellow by the National Endowment for the Arts.

Johnston will begin his fellowship in December and will use part of the grant money to reimburse the University to hire a replacement for some of his courses as he pursues two artistic ventures over the following year.

The second portion will take him to the Mediterranean island of Crete and the Cycladic Islands to study the Minoan culture of Cnossus and its influence on the development of art in Ancient Greece, as well as its historical linkages to the development of art in Greek colonies in Italy before the rise of the Roman Empire.

Minoans were established artisans and enjoyed an advanced lifestyle more than 2,000 years before Christ. They were noted for their exceptional pottery, and for a culture whose religious beliefs and superstitions permeated every aspect of their daily lives.

Historians such as Will Durant have noted that the Minoans were deeply and thoroughly religious, worshipping mountains, caves, stones, trees and pillars, the sun and the moon, animals and even the number 3.

At first view, Elliott Wold is the epitome of a tweedy collegiate choral director: silver hair brushed back in the style of a concert maestro; an ever-present tuxedo during performances that is replaced by a camel colored cordury suit coat off-stage; the pungent aroma of vanilla-scented Smokers Pride pipe tobacco.

But a booming voice often punctuated with humor, sparkling eyes surrounded by wrinkles etched from decades of smiles and laughter, and a gentle manner create an aura of genuine warmth that have made him admired by the tens of thousands who have heard his students in concert.

It has made him one of UW-River Falls' most beloved professsors to thousands of alumni who have performed during his stewardship directing the Concert Choir and Chamber Singers, earning that group critical acclaim through dozens of international and regional tours. So great is the tie that many of those former students over the years have returned as members of Wold's Alumni Choir.

Their most recent performance came on May 16 when several hundred alumns returned to their alma mater to honor Wold in a retirement gala. They joined with the Chamber Singers and Concert Choir, along with family, friends and the public at large, to fill the stage and the seats of the Abbott Concert Hall to thank Wold for his gift of 35 years of music.

It was the conclusion to a career that brought Wold to the music department in 1963 after earning his bachelor's degree from Concordia College and his master's degree from UW-Madison. He did additional post-graduate work at Northwestern University.

Wold's accomplishments during that time are legendary: seven tours to Europe, three to Canada and four to the Far East; three European tours by the Alumni Choir. An educator as well as a conductor, Wold says he thinks those tours were crucial to his students learning that people are the same throughout the world. Those experiences also pushed them to take risks and "be brave."

As a voice teacher and choral director he guest conducted or lectured to thousands of high school choirs during visits or at festivals across Wisconsin, Minnesota, Montana and Iowa. He also developed the annual Medieval Banquets held for more than 25 years each December. His singers also participated in the premieres of 16 works of the UW-RF Commissioned Composers Series.

"I grew up in a family that had a fascination and a deep committment to music," he recalls. His uncles farmed and then on Sundays performed in church as singers of conductors. His mother played the piano, and "a lot of our social life was singing and playing instruments."

In high school he was encouraged by two teachers, who, when he graduated, had so inspired four of his fellow classmates that they too eventually become college choir conductors. Most importantly, he also participated in operetta where he played the role of a prince and the young woman who played opposite of him as a princess later became his wife, Jeanne.

Wold continued his musical pursuits, becoming the first freshman to sing with the Concordia College choir. He played in a jazz band during his Army years, and in graduate school at Northwestern he earned extra money by performing at church services ranging from Episcopalian to Jewis synagogues, and even performing in Yiddish operas.

What they remember most vividly about Wold is that all of the Chamber Singers and Concert Choir's accomplishments were by some 72 members of whom only a quarter were music students. For some that would have been a challenge.

For Wold it was expected in a student body with a diversity of majors. Over his career it became his hallmark to teach others to sing through training, encouragement and humor. His former students note that hwile some concert directors used intimidation to motivate singers, that was never part of Wold's style.

"Some of the best singers aren't in music," Wold explains. "They just don't know how to do it when they begin. I am a strong believer that people need to be pushed and complimented. They have to learn to make their voice an extension of their brain. I don't give up until I get it.

Wold is quick to note that his students' success came through their hard work, at least six hours each week for an entire school year rehearsing Wold's favorites-a capela pieces-as well as an eclectic mix of spirituals, blues, jazz and other genres. "If you are going to be good then you have to give to it," he says.

Their efforts created a "big" sound that was appreciated by audiences and orchestras. That sound was especially sought out by the Minnesota Orchestra which regularly asked the Choir to perform, because as conductor Henry Trowell explained, "they can carry over our orchestra."

Wold says that his greatest accomplishment was "taking the most students and trying to make them take a piece of good, strong, artful music and bring it to an audience in a way the audience can understand. If you are dealing with truly great music and you get inside and learn every aspect of it, I believe they take on some of that greatness themselves. They take it inside of themselves. They may not see that right away, but eventually they do."

One was a performance for Alberto Genaspira, one of South America's most famous composers. As the composer listened, Wold led the choir through a rehearsal of Genaspira's demanding "Lamentations of Jeremiah." The work ran the range of emotions of his interpretation of the dictatorship of Juan Peron on Argentina's people.

Another deeply-etched memory came during a European tour in the Mozarteum in Salzburg, Austria, before concert-goers trained to listen to music with a critical ear. As the 80 students performed, they became one with the music and earned the accolades of the audience and took so many curtain calls that they ran out of music to perform.

"When you take a piece of music and it comes forth, it gets to you a little bit. It gets inside of you. When 60 or 70 people get music to speak in the manner you intended-it gives you that lift that you needed to experience.

Through the years, Wold has built a remarkable legacy of students who have gone on to musical success with such renowned organizations as the New York Metropolitan Opera, the Wurzburg Opera in Germany, the Chicago Lyric Opera, the Minnesota Opera and the Minnesota Chorale and many othe professional companies. Just as importantly, hundreds more have kept music an integral part of their lives through church choirs or community organizations.

"We're really pleased to receive state support for our birthday celebration," said Janet Olson Halaas, Main Street Project coordinator and Sesqui committee chair. "This will help to ensure that as the residents of River Falls celebrate our city's birthday that we will benefit from a significant economic impact by drawing visitors to our events."

He noted that another benefit to River Falls is the grant guidelines allow renewal for three years. That will allow the Main Street Project to work with groups that are participating in the Sesqui celebration to obtain marketing and advertising grant dollars to build a solid customer base for future years.

Kinders credited the strong mix of River Falls and Wisconsin Sesquicentennial events scheduled for the weekend in convincing the Tourism Department to fund the initiative. "We received a lot of help from outgoing grants administrator Sharon Berge and northern Wisconsin department representative Ruth Goetz for helping to shape the grant application. They were important to our success, both for the Sesqui weekend and into the future."

For the last five years, The American Council on Education National Network for Women Leaders in Higher Education has honored individuals who have contributed significantly to the advancement of women and women's issues in higher education.

This year ACE created a new category of awards to recognize outstanding Women's Studies Programs.  The awards were presented at the 80th annual ACE meeting recently in San Francisco, where consortium director Jacqueline Ross accepted the award on behalf of the Women's Studies Consortium.

The consortium, which was founded in 1989, is comprised of the women's studies programs based on the 14 UW System campuses and UW-Extension.  The mission is to ensure the continued development of women's studies, to maintain the state's current national prominence in the field, and to create a unique inter-institutional model for educational innovation.  The Consortium offers over 300 courses to over 8,000 students each year and has recently established a women's studies major.

In addition to the courses and women's studies minor, the Consortium is also involved in a variety of different programs which help ensure the continued development of Women's Studies in the UW System.  The UW-River Falls campus his highly involved in two of the projects, the Women and Poverty Public Education Initiative and the Women and Science Program.

Social work department Professor Ruth Kalms and UW-River Falls graduate Victoria Hanson, are working as representatives for the Women and Poverty Program.  They are currently collecting information regarding the effects of W2 (Wisconsin Works) on western Wisconsin.  Kalms and Hanson are also looking at how the welfare reforms are effecting women and children in western Wisconsin as well as providing support to women in poverty in the River Falls area.

The Women and Science Program is designed to attract and retain qualified women and minority students in science, mathematics and engineering. The UW-River Falls Women's Studies Program brings in distinguished professors, such as Cheryl Ney and Sherri Nichols, to work with faculty in developing techniques to keep women in math and science.  Also, biology department Professor Kim Mogan and chemistry department Professor Barb Nielson work with faculty to continually develop techniques to retain women in the math and science studies.

Karolides' book is one in a set of four volumes written by separate authors, published by New York-based Facts On File, and scheduled to reach bookstores this June. The others in the series focus on books censored for erotic, religious or social reasons.

"Some of the censorship history stories were as compelling and gripping as the censored books themselves," she says. "Although many people may have read the books in discussion, many probably don't know the criticism the pieces have faced, or the obscure details concerning their history."

"It is interesting to see that censorship goes well beyond the schools and that opposition comes from all sorts of facets. Through Karolides' book we were able to approach this issue in an entertaining and informative manner," says Granston.

Karolides says he is opposed to censorship as a citizen and as a teacher because it "blocks learning and denies thought; as such it is a significant threat to the American ideal of democracy. The democratic process depends on an enlightened citizenry-engaged and thinking individuals. Absolutely indispensable to these is the right of fundamental inquiry--the right to read."

The writing process for the book began with Karolides studying approximately 140 books that have been censored in the United States and the world for political reasons. He then narrowed the selection down to 105 that he felt were most important. The final product contains a variety of pieces, from fiction, nonfiction, and autobiographies, to history books, political analyses and adolescent novels.

The works discussed in the George magazine article were selected based on the criteria that they are among the most censored books, or they have a significantly egregious case history, Karolides said. All have been censored in the United States.

RIVER FALLS-An independent Citizens Panel on Wisconsin Campaign Reform is recommending substantial changes in funding state-wide political campaigns that calls for mixed public and private funding supported by an income tax check-off.

Students in a political participation course taught by UW-River Falls political science Professor Dave Schultz selected the panelists and monitored the week-long presentations and discussions for bias.

Citizen panelists spokespersons strongly urged legislators to take the Citizen Panel's recommendations into account. The Panel's findings were presented to Gov. Thompson during his visit to UW-River Falls on April 27 for a bill signing ceremony, as well as to local legislators.

Konder said it was clear during the presentations that special interests have the greatest influence and ordinary voters have the least when it comes to Wisconsin state elections and legislative activities.

She said there clearly is a role for special interest groups, but the panel offered a series of voters education and campaign issues monitoring recommendations that will increase electorate interest and impact on elections.

Panelist spokesperson Eric Groop, a kitchen manager from Ellsworth, said that the Citizens Panel exercise demonstrates that common ground can be found despite the extreme differences in election reform proposals.

Paul Schaefer, project director for the Citizens Panel, said that was apparent as each of the major election reform presenters took advantage of their presentations and moved toward common ground on many issues.

As a freelance writer, Sturm has scored numerous musical productions for commercial and industrial film, television and radio. In 1994, he was awarded a composition grant from the National Endowment for the Arts. Over nearly two decades of teaching, Sturm's ensembles and students have won numerous "downbeat" and International Association of Jazz Educators Awards for outstanding performances, compositions, arrangements and recordings.

Sturm has commissioned many compositions and arrangements by major jazz composers and has fostered the performances of over 200 new student works. The composer frequently serves as visiting artist, clinician and guest ensemble director at high schools and universities and has appeared as composer in-residence for the NEA "Meet the Composer" program.

"Dr. Pepi teaches that you don't have to travel to exotic places to appreciate the environment: an appreciation for the environment and an understanding of nature and science starts in our own backyards."

Her presentation marks the third time that a graduating senior has been asked to present the address in the modern history of the University. Burlingame's selection was through a speaking competition open to all commencing seniors.

Her speech, "We Believe" will focus on the need to strike a balance between the incredible potential of technology against the values that require a responsible use of this resource for the benefit of all.

A native of California, Burlingame began her career at UW-River Falls after transferring from Century College in Minnesota in 1995. "I absolutely love River Falls," she says. "I love the small campus atmosphere with teachers who are personable and reachable."

"The trophy isn't important. It's the learning and teaching that matters," says team advisor and plant and earth science Professor Larry Meyers. "The trophy means they learned more than everybody else."

At the competition students used a scorecard to evaluate four sites, five feet deep. They were allowed 50 minutes per site. Students identified soil layers, determined existing amounts of sand and clay in the soil, expressed the color, and then interpreted how these properties would affect land use.

"It's like signing up to take four one-hour exams in a row on a Saturday morning," says Meyers. "In the classroom, I'm very demanding-you can't make mistakes when evaluating soils. The more students know (going to the competition), the more fun it is."

Team member Tony Roder would agree, believing the win is a reflection of the education the team has received at UW-RF. Roder also says the competition provides students with the opportunity to meet those they may be working with in the field one day.

Department Chair and Athletics Director Connie Foster said the decision to add the sport was an exciting one and she credits the enthusiasm of Thibodeau and College of Education & Graduate Studies Dean Kathleen Daly.

"There's been a groundswell of support for adding the sport from our students, faculty and staff. It's a welcomed addition to our athletic program. There's a lot of interest in the sport and it will be a popular and well-received addition."

Daly added, "Women's ice hockey is a wonderful addition to the sports we already support. It's a very dynamic sport and great for UW-RF. With several other colleges in the area raising the sport from club to varsity status, it would have been terrible if we would have been left out. We have several students in school who have played the sport and I am grateful to all students who have given their support to adding the program."

The new team will field 25 players supported over the next five years by increasing support in student fees. Foster noted that UW-RF has been receiving queries nationwide for years from prospective players who are seeking an opportunity to play at the collegiate varsity level.

Foster said she expects the new coach to quickly become involved in recruiting, team start-up issues, and scheduling varsity matches against Minnesota Intercollegiate Athletic Conference and Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference opponents. UW-RF is the second WIAC institution to add the varsity sport, following on the heels of UW-Superior.

According to Foster, the sport of women's ice hockey is too new yet to provide conference and national championship playoffs opportunities, but that she expects those to develop over the next few years.

Also to be considered next year, she said, are additional assistance from the UW-RF Student Senate funding to assist in contributions to the team's start-up costs. The Senate, through its statutory bonding authority, also will consider funding to upgrade rink facilities at the UW-RF Hunt Ice Arena and to add locker, storage and office space for the women's program.

According to Wood, "We felt pleased the Committee choose Amy because she exemplifies what a teacher should be. It seems that no one who meets or works with Amy fails to recognize her exceptional gifts as a motivating human being."

River Falls, where she made an exceptional impact on many of the staff and students. According to the letter submitted by the English Education Committee, the River Falls High School faculty said that Stenson was the most prepared student teacher that the high school has had in the past decade. She was always willing to help in any way that she could, and always projected her positive attitude toward staff and students. Even in difficult situations, Stenson was credited with being able to see the positive side of a situation and work through it no matter how difficult it appeared.

The nomination letter noted, "These observations and testimonials point to the conclusion that Amy Stenson has been a model student teacher: one who has gotten her students deeply engaged in Language Arts study; one who has made her students-in all their individuality-learn and succeed; one who has not only fulfilled her responsibilities, but gone far "above and beyond"; one who has served as a personal and professional role model in knowing and loving her field, being eager to learn and give of herself, and displaying a 'never say quit' attitude."

Conference Softball Scholar Athlete Award during the spring of 1996. Because of her love for athletics, service to the university and to the community, and her dedication to academics, Stenson was awarded the UW-River Falls Chancellor's Award at her graduation, the highest award for service to the University.

Eight students at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls have been chosen to receive the Chancellor's Award, the University's highest non-academic honor. The award is given to a group of students who demonstrate outstanding leadership and service to the University.

Herod was honored for his impact in student organizations while gaining valuable applied work experience. His involvement in campus activities include Student Alumni Association, Habitat for Humanity, Johnson Hall Community Counsel, R.O.A.D. Crew, Gay/Straight Alliance, and campus tour guide. He has recently held leadership positions including Student Alumni Association president and Gay/Straight Alliance vice president.

Company in St. Paul where he worked on planning an international trade show with the Disney Company. He currently works at Saturn of St. Paul as the finance assistant, and aspires to work as a marketer in the Kris automotive industry.

Koch was cited for her involvement in student activity and leadership positions, including president of the Student Senate. She competed in varsity gymnastics, was a resident assistant and the senior resident assistant for Hathorn Hall.

Koch served as the Leadership Development and Programming Board Chair and was appointed to serve on the Long Range Planning Committee for Student Life Facilities. Koch was elected by the Student Association to serve as their student president during which she served on various committees and was the official representative for the Student Association.

She served on Student Senate for three years and for two years was vice president. Through her Senate work, she chaired several committees including the Shared Governance Implementation Committee that implemented major changes to student participation in the shared governance structure on campus. She also chaired the Student Shared Governance Committee and was in charge of recruiting and appointing students on the different committees throughout the community. She was named the "Student Senator of the Year."

Kubes has been a campus tour guide for two years and was appointed to be a R.O.A.D. Crew leader. Recently, she was selected to represent UW-RF at the 9th annual National Service Learning Conference in the Twin Cities. She is also involved in the community through many organizations including the American Red Cross. She plans to pursue a career in social work and continue her education.

Mbiti was cited for his activities in many areas of student life. In the past he served as Crabtree Hall Council Treasurer and on various Reach for the Future subcommittees. He is president of the African-American Alliance and is a resident assistant in May Hall. He works with the Multicultural Committee of the United Council of Univerisyt of Wisconsin System Students, which coordinates events such as the Day of Action Against Hate Crimes. He also works with the Campus Diversity awareness committee which is responsible for UW-RF's annual multicultural diversity festival, Unity in the Community.

Leadership Conference where he was awarded first place in the research paper category for his work titled "The Evolution of the Mask." He works as a math and economics tutor and hopes to attend graduate school.

McLean was recognized for her numerous leadership positions in a diverse range of activities. She has chaired the Women's Equality Group for the past two years, bringing "Take Back the Night" to a successful yearly event. She has served as president of the Falcon Cheerleading Team, Student Senate Director of Affairs and Academic Services, and Secretary for the Diversity Awareness Committee.

McLean held an internship in Bismarck, N.D., in a unit dealing with crisis intervention, domestic violence, and sexual assault. After graduation in December, McLean plans to pursue a career in higher education.

Schuetzle was recognized for her unselfish attempts to make a difference on the UW-RF campus. She serves as the chair of the Student Academic Success Center Advisory Board and works in conjunction with the Student Senate to improve the services offered by the Academic Success Center. Schuetzle is a student representative working on the Learn and Serve America Implementation Team to establish an office and academic component of Service Learning on this campus. She has worked to revive and establish both the BACCHUS/GAMMA and Tomorrow's Educator's organizations and now holds the position of vice president in both groups.

Thompson was cited as a valuable member of the campus community for his efforts in the English department, on Student Senate and as a tutor. He founded Sigma Tau Delta, the International English Honor Society, and has been its chapter president for the past two years. For three years, he has been on the editorial staff of the campus literary magazine, Prologue, and has worked on the Student Reading Series since it began two years ago.

As a member of the Diversity Awareness Committee for over a year, Thompson played a key role in implementing the yearly campus diversity festival, "Unity in the Community." He has been a member of the University's Student Senate for a year and a half, during which he has worked primarily to meet the needs of students of color, women, gay and lesbian students and other traditionally under represented groups. He recently won the United Council Multicultural Issues "Director of the Year" award for these efforts.

For the third consecutive year, the UW-River Falls floral crop evaluation team has defended its title as best in the nation after recently winning the 57th annual National Intercollegiate Floral Crop Quality Evaluation and Design Competition at South Dakota State University in Brookings.

"The win is a reflection of the quality of the program; it's not about just training for the contest," says horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss, who has coached the team since 1979. "It's what students have learned and the training that's important," said Ferriss, a Hastings, Minn., resident.

The competition was comprised of a cut flower division and a potted plant division, which included flowering and foliage plants. Each team member competed with 30 other individuals in judging cut flowers and designing an arrangement.

In the overall individual placings, Christ won first place, Beckman third, and Sell tenth. In the cut flower division, Christ took first place and Beckman second. Christ explains that judging cut flowers involves looking for insect and disease damage, improper flower form, and other problems. She said that at the event students didn't have to explain their placings, but usually do at their practices with Ferriss. Along with her first place win, Christ tied for second place in the design class, which consists of making a corsage and a centerpiece.

Once students have competed in the annual competition, they cannot compete again, so a different group of students attends every year. Ferriss believes that this provides a valuable resource to the team.

"One of the keys to why we have been successful is that some of our previous students (who have competed) come back and help train the next team. These assistant coaches add an extra level of training and resources."

More importantly, they are able to network with those who will be the future leaders in the horticulture field. "Meeting and connecting with others is an extremely important part of the process," says Ferriss.

Students evaluated the quality characteristics of over 50 types of cut flowers, flowering potted plants, and foliage plants during the competition. The cut flowers, including roses, carnations, exotics such as heliconia and ginger, and specialty cuts such as Tweedia and Watsonia, were obtained from numerous sources throughout the world.

An interesting component of the competition, says Ferriss, was that the SDSU faculty member in charge of coordinating the competition graduated from UW-RF and was a member of one of first flower judging teams Ferriss coached. Along with being the team's coach, she teaches introduction to horticulture, greenhouse management, floriculture production, herbaceous perennials and senior seminar in horticulture.

Hard-working, caring, thorough and dedicated are among the words used to describe the recipient of this year's Outstanding College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences Faculty Teaching Award at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

Greub wrote the textbook "Crop Production," which is prominently used in high schools and colleges throughout the United States. In 1993 he was recognized as Wisconsin Forage Council Educator of the Year.

In his spare time, the professor enjoys playing his concertina with his polka band, the "Polka Pals." He also enjoys fishing, traveling, cutting wood and "striking up a conversation" with a friend on his HAM radio.

"I remember he was a strong supporter of higher education. Apparently, he decided to leave a legacy of money for agriculture to help students go to college and to help them meet their financial obligations."

The Kuschel agricultural scholarship fund will provide $2,500 in scholarships annually for students majoring in dairy science, agriculture education or production agriculture. According to Rohde, the endowment will create about three scholarships for amounts between $800-$1,000.

"They are needed to provide incentives for students to come to River Falls, stay at River Falls and pursue a degree. These are important endowments that we received. It really gives us a shot in the arm," Rohde said.

Dr. Earl Hildebrand Memorial Fund in recognition of her leadership and outstanding record as a student at UW-River Falls. In her major area of study, she achieved an exceptional cumulative grade point average, and she has earned a place on the Dean's List nearly every semester.

As a member of NAMA, she has chaired marketing teams in researching and developing comprehensive marketing plans for agricultural products and presented them at NAMA conventions. She has received many awards from the association in addition to serving as its student chapter president in 1997.

Frederick has been a tour guide for the UW-River Falls Admission's Office and a student assistant for the agricultural economics department for the past two years, exhibiting her leadership and organizational skills while maintaining a positive attitude in working with students and faculty, according to Dean Gary Rohde.

"Renee demonstrates diligence, hard work, extreme self-discipline, responsibility and clear-cut organization," said Cizek. "She epitomizes the well-rounded 'model student'-a young woman strong in intellect and humble in spirit-truly mature beyond her years."

Jill Krones, a sophomore from Hanover, Minn., won the title after competing in a total of 10 regional rodeos throughout the year. The region consists of contestants from some 12 schools in Wisconsin, North Dakota, South Dakota and Iowa. Points are accumulated according to placement in each event. Krones' first place wins at the South Dakota State University fall rodeo, the Iowa State University fall rodeo and the UW-RF fall rodeo helped secure the championship standing with 520 total points. The second-place regional winner trailed with 325 points.

Krones, an agriculture education major, has been riding since she was 4 years old. As Professor Anthony Jilek of the animal and food science department noted, her accomplishment is a high honor that she "has worked very hard for, not only this year but for a number of years."

"We have left the Age of Industrialization and have entered into the Age of Information. The changes in communications have made a new, wonderful world," Burlingame said, stressing that communications are no longer a wonder of technology, but a part of daily life. "With the power of this technology, we must find ways to share our resources globally."

Technology has made it easy to talk to and see one another , to share thoughts, knowledge, and beliefs. Burlingame said that it must be just as easy then to share food and clothing, and to make homes stronger and still comfortable without the destruction of precious resources.

The endless opportunities in technology, communications and medicine have also created a dimension of responsibility-a responsibility to create only those changes that can improve life, and fto urther the greatness of the human spirit, she said.

Burlingame recognized families and responsible education for molding the values that she considers the bridge between the call to opportunity and the responsibility to do right. She thanked the families for their guidance, and for teaching traditions that "anchor us in these rapidly changing times."

Local attractions including historic, cultural and recreational sites will have displays, as will local artisans exhibiting arts and crafts.  Those interested in displaying should contact Polfus for more information. A silent auction will be held for items or services provided by display participants and other St. Croix Valley tourism and hospitality businesses. Musical entertainment will also be provided throughout the evening.

Sponsored by the Citizens Election Forum of Minneapolis, the panelists will take testimony for a week and issue a report on its opinion of the most effective way to finance Wisconsin elections. Students in a political participation course taught by UW-RF political science Professor Dave Schultz selected the panelists and will monitor the week-long presentations and discussions for bias.

Roger Bybee of Wisconsin Citizen Action. The Milwaukee-based chapter of the national organization advocates full public funding of political campaigns. It has not yet developed a specific proposal for Wisconsin.

Gail Shea, of the Wisconsin Democracy Campaign. The Madison-based group is a coalition of organizations that favor reforming campaign finance laws. It has developed a legislative proposal that supports a mix of public and private funding.

Ned Crosby, founder of the Twin Cities-based Citizens Election Forum. He advocates a reform proposal that focuses on improving the dialogue between citizens and candidates in a way that empowers citizens.

Following each presentation, representatives of each of the five proposals will be asked to critique the best and worst aspects of each option for campaign finance reform. Panelists also will ask questions of presenters.

The St. Croix and Pierce county panelists were selected from 400 residents contacted randomly to be a mirror of American demographic profiles based on race, age and gender. They are balanced among those who both favor or oppose campaign funding reform that reflects the current distibution of Americans on the topic as indicated in national polls.

A meeting has been set for the general community to offer its opinions at 7 p.m. on April 13 in Room 127 of South Hall. That will be followed on April 14 with a round of meetings with students, faculty and staff.

For the University, the exterior master plan will be the first produced by an outside consultant since 1968.  The consulting firm will collaborate with faculty, staff, students and community members to design a plan that addresses issues such as parking and transportation, land use patterns, sites for new buildings, proper locations for roads, sidewalks, lighting, planting beds, trees, signage, and site amenities like benches and picnic tables.

Some ideas for the plan include creating a campus mall area, redirecting sidewalks and allocating space for a new residence hall.  The main goal is to functionally and aesthetically unify the campus with its surroundings, Braun says.

An estimated $40,000 from campus funding will be used to develop the exterior master plan.  The final plan will include recommendations on the phasing and preliminary cost estimates of various design solutions.

Families can enjoy refreshments, piano music, and performance arts such as the St. Croix Valley Boys Choir and Odyssey of the Mind teams. Sculptors, ceramists and other artists will be on hand, creating art and answering questions. Free, hands-on activities will also allow children to make their own masterpieces.

This year's theme, "Tales to Tell," challenged young artists to combine art and language by visually illustrating real and imaginary stories, organized around the components of every story: setting, character and event.

According to Professor Lynn Jermal of the UW-RF art department, a Hudson resident, the works on display show a wide range of imagination and are representative of the high quality of work done by young students.

Session four of senior outreach studies classes will be offered this spring by  continuing education extension at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls:  "Morning with a Professor" on Tuesday mornings, and "Bits of History" on Thursday mornings.

Unity in the Community is a time for celebration of diversity on the campus, among our neighbors, and in the world. This year's theme, "Sharing Perspectives-Finding Common Ground," can be found through the week's schedule of events.

Throughout the day participants are also encouraged to visit the displays and presentations by UWRF student organizations in and around the Student Center as well as  the Annual International Bazaar in Karges Gym.

The River Falls Sesquicentennial Steering Committee has awarded four grants totalling $2,325 to organizations for participation in the Sesquicentennial Celebration.  According to River Falls Main Street Project Coordinator Janet Olson Halaas, the purpose for the grant program is to encourage organizations and businesses to celebrate this milestone in River Falls history.

There were two major guidelines organizations and businesses had to follow when applying for the grant program.  First, the grant's purpose must be directly related to the history of the people, community or culture of River Falls.  Second, it must also be beneficial to the River Falls community.  According to Olson Halaas, with the four different categories that were selected, the grant program has achieved its goals.

The grants will help to bring the community together and the history of River Falls alive during the Sesquicentennial Celebration.  "The four grants represent a good cross-section of the community.  Some of the items are tangible that people can collect and keep," Olson Halaas says.

The first grant was given for the production of "Entering the Circle," a play that tells the story of farm wives at the turn of the century.  The play is the result of the work of  five UW-River Falls faculty members.  History department chair Kurt Leichtle is serving as the historical consultant.  Leichtle's research comes from the turn-of-the-century diaries of rural River Falls farm wife Jenny Andrews as well as other Midwestern women.

Journalism department chair Mike Norman is writing the play and plant and earth science department Professor Bob Baker is coordinating the show's planning as well as gathering and organizing photographs to accompany the presentation.  Speech communication and theater arts department chair Margaret Swanson will be directing the play and theater arts department Professor Ken Stofferahn is overseeing set design.

A grant was awarded to Gypsy Cab for the publishing of a special edition book titled, "River Falls Remembers."  Past and present residents will help to write the book to include memoirs, essays, and poems about the City of River Falls.  Captioned photos are to be included in the book. Submissions for the book will be open to anyone.   Gypsy Cab plans to visit the elementary schools, River Falls Middle school, River Falls High School, and area nursing homes to help include all members of the community.

A grant was given to the Kinni Enhancement Project for the painting of a large mural. The theme of the mural surrounds the Kinnicikinnic River and its importance and history to River Falls.  The mural will be painted on the side of the Hallmark/Ben Franklin building at Main and Maple streets, downtown River Falls.  The unveiling of the mural will take place on Saturday, Sept. 26.

The final grant was given to the Quilting Friends for the production of a quilt.  Experienced quilters will make the quilt to feature historic landmarks of significance to the City of River Falls.  The quilt is to include features such as River Falls' 150 year logo.  The quilt will be on display during the month of September.

The UW-RF Community Orchestra, directed by Kris Tjornehoj, has performed for several years.  Members include students, graduates of musical institutions, educators who are continuing their education and those who play for pure enjoyment.

During his visit to the campus, Thompson also will sign into legislation several acts recently passed by the Wisconsin Legislature. This includes a Wisconsin-Minnesota Tuition Reciprocity Act. This version makes permanent the 25-year-old compact in which students pay their home state tuition while attending a university in a neighboring state.

The College of Education & Professional Studies traces its roots to the founding of the State Normal School at River Falls in 1874 to train teachers. The college has been nationally recognized for the breadth of its teacher training programs and was recently named one of the 10 best programs in the nation.

Take Back the Night is an international rally and march organized to call attention to violence against women, children and families.  The first rallies began in England, with the first rally and march held in the United States in San Francisco in 1978.

Special exhibits will be on display throughout the evening.  The Clothesline Project, sponsored by the Minnesota Women's Coalition, will feature a collection of 200 t-shirts designed by survivors of sexual assault and domestic violence.

The Minnesota Women's Consortium will feature the Silent Witness Project, which is a 27-figure display of life-size wood cut outs.  The figures are painted red to represent women who have lost their lives to domestic violence.  Each has a plaque identifying and describing who it represents.

"We're excited about this effort to attract more visitors to the Scenic St. Croix Valley," says Carol Sudheimer, alliance president of Afton, Minn. "We have so much to offer here, and we hope the packet will convince visitors to return again and again."

Included in the coupon books are substantial discount incentives to lodging establishments, Beds & Breakfast, marinas, river cruises, rail tours, restaurants, antique dealers, retail establishments, river tubing, casinos, a nature center, a heritage center, a trout farm, canoe rentals, and summer theatre. The packet also includes a special discount to a Wisconsin Sesquicentennial Performance of the nationally acclaimed Lake Superior Big Top Chautauqua.

This marks the second year that the two departments have contributed to the promotion, according to Alliance marketing Chair Mark Kinders, the public affairs director at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The University of Wisconsin River Falls radio station is joining the Ideas Network of Wisconsin Public Radio. The new affiliation will be part of a Thursday, April 30, signing ceremony to take place at noon.

UW-Extension Interim Chancellor Beaver called the move another example of the strength of the UW's broadcasting partnership, as well as an additional opportunity for students interested in pursuing broadcasting as a career.

Interim Director of Wisconsin Public Radio Greg Schnirring said the partnership is "an opportunity to expand on the Wisconsin Idea and take Wisconsin Public Radio programming to the state border. This is an exciting way to spread the uniquely Wisconsin programming of the IDEAS NETWORK to one of the fastest growing areas of the state."

This marks the second year that the St. Croix Chapter of Habitat for Humanity will start the construction of a house on campus. The framed home will be trucked from campus at the end of the week to be assembled on a site in Spring Valley.

A House Dedication will take place on Friday beginning at 12:30 p.m. in the upper parking lot of South Hall. An Open House Reception will be held one hour prior to the dedication, beverages and snacks will be served.

During the show she also challenged viewers to write in to her show, encouraging them to become volunteers with their affiliate. So far, more than 15,000 names have been received by Habitat for Humanity International.

Christian housing ministry, Habitat works in partnership with people in need to build simple, decent houses. The houses then are sold to the partner families at no profit, through zero-interest loans. At work in more than 50 countries around the globe, Habitat has built housing sheltering some 300,000 people. Habitat expects to dedicate its 100,000th in the year 2000.

Koskie says, "I can't thank God and the Habitat Chapter enough for this wonderful blessing." Koskie and her family are anxious to begin accumulating their "sweat equity" hours of labor required as part of the agreement to qualify for the house. A total of 250 hours are needed.

Whitner received a second place scholarship in prose for her paper, "Diversity: A Lifelong Commitment." The paper examines acts of combating resistance to diversity through Whitman's recollections and reflections of growing up as an African-American female in Mississippi, through the Civil Rights era to present day activism and involvement.

Joos' paper, "White Allies?", explores the detrimental effects of white moderacy and explains how a lack of action in white America prevents change and fuels the American race problem. The paper also presents a course of action including education and the election of officials willing to battle the inertia of American apathy.

Baregi presented her paper, "Metropolitan Desegregation of Schools: A 21st Century Vision." The paper focuses on the problem of segregated public school systems and the history of desegregation, and provides a brief description of some policies and programs that have contributed to an ethnically/racially integrated public school system. It also covers some important steps to take to achieve the best results in an integrated system.

The University of Wisconsin System gathering is one of the oldest and largest multicultural conferences in the nation, attracting about 400 students of color from around the state. It is an opportunity for students to gather for the presentation of papers, to hear key-note addresses and to network with faculty, other students and employers. The conference focuses on the presentation of papers in three categories including research, prose and poetry.

The papers were chosen on the basis of scholarship, rigor, and relevance to the theme, "Rising to the Challenge of Combating Resistance to Diversity." Out of 54 submissions, only 24 papers were chosen for presentation.

Thirty-seven UW-River Falls students and three faculty members were inducted into the Phi Kappa Phi Honor Society for academic excellence during the society's initiation ceremony and banquet April 22.

Phi Kappa Phi is a national honor society whose primary objective is the recognition and encouragement of superior scholarship in all academic disciplines.  It is the highest academic honor a student can achieve at UW-River Falls.

Receiving the award is Robert Dykstra, a 1957 elementary education and guidance graduate  Dykstra earned master and doctorate degrees in educational psychology and education from the University of Minnesota. He is a New Brighton, Minn., resident.

Dykstra's prolific literacy work, spanning three decades from the mid-60s to the early 90s, includes research that continues to be universally recognized as among the most important ever conducted in his field.

Among Dykstra's legacy to UW-RF are several faculty members who received their doctorates as his advisees at the University of Minnesota.  They include teacher education Professor Brenda Shearer, College of Education and Graduate Studies Dean Kathleen Daly, the late Professor Ronald Johnson, who was instrumental in developing the master of science in education reading program, and Professor Marilyn Naylor, who recently retired from a long and distinguished teaching career in reading and learning disabilities.

Before attending college, Dykstra began his teaching career in a one-room schoolhouse near Plymouth, Minn..  After being drafted and completing a two-year stint in the Army, he taught a fifth and sixth grade combination class in Cedar Grove.

Recent honors for Dykstra include being elected to the international Reading Hall of Fame in 1996 because of his significant contributions to the understanding of the reading process and to the teaching of reading in schools.

Along with assuming various leadership positions at the local, national and international levels and being involved in numerous volunteer activities, Dykstra continues to remember his ties to UW-RF.  He has been an active member of the UW-RF Foundation Board of Directors for two years.

The exhibit will feature 80 pieces of artwork created by grade school students from across 10 states. Millions of youngsters entered their artwork for consideration to be included in regional shows across the nation.

After being selected as one of three host sites in the central region for the traveling exhibit, UW-RF partnered with the Phipps Center for the show.  Their combined resources give families the opportunity to participate in a variety of collateral activities, contributing their creativity to the celebration.

"Animation Workshops with Duane Barnhart," for ages 9-12 April 25 from 10 a.m.-noon, and for ages 13-adult April 25 from 1-3 p.m., $10 class fee plus $2 materials fee.  Participants will discover what makes animation work by drawing characters and making them move in two-part animation and flip books.  They will also learn about registration and extreme movements.  Participants will draw a character and paint an original animation cell, which will be mounted in a mat and taken home.  Two-part animation will also be created and transferred onto video for home viewing.  Students who wish to have their own copies of the simple animation project should bring a blank VHS tape, which is not included in the materials fee.  Barnhart, a professional cartoonist, teacher and author, has taught thousands of young people the techniques used by professionals.

"Book Arts: New Forms to Tell a Tale," for grades 3 to adult, May 2 from 9 a.m.-noon, by Suzanne Stout, fiber artist in River Falls and teacher in Farmington, Minn., and Cindy Moe, artist and teacher in Clear Lake.  Register by April 24 by calling the UW-RF Continuing Education Extension.  Participants must bring two pencils and an eraser.  This workshop will show the art of making books in a wide range of shapes and sizes.  The class will make bridge books, pop-up books, books with doors and windows, and flips and flaps.  The class will explore ways to make decorative papers to use within the books using marbling and paste painting techniques.

The seminars will address investment planning, personal finance on the World Wide Web and investing retirement assets.  Taught by Charles Corcoran, associate professor of finance in the School of Business and Economics at UW-RF,  the seminars will focus on educating consumers.

"I want to help people become more informed financial consumers," Corcoran says.  "Once people are equipped with the tools to be smart, informed consumers, they can windowshop financial products intelligently."

Corcoran recognizes a need for a representative of an educational institution to present unbiased information to consumers. "They are pretty much going to get an objective scoop from me--I'm not selling anything."

At each seminar Corcoran will present information about preparing for the future, provide materials for planning, investing and taking advantage of Internet sources, and allow participants to ask questions about their personal financial situations.

"I enjoy sharing these things with people.  Most of us shouldn't have to pay for this information," Corcoran says.  "Most people are capable of doing it themselves-they just need some framework that provides them a direction."

Corcoran has a bachelor's degree in finance from Georgetown University and received his master and doctorate degrees from the University of Minnesota.  In addition, he is a chartered financial analyst and a member of the Twin Cities Society of Security Analysts.  At UW-RF he teaches managerial finance, investments and personal finance.  In 1997 Corcoran was selected as a UW System Teaching Fellow.

The facility will provide a state-of-the-art teaching laboratory for students, dairy industry personnel and dairy farm employees.  As a replacement for facilities built in the 1950s, the new center will meet the needs of the dairy teaching program at UW-RF in the year 2000 and beyond.  In addition to UW-RF students, dairy industry personnel and dairy farm employees will utilize the teaching laboratory.

It is because of this partnership that Rohde says with conviction that it is in the dairy industry's best interest to support the Dairy Teaching Center financially.  In return, UW-RF will work with representatives from the dairy industry to help accommodate the specific needs of regional dairy businesses.

The new facility will be located on the University-owned Mann Valley Farm.  It will include a milking center with a parallel parlor and rapid exit stalls, a modern free stall barn for the milking herd and heifers, a warm stall barn wing for maternity stalls, animal treatment and research trials, bunker silos, hay shed, and commodity bins for feed storage, new technology for a nutrient management system, a teaching classroom and laboratory facility, and a pavilion/arena for shows and contests.

"The dairy industry," according to Rohde, "cannot help but benefit from employees who have received the best possible dairy science education an institution can give.  Most of these students are from the Upper Midwest and traditionally graduate and work in the dairy industry in the region."

Rohde stresses that the college has a national reputation for excellence in teaching undergraduates, where students are allowed to meet their specific goals by choosing an option in business, production or science.  Some students arrive on campus with no practical experience in dairy cattle, and a goal is to quickly and properly educate them for employment in a rapidly changing industry.

The use of the Dairy Teaching Center that Rohde lists support his assertion.  The center, according to Rohde, will be used for training programs for dairy farm employees, education workshops for industry personnel, regional dairy judging contests for high school students, applied research projects, extension out-reach activities and field days, livestock and dairy cattle sales, dairy-related educational activities for grade school children, farm tours for the public, foreign visitors and special interest groups.

The mutually beneficial partnership between the dairy industry and dairy science education is one reason why UW-RF is looking to the dairy industry for a substantial portion of the $400,000 that must be raised.

WorldColor is an international group of storytellers and musicians from West Africa, Mexico, South Africa, Japan and the United States, including tribal America. The group uses traditional world music and original, contemporary worldbeat songs to connect cultures and to speak of the racial, social and environmental concerns of the world.

Artistic director Pamela Whitman spent three months in South Africa in 1985, where she was inspired to create WorldColor in an effort to help heal the wounds of prejudice between people. The foundation of music and art for World Peace is based on Native American prophecies that Whitman learned of when she was a principal flutist for the South Dakota Symphony.  The prophecies assert that world peace depends upon the unifying of the four human races: Black, Red, Yellow and White.

Songstress and actress Michelle Tuthill has a versatile voice and has  performed opera, big band, doo-wop, gospel, blues and R&B, while guitarist Michael Stark offers proficiency in multiple styles of music, including jazz, classical, blues, rock, country and accoustic.

Drummer Kevin Murillo brings a wealth of musical knowledge and experience and a unique flavor to the group. Percussionist/dancer/vocalist Emile Hassan Dyer adds multi-cultural perspective to the arts and an array of colors to the vocals of the group through his traditional African chants and scat singing and toning.

Blake will be showing works in printmaking, Carrison will have various pieces of jewelry and photography, and Spaulding will be presenting a wide array of sculpture works.  Information will be available on the sale of the works.

This art business event was initiated by working artists in the area to help individuals with artistic talent to develop their style, create a portfolio, establish a network of support, and learn to market their work with success.

The keynote address, "Being Creative in an Adverse Environment," will be presented by Peyton, a Minneapolis artist who, among other accomplishments, has established his own private art gallery and studio and co-founded the afterschool arts program Juxtaposition Arts.

James S. Mckahan, a national, award-wining artist from Ellsworth, will focus on resolving the conflict between maintaining a creative and spiritual focusin doing artwork and the time-consuming business of self-promotion.

With her 16 years of experience in arts and crafts show management, art business and marketing consultant Molly Hibbard will offer seminars on art fair jurying.  Topics will include the information needed to apply, judging criteria, the application process, and scoring in a mock slide jury and review process.

A self-employeed landscape painter, instructor and consultant, and human resources manager for the Ordway Music Theater in St. Paul, Wendy Lane's first session will discuss writing a resume for a job in the arts, creating a cover letter, supplemental materials, and where to send them.  Her second session will feature self-promotion techniques such as artist newsletters, postcards and press releases.

Anna Carlson, a self-supporting artist and clothing designer, and Marit Lee Kucera, a self-taught textile artist and teacher, will discuss the business of being a professional textile artist.  Techniques discussed will include goal setting, marketing and targeting an audience, business and ethics, and the personal satisfaction of being self-employed.

Nationally recognized through its performances carried on National Public Radio, the Lake Superior Big Top Chautauqua has created a major new historical musical to celebrate 150 years of Wisconsin statehood.

The appearance was announced on Wednesday at UW-River Falls before a crowd of about 100 persons from River Falls and surrounding communities, who also were treated to an impromptu performance by Chautauqua artistic director Warren Nelson and three performers from the troupe.

The 2.5-hour show set for Sept. 26 will use all original stories, songs and music to tell the stories of Wisconsin's people, illuminated by the projection of historic photographs collected statewide from museums and private collections. The show is being researched and written by Nelson.

The appearance in River Falls will launch the company's statewide tour to present the show over two months to 11 cities. In addition to its full performance, the troupe will present two 45-minute shows to some 6,000 regional elementary and middle school students.

Major underwriting for the Chautauqua's appearance is being provided through the student-supported UW-River Falls Wyman Performance Series. "The Wyman Series is very excited to be a part of this program!" said series coordinator Kaye Schendel.  "We believe that students, faculty, and the community will have a fantastic opportunity to be part of one of the biggest events to take place at UW-River Falls".

The performance by the 78-member choir will begin with a selection of religious music and will then feature "Va Pensiero" from the Verdi opera, "Nabucco," an Italian favorite. The concert will conclude with a varied selection of American spirituals, including two arrangements by director Elliot R. Wold.

Concert Choir alumni meet annually for a reunion retreat at the University's Pigeon Lake Camp in Drummond, Wis. They perform at an annual Homecoming concert on campus and have completed three concert tours in Europe.

Jocelyn Gorham, a member of Ragamala Music and Dance Theater of Minneapolis, has created two classical Indian dances for the concert.  Gorham has an extensive background in modern and Middle Eastern dance and has performed with the Nancy Hauser Dance Company, Jawaahir Dance Company and the Children's Theater Company.  Risa Persian, founder of the Precipice Dance Company in Minneapolis, will perform a solo and has choreographed two dance pieces based on Margolis Brown techniques.  Ricardo Suarez from St. Paul, Minn., will return as guest choreographer to share his inventive and technically demanding work.  An addition to this year's concert is choreography by Torrion Amie, a Twin Cities hip-hop choreographer.

This year's theme, "Sharing Perspectives, Finding Common Ground," focuses on giving the community the opportunity to learn about and accept each others' backgrounds and differences. The celebration includes music, dance, food, lectures and presentations.

"We all have many things that make us different. But given the chance, we realize that we have just as many important things inside that make us all the same. The bottom line is we all want to succeed and be happy--we are all human," comments Theresa Zirbel, member of the diversity awareness committee.

Twin Cities photojournalist and artist Wing Young Huie will present excerpts from his book, "Frogtown," and Lorraine Norgaard will discuss women's history through film, illustrated by her own production on Native Americans.

According to Yolanda Dewar, assistant director for student international programs, Unity in the Community shows the spirit of the campus and allows students of every ethnic background to feel like a part of it. "The contributions of our international students, to the campus and the community, are many," Dewar says. "Learning about the many different cultures that exist is very important."

The society has existed since 1920 with the purpose of promoting an interest in the study of sociology, researching social problems, and improving the human condition through social and intellectual activities.

To be eligible, a student must be a declared sociology major, sociology minor, or anthropology/criminal justice minor; be at least junior status; have completed at least 12 credit hours of sociology; and attained a GPA of 3.0 overall and a GPA of 3.25 in all sociology course work.

Many of the benefits some Americans take for granted-child labor laws, the minimum wage, health care, unemployment insurance, social security-came about because social workers saw injustice in these areas and fought for change.

The profession of social work has changed over time, especially in the educational requirements and legal regulation for social workers that is now required in all 50 states, according to Ruth Kalms, associate professor of the UW-River Falls social work program.

These and other changes have been made to more adequately address the needs of people and groups, says Kalms.  Additionally, a code of ethics has been developed as the cornerstone of the profession.  The code describes what workers must and must not do, from values to implementation of programs and service.

Social workers seek to strengthen and improve the ability of people and systems to cope with the problems they face while promoting improvements in the social environment that will enable human needs to be more adequately met.

Social workers are involved in wide-ranging tasks in many different public and private areas.  They deal with troubled children and families, organize communities for change, conduct research, and administer social programs.

According to Kalms, social workers can be found almost any place where people and organizations come together: from  family counseling to mental health centers, from nursing homes to prisons, from corporations to community organizations.

Students from UW-RF's accredited social work program graduate with a Bachelor of Social Work degree and the training to prepare them to become beginning level social workers in all types of agencies, says Kalms.

Typical of major, Platson is already well on his way to a successful social work career. He began volunteering in 1996 at the River Falls Turning Point, a shelter for victims of domestic abuse.  He now facilitates a support group for children while their mothers attend a self-esteem session.

His most recent job adds work experience with the Pierce County Family Community Partnership, a pioneer program designed to reduce the time children spend in out-of-home placements such as foster care.

As part of the in-home services committee, Platson participates as a mentor for a child.  This has given him a valuable behind-the-scenes look at the social work profession in action, including interviews with the family and case discussion meetings.

After making an assessment of a family, group, or individual's situation, the social worker meets with the client to develop a contract and make a plan in which goals and objectives are to be accomplished to meet the client's needs.

There is never a typical day for social workers, according to Kalms, and, as Platson says, it's not a nine-to-five job.  A worker's focus is always on the client's needs. Workers attempt to keep schedules, but often situations arise that require immediate response or work beyond typical hours.

According to Kalms, professional social workers need to understand the interrelationships between systems and have a realistic view of their job. They must maintain a balance between their personal expectations and occupational limits and be willing to seek outside help from supervisors and colleagues.

While professional workers recognize their limits, they also work within those limits to push for needed changes in laws, systems, and groups, in order to make a difference in the lives of others, Kalms says.

Those who express an interest will be asked whether they would be willing to participate in a citizen's panel that will hear arguments for and against campaign financing reform. The panelists will serve for five days in April and be compensated $100 per day for their time.

The Jefferson Center is a non-profit foundation that was formed in 1974 to conduct research and develop democracy. Over the years it has initiated numerous citizens panels to hear debates on such diverse topics as issues in the Minnesota governor's race, the St. Paul's mayoral race, the federal deficit, local school bond issues, organ transplants, and the impact of agriculture on water quality.

During a presentation on the project on Feb. 5 at UW-River Falls, Jefferson Center founder Ned Crosby said the campaign finance reform panel's recommendations will be shared widely. Ultimately, he said, he expects the Center to pursue up to $15 million in corporate and foundation donations to share the recommendations nationwide. In some circumstances, Crosby said, it's possible to use the initiative process of some states to adopt the panel's recommendations as state law for funding political campaigns.

Those Pierce and St. Croix counties residents who indicate a willingess to participate will be placed into a pool of names from which 18 panelists will be drawn. According to Crosby, the final panel will be a mirror of American demographic profiles based on race, age and gender. There will be balance among those who both favor and oppose campaign funding reform that reflects the current distibution of Americans on the topic as indicated in polls.

Crosby noted that polls on such topics as campaign finance reform are useful in revealing the opinions held by Americans. However, he said, such polls do not determine whether those opinions are well-informed.

Panelists will hear from well-known state and national experts on four types of campaign financing and decide which is most appropriate: full public financing; a mix of public and private funds; an emerging Republic Plan in Wisconsin based on an on-going commission studying the funding of elections; and a Citizens Reform approach supported by Crosby.

Students at UW-River Falls in a political participation course taught by Professor Dave Schultz will be used to ensure the panel project is unbiased. The students will select the 18 panelists from the pool of those interested in participating. They also will independently research the reform options and then monitor the presentations to the panel to ensure that all sides of the issue are being fairly presented.

This year's seminar, "Creating the Successful Arts Business:  Mobilizing and Using Your Art Resources," will be a participatory workshop in which artists and craftspeople will have an opportunities to interact and network.

The seminar, co-sponsored by the UW-RF Continuing Education Extension, will include a keynote speaker, morning and afternoon sectionals and an extended panel discussion.  Panelists will include artists, administrators and consultants.  Breakout sessions will be conducted by area professionals and will address topics aimed at aiding artists in their quest to make a living doing what they do best--creating art.

Imagine a classroom where the walls are tall green trees, the ceiling is a blue sky, the drone of rippling water from lakes and streams surround you and the noisiest distractions you hear are the occasional chirp of a bird or the croak of a bullfrog.

This setting describes the Pigeon Lake Field Station, directed by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, and dedicated to serving higher education at undergraduate and graduate levels, "as a center for study, teaching and research in any discipline in which learning can be enhanced by utilizing a natural, relatively undisturbed, wilderness environment," according to its mission statement.

Recently named to the position of senior manager for the field station is UW-RF art department Chair Michael Padgett, who says his priorities will be to bring stability to its administration and more opportunities for faculty to teach.

"Over nearly a decade of involvement I've developed a vested interest in the success of Pigeon Lake and its programs as well as a deep concern for its future," Padgett says.  "I've watched management come and go and support for the facility and its programs fluctuate with the disruption of each change in leadership.

"My interest is in building the facility and its programs on its clear strengths and in making its programs responsive to customer interests and needs.  As I see it, the answer to the success of Pigeon Lake Field Station lies in improving our outreach and communication efforts to be certain an awareness exists in regard to the wide range of offerings and experiences available."

Chequamegon National Forest in northern Wisconsin's Bayfield County, is ideal for field studies in the natural sciences, while the beauty of the area makes it popular for activities in the humanities, social sciences, and recreation and physical education.

Wisconsin System enjoy benefits in these unique surroundings  that cannot be attained in the common classroom environment. One-on-one training, highly structured use of time, and the absence of every-day distractions promise thorough instruction at the field station.

Courses range across many disciplines, including biology, education, sociology and anthropology. The setting particularly lends itself to the arts, with three Art Weeks offering such credit courses as glassmaking, clay, painting, print-making, photography, drawing, and African and African-American art.

Meredith Clawson, of Excelsior, Minn., majors in physical education at UW-RF, with minors in outdoor recreation and health. She took three outdoor recreation courses at Pigeon Lake during the 1997 summer session and experienced first-hand what she considers an incredibly valuable resource for the University. "You get a brand new perspective when you're at the field station, with the beautiful wild flowers, amazing wild life and the clean, clear lake; you're on a whole different time schedule - Mother Nature's."

Professor Dennis Van den Heuvel of the UW - Stout vocational rehabilitation department coordinates and directs a session at Pigeon Lake for a group of professional counselors from all over the state. He says it provides a setting that can't be matched on a traditional campus.

"Combining the physical beauty and climate and the ambiance of outdoor living with the growth of professional camaraderie makes Pigeon Lake an outstanding, potent learning place. The setting is informal enough to allow great expression of ideas and planning."

Pigeon Lake is equipped with excellent classroom facilities, comfortable cabin accommodations and bathhouses with shower facilities, including those with handicapped accessibility. Foosball, pool and other games are available in the recreation hall, and visitors also canoe, boat or swim in Pigeon Lake, or bicycle in the National Forest.

Next, the field station became an organization site used by a variety of recreational groups until it was declared surplus property by the U.S. Forest Service in 1959. The facility was then purchased by the Board of Regents of State Colleges.  In the next 16 years the field station increased in size from 11.5 acres its present 50 acres.

The condition of the transfer gave UW-RF responsibility of the financial and academic administration of the program and the maintenance of the physical facilities of the field station. It also takes the lead in developing opportunities for programming by the faculty from other institutions within the system.

Although the highest priority for the field station is for credit-producing instruction and research-related activities, the field station is available for educational meetings and conferences, non-credit programs, and non-educational use by individuals and groups.

One such group is the Spelmanslag Fiddlers Group, which plays traditional Scandinavian folk music. The group retreats to Pigeon Lake at least one weekend each year for "restoration and meditation," according to Ruth Reilly, who has coordinated the trip for a number of years. "Our music is straight from the heart and the setting at Pigeon Lake offers a wonderful, pressure-free place to play."

An Isanti, Minn. native, who attends the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, recently returned from Orlando, Fla., after completing a six-month internship at one the world's most famous vacation destinations.

Aaron Deschenes, 20, gained experience in both full and quick-service aspects of the food industry during his stay at Walt Disney World from June 1997 to January 1998. He spent much of his internship working as a host at The Plaza Restaurant, located on Main Street of the Magic Kingdom. But the large size of the location in which he was stationed allowed him to move around and work for other businesses in the area as well, including Casey's fast food restaurant, the Plaza Bakery and the Cone Shop.

The internship was unrelated to Deschenes' recently declared major of business administration but he knows the experience will be valuable in the long run.  "Employers will see that I worked for Walt Disney World.  They understand the kind of high standards that business has."

Deschenes says the best part about the internship is the variety of friends he made, from the East Coast to the Southwest of the country. He enjoyed the experience and the area so much, in fact, that he stayed for two weeks after the internship was complete and is returning this summer as a casual, temporary employee.

The internship at the famous 42-square-mile theme park and resort was an opportunity that Robert Swanson Jr., 28, sought out by frequently browsing the bulletin boards around the University campus. He started the internship in June 1997. His responsibilities ranged from  doing a variety of custodial duties to operating 15-minute educational film attractions that play throughout the day.

Swanson announced the safety procedures and introductory information for the short films "Cranium Command," about the brain of a 12-year-old boy, and "The Making of Me," about birth and reproduction. In addition to the basic duties of the show, Swanson was expected to answer an array of questions from a diverse audience of people from all over the world; communication that Swanson stresses is not always easy.

The student readings series was started a year and a half ago by English Professor Jennifer Brantley to allow students, staff, and community members to listen to and read writings.  The forum is completely open as to who can read and the subject matter.  It can be anything from poetry to short stories.

A typical reading series consists of four students or staff reading their works to an audience.  When they are finished, there is an open microphone session so any members of the audience can come up and read their works.  On occasion there are professionals who are invited to read.  At these readings there is no open microphone session.

With the exception of Brantley, the series is completely run by UW-RF students and it is not classroom-oriented.  She feels that this method of organization helps get students more involved.  They do just about everything, including introducing the speakers, Brantley notes.

"I knew there were a lot of writers on this campus and students need some outlet for their work. The readings series gives them a sense that they are not just writing for themselves.  Their writings must be understandable for others, too.  Also, it gives them a sense of community outside of  the classroom," Brantley says.

The professionals who read have their own reasons for participating, and it is not the compensation.  "We look around in the community and find people to come for very little money," she said.  "Published writers come because they are excited to have a student audience."

There were about 15 people in the audience at the first student reading series evnet.  Ever since then, the numbers have been increasing.  At the last reading 40-50 people came to listen and some to read, Brantley relates.

"Every time I go there, I leave feeling rejuvenated.  Students have ideas outside the classroom.  They think a lot about important ideas and I always leave the readings juiced back up again," Brantley explains.

Leading the seminar was Dorothy Siegel, vice president-emeritus of student affairs at Towson State University. Siegel is nationally recognized for her work establishing the Campus Violence Prevention Center at Towson and her extensive writings on dealing with hate speech and other campus incidents.

"We share a common view of a university experience," Ballou explained of the schools. "We are institutions that want to improve the quality of the human experience. We want students to experience free inquiry and intellectual rigor, and we want our campuses to be a hospitable place."

The campuses reviewed or drafted their policies on dealing with episodes of hate speech. This included determining the extent of the incident, mounting an administrative response, assisting those injured by the event, and emphasizing the use of education to defuse the incidents.

Webbed Feet 1 will serve as an introduction to internet promotion in the hospitality and tourism industry. It will provide information on basic Web surfing, how to research customers and competition on line, commercial transactions, review some of the best tourism Web sites, and provide advice on chosing a Web page designer and internet service provider.

Significant cost savings and other benefits resulting from some informal cooperation among three Minnesota-based emergency medical service providers, Rice Memorial Hospital Ambulance Service of Willmar,  HealthEast in the Twin Cities, and GoldCross, which serves several mid-sized communities in Minnesota and Wisconsin, led to the incorporation of the North Central EMS Cooperative.

The Co-op, which is still in its formative stages, sees itself as a joint purchasing cooperative for any public, nonprofit, private, or volunteer emergency medical service provider in Minnesota, Wisconsin, Iowa, North Dakota or South Dakota.

The incorporating board of directors of the Co-op is concerned that emergency medical services continue to be available to the public, especially in rural areas.  In an era when Medicare and Medicaid reimbursements are being dramatically reduced, containing costs is one way to ensure that EMS providers can remain viable.  Joint purchasing of supplies and gasoline, for example, is one way to enable all EMS providers, large or small, to realize significant cost savings.  	Better information sharing, government relations, and training are other potential ways the co-op will help EMS providers.

The kitchen would allow producers to process food during the peak season for sale at a later date, or to do one stage of processing during the season for further processing at a later date.  This would extend the marketing season, allow producers to utilize existing down time for processing, and improve farm profitability.

The Farm Market Kitchen is also seen as a way of enhancing the local farmers market.  Vendors from the farmer's market will be some of the key cooperative members/owners and will be able to expand their product lines.

Association's Land to Learning Project.  This is an educational program that focuses on broadening students' awareness of present and future farming practices, agricultural careers, and land stewardship.  The kitchen provides a means to expand that project by incorporating food processing, preservation, ethnic cooking and hands-on activities for students.

Completing a feasibility study, identifying potential members, and developing the best organizational structure for the Farm Market Kitchen Project are among the types of assistance the UW-River Falls Cooperative Development Initiative will be providing to the group. Persons in and around Kewaunee County are encouraged to call Mary Pat Carlson at 920/487-2709 for additional information.

Brancel and Hugoson recently testified in Washington, D.C., on the inequities of milk pricing levels. Hugoson also completed a New Zealand trade mission excursion in January and found that an aggressive marketing program is what makes New Zealand's dairy program succeed. Both are extremely knowledgeable about current issues in agriculture.

The farm show, held on campus for the first time, is expected to attract farmers from western Wisconsin and eastern Minnesota.  Farm equipment and agricultural product companies from at least five states will display the latest in new products and services.

The preservation of historic buildings will be featured on canvas by artist LeRoy Schwan of New Richmond, Wis.  He will display ink drawings of historic sites and also demonstrate his artistic skills for observers.

"Although awards and competition are contained within this contest, it provides students with excellent tournament experience and gives the University an opportunity to provide forensic service to high schools in the immediate geological area of the state," says James Pratt, of the speech communication and theatre arts department.

Prescott: Jacyln Bolin, first in public address and third in moments in history; Maria Maier, third in storytelling; Anne Christensen, tied third in radio speaking; Tonya Brabec, tied third in farrago.

Financial aid counselors will be available to answer all questions and concerns.  This program will be helpful for all individuals and families of individuals intending to continue their education after high school.

Additionally six courses are available for credit via distance learning through faculty at University of Wisconsin System campuses in River Falls, Superior, Stout, and Eau Claire. All classes are available through distance learning classrooms at UW-River Falls. Classes begin during the third week of January and will continue through the end of the semester in May.

"Home Landscaping and Horticulture in Western Wisconsin" will provide an understanding of the basic requirements of plants in the landscape, an appreciation for some basic principles of design and allow participants to address personal landscaping needs.  The course is offered Mondays, March 30-April 20 from 7-9 p.m. in the Agricultural Sciences Building. Registration fee is $40, and the registration deadline is March 20.

"Parenting Workshop: Discipline that Works: From Tots to Teens" will discuss with enthusiasm and humor some proven techniques that help parents avoid power struggles and foster a family atmosphere of cooperation, responsibility and respect. Parents will learn specific skills to use immediately and gain some helpful parenting materials.  The program will be held Tuesdays, March 3 and 10, from 6:30-9 p.m. at the River Falls High School. Registration is limited to 70, and the deadline is Feb. 27.

Two art workshops for parents and children also will be held in conjunction with a regional showing of award-winning art elementary students who participated in the nationwide "Dream-Makers" competition.

"Crazy Character Sculptures" will create large "wizbit" sculptures of patterns and colors using traditional and non-traditional tools. These sculptures may be displayed in the lobby of the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson during the Dream-Makers gallery showing in April and May.

"Book Arts Workshop" will teach how to make concertina books with pop-ups, flaps, doors and other techniques to tell stories. Marbling and paste painting techniques will be explored to help illustrate the books.

As UW-River Falls faculty and staff prepare for the start of spring semester on Jan. 20, they were greeted on Friday with one of the most positive messages on the state of the institution in recent years.

Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau addressed several hundred persons as he provided an update on the progress of the University's five-year strategic plan, "Reach for the Future," as well as an upcoming 10-year accreditation review by the North Central Association.

Thibodeau noted that at the mid-way point in its strategic planning process, the University has reallocated $1.9 million to information technology, computerization, academic program support, student services, student life, and faculty and staff development.

"We're making wonderful strides in redeploying our resources to our areas of need," Thibodeau said. "You have to feel good about this. I know how difficult it has been to get it. But it sure is nice to deploy it."

"traumatic and disheartening" reductions in state tax dollar support. He attributed that to a national debate that created a crisis situation for higher education in credibility, funding, public support, cost containment, respect for faculty, and a shift in tone of public debate from an "investment" in higher education to the "cost" associated with it.

UW-RF felt the impact of that debate, he said, as it saw 93 percent of its state tax dollars tied into faculty salaries. About half of the institution's funding comes from the state, with the balance from tuition, fees, grants and gifts.

Thibodeau noted it is critical to provide competitive salaries and fringe benefits to faculty and staff, but that there was little discretionary funding available to support UW-RF employees in their academic responsibilities.

"Reach for the Future," he said, has 12 goals that will require doubling the amount of state tax dollars allocated for academic support from 6.9 percent to over 12 percent. At midstream, the University now earmarks 9.1 percent.

"That's a goal (12 percent) that we must continue to support. We must reach it. There is always a gap between where we are and where we want to go. Difficult decisions will continue to be made," he said.

Thibodeau noted that the UW-RF planning process is heading toward recognition as a national model because of its pervasive look at all aspects of the University, as well as its wide inclusion of students, faculty and staff in the decision-making process.

In December Thibodeau and Vice Chancellor Virgil Nylander provided an overview of the plan to some 250 chancellors and presidents of the Middle States Association of Colleges & Schools that provides accreditation to institutions on the East Coast. They were joined in the presentation by Judson Taylor, former UW-RF Provost who instituted a similar planning process at the State University of New York at Cortland, where he is now president.

Thibodeau closed the meeting with two additional pieces of good news for the campus. He said he expects next week to see the release of $6.5 million for the construction of a new Teacher Education Center.

Groundbreaking is planned this spring on the first building dedicated exclusively for teacher education in the University of Wisconsin System in 22 years. Completion is expected for the start of the 1999 academic year.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Department of Continuing Education Extension and Dr. Judy Cooper have teamed up to offer professional development credit outreach seminars for teachers this spring in subject areas such as teaching decision-making, increasing student self-esteem, and creating a more effective learning environment.

Cooper has been a professional educator for 35 years.  She has taught at all levels and has administrative experience as a special education director, elementary and junior high school principal, high school assistant principal and assistant superintendent.  Recently, Cooper has authored a number of books for teachers and parents addressing vital topics about children.  She is heavily involved with teacher training nationally, presenting in about 100 districts per year.  With her dynamic and enthusiastic style, students leave Cooper's classes motivated and eager to put new skills into action.

"Student Groups! High Performance Learning" is a two-credit course that teaches the most advanced, most successful student grouping strategies.  Participants will learn the skills to create highly functioning student learning groups in a classroom charged with enthusiasm, high motivation, and quality end products.

"Increasing Student Self-esteem," a two-credit course, teaches strategies to raise self esteem, including recognizing destructive behavior and the causes of low self-esteem, using classroom activities to build esteem, teaching student motivation and self-monitoring techniques, and more.  Participants must name a study partner for this class: someone who is not enrolled in the course but has committed to working with the participant in completing discussions and activities.  For group enrollment, send all registrations together.

Henson, 47, came to River Falls in 1986. By using art and poetry, Henson hopes to make individuals and groups more aware of the important social choices they are bound to encounter. Henson has taught art workshops at numerous area elementary and middle schools for the last few years. Also, he served as the volunteer art facilitator for the Hennepin Juvenile Detention Center in 1992 and for Project DeNova.

"His message was one of the nicest gifts the children could ever have. He told them there were no mistakes in art. Everything and everyone is OK," Dawn Pennie, an area art teacher, says of Henson's teaching style.

In addition to teaching art to young people, Henson has been successful creating many privately and publicly commissioned paintings on his own. He also has given numerous speeches and presentations on adolescent choices. He has published two books of poetry. The most recent, "Mighty Mercius," was published by the River Falls Journal in 1989. That same year also brought Henson the World of Poetry's "Golden Poet Award." In 1990, he launched "Crossing Your Rubicon: How to Overcome," a local cable television show.

A common characteristic of Hensons' paintings is that they usually contain a central image surrounded by other smaller images, which tell a story of some of Henson's life experiences. It is through these images Henson hopes to bridge the gap of understanding about the changes and choices children go through.

In a newspaper interview last July, Henson described the reasoning behind his busy style of painting. "The paintings are cluttered, just like life and decisions and society are cluttered. Under it all, you'll find a glimmer of hope."

Shoppers will be happy to find that prices for their holiday goodies are keeping pace with inflation and the cost for their holiday feasts won't be noticeably higher than last year, according to data collected by faculty at UW - River Falls College of Agriculture, Food, and Environmental Sciences.

Although the percentages are up a little, according to agriculture economics Professor Gerald Nolte, "Food prices are very low relative to the average family's ability to produce wealth. Consumers, on average, spend only 11 percent of their disposable income on food, and just under 50 percent of that is for eating out.  These fractional increases in food prices will be imperceptible to the typical family shopping for a large meal."

There will be a larger supply of turkeys this year due to higher cold storage stocks and slightly higher production. This increased production and higher exports are keeping domestic consumption about 2 percent lower than last year.  Retail prices will average the same as last year during the holiday marketing season.

Overall poultry prices are up a mere 0.5 percent.  Poultry marketing activities are up a little from last year, putting a downward pressure of about 4 percent on farm prices, according to Nolte. But marketing firms coming off a period of low margins in the poultry and other food sectors have not yet created enough competitive pressure to pass the lower prices on to consumers.

Fresh vegetables are up about 5 percent. Supplies of corn are abundant and prices are fairly stable in comparison to last year at this time when corn supplies were virtually exhausted across most of the country. The season-average price of corn is about $2.70 per bushel - a significant decrease from spring market prices which were well above $4.

Because of the constant fluctuation in the dairy industry, prices in this area are hard to pin down, says Ranee May, UW-RF dairy processing plant manager. Overall prices for dairy products are slightly lower than last year, but shoppers will pay about 25 cents more for butter during the holiday season due to families' increased baking of holiday cookies and cakes at this time of year.

An estimated 30 million families will purchase real trees this year and, according to Professor Mike Kaltenberg of  the plant and earth science department, there is a tree of excellent quality available in everyone's price range.

Although popular for its top rank production of cranberries and Christmas trees, Wisconsin is known as America's Dairyland for a reason.  The state ranks No. 1 in production of cheese, milk cows, and sweetened whole milk, as well as corn for silage, beets for canning,  and snap beans for processing. Wisconsin is second only to California in milk production and butter and ranks No. 2 behind Minnesota in sweet corn and green peas for processing.

In addition to supervising the campus's eight full- and part-time security officers, Stevens also will oversee the staff and students employed in the campus parking office, safety department, and hazardous waste. She also will serve as the liaison to regional law enforcement, judicial and emergency services organizations.

Stevens will report to Virgil Nylander, vice chancellor for administration and finance. Said Nylander of her appointment, "Priscilla is exceptionally qualified and very enthusiastic about working with the campus. She is a tremendous addition to UW-River Falls."

Her professional affiliations include serving as the president of the Illinois Campus Law Enforcement Administrators, and she is a member of the International Association of Campus Law Enforcement Administrators, the Illinois Association of Chiefs of Police and the National Fire Protection Association.

A tourism promotional campaign that will target bringing more visitors to the St. Croix Valley this winter has received over $30,000 in matching funds from the Wisconsin and Minnesota tourism departments.

"We're extremely pleased that both state tourism departments continue to see the value of our promotional activities and have supported us financially in these efforts," said Carol Sudheimer, Alliance president and a member of the Afton Business Association.

The grants mark the second straight year the two states have provided funding for the project. Their contribution marks the only joint funding between the two states to a regional bi-state organization.

The packet includes a four-color descriptive map of the communities and visitors amenities in the St. Croix Valley, as well as a discount coupon book. Discounts include such businesses as restaurants, lodging establishments, Bed & Breakfast establishments, arts galleries, marinas, specialty stores, railroad tours and entertainment.

Packets also will be distributed through the Minnesota Office of Tourism booth at vacation shows in Des Moines and Minneapolis. A new component to the 1998 campaign will be distribution through the Office's Minnesota Store at the Mall of America.

The two state agency grants include funding to assist the Alliance and UW-River Falls to update a massive "ASK US" database of visitors amenities that can be found at the site. The searchable database provides additional assistance to visitors who seek to plan their vacations to the Valley, with tens of thousands of visitors accessing it since its launch in July 1996.

Last year's promotional campaign and the use of the Web site led to national recognition by the Council for the Advancement and Support of Education with the awarding of a Silver Medal to the Alliance and UW-RF for economic development initiatives.

Last spring the parking lot of Historic South Hall became a construction site for six days as volunteers constructed exterior walls, covered them with sheathing and erected them.  The walls were then transported to Ellsworth where other volunteers and the family invested their time to finish the house.

About 70 students are members of the UW-RF chapter of Habitat for Humanity, which encourages the construction or renovation of housing for needy families.  Families can purchase the homes at cost with no-interest loans.

As part of a greenhouse management course, three species of beneficial mites were released into the foliage display house of the greenhouse recently to help combat of the most serious of greenhouse pests: the red spotted spider mite.

The red spotted spider mite is a major pest to greenhouse growers and homeowners alike. But rather than turn to chemicals to control the pests, the experiment tries another promising alternative. These mites species that were introduced are considered beneficial since they destroy insects that harm to the plants.

The introduced mites are an experiment and learning device at this point, and not a guaranteed answer to the spider mite problem. Organized largely by horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss and Dan Waletzko, greenhouse manager, the focus of the project was primarily to give students exposure to the use of beneficial insects.

One way for students to see this is by monitoring the numbers of "good" and "bad" insects. Ferriss said she hopes the students will be able to discern the benefits of the experiment and replicate it when they enter industry.

Ferriss offered several explanations. First, to maintain beneficial insects there must be a food source, mainly the "bad" insects. Consumers don't like insect damage on their plants and are generally not tolerant of even minor damage the "bad" insects may cause. This limits the use of the "good" insects. 	In addition, many consumers are not comfortable with the concept of "crawly" things on the plants they bring home, regardless of whether they are beneficial.

Some of the locations where these insects may be more effectively used are in botanical gardens and conservatories, interior plantscapes, such as those found in some hotel lobbies, malls, and business complexes, and the fruit and vegetable industry. For those parts of the commerical plant world, perfection of plant specimens isn't as necessary, and in fruit and vegetables, the leaves where the insects reside are generally not harvested.

Another reason for a slow acceptance is that the insects can be difficult to maintain. Predatory mites such as those introduced at UW-RF prefer an environment that is warm and humid--almost completely opposite to the warm, dry environment preferred by the "bad" mites. The chemicals applied also need to be watched more carefully, to be certain that none of them negatively affect the beneficial mites. The two kinds of mites also prefer to live on different plants, which can also add to the challenge.

So far in the UW-RF experiment, it appears as if the "good" mites are winning the first battles, according to Waletzko. He said intial follow-up shows that there have been changes in the populations of "bad" mites. The challenge for Waletzko, Ferriss, and the students will now be to determine which of the "good" mites are winning the war, and exactly how effective they are.

"It will be particularly interesting and stimulating to watch and learn from this family.  The Cepede family goes back generations in Puerto Rico.  They have passed the traditional dances, particularly La Bomba, and the music through many generations," Zhe said.

All lessons will be offered on Wednesday evenings beginning Jan. 7 and running eight weeks. No class will be held Jan. 21. The classes are taught by Deann Bauer, who has been a skating instructor for 17 years. She has been a member of the Ice Skating Institute of America (ISIA) for 15 years, and is qualified for judging and testing.

"My Graduation Speech," as Caskey titled the presentation, was a compilation of thoughts written by "Brad"--as Caskey was identified while attending the University as an undergraduate in the 1970's--and "Dr. Caskey," who was expected to deliver the final product.

Caskey was selected to deliver the speech to 264 undergraduate and graduate degree candidates because of his selection as the  the 34th recipient of the highest University honor, that of its Distinguished Teacher.

"I am sorry that my paper was a few days late, but on Monday my nanno kitty got sick and I had to rush to the store to buy a new set of batteries.  On my way to the store, my car got a flat tire, my great aunt died and I got strep-throat.  The dean of students office can provide you with a note documenting these disasters if you need one," "Brad" explained.

The speech provided a transition between the generation of the graduates and the generation of their parents: it delivered social commentary that paralleled the speeches or writings of several well-known persons.

From King he added: "I had a dream that someday, all students - freshmen, sophomores, juniors, seniors and graduate - will understand that asking a faculty member, "Are you going to go over anything interesting or important in class today?" does constitute a stupid question."

Larry Larson, an employee in custodial services, and Annette Blanchette, a student status examiner who aids elementary education majors in course selection and planning in the College of Education, are recipients of the "Chancellor's Recognition Award to Classified Staff."

Larson and Blanchette were honored at the annual classified employee Holiday Luncheon Dec. 12, where the Chancellor acknowledged their outstanding performance over and above the requirements of their positions. 	Selection criteria included success in fulfilling the overall responsibilities of the job description, participation in University service projects outside of the job description and human relations skills.

Blanchette, whose hometown is Oshkosh, has been employed with the University for 31 years.  She began as a library assistant and then transferred to the educational technology center before assuming her current position.  Blanchette will be retiring in February.

Minnesota and one in Wisconsin, to receive custom designed technical assistance from Cooperative Development Initiative personnel and others over a two-year period.  Generally, projects consist of groups from multiple communities, although innovative projects from multiple groups within a single community will be considered.  What is important is that the group wants to function using the principles of cooperation and collaboration.

David Trechter, director of the Cooperative Development Initiative, and an extension specialist in cooperatives at UW-RF.  "As resources get stretched tighter,  and problems are beyond the scope or capacity of a single community or organization, more and  more groups are choosing to collaborate to resolve common issues."

Projects the Cooperative Development Initiative has assisted in its first three years illustrate the diversity of the local issues that can be addressed cooperatively.  Those projects include: the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance, a consortium of 19 communities that are cooperatively promoting the St. Croix Valley as a tourism destination; the Northwest Minnesota Development Achievement Center Cooperative, a cooperative nonprofit to improve services for developmentally disabled adults; the Minnesota Agro-Forestry Cooperative, a producer-owned supply and marketing cooperative of hybrid poplar growers in central Minnesota; the Barron County Transportation Coordinating Committee, an effort to improve and expand transportation in Barron County, Wis., through the coordination of services and resources; and the Czech Area Development Committee, representatives from three Minnesota communities working to improve development opportunities in their area through coordinated land use planning among jurisdictions, and addressing transportation issues.

The fair was a cooperative effort among the School of Business & Economics, the College of Education and Graduate Studies, and the College of Arts & Sciences.  The cooperative education and intern office in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences was also involved in the seminar held on Oct. 21.  It is designed to bring employers and students together to give both parties an opportunity to test the employment market.  This year, over 1,200 students took advantage of the career fair to show their faces and their interest in the job market to over 100 companies.

Kundinger's job was to coordinate and plan the event, with guidance from a supervisor and an advisory committee.  The UW-RF senior says she relied on the successes and mistakes from last year's fair, her initiative and common sense to pull off the event.

Kundinger's supervisor, Professor Terry Ferris of the plant and earth science department, commented that the intern's confident, "positive, 'can do' attitude went a long way" for the intern.  "Karen is the type of individual who will jump in and get the job done," Ferris said.

Kundinger also worked in cooperation with June Schubert, the career services coordinator.  This year the campus-wide career fair was held in conjunction with the department of counseling and career service's "Walk-Through Workshop." The department offered such services as mock interviews, advice on appropriate dress for interviews, resume reviewing and writing, as well as a lunch and dinner that instructed students on proper table etiquette.

Schubert said she was extremely impressed with Kundinger's efficiency, responsibility, and great ideas.  Schubert stresses that the process of coordinating the career fair involves much more than mere paperwork: sending invitations to over 500 businesses, confirming their attendance, planning the schedule for the day and making sure that everything ran smoothly.  According to Schubert, "There is a lot of detail involved and Karen handled it all extremely well.  No one ever had to worry that things would get done--and get done efficiently."

Another major task was gaining visibility for the event, a challenge to someone who never considered herself a creative person.  Kundinger devised the theme of "An Oasis of Opportunities," because of its warm, inviting appeal.  The theme appeared on publications, brochures, bookmarks and flyers, and made Kundinger extremely proud.

Schubert noted that promotion of the fair had always been a bit of a problem in the past, but not this year because Kundinger had so many successful ideas. One that was particularly impressive was the idea of placing a sandwich board on campus to count down the days until the career fair as a reminder to students to get their resumes in order, to find the right clothes to wear to their interviews, and to be prepared for employers' questions.

The number of companies attending the fair this year was up about 20 percent from last year, and student participation increased as well.  The fact that employers are recruiting because of western Wisconsin's healthy economy, along with the convenience of the fair (100 companies lining the walls for students to choose from), and the relaxed atmosphere makes it an extremely productive event.  The campus surroundings are less intimidating then a formal interview, and, as Kundinger adds, "If you aren't satisfied, or don't hit it off with one company you can literally just go on and try again at the next."

In December, Kundinger will graduate with a degree in horticulture, and when she does she feels she will be a step ahead of her competition in the job market because of her experience as the career fair intern.

"Coordinating the career fair may not seem to have a lot to do with a major in horticulture, but I have always wanted to work with the people and the plants.  It has to be 50-50 for me to be happy," Kundinger explains.

Schubert, for one, believes that Kundinger could pick any one of her ideas for the future, saying, "We were fortunate to have Karen coordinate the fair this year.  She is quick and sharp, an excellent writer, a good student with a great work ethic. Just take one look at her resume and you'll see that Karen will succeed no matter what she does."

"This new January Term is an excellent opportunity for continuing students to pick up an additional class.  Students from this area attending other colleges who are home for the holidays may also wish to take one of these classes. These are regular college classes which should be transferable to any college or university," Tuchtenhagen noted.

Dean Neal Prochnow of the UW-RF College of Arts & Sciences notes that Tschetter's selection to lead the team is a reflection on the quality faculty of the University's School of Business & Economics. He added that although Tschetter will be gone for two years, his experiences will be add measurably to his classroom teaching on his return.

"Tom will have the opportunity to lead a team of senior professionals who are working with International Accounting Standards for an entire nation. This experience will be of tremendous value to our students as we prepare them professionally to work in an ever-expanding international business environment. Moldova is just one of many nations that is evolving into a free-market economy. Tom's experiences with them will be invaluable when he returns to the classroom."

Tschetter traveled to Moldova for two-months this summer with the non-profit organization Citizens Democracy Corps based in Washington, D.C. The CDC recruits senior-level entrepreneurs and executives as volunteers to prepare local companies for economic success in Russia, the Ukraine and Central Europe.

"Imports are taking over and they need to make their own merchandise and adopt a profit system, which they have never done before," Tschetter says.  "By doing this, it will prevent their economy from becoming stagnant."

The artists will bring together diverse subject matter and media into a show that emphasizes the themes of ritual and passage.  Students will showcase works in glass blowing, painting, black and white photography and jewelry.

This annual art sale features artwork of current UW-RF  art students and alumni, current and retired faculty, and local professionals.  The proceeds are distributed in part to the Student Art League and to the Art Scholarship fund.  The sale includes glass, ceramics, jewelry, fibers, painting, printmaking, and photography.

It isn't every day that a college student conducts a study that goes public in four states.  But UW-River Falls geography major and River Falls native Mike Tronrud did with his senior thesis comparing local elders' memories of past winters to actual weather data from the same years.

The idea for this study was one that Tronrud's mentor, associate geography Professor Don Petzold, says he had in the back of his mind for the past 20 years, but never had the time to complete.  When he suggested the idea to  Tronrud, the student admits he thought it was a little "weird," but liked the idea of doing original research.

He says that his research activities found him listening to stories much like those we've all heard grandma and grandpa tell about walking to school (uphill both ways) in blowing snow and frigid temperatures. Most certainly under conditions that were much worse than we have ever experienced.

To test whether their recollections were accurate, Tronrud then plotted and analyzed winter climate data for western Wisconsin, including the mean temperatures and snowfall for each year and each decade from 1920 to the present.

When Tronrud compared the data from the two sources, it was apparent that the seniors' memories did not correspond to the records.  What Tronrud concluded was that the elderly people he surveyed tended to recall one severe winter and then apply it to an entire decade.

Thirty-five percent of those surveyed claimed that the 1950's had the most snowfall. In reality, that decade produced the least snowfall overall.  However, the winter from 1950 to 1951 did produce the third highest snowfall ever in River Falls and surrounding areas.

The need to express the hardships of their youth was evident from the responses in Tronrud's study.  "Today, many people tend not to understand or respect what life was like growing up in the 1920's or '30's," Tronrud concluded.

Okay, so maybe it wasn't uphill both ways, Tronrud says, but also keep in mind that today buses pick up and bring home school kids over roads that have been plowed and salted. Winters of the past, without these and other technological advances in clothing, heating, and transportation, were much harder to deal with, even if they were a few degrees warmer or a little less snowy.

Tronrud was prepared to hear exaggerations in the seniors' memories, having heard childhood stories from his own grandpa and great-uncles. But he says he had no idea what to expect from the weather data.  Now, Tronrud sees that their exaggerations make sense.

"They were smaller then;  everything looked bigger.  They were not as mentally mature in those years that they walked to school.  The conclusion here is that technology advances, but memories do not," he reasons.

Hannah humorously called it the exposing of "one of the world's oldest ongoing frauds." He wrote, "Besides bad perms for men and dumb disco music, the '70's also was the coldest decade in recorded weather history.  And the average annual snowfall in this part of Wisconsin was deeper than any time since Herbert Hoover was in the White House."

But Petzold says he doesn't want the seriousness of the study to get lost in the humor of it. "This is a fairly serious study, and Mike did an outstanding job of researching and presenting it," he says.

Tronrud gave his presentation to the Wisconsin Geographical Society, and won first prize in the student's competition.  The study is now in the process of being reviewed for publication in a refereed journal.

Petzold says Tronrud is one of his best students.  He is a member of the geography honor society, has been on the Dean's list for several semesters, and will graduate with honors from the University, "It is rare for an undergraduate to do work - publishable work - of this caliber," Petzold adds.

Mary E. Hollister, a sophomore pre-elementary education major from Mondovi, and Amanda Zopp, a junior broad area agriculture major from Sheldon, were granted the scholarship incentive to pursue their dream of achieving a college education.

The Horatio Alger Association, a nonprofit educational organization founded in 1947,  focuses on recognizing outstanding Americans that have provided a critical link to motivate and educate America's youth.  The Association awards more than $1 million in grants and college scholarships annually to secondary school students who have overcome adversity and are recognized for their outstanding community involvement.

Alpha Zeta, founded in 1897 at Ohio State University, is the nation's oldest professional honorary society recognizing leadership, scholarship and service among persons in agriculture and natural resources.  To celebrate its 100th anniversary, Alpha Zeta chose to honor its distinguished members.

Josephson and Boehm were recognized at the Alpha Zeta Centennial Honor Roll recognition luncheon recently at the Summit on Food, Fiber and the Environment in Columbus, Ohio.  Honor Roll recipients, student members and participants in the 1997 Summit attended the luncheon designed to recognize past, present and future leaders in global food, fiber and agriculture.

Being named to the Honor Roll is a "tremendous honor" says Josephson.   "It made me proud to be part of the number of stalwarts who gathered in Columbus, Ohio, to receive the award-it makes you feel a little humble."

Boehm is the vice president of logistics at the Kroger Company in Cincinnati, Ohio.  He is a member of the International Food and Agribusiness Management Association and is on the People Working Cooperatively Board of Directors.  Boehm was a former assistant professor of agricultural economics at Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University.  Also, he was a recipient of the annual USDA Superior Service Award.

I don't care how much you pay for an education or how prestigious the college is . . . my four years at River Falls were fundamental to my career," Boehm says.  "Some of the faculty I was privileged to work with are still friends of mine today."

The outdoor artwork will highlight specific sites on campus.  Each piece of artwork-whether large or small, serious or whimsical-will be temporary.  Artists must construct artwork that can be completely removed after the exhibit.

Academic disciplines seeing the greatest demand among those new students include:  elementary education in the nationally ranked College of Education & Professional Studies; the sciences, particularly in the Centers of Excellence for undergraduate physics and chemistry, as well as in biotechnology, food sciences and biology; the School of Business & Economics; and in the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

Alvarez is the Student Services Coordinator as well as an adviser to the Latino Student Organization and the Native American Council.  She admits that participation in Multicultural Services is a time- and energy-intensive area, but says she feels privileged to be involved with the student organizations, to be a facilitator for conferences, to be active with community support programs, mentoring, cultural programming, Outreach education, guest lecturing and collaborations across campus.  To Alvarez, however, these events and actions are just "things" if they do not benefit students-not only students of color, but the entire student body and River Falls community.

According to Alvarez, a notable aspect of the institute is working with a dedicated group of faculty and staff in which "no one works in isolation and diversity is valued.  Besides personal and intellectual enrichment, diversity programming and the classroom bring strong support and provide and assist a socially just campus.  Everyone takes ownership for a great campus and I just want to make a meaningful contribution.  I want to give back to the community and promote the success of students," says Alvarez.

An important aspect to be remembered, according to Alvarez, is that today's college graduate who can communicate with diverse people and understand many different perspectives will gain a competitive edge in tomorrow's job market.

The Sabella Consort has been delighting audiences internationally for more than a decade.  The leader of the group, Rusty Sabella, is best known for his virtuosi performances of jazz guitar, mandolin and mandocello.  His ingenious combination of original jazz compositions, lively Irish reels and haunting melodies from centuries past has come to be called "Renaissance Jazz."

This season, the touring ensemble includes two exciting additions.  Travis Ranney will perform on a myriad assortment of acoustic and electronic woodwinds including saxophones, flutes and wind synthesizer.  Gary Fukushima will provide lush textures and improvisational keyboard skills with performances on piano and synthesizers.

The concert will end with all the choirs combining to sing five songs.  One of the combined choir numbers will be Brahms' "An Die Heimat" (My Homeland).  This number relates well to the theme of homecoming.  It talks about home and coming back to the place of joy and memories in life.

The purpose of his book is to portray the lives of gay southerners against the background of Southern cultures and discrimination: to show what it was like to be not only gay in the South, but black and gay in the South, or Jewish and gay,  or a lesbian woman in the South.

Up until the Stonewall riots in 1969, it was typical for gays to be harassed, arrested and have their names sprawled in the newspaper, for simply patronizing a bar.  When they fought back, during these three infamous days of riots, it was deemed the beginning of the gay movement.  But Sears explained that the movement began long before that.  He discussed the enormous impact of World War II and stressed the importance of the Kinsey Studies, which gained national attention in the 1940's when it reported that there were over 20 million gay men and women living in the United States.

The first organized homosexual group was actually formed as early as 1950, when seven people secretly began what was known as the "Mettachine Society."  In the mid-50's another group of gay men were more open and published their own magazine of stories, letters and book reviews.  Their actions landed them in the U.S. Supreme Court, however, when certain postmasters refused to carry the magazine.

He noted the differences in the movement, from a time when gay life meant the dangers of harsh jail sentences and commitment in mental institutions to police entrapment and murderous assaults.  There were confining divisions based on social class and race while those arguing that homosexuality was an illness, not a crime, were considered liberal.

Sears spent the entire week visiting selected classrooms, giving presentations on such topics as politics and philosophy of the gay movement, overcoming heterosexism and homophobia, gay issues in the workplace, constructing sexual identity and more.

As a professor of curriculum and higher education in the doctoral program of the department of educational leadership and policies at the University of South Carolina, Sears has written over 100 book chapters, articles, essays and scholarly papers, as well as five books.

He graduated summa cum laude from Southern Illinois University with a bachelor's degree in history and got his master's from the UW-Madison in political science.  He earned his doctorate in sociology and education from Indiana University.

Sears has served as a visiting instructor at Trinity University in Texas, the National College of Education in Illinois, and the Center for Feminist Research at the University of Southern California, as well as a research fellow at ONE Institute.  His overseas teaching and research experience includes work in South America, Africa and Southeast Asia.

His teaching and research have attracted national attention, as well as its share of criticism.  But Sears responds to the criticism by saying, "We are quickly becoming a tribal nation, but in the coming 'culture wars' there will be no victors, only victims.  If we've learned any lessen from history, it is that victory comes at a price; the vanquished will rise again."

Schils won the award in the dressage event of the competition, which involves leading a horse through a series of non-jumping movements.  The horses are judged on the grace, dynamics and fluidity of their movements.

Schils says that audience members who watch dressage should come away impressed by the beauty of the experience. The movement of rider and horse should evoke the same appreciation as ballet or figure skating.

Schils attended the competition last month in Mason City, Iowa-one of the host sites for the national show.  About 200 riders qualified to participate in nine levels of competition, ranging from beginners to those more advanced.

This is the second consecutive year Schils' and her Dutch Warmblood horse have won at the national competition.  She admits this is rather unusual.  The horse has showed progressive improvement by winning the training level two years ago, the first level last year and now the third level this year at either the regional or national level.

"You keep an eye on where you are now and be happy with the day-to-day progress.  As long as you're pleased with yourself and your progress, you'll eventually get better and end up where you want to be."

Schils attributes the award to her broad base of knowledge about managing horses properly.  Some critical areas are knowing proper training techniques and understanding nutrition and physiology.  The time a trainer actually spends on a horse's back is very minimal in comparison, according to Schils.

Vega, who is assistant dean of the College of Education & Graduate Studies, will join educators, area coordinators and members of the Board of Directors of Phi Delta Kappa International to conduct the business of the professional education fraternity and to take part in the Conference on Advocates for the Public Schools.

Phi Delta Kappa International promotes education through research, service, and leadership, with particular emphasis on publicly supported education.  Its membership includes professional educators form all fields of education.

Gorham has an extensive background in modern and Middle Eastern dance.   She has performed locally and internationally as a soloist and with the Nancy Hauser Dance Company, Jawaahi Dance Company, and the Children's Theater Company.  Her program explores such subjects as devotion, destruction, seduction and duty in this interesting evening of music and dance.

The Sugar Plum Fairy and the University of Wisconsin-River Fall will combine for an evening of magical, fairyland entertainment when the Minnesota Ballet presents the Nutcracker on Dec. 6 in the North Hall Auditorium.

This traditional interpretation of the holiday classic opens with a party filled with joyful children, wonderful dancing dolls and a magical Christmas tree.  But after midnight Clara witnesses a frantic battle between the evil Mouse King, commanding the mice, and the Nutcracker, leading the toy soldiers.  She is then escorted through the snow into a fairyland of breathtaking entertainments.

The company has become a Midwestern ballet treasure and a national and international touring company, covering Minnesota, Wisconsin, Missouri, and Central America.  Its reputation is built on an exciting blend of classical ballet, jazz, and modern works.

The Minnesota Ballet's repertoire ranges from Allen Fields' "Pas de Six," set to the lush music of Glazunov and costumed in elegant teal and green tutus, to Robert Gardner's playful "Four for Five," with colorful costumes and set that are reminiscent of Matisse cut-outs.

Fields expresses the passion of the company in saying, "Our live dance generates passion, spirituality, and an overwhelming feeling of belonging.  Dance has a voice that is universal.  If you are a breathing, moving human, you are dancing."  A review from La Prensa Grafica, San Salvador, El Salvador, raves, "the music and the dance were more than enough to inspire inner keys, profound and secret."

Barrett received the Outstanding Faculty Award for her work as an assistant professor with the department of health & human performance. Dean Kathleen Daly said Barrett's colleagues cited numerous contributions in nominating her for the award. "Betsy is an outstnading teacher and has also contributed in significant ways to her department, the College of Education & Graduate Studies, the University, and beyond," Daly said.

"The College of Education and Graduate Studies is very proud of the outstanding contributions that she has made to the campus community.  As this year's Outstanding Faculty Member, Ms. Betsy Barrett exemplifies excellence in teaching, research, scholarship, and university service."

Cited were her consistently high evaluations from students; use of information technologies in teaching coupled with various assessment techniques to measure their effectiveness; her University service in coordinating a Life Fitness program for faculty and staff; service on many department and institution committees; grant writing activities; and scholarly presentations.

Dean Gary Rohde noted, "In all of his dealing with students, his desire to teach and help produce a mature, professional and educated citizen is clearly apparent. For Lewi, every moment with a student is a 'teachable moment.' Lewi seems to be tireless in his quest to help students better themselves."

May was cited for his use of new technologies in his agricultural economics classes; coordinating the department's internship program; adviser to the Agricultural Economics Club; led the founding of the campus chapter of the National Agricultural Marketing Association, which has twice been selected as best chapter in the nation; and has been recognized nationally for his assistance the campus chapter of Alpha Zeta.

"John Shepherd is one of the most knowledgeable and creative experimental physicists that I have ever known. This is reflected in his design of the Junior lab sequence and the Swensen Sundial. Students note that 'he is very good at making difficult concepts interesting and understandable.' "

"Imtiaz Moosa takes great pride in preparing for his classes and initiating thought-provoking discussions. His students both recognize and appreciate this as is evident from their comments. 'Very interesting to listen to and he led very stimulating discussions.' 'Imtiaz really makes you think of all the ideas of all the viewpoints.' "

"I have worked with Nick Karolides for 12 years. His work with students as Associate Dean is always professional, caring and sensitive. It is no surprise that this is the most frequent comment made by students about his teaching. It is also no surprise that he was recognized as an outstanding teacher in the college. He won the UW-RF Distinguished Teahcing Award in 1971 and the Regents Teaching Excellence Award in 1994."

"Rik Seefeldt is an example of what teaching is all about at UW-River Falls. The students commented not only about his classroom teaching, but also about the time that he devoted to advising them about their academic programs, their careers, and their futures."

Seefeldt is a licensed psychologist who, along with his duties as psychology department chair, teaches undergraduate courses in General Psychology, Abnormal Psychology, Introduction to Counseling, Introduction to Clinical Psychology and a graduate course in Psychopathology. He is also the coordinator for the department's field internships.

Shepherd teaches Advanced Laboratory, Fortran, Data Analysis, and Engineering Statistics, as well as general astronomy. He advises pre-engineering majors in the department. He is editor of the Wisconsin Physics newsletter for high school science teachers, and he also has been involved in such research topics as light scattering in dust clouds around stars.

Moosa has been a member of the philosophy department since 1989, where he specializes in aesthetics and Oriental and Islamis religious philosophy. He teaches such couses as the Philosophy of Art, the Philosophy of Law, and Oriental and Islamic Religious Philosophy. He also serves on numerous University committees.

UFO enthusiast Hastings will present a 90-minute slide show illustrating that the U.S. government has covered up the existence of UFOs.  Hastings will attempt to prove his theory by citing evidence in recently declassified government documents.  Audience members will be invited to view the 600 pages Hastings has obtained through the Freedom of Information Act.

Among the evidence he will present, Hastings claims to have a copy of an official government memorandum written in 1950 that reports, "flying saucers crashed in New Mexico and were secretly recovered by the U.S. Air Force.  Aboard the craft were found bodies of human shape but only three feet tall."

A seminar focusing on the theory of multiple intelligences, presented by Howard Gardner, professor of education and co-director of Project Zero at the Harvard Graduate School of Education, is scheduled for November at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

Gardner will reflect on the theory of  multiple intelligences and its evolution over the last decade, focusing on some of the new conceptions that have emerged and describing efforts to identify new intelligences.  The theory has proved controversial within psychology and has generated considerable interest in educational circles both in the United States and abroad.

Some of the major themes to be discussed in the seminar are:  learning, psychology/development, mental-representation, redefining intelligence, the eight intelligences, MI applications/ MI myths, the unschooled mind, and enemies of understanding.  Other topics to be discussed will be cognitive revolution, intelligence testing, uniform schools, individualized education, the relativity of intelligence, cognitive Freudianism, direct-confrontations, multiple entry points and understanding-performances.

He published the book, "Frames of Mind:  The Theory of Multiple Intelligences," in 1983, which was intended as a critique of contemporary psychometric approaches to intelligence and also as a presentation of a new approach to thinking about human cognition.  Viewing intelligence as the capacity to solve problems and fashion products that are valued in the culture, Gardner proposed at least seven relatively autonomous human intelligences.

Comments must address substantive matters to the quality of professional education programs offered at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, and should specify the respondent's relationship, if any, to the institution (i.e., graduate, present or former faculty member, employer of graduates). Copies of all correspondence received will be sent to UW-River Falls for comment prior to the review.  No anonymous or oral testimony will be considered.

The unveiling will come during a Sesquicentennial information session set to begin at 7 p.m. at the Kruger Auction Services Building, 218 S. Main St. The event will include an update on planning activities, as well as hors d'ouevres.

"The unveiling will be a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity for many of us to kick off the Sesquicentennial and celebrate the city's birthday. What we do over the next year-and those who participate-may well be the resource as River Falls next celebrates its Bicentennial in another 50 years."

Halaas notes the committee has been busy researching how the community celebrated its Centennial celebration in 1948, and hopes to gain participation from those individuals, businesses, institutions and community organizations that played a role in the last commemoration.

Among the many who have already stepped forward is Helen Wyman, who created many of the artistic motifs that were used to celebrate the Centennial. Wyman's artwork is being updated for the Sesquicentennial and will be featured on such souvenirs as note cards and placemats.

The committee also plans to sanction events sponsored by community organizations or businesses in 1998 that include a relationship to the 150th birthday celebration and encourage them to display the Sesquicentennial logo in their promotional activities.

Volunteers also will be sought to serve on a variety of committees, including: publicity; projects administration; sanctioning of community events to use the Sesquicentennial logo; historical research for River Falls artifacts and memorabilia, and oral histories to incorporate into the celebration; and a souvenirs committee that will commission Sesquicentennial souvenirs, with profits earmarked for promotional activities.

Recognized by a national parenting organization for his work as a leader in parent education, Brickner has an enthusiastic, humorous approach to providing parents with helpful parenting materials and teaching them specific skills that can be used immediately.

"Totems, in any of the myriad cultures that have fashioned them, are touchstones of one's connection to the inexplicable forces beyond the individual and family," Koch says.  "Totems have traditionally honored this relationship with symbolic elements drawn from immediate reality."

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls' Chalmer Davee Library has come a long way since its meager beginnings as one small room, when the University was founded in 1874.  In response to new and ever-changing technologies, the library has recently undergone significant construction and remodeling and on Oct. 8 at 3 p.m., the library will be rededicated in the name of Dr. Chalmer Davee.

The building now includes a three-level entrance with a lobby area on each level, additional study space, additional shelving for book and periodical growth and a number of group study rooms.  The project also added compact storage areas and an electronic bibliographic instruction classroom to the library.  Also, Davee Library is now home to such services as the Academic Success Center, the Writing Center and Information Technology Services, including five computer labs.

The Red Computing Laboratory will be dedicated to Dan Lunderville, who worked as a senior information processing consultant in Academic Computing until his death in 1995.  Lunderville worked to establish the original Red Lab in North Hall and maintained and connected it to the campus network and the Internet. He served as chair of the Academic Staff Council and received the Chancellor's Award for Excellence in 1987, the University's highest recognition award for professional staff.

Major technological improvements continued in the library during the 1980' and 1990's, including the first on-line catalog, which replaced the card catalog format that had been used for over 100 years.

According to Virgil Nylander, vice chancellor for administration and finance, the outcome of the library remodeling project was definitely worth the wait and inconvenience of a project plan that required the Library to remain in use during renovation.

"When we look to the future, we look to the prize," Nylander said.  "That prize is a new library that's much more compatible for student and faculty use." The library certainly has come a long way in the past 46 years.  It has become much more than just a building, now holding over 200,000 books;  it has become the information and knowledge center of the entire campus.

Professor Lou Greub of the plant & earth science department co-authored three scientific poster papers and was the presenting author for two of them at the XVIII International Grassland Congress in Canada.

Along with university, government and agribusiness personnel, dairy, beef and sheep farmers, ranchers and forage producers from several countries attended and participated in many of the formal programs of the conference.

More than 40 percent of the world's land area is classified as natural grazing land, and about one-fourth of the cultivated land produces tame forage crops in countries such as the United States.  Consequently, over one-half of the world's agricultural area produces forage of some type.

The productivity and use of forage resources have a great impact on the economic and nutritional status of millions of people. Inappropriate use of natural grasslands for activities like overgrazing, and failure to include forage crops in a cropping system on hilly land, which is present in many parts of Wisconsin, can have serious undesirable environmental effects.

During the conference, participants went on half-day mid-Congress tours.  They traveled between Winnipeg and Saskatoon and were introduced to Canadian forage-based agriculture, commercial seed production and some of the picturesque parkland sites of central Canada.

Also, half-day local excursions out of both Winnipeg and Saskatoon provided opportunities for participants to visit over 30 sites of technical, cultural or historic interest.  Among these were seed-processing plants, conservation projects and nature centers, potash mines, an ethanol plant and a Hutterite colony.

"A lot can be gained in the struggle to increase the world's food supply and fend off starvation by managing more effectively the forage resources for meat and milk production in developing countries," Greub says.

The technical paper and invited speaker portion of the Congress was divided into 30 different themes to accommodate all facets of grasslands and forages.  Themes encompassed all aspects of forage production and use in both temperate and tropical grassland agriculture, including environmental concerns and economic impacts.

Uniquely, this group's study may be one of the first, if not the first, U.S. Department of Agriculture funded research project involving the cooperative efforts of state universities and a large, private agricultural business, says Greub.

The study evaluated the use of reed canarygrass as an environmentally safe means of using large quantities of liquid dairy manure. Similar stands of the grass were established at the UW- RF Lab Farm I, which is a dairy farm; in Waseca, Minnesota; and in Webster City, Iowa.

Identical liquid manure and fertilizer nitrogen treatments were then applied at the three locations over a two-year period.  Data were taken on the amounts of nitrogen applied, the yield and nitrogen content of the harvested reed canarygrass forage, and the nitrate content in the soil and soil water under each treatment.

One objective of the study was to relate manure application rates to the losses of nitrogen, in the form of nitrates, leaching into the soil with the downward movement of soil water.  Such nitrate compounds have the potential to find their way into the groundwater and contaminate drinking water supplies.

Basically, the research team found that a good stand of reed canarygrass can effectively use the nitrogen from up to 40,000 gallons of dairy slurry per acre per growing season without nitrate loss into the ground water on the silty clay loam soils of southern Minnesota and northern Iowa.

However, on sandy soils, which can be found at the River Falls site, the maximum rate of manure application would have to be restricted to 30,000 gallons or less to prevent nitrate losses into the ground water.

While at the conference, Greub discovered that a group from Sweden was presenting a series of papers on the use of reed canarygrass biomass for fuel and the production of pulp for paper and other products.

He notes that it was interesting to find that some of the questions, problems, and issues that concern the United States are also of concern in other parts of the world.  Papers and discussion sessions addressing environmental concerns generated a lot of interest.  Delegates from Finland, New Zealand and Great Britain said that animal rights issues were hot topics in their countries.

"This one was during the summer when I'm not teaching and was closer than it ever has been in the past and probably ever will be again in the future, at least while I am around," Greub says.  "I found it to be one of the most interesting, stimulating, and educational conferences I have ever attended."

National award-winning artwork from 21 Wisconsin-Minnesota grade school students in kindergarten through sixth grade has been selected to be featured in a regional art exhibit-from a child's perspective.

The honorees were chosen in the Crayola Dream-Makers program sponsonered by Smith & Binney, the makers of Crayola products, to encourage the creative behavior and conceptual development of children through art activities. Held every two years, this year's exhibition theme "Tales to Tell," challenged students to weave words and pictures to illustrate real and imaginary stories.

"The exhibit is a wonderful way to put a spotlight on how important art can be as one of the ways children learn and express themselves," says Lynn Jermal, UW-RF art professor and program coordinator for the event.  "The exhibit is so beautiful and engaging.  It brings up the standards for everyone about arts education."

The artwork of one of Girtz's students was chosen to be in the exhibit.  Eight-year-old Colton Stanger from Willow River Elementary in Hudson created a pen and water color work titled "The Northern Lights."

"All of the students' works could be in the show," says Girtz.  "It is a wonderful opportunity even for the boys and girls who could not be in the show.  The activities they did were very colorful and imaginative."

Stout believes the Dream-Makers program acts as a learning tool for daily life. "Students get to learn that you have to make art that holds a viewer's attention.  And having to write about their artwork helps them learn how to express themselves," Stout says.

The trail is intended for walking and biking transportation, to and through campus for students and community residents.  The primary design is for transportation, not recreation, however, according to Campus Planner Dale Braun, "You can't hardly walk along the South Fork River and not notice its beauty and recreational aspects."

The initiation for the project came from the fact that almost 500 students live in the vacinity of West Johnson Street at the south end of town. " These students either walk the long, cold trail through the Knowles area, or walk down Main Street, or drive to class, which is also poses parking problems," said Braun.  "Other paths have been found or made down steep hills that could potentially be dangerous.  To me, the importance is in having a safer trail for the students."

The toughest part in the funding, according to Braun, was from the State Building Commission, which has to authorize every project in Wisconsin. It recently gave the campus some $73,000 and the authorization to go ahead with the project.

Construction on the trail is scheduled to begin in spring 1998 by Cedar Corp. of Menomonie, and is expected to take four to five months to complete.  The trail will be paved, with adequate lighting, landscaping and signage.

One section of the trail will run east to west the length of campus, starting behind Johnson Hall.  Another section will run north to south, from the corner of Broadway and Sycamore streets, to cross at the Wall Amphitheater.

Braun recognized all those who realize that safe transportation for students and the community is as important as the construction and repairing of buildings and who have been generous with their money.  "A special thanks goes out to those taking care of that need."

This pilot is affliated with the "America Reads Challenge," which was a federal program initiated by President Clinton to ensure that all children read independently and at the appropriate grade level by the time they leave the third grade. The program is federally funded, with the UW-RF students allowed to use Work/Study Program money as wages while assisting the district. Typically, Work/Study payments have been used to subsidize student workers providing assistance to the University.

The large numbers of education majors at UW-River  Falls provides the good opportunity for those students to get their foot in the door and receive some real-life work experiences in the education field, as well as providing the school district with qualified tutors, according to UW-RF personnel.

The College of Education & Graduate Studies, which is ranked as one of the 10 best teacher education programs in the nation, will provide 20 students to tutor K-8 students in the areas of reading strategies, writing strategies, and math skills.

Dave Woodward, UW-RF director of financial assistance, believes that the program will benefit the college students with experiences such as interviews, on-the-job experience, and contacts for later jobs, such as student teaching.

Clinton's challenge is for Universities to use 53 percent of the new Federal Work Study money in the communities to assist elementary school youngsters with their reading skills.  According to Woodward, "This program will provide more assistance in terms of help they (the River Falls schools) can give to the students."

The America Reads Challenge builds on the foundation being laid by classroom teachers, librarians and reading specialists by drawing upon the invigorating spirit of community volunteers in tutoring and mentoring.  The fundamental purpose of the program is to enable parents and educators to complement and expand existing successful literacy efforts to help many more children increase their skills and achievement levels, and to provide additional help in reading with extended learning time to children who need it most.

Generally, the federal government provides up to 75 percent of the Federal Work Study wages that are paid to students, while the employers must contribute at least 25 percent of their funds.  With the America Reads Challenge, the work study money that students receive will be fully funded by federal dollars.

Paulson believes that there are a number of ways that this program will help the community, the organizations, and the individuals involved.  There is an ongoing need to help students, and the River Falls school district has addressed this problem before with volunteer programs.  The America Reads Challenge is another example of the University and district collaborating to meet each other's needs, he said.

Paulson hopes that the children will help others when they are adults, as well.  If they get the help they need form an older adult, hopefully they will return the favor to future children when they are adults.

According to Paulson, "Everyone profits, including society, when someone helps a child.  Children are our future, and if they aren't getting the help they need now, they may never get it.  By helping children, you are also helping yourself and ensuring a good future for everyone."

According to Woodward, if the pilot program proves successful between UW-RF and the River Falls School District this year, the University will pursue similar partnerships with other surrounding school districts.

Also invited to show their works are Shana Kaplow and David Madzo. Julie Baugnet, UW-River Falls Curator and painting instructor, chose these particular artists because of their sensibilities toward the painted surface and their diverse imagery.

Area senior citizens can study a range of topics including prairie restoration, watercolor, mental health and art, and natural landscapes in Session I of the Senior Outreach Studies program at UW-River Falls.

Citing his own opportunity for a six-month development leave, UW-River Falls Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau on Monday encouraged faculty and staff to view the upcoming academic year as an opportunity for renewal.

Some 400 faculty and staff heard from Thibodeau and other University leaders on Monday as the campus prepares to launch its current academic year. Classes will begin for an estimated 5,375 students on Sept. 2.

When the new freshman class arrives on Friday to move into residence halls for the start of classes on Sept. 2, it will be one of the best in the institution's 123-year history. Thibodeau noted the freshman class has an average ACT score of 22.7 , and almost 88 percent are in the top half of their high school graduating classes.

"Obviously, this process of renewal doesn't start and end with the beginning of the school year. In higher education, we have the unique opportunity to professionally renew ourselves through our work and through the opportunities for growth and development provided by sabbatical leaves and a wide array of other professional development opportunities," Thibodeau said.

The chancellor returned in July from a six-month leave in which he pursued an array of projects. They included reviewing and expanding the campus's role with higher education institutions in Eastern Europe and the Pacific Rim, and researching the impact of information technologies on teaching outcomes.

Thibodeau noted that the University has positioned itself for many renewal opportunities as a result of its strategic planning process, "Reach for the Future." Now entering the third year of a five-year process, the plan is intended to prepare the campus for the educational and information technology challenges of the 21st Century. It will shift $2.5 million into academic support, information technology, and faculty and staff development.

"Our Reach for the Future initiative is a powerful renewal process for the entire campus. It provides a unique opportunity to keep us new, fresh and strong. The University community worked hard to develop a process designed to engage a broad cross-section of every University constituency in a pervasive and very open and informed shared-governance environment."

He said he disagreed with news reports which contend that state government continues to operate as business as usual, despite the lack of funding. "I do not agree, and I told Gov. Thompson of the difficulties when he was on campus earlier this summer. In addition to the erosion of public trust in the legislative process, we are experiencing growing problems in managing our resources and planning our programs and services for the year ahead."

On another matter, he said that three major building projects have all been slowed as a result of bidding difficulties. While each was designed by a separate architect, all were 20 to 24 percent over the project's allocation.

"The only explanation that has been offered to us is that we are in a poor bidding climate in western Wisconsin. Few of the major contractors from eastern Wisconsin or the Twin Cities showed an interest in these projects. We didn't have many bids to begin with. It seems that business is so good and the skilled labor market is tight, so bids are high." Thibodeau noted the University is not alone, citing high bids on the new River Falls Public Library and a New Richmond school project.

On the positive side, Thibodeau noted, planning for a new $2.8 million Dairy Teaching Facility has been approved, and a dedication ceremony has been set for Oct. 8 for the remodeled Chalmer-Davee Library.

Two important information technology projects also have been completed: the complete intra campus wiring project to connect all buildings, and the completion of four technologically enhanced classrooms and the purchase of six mobile technical units.

Provost Robert Milam will lead a campus-wide initiative to ensure that women faculty and staff are provided the opportunity to assume greater leadership roles. Milam has already met with the Commission on The Status of Women to develop an action agenda.

As an intellectual gay activist living in the deep South, Sears has attracted national attention and angered many conservative Southerners;  he was denounced as the "Satan of the University" by the Rev. Pat Robertson of the 700 Club.  At the same time, his work has undoubtedly opened the minds of many;  he was awarded the American Civil Liberties Union's First Amendment Award.

According to UW-RF Provost Robert Milam, visiting professors like Sears are essential in keeping with the University's objective to "remain guided by professional ethics and open to a wide array of differing perspectives and viewpoints." He added that Sears will "provide a window to the ideas and perspectives which will enable graduates to interact successfully in the global marketplace."

Sears is a professor of curriculum and higher education in the doctoral program of the department of educational leadership and policies at the University of South Carolina. He graduated summa cum laude from Southern Illinois University with a bachelor's degree in history, earned his master's in political science from UW-Madison and his doctorate in sociology and education from Indiana University.

During his week-long stay at UW-RF, Sears will be addressing lesbian, gay and bisexual concerns through lectures and workshops based on his books,  homophobia and heterosexism, and cultural studies.  His workshops focus on faculty response to student sexual diversity, the development of tolerance and doing local and regional historic research.

He will be meeting with various groups, including the Gay/Straight Alliance, University Committee on LGB Concerns & Safe Space Committee, and diversity awareness groups.  He will also be available in all departments for individual faculty and staff consultations.

During the early nineties, Sears worked as the editor of "Empathy," an interdisciplinary journal on sexual identities.  He was also the founder and past president of the American Educational Research Association's lesbian and gay studies special interest group.

Included among the many weekend activities are a cocktail and hors d'oeuvres hour and a display by the University Old Car Club and the presentation of the St. Croix Summer Theater's "Forever Plaid" on Friday.

A block of rooms in the residence halls have been reserved for alumni who really wish to get back the feeling of college life. To obtain accommodation information or to register for the weekend, call Dan McGinty in the Alumni Office at 715/425-3505.

Connolly graduated from Iowa State University with a bachelor's degree in farm operations and a background in agronomy and livestock.  He began his career as the farm operator at Iowa State University before coming to UW-River Falls in 1985 as the assistant director under former Laboratory Farm Director Rudy Erickson.

When Erickson retired in 1996, Connolly was offered the interim Lab farm directorship. Dean Gary Rohde appointed him to the position on the recommendation of the the college's Farm Advisory Board. He was appointed permanently to the job in January.

As the lab farm director, Connolly manages and supervises the two University farms, which he says run very similar to regular farm operations, taking into consideration the livestock crop and dairy production.

The differences Connolly notes are in the purchasing and business operations aspects.  Unlike a regular farm, everything has to be run through the University, which means extra paperwork because of its status as a state agency.  Some of his office practices include analysis and summarization of farm records and transactions, processing bills and receipts and ordering products.  He is also responsible for making decisions regarding major purchases and sales of livestock and crops.

The business aspect is the hardest part for Connolly to get used to, but  Rhode says of Connolly, "I have confidence that he will do an excellent job as our Farm Director,... he is a competent and capable individual."

Connolly likes what he considers the "juggling" of the job.  "One minute I can be doing paper work in the office, and in an hour I can be out working on a silo, or getting a tractor ready for the fields."  He also likes the interaction with the University and the public.

Aside from the management and book work responsibilities, Connolly stresses an even more important responsibility: the importance of working closely with faculty and being available for students. The main purpose of the lab farms is educational through activities such as farm cropping operations, organizational activities and visitor tours, laboratory class activities, applied research projects and student employment, all of which Connolly manages and  supervises.

Connolly believes it is important to give students from all backgrounds the opportunity to become familiar with farm management practices. He believes the University offers excellent lab classes through a good agriculture science department that is dedicated to teaching.

Connolly is also a member of the Dairy Committee and is active in the planning stages of the new dairy facilities. Planning money has been released for the facility with the likelihood that it will be constructed in the next four years in the Mann Valley Farm.

Connolly also is pursuing his master's degree through an off-campus master of agriculture degree program through Iowa State University.  The program is perfect for people like Connolly, who work full time and lead busy lives and do not have easy access to their program of interest.  Connolly rarely ever has to travel to Iowa, as the program offers almost all of the curriculum through videotapes.

Connolly admits that this type of program is difficult to do and jokes that he is in the 15-year master's plan.  But he also is very pleased with the program and the faculty he works with.  "If I have a question all I have to do is send an e-mail message and I have an answer usually in less than an hour."  He appreciates their support.  "They understand that most of the students in the program are working full time in addition to studying the courses.  Their motto is 'don't give up, however long it takes.'"

Students had the opportunity to take classes in areas such as art, Spanish, bookmaking, sign language, aerospace, astronomy and fly fishing. Other programs offered included "Egyptian Art and Artifacts," "Stars on Stage," "Claris Works for Kids," and "Wild Wisconsin."

July 1:  Runaway:  Together, the duo of Dan Sebrank and John Smith perform music described as contemporary new folk-acoustic with a little more punch.  Runaway captivates the audience with their spontaneity, good nature and upbeat personalities.

July 8:  Friedlander and Hall: These acoustic guitarists prefer to turn back the clock, specializing in jazz swing versions of classic songs from the '20's, '30's, and '40's.  Their versatility and willingness to please audiences of all ages has earned them star status on the summer outdoor concert circuit.

According to program coordinator Karen Leichtle, participants in this unique learning experience had the opportunity not only to be involved in challenging, interesting and enjoyable course topics, but to meet other talented young people from western Wisconsin and to work directly with University faculty and other highly qualified instructors as well.

Courses ran from June 9 -13 and include such topics as fly fishing and stream entomology, Spanish, producing radio plays, exploring the information superhighway, scuba diving, , alternative energy systems, creating beaded jewelry, bookmaking, journalism, and board games from around the world. Students also will participate in programs, including "Deutsch Macht Spass," "A Day at the Improv," and Wilder Wisconsin.

The scholarship is awarded annually to an incoming freshman who has demonstrated both academic excellence and leadership in school and community activities.  The award provides four years of full tuition and fees.

The selection process for the scholarship begins in the spring with a review of applications of incoming freshmen are reviewed for those with ACT scores of 28 or higher, according to David Woodward, UW-RF scholarships coordinator.

Applications for the scholarship are then sent out to students, inviting them to send letters of recommendation and examples of leadership abilities.  A University scholarship committee reviews the applications and chooses the recipient.

Weyauwega-Fremont High School guidance counselor Richard Altendorf, wrote of Brewer, "Christy Brewer is a highly motivated, intellectually gifted and creative young woman who has distinguished herself as a scholar and leader... Christy has really set herself apart from others in her commitment to FFA.  She has held many offices and been involved in many projects at the local, state and national level."

As assistant director Hansen travels to many different high schools to recruit students to attend UW-River Falls.  He also serves as the transfer coordinator, advising students who are transferring from other universities and community colleges.

According to Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, Hansen "has served not only the Admissions Office but the entire University in the most exemplary manner.  His knowledge, competence and commitment to this University are to be commended."

Hansen has been at River Falls since 1968 when he began as a college freshman.  He earned his bachelor's degree in history and secondary education, then continued on to graduate school.  He was hired in the admissions office upon graduation.

Since 1974 Hansen has handled public address responsibilities, announcing at various athletic events including basketball and hockey games.  He has long been a scorekeeper at men's basketball games and contributes his musical talents at athletic events through singing the national anthem.

Hansen contributes his time and talents to the community as well, through leading congregational singing as a cantor at St. Bridget's Church and through many years of participation in the summer community theater and the Phipps Theater Community Choir.

Hansen said he was surprised when he learned he had been selected to receive the Chancellor's Award. "I had no idea I was even being considered," he said. "It is gratifying to hear the comments and compliments;  it's nice to feel that what you do is appreciated. It really reaffirms your commitment to your job."

Tuchtenhagen said the University will continue to review academically highly qualified applicants or those in unique circumstances. However, other applicants will be considered either for the Spring Semester of 1998, or the next available term in Fall Semester of 1998.

Tuchtenhagen said enrollment was closed to honor an institutional commitment that all incoming first-year students will get a residence hall room and a full class schedule. Transfer students admitted after May 1 may not be eligible for a residence hall room.

Further, the survey demonstrates that a bachelor's degree continues to be the path of economic security while, as a result of taxpayer's subsidies, it is an investment that quickly recoups lost wages, tuition and expenses devoted to earning a degree.

"The economic impact of UW-River Falls is pretty obvious from this study," said UW-River Falls Provost Robert Milam. "But what is equally important is the quality of life that the University contributes to the St. Croix Valley. That is hard to quantify.

"The economic analysis is straightforward. But how can you measure the impact on the quality of life? Whatever factor we contribute on the economic side, I think, there is an equal contribution toward the quality of life that can't be measured."

Strang reaches a final economic impact dollar amount by multiplying the direct expenditures of $91 million by a conservative multiplier of 2.32. The multiplier signifies how many times that original dollar is "turned over" in local communities before it leaves.

The report also demonstrated that the time and expenses that students devote to pursuing a bachelor's degree represents an exceptional investment, with the average student recouping the investment in just three years after graduation due to higher earnings.

Based on the current cost of taking 4.5 years to complete a degree at UW-River Falls and the average annual lost earnings while pursuing the education, the total cost is about $39,500. But the additional lifetime earning represents a 22.67 percent return on the investment.

"The lesson has been that a high-quality university education has become more and more essential given the skills differentiation between unskilled jobs and employment requiring a university education," Strang said in his report.	The study also concludes that Wisconsin taxpayers earn a reasonable return on their investment. State tax dollars represent just one-third of the cost of a degree, with the balance coming from tuition, gifts and grants.

"Universities and their communities are almost without exception known as attractive places to live. People are drawn to positive images that a university town presents, such as libraries, cultural events, art exhibits, concerts, readings and, at heart, an engaged and lively community of thinkers," Strang concludes.

The policy forum is designed to enhance awareness of poverty issues under Wisconsin's current welfare reform.  The day-long forum will address issues of health and child care, education and employment.  It will begin with keynote speaker Laura Wittman who is the co-author of "In Our Own Words:  Mother's Perspectives on Welfare Reform," a statewide survey of women in poverty.

Panel and roundtable discussion groups will include a variety of knowledgeable individuals brought together to educate the public about both sides of welfare reform and its impact on those in poverty.  The discussion and panel groups will include legislators Sen. Alice Clausing (De-Menomonie) and Rep. Sheila Harsdorf (R-River Falls), human service professionals, individuals in poverty, daycare providers, and employment professionals from Pierce, St. Croix and Polk counties.

"I am very pleased and honored to have received this award.  It has been very exciting and rewarding to work with so many school districts and elementary teachers in making a transition from book-centered to hands-on learning," said Duerst.

Duerst received the award based upon her contributions and involvement in science education in many area Wisconsin and Minnesota school districts over the past 10 years.  Duerst's summer hands-on science workshops have improved science curricula throughout the 27 participating districts by helping teachers create an active and inquiry-based learning environment.

In 1986, Duerst designed a unique class for elementary education majors that she teaches at UW-River Falls. This course teaches practical concepts that can be applied in K-8 curriculum.  Duerst developed a lab manual for the class, which uses common materials available in supermarkets or drugstores.

WWST awards selection committee co-chair Don Bogdanske noted the award was presented to Duerst for her demonstrated excellence in education, innovative teaching methods, and the desire to improve and enhance the curriculum.

The ceremony also will include recognition of seven students who were presented the Chancellor's Award, the most significant honor that can be presented for service to the University; the Distinguished Teacher, which is the institution's highest faculty and staff award; and the Distinguished Alumnus award.

The tone of the seminar was set by LaMoine McLaughlin, owner of Amery's Northern Lakes Center for the Arts and president of the Wisconsin Assembly of Local Arts Agencies, who gave a keynote address stressing the importance of community and building a network among artists at a local level.  McLaughlin said that the general public should be educated about the value of art and its priority in society.

This seminar followed the award-winning "Creating the Successful Arts Business-Practical Approaches to Making a Living in the Arts" held last spring. It was a 1996 recipient of a regional Award for Excellence for a seven-state region for the upper Midwest of The University Continuing Education Association.

In addition to McLaughlin's speech, the 1997 seminar included an extended morning and an afternoon panel of artists, art administrators and consultants who answered questions from artists attending the seminar.  Following the discussions, breakout sessions conducted by area professionals addressed topics aimed at aiding artists in their quest to make a living through art.

It includes some 14,250 advancement professionals who specialize in such areas as educational fundraising, alumni relations, media relations, legislative and public affairs, publications and admissions. Its membership also includes  chancellors, presidents and deans.

"The CASE award recognizes the successful 'good neighbor' relationship that exists between UW-River Falls and the communities it serves in the St Croix River Valley. I am proud of the success of the Tourism Alliance and the leadership roles that UW-RF professionals have played in its development."

Your affiliation with the SCVRTA provides others with an ideal example of how a university can interact with its community to serve the public good. It is especially impressive that your partnership impacts so many communities, including several across your state border.

Coordinating the production of the Alliance's priority marketing project, "Seasons in the Scenic St. Croix Valley." It included the first recreational map ever produced of the Valley, as well as a visitors discount book.

Through a grant by the W.K. Kellogg Foundation to the Cooperative Development Initiative, UW-RF provided strategic planning and strategic marketing assistance to achieve membership and financial stability.

Through the CDI, printed and distributed an "ASK US" directory-a 120-page book outlining all visitors' amenities in the Riverway. This directory was distributed free to all federal, state and local information sites to respond to visitors' inquiries. It is available for sale to Alliance businesses.

Represented the tourism and hospitality industry to a six-state forum on tourism sponsored by the Ninth Federal Reserve District Advisory Council on Small Business, Agriculture and Labor. The session concluded with the Federal Reserve committing to developing reliable methods to measure tourism economic impact and to study the Fed's practices on lending to the hospitality and tourism industry.

"UW-River Falls has a greater vision in what it sees that it has in the way of resources it can share with all of the St. Croix River Valley. And as a partner, they share with the Valley what we in River Falls sometimes take for granted."

A physcist who has carved out a remarkable career in scientific aerospace research for the national space, defense and intelligence communities, as well as private businesses, has been named the 1997 Disingtuished Alumnus at UW-River Falls.

Godden earned a doctorate in physics from the University of Colorado where he specialized in high energy physics with a braod mathematics background. At the university, he also worked as a principal investigator for soloar physics research with its Laboratory for Atmospheric and Space Physics, and as a researcher in its High Energy Physics Laboratory.

At UW-RF, he minored in English in addition to his double major in physics and mathematics. Godden was a member of the Humanities Honor Group, received the Gold R Award for academic excellence, and the Stratton Hall Scholarship for the highest grade point average. He also participated in an internship in Frankfurt, Germany, and studied the French language at the Sorbonne.

"The University of Wisconsin-River Falls provided a solid foundation for my career," said Godden. "It was the inspiration for my technical career, and very importantlyl provided me a broad background and appreciation for the humanities. My undergradaute background and support group from key members of the faculty presented me several choises for my future."

The assistance of several faculty members, including Vera Moss, Francis Chisholm, Wayne Sukow and Earl Albert encouraged Godden to pursue his graduate studies and were critical in his achieving a National Science Foundation Fellowship at the University of Colorado.

"Through life's subsequent experiences and encounters, I have come to appreciate the outstanding humanities background I received from my undergraduate experience. I owe much to my UW-RF background and preparation for life's major choices," Godden noted.

Zaloudek was chosen to deliver the address through a selection process among graduating seniors that was coordinated by the Faculty Senate Public Relations Committee. Seven seniors auditioned to give the commencement speech.

"We were impressed with both the content and delivery of her speech," said committee chair and agricultural economics Professor David Trechter. "She is a poised and polished young woman. She will do a great job."

After graduation, Zaloudek hopes to use her "abilities, education, and energy to promote positive change within the inner city." She has completed an internship with the Minnesota Coalition for the Homeless and this summer will direct a musical composed of inner city children through the Boys and Girls Club of St. Paul, Minn. She also works with inmates at the Stillwater (Minn.) Correctional Facility.

The presentation was a graduation requirement for the major, which is in its first year. The portfolios contained the works created by the graduating seniors over the last four years and included brochures, flyers, press releases, program announcements, desktop publishing and photography, as well as various other works. The products came from a variety of activities that the graduates participated in, such as internships, campus organizations, jobs, academic classes and hobbies.

Focus groups of business communication professionals conducted by the University while developing the new major demonstrated that students entering the marketing communications work force needed greater emphasis on technology and a broader base of marketing and communication skills.

Cutting edge technology is integrated into the marketing communication coursework to address the needs sought by business employers. Desktop publishing, database manipulation, and word processing are just a few of the skills that are learned.

Another component of the major is the requirement to participate in an internship experience with real workplace experience to graduate. With the competitive nature of the marketing communications field, the goal is to prepare the students for a career by ensuring their experiences are broader than traditional academic preparation.

The marketing communications major is an interdisciplinary program that includes seven academic departments from the Colleges of Arts & Sciences and the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences. Students take courses from such departments as agriculture education, agricultural economics, art, business, English, journalism and speech communication. Among the courses they pursue are marketing, public relations, mass communications law, writing for business, advertising design, photography, radio and television production, and consumer behavior.

UW-River Falls is located in western Wisconsin within metropolitan area of the Twin Cities of Minneapolis-St. Paul. The Twin Cities constitute the No. 2 market in the United States for billable services in advertising, public relations and marketing communications.

"As I've talked to farmers about their recruiting, one idea has emerged to explain why some of them are so successful: farmers who pay attention to the image of dairy work have no trouble recruiting help."

Conversely, some farmers are so fearful of trying to recruit the right person that they choose not to expand their dairy operations even when it's apparent that they could significantly increase their income by doing so.

Dairy farm work suffers from some great a stereotype that it has automatically become the "default' image for every operator. Among the general public and prospective employees, good operations are thought to be the exception. "Dairy farms are thought to be a nice place to visit Grandma and Grampa, but not a place to build a career," Cooper says.

For operators who want to turn that image around, Cooper says, it requires to actively acknowledge the stereotype exists, and then to follow some common sense steps to overcome that through an agressive advertising and public relations campaign.

Cooper acknowledges that these activities are hard work. But he also points out that an assertive advertising and publicity campaign to hire the right person will save money and aggravation. He notes that an amount equal to one-fourth of an annual salary is expended just to train a person.

"I cannot over-emphasize the importance of recruiting the right peron. It is so important that it requires a substantial investment of time and resources to do it right. But it will pay off by reducing productivity problems and turnover," Cooper concludes.

Alpha Kappa Delta strives to promote an interest in the study of sociology, research of social problems, and other social and intellectual activities that lead to the improvement of the human condition.  AKD has existed on college and university campuses since 1920.

To become a member of AKD, a student must be a junior pursuing a major or minor in sociology or a minor in anthropology or criminal justice.  Also, a student must have a cumulative grade point average of 3.0 and a grade point average of 3.25 in all sociology course work.

Caskey has been a member of the faculty since 1990, teaching courses in general psychology, child and adolescent development, adulthood and aging, psychology of sex differences, research methods, cognitive and physical development, social and personality development, and sociology of later life.

He is a frequent presenter at conferences, authoring papers on such topics as student evaluations of college teachers, distance learning techniques, the influences of the speed of processing on reading, the visual memory of mentally retarded children, and Alzheimer's Disease.

Caskey also speaks widely, sharing his expertise with many regional volunteer agencies and groups. His topics have covered such areas as parenting; death, dying and bereavement; moral development and moral education; attention deficit disorder; and bonding, attachment and corrections issues.

During his career at UW-RF, Johnson taught various art courses including ceramics and sculpture. In 1967, he began the glassblowing program which continues to be unique in the Midwest today. He sees this program as one of his greatest contributions to UW-RF.

Jones considers his most significant contribution to UW-RF to be good teaching and his service to the community as a stray voltage expert. He also received recognition of the department curriculum by the American Society of Agricultural Engineers.

During his tenure, Kinzel served as department chair for two years, developed 13 courses and one minor (outdoor education). He regards being able to practice what he teaches - his genuine care and concern for all students in his classroom - to be his greatest contribution to UW-RF. Kinzel said he "feels honored being a part of this University for 28 years."

During her career, Oostendorp has seen a move toward better publications and better service in publications and in the copy center. Many of the things that are produced today could not have been done in any way when she began in 1969.

"I'm pleased to have been involved with the athletic conferences as they made their way to a combined men's/women's conference, the Wisconsin Intercollegiate Athletic Conference, " Oostendorp said. She has been the women's Faculty Athletic Representative since 1985.

Riley's career achievements include educating others through presentations on topics such as work-place violence and eye-witness identification and designing a comprehensive training program for the office of safety and security.

Riley considers establishing a Community Security Assistant Program, a student patrol program, as his most significant contribution to UW-RF. In addition, he worked to establish a student internship program for Wisconsin Law Enforcement certification.

Riley has noticed a redefining of the safety and security role during his career, including a better working relationship among all campus members to improve the quality of campus life while maintaining a safe learning environment.

Schmidt regards providing students with meaningful work experiences and acting as a mentor and counselor for them as his most significant accomplishment at UW-RF. "Internship is not a new word in my repertoire," Schmidt said. "It has been a way of life since I arrived on campus. Where else could a student learn to supervise a multi-million dollar sports facility while pursuing their degree?"

Changes Schmidt has seen during his career include the physical growth of the campus. "It was challenging and yet rewarding to be involved with the construction of three new buildings," he said, referring to the Student Center, Hunt Arena, and Knowles Center. His career involved staffing and supervising these facilities. Change also included the continued development of the Intramural Complex and the irrigation system and finally grass.

Zaloudek told the gathering of graduates and their families that too often the day will be commemorated by questions asking not what the graduates have learned, but rather what they will do now that they've graduated.

"Commencement is intended to be a time for recognizing accomplishments," Zaloudek agreed. "Why is it then, that your grandmother does not come up to you and say, 'I'm so proud of you. Tell grandma what you've learned in college.' Has anyone inquired about what things you accomplished within your student organizations while here at UW-River Falls? Probably not.

" 'Enjoy my high double piano A-flat, of course, and try for a B-sharp next time is what I want to say,' but I don't. Instead I try to convert my experiences into dollars and cents for their benefits."

Zaloudek noted that priorities of graduates have changed dramatically over the last three decades. For example, she noted that the graduates of 1967 overwhelmingly said it was essential or very important to develop a meaningful philosophy of life. Today that objective ranks sixth. Thirty years ago, less than half of all freshmen said it was important to be well-off financially; today it is the top goal.

"It is not my intention to reproach our culture's emphasis on the tangible, quantifiable things, only to point out that this emphasis may be at the expense of considering some of those other issues-those which are less tangible," Zaloudek said.

She reminded students that they have already gone through the "identity crisis" of defining who they are when they were younger. Lying ahead, she said, was the 'mid-life crisis" in which they will ask themselves whether the ambitions they set and achieved have real meaning.

"We may be pushed to achieve accomplishment after accomplishment-earn a degree, embark on a notable career, receive distinguished honors, acquire material possessions-without ever defining our ambition. It is possible that we may eventually find that our accomplishments, however worthy, stand in isolation of our ambition because we never took the time to address and understand what the ambition of our life really is."

Zaloudek remarked that her caution to her fellow graduates is to "encourage you to understand your ambition, and then to make your accomplishments components of that ambition. For I am certain that at the end of my lifetime even I will not brandish my life's to-do list and cross off those items which I dutifully accomplished. Rather I will consider the ambition of my life and whether my accomplishments-from the smallest to the most significant-are components of that ambition."

The college recognizes a faculty member each year for his or her valuable contributions to undergraduate education.  In honoring May, Rohde stated that May has a great desire to make every opportunity a "teachable moment" for his students.

May joined the faculty in 1982 in the department of agricultural economics and he has generously given of his time, knowledge and insight, Rohde said.  He holds a doctorate in agricultural economics from Washington State University as well as a bachelor's and master's in the same field from the University of Nebraska.

In presenting the award, Rohde said May is an exceptional classroom teacher who prides himself on being well-prepared, patient and motivational.  He teaches several courses in the department and serves as the department faculty coordinator for intern students.

He is a successful teacher and "regularly implements new approaches and methods in his classes," according to Stan Schraufnagel, professor of agricultural economics.  Some of those approaches are: "a day with a salesperson" where students make arrangements and spend a day on a sales route; "team competition" in his agribusiness management course; and a sales presentation that requires the students to sell May their final grade.

Rohde noted another reason May is so successful is that "he gives (the students) a higher perception of themselves and challenges them to measure up.  In spite of May's high standard and reputation for "being a stiff grader" his classes remain very popular with students."

When accepting his award, May shared one of his familiar "vitaminds," an inspirational quote.  "The greatest good you can do for another is not to share your riches with them but to reveal their riches to themselves."

The award is presented to a select group of students, chosen by the Chancellor, who have distinguished themselves through outstanding service, leadership and skill.  The students are those who have tried to make UW-RF a better place for students, faculty and staff.

Herman was cited for her leadership positions, including one as a student senator.  During her sophomore year, she spent a semester abroad in the Wisconsin in Scotland Program where she was a resident assistant at Dalkeith Manor Estate near Edinburgh.  She has also been a resident assistant on campus for over two years.  Herman is a member of the Academic Success Center Planning Team and lead coordinator of the Rising to the Challenge Handicap Accessibility Project. Herman is assisting in planning the restructuring of the orientation program for new students and has worked on the summer registration staff.  Along with college, she is a youth leader with the Dwelling College Ministry at the Abundant Life Church.

Knapp was recognized for being a member of the Student Senate, the Agriculture Education Society, Alpha Tau Alpha, and the Student Alumni Association.  On the Student Senate, Knapp was a member of the Budget Committee where she revised the segregated university fees and program fund request forms.  The revised forms aid student organizations in filling out requests for funding.  Knapp was also student chair for the development of the instructional videotape, "Agricultural Education Parliamentary Procedure," which is sold nationwide through a private company.  She has organized many chapters activities for Alpha Tau Alpha and the Agricultural Education Society.  In addition to college, Knapp manages the Instructional Material Center in the Agricultural Education Office.

Staszak was cited for being a member of Alpha Gamma Rho and treasurer and president of the Student Senate.  He has participated on numerous committees, including Reach for the Future, the Steering, Parking and Athletics.   Staszak was instrumental in implementing the new student shared government structure.  Through the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, he has been a college ambassador to 13 high schools and a member of a variety of agricultural organizations.  Last year he was chosen to be the treasurer for the Wisconsin FFA Association.  With this job, he has represented the agricultural industry to Wisconsin citizens and has taught younger students the importance of leadership skills.

Xiong was recognized for being president and a member of the Asian American Student Association.  She has served on the Student Senate and attended many United Council meetings in Wisconsin.  Xiong contributed to the Search and Screen Committee as it filled the Academic Advisor position in the Academic Support Office.  As a student representative, she attended the UW System Conference on Race and Ethnicity.  Xiong has presented poetry at the American Multicultural Student Leadership Conferences that are held on various UW campuses.  On campus she has tutored as a supplemental instruction leader for the Academic Support Office.  Xiong hopes to pursue her service-oriented interests by attending graduate school in the field of student affairs.

Recently, Shimaoka was awarded the prestigious title a "living national treasure" of Japan.  This award was established to reinforce the belief that artists are important to the overall Japanese culture.  With this honor, Shimaoka will have the status of an "art god" in Japan and will receive an annual stipend to create art for the rest of his life.

The exhibit alos featured the ceramic work of  artists Ken Matsuzaki of Japan, another one of Shimaoka's apprentices, as well as Warren MacKenzie of Stillwater, Minn., a friend and mentor to Johnston.  The ceramics exhibit appeared in two fine art galleries for five weeks in Japan.

Johnston's connection with Japan traces back to his days in college.  While he attended the University of Minnesota in 1969, Johnston met MacKenzie, who was teaching a ceramic class.  After taking the course, Johnston says, "making pots was soon all I cared about doing." A few years later MacKenzie introduced Johnston to Shimaoka when he visited the college to conduct a workshop.  In 1975 Johnston traveled to Japan as Shimaoka's apprentice to master the tradition of firing ceramics in a wood-fire kiln.

"Going to Japan to study about pots and wood firing was a major event in my life and it gave me many insights into the world of pots," Johnston says.  "My goal was to gain a pragmatic and theoretical understanding of the artistic perceptions of this culture."

Johnston believes that this respect stems from Japan's cultural history, which dates back 5,000 years.  As an older culture, the Japanese have a greater respect and a formal appreciation for art, music and theatre than do Americans.

"In America, artists have more freedom to be a little crazier, to express themselves more freely," Johnston says.  "In Japan, artists do not have that freedom.  When the Japanese travel to visit America, they often end up staying because they enjoy that freedom."

"Wood firing is technique and process-oriented and, in many cases, pragmatism becomes the rule-how many sticks of wood, how to place the pots to accept ash residues, whether to subject choice pots to the hellish incendiary effects of the box," Johnston says.  "This technique gives fired objects a very wonderful surface quality and different colors in glazes that you can't get in any other way."

"There is a sense in this process of the nourishable accident, and often it is the flaw, the scar, the unintended mark that becomes interesting," Johnston says.  "Wood firing is a technique that opens itself to producing flawed things of beauty, and often beauty resides in the flaw itself: the accident around which the idea of the pot gathers itself and becomes unique."

"Wood firing is ritualistic, obsessive.  For many of us, it is the way we live.  The technique-based ceramist knows why he or she does it.  The rest of us can't explain it so easily.  Our feelings are similar to those experienced when looking at a favorite painting:  We can't explain these feelings and we grow suspicious of those who can."

Johnston has many future plans for his ceramics, which include exhibiting work in St. Paul, attending an exhibit and workshop in Washington, D.C, in November, and curating and participating in an exhibit in Hawaii in March.

Waltezko says that one of the successful projects at UW-RF is its Student Ambassadors program.  The purpose is to prepare high school students for college life.  Members of SAA have reached over 300 students this year to tell them about everything from living on campus to what it's like to dine in the cafeteria.

Some of Waletzko's accomplishments with SAA include helping plan the Spring Banquet, reviving the Fall Retreat for new members, and initiating an effective way to determine member activity through a points system.

Wisconsin-River Falls Rural Development Institute, made possible by a grant from the W. K. Kellogg Foundation.  Its goal is to provide training and technical assistance to multi-community groups in Wisconsin and Minnesota who are collaboratively addressing common problems.

The Czech Area Communities will assess their various zoning regulations and annexation rules. Results from the study will be used to make recommendations to the two counties and five townships regarding proposed changes in zoning so the communities share similar or compatible zoning regulations.  Additional plans include the development of a jointly owned industrial park, addressing transportation issues between the communities due to inconsistent weight restrictions on highways, and possibly transportation between and among the three communities.

Creating a plan for a coordinated county wide transportation system through the collaborative efforts of several public and private groups is the goal of the Barron County Wisconsin Transportation Coordination Committee.

Members of the committee include representatives of the general public and several governmental agencies that provide transportation for their clientele.  Building on its current data, the Coordination Committee will gather additional information on existing transportation services in the county (funding sources, restrictions on the use of funding or on ridership, fees paid/generated), and will identify gaps between what is provided and what is needed.

Ultimately, the group hopes to use this data to develop a coordinated transportation plan that would continue to serve clientele currently served, and those who do not have access to transportation. By pooling the resources of several groups, they hope to provide better service, avoid duplication, make better use of the vehicles already in the county, and better use of individual agency volunteer and staff time spent coordinating transportation.

The Cooperative Development Initiative will assist both the Czech Area Communities and the Barron County Transportation Committee in the design of the data collection instrument, analysis and ultimately in the development and implementation of the plans that result.

Other groups that have or continue to receive assistance from the Cooperative Development Initiative include: the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance, a cooperative venture of 19 communities along the Lower St. Croix Naitonal Scenic Riverway; the Northwest Minnesota Development Achievement Center Cooperative, a nonprofit cooperative made up of 8 DACs in the northwest corner of Minnesota, and  the Minnesota Agro-Forestry Cooperative in central Minnesota, a co-op that will assist farmers to grow hybrid poplar trees and market them to the pulp and paper, oriented strand board, or bio-mass energy industries and other potential users of these trees.

Each student will display their individual talents:  Hawkinson will display sculptures in fibers and graphics; Sands, a graduate of Eleva-Strum High School, will show sculptural and functional pieces that emphasize fine metalwork, and East will display pottery, sculptures and drawings.

With the funds from three grants, the interdisciplinary class "Political and Economic Issues of East Asia" will be offered through an interactive television network next fall.  The class will link students and faculty from three University of Wisconsin campuses.

The course will teach students about the politics, economics, history, culture, philosophy, geography and business environment in East Asia.  It will explore the collective impact that East Asia has on the world economy and global politics.

The instructors plan to share their experiences and expertise as well as invite guest speakers through interactive TV.  The speakers will be from the three campuses, and some may be connected live from East Asia.  Throughout the course, students will watch seldom-viewed documentaries about East Asia and explore the Internet.

Chen believes that students should learn about East Asia for both political and economic reasons. For example, he notes that new buildings and construction projects in China are signs that the economy is booming, providing many business opportunities.  Those who are aware of the region's economic state will have a competitive advantage in the global marketplace, says Chen.

In addition to being one of its largest markets, East Asia has become one of the United States' top trading partners and one of its strongest economic competitors.  East Asia has maintained a 10 percent average annual rate of economic growth for about 15 years; this is the largest of any region in the world.

The constant tensions between mainland China and Taiwan and the conflict between North and South Korea have potential impact on the United States, says Chen.  The United States has the second largest military force in the region, and about half of its overseas military personnel are stationed there.

Chen wants citizens and students to learn about East Asia because activities in this region affect the world.  For example, the potential impact of China's rapidly growing nuclear abilities should be a concern to everyone.

Last November a 7-day residency took place in conjunction with the Dance Theater organization at UW-River Falls.  Eight members of Dance Theater were cast in a piece choreographed by Patrick Connolly, the artistic director and co-founder of the company.  The dancers worked long hours with Connolly learning the movement, rehearsing, and perfecting the demanding technique required for the piece.  The work will be performed at the Dance Theater's annual Spring Dance Concert April 9-12.

Student Life and Counseling Center staff immediately began notifying students, faculty and staff who were friends, teachers or advisors to Stodola and the injured students to provide information and to offer counseling.

The concert will feature the world premiere of Turrin's newly commissioned work, "Soundings," for wind ensemble. Other compositions by Turrin will also be performed, including two selections for wind ensemble as well as a variety of chamber music.

Three art students from the University of Wisconsin-River Falls are gaining professional experience while displaying their work at the prestigious Wisconsin ArtsWest exhibition in Eau Claire this month.

The show was open to all artists over 18 years of age residing in west-central Wisconsin near Eau Claire area. The juror who selected the pieces for display was Phyllis Wiener, a professional painter from Minneapolis.

Participation in this exhibit is a prestigious honor for a student, according to art department chair Michael Padgett.  Most of the entries were submitted by working artists in the area.  For students to be selected, their work must adhere to high professional standards.

"We hoped to present a well-rounded performance that people can learn from." Zhe said.  The concert was intended not only to be entertaining, but also to challenge the audience's thinking and offer insight into other cultures.  One of Dance Theater's goals is to provide exposure to modern dance and enhance appreciation.

Members of the UW-RF Dance Theater and E. Gwynn Dance Company have engaged in a faculty and student exchange to jointly create the Cuban-derived choreography.  "This exchange is a continued effort to promote a relationship between the two universities and to provide the students with an opportunity to work with individuals from diverse backgrounds," according to Zhe.

Both dance companies worked individually on the project since September and met three times to rehearse and coordinate their dancing styles.  "They studied more of an African-based technique" which made it challenging to coordinate styles, commented Giessinger.

"It has been a real joy meeting new people from different backgrounds" said six-year Dance Theater member Lallemont.  All three women agreed that the experience has enhanced their racial awareness and has been a great learning opportunity.

In March, Zhe and these three dancers headed on a week-long trip to Jamaica where they met with the North Carolina students to rehearse.  The week also included an intensive study of Caribbean dance, culture and classes with two guest artists from Cuba at the National School of Dance in Kingston, Jamaica.

She appreciated the trip most from an educational standpoint, especially with her future career in education.  It provided an opportunity to "tap into another culture in a way I've never experienced before. I was able to get a lot of materials I can use in the classroom."

The Spring Dance Concert also featured a flowing, lyrical piece choreographed by guest artist Patrick Connolly of the Connolly Dance Company of Madison, Wis.  During a seven-day residency that took place at UW-RF in November, eight Dance Theatre members were chosen through audition to perform the piece.  The selected dancers worked long hours with Connolly that week learning the movement, rehearsing, and perfecting the demanding technique required.

Patrick and his wife Kristanne, also of the Connolly Dance Company, spent time with dance students discussing the intent of the choreography, character developments, and the reasons behind various movements.

One of Dance Theater's strengths is that members exhibit a wide range of abilities.  The group is chosen through audition, but no prior experience in dance is required to join.  Dance Theater selects its participants on the basis of interest and heart, choosing those who truly want to move and who are willing to work hard.

UW-RF does not keep official records, but Yunger is believed to be the only student at UW-RF history to receive a national Fulbright grant in the program's 50-year history. Ten faculty members have been awarded teaching or research Fulbright scholarships.

"I want to use this as a cultural exchange to learn about what teaching is really like and how it differs in Germany.  I hope to then be able to translate that experience into the classroom here when I teach students in the future," Yunger says.

Yunger believes that past visits to Germany helped qualify him for the award.  In high school he switched places with a German high school student for just enough time to realize he wanted to go back.

He was able to return to Germany in college as part of the UW-RF Semester Abroad program.  During those five months, Yunger independently researched the integration of the Turks into German society and had the opportunity to meet with a German senator.

UW-RF Counseling Center and Campus Security representatives will attend. Turningpoint for Victims of Domestic Abuse will provide information, and the local Food Shelf will have people there to accept donations.

MAA is the world's largest organization devoted to the interests of collegiate mathematics.  A wide range of mathematics topics were discussed during the two-day conference.  Guest speakers included both faculty and students from various universities.

According to Bruce Williamson, UW-RF mathematic professor emeritus who chaired the awards selection process, the teachers were recognized for their success in laying the groundwork for understanding mathematics that allows students for mathematics at the college level.

Ann Elling is a graduate of UW-River Falls with a master's degree in teaching and a minor in mathematics.  She has been an instructor at UW-River Falls and Cray Academy and currently teaches at Rocky Branch Elementary School.  She is a member of numerous professional organizations and has presented workshops throughout the state.  In 1993, she received the Presidential Award for Excellence in Teaching Mathematics.

"I didn't realize how much I wanted to go until I got the offer," Toman says.  The Fulbright Program awarded 10 scholarships this year for travel to the Czech Republic.  While in the Czech Republic, Toman will live and teach in the city of Olomouc at Palacky University, and one day a week he will commute 50 miles to teach at Masaryk University in the city of Brno.

Since graduate school, Toman has been intrigued by the forms of short story and how they differ from longer prose.  His interest in American satire stems from graduate school, and he has written and published works of satire.  When Toman travels to the Czech Republic next fall, he plans to bring cartoon slides that illustrate satire.

"There might be the perception in former Soviet-dominated countries, who have a Marxist philosophy, that the U.S. is incredibly materialistic," Toman says.  "I want to emphasize the counter-strains that protest against materialism-those who are concerned with the moral spiritual truth opposed to material comfort."

Toman says that American intellectual writers have never been comfortable with materialism, and he will teach students from the literature of ethnic writer O.E. Rolvaag, who writes about how immigrants to the United States are losing their spiritualness in the materialistic culture.

"The land they come to is viewed as a land of plenty and opportunity.  And that opportunity is defined as an opportunity to gain wealth rather than, for example, as an opportunity to contemplate man's relationship with nature."

Toman has also offered to teach a class about the American author Willa Cather who has written three works about Czechoslovakians coming to the United States.  He hopes students will like Cather because she has only good things to say about Czechs.

Three UW-River Falls broadcast journalism majors were recognized for their outstanding work on "10/19 Community News," a weekly news broadcast produced by broadcast journalism majors. The broadcast runs on cable systems in River Falls, Hudson, and North Hudson.

The students received awards from the Northwest Broadcast News Association, which represents news organizations from Nebraska, Iowa, the Dakotas, Minnesota and Wisconsin. The NBNA  sponsors an annual news awards competition for professionals and students.

Paul Jurgensen, a junior from Ellsworth, won first place for Best Video in the Student Competition for his story "Bike Safety Patrol." This story was about the University's public safety office's new bike patrol.

The students received their plaques during the NBNA's annual awards banquet  April 12 at the Regal Minneapolis Hotel. The guest speaker was Barbara Carlson. News directors and professionals from throughout the six-state region were at the banquet.

"The banquet is quite a showcase event," Snyder said. "These awards recognize the quality of work done in the journalism department. We are very pleased that others working in the industry recognize the outstanding quality of our students' work."

"We're working on prizes for the trivia questions," says "Sports Junkies" adviser Robert Snyder.  "We know lots of people already watch the taped version of the show.   We get plenty of feedback from people about how much they like to watch 'Sports Junkies.'  This is a chance for those viewers to be a part of the program."

Jenny Pieper of Cochrane, Wis., and Willie Helpingstine of River Falls were members of last year's winning team and served as assistant coaches this year. 	"They were able to share their expertise and knowledge with other students and played a key role in the success of the team", said horticulture Professor Terry Ferriss, who has coached the team since 1979.

Eighteen students trained and competed at the local level for a spot on the team. The training process teaches students to understand production techniques and post-harvest handling procedures that will ensure availability of high quality floral products in the industry.  Students also learn to critically examine plants as well as recognize and minimize characteristics that indicate damage from insects, diseases, improper handling, cultural imperfection, and over-maturity.

"The National Competition also provides students an excellent opportunity to interact and establish contacts with industry professionals as well as faculty and students from many of the nation's top schools of horticulture. Just visiting another region within the U.S. is often a valuable cultural experience for students."

The 10-foot-high metal structure of welded steel is formed as a large, earth-shaped sphere. A straight cylinder at the top was created by Johnson to suggest the scales of justice. Welded into the sphere's surface are quotations from King's speeches.

According to Johnson, this is the third nameplate placed on the sculpture. The first was stolen when the sculpture was vandalized during the turbulent 1970s. The second nameplate was lost during a campus clean-up in preparation for the arrival of new Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau in 1985.

A banquet has been set to recognize her contributions and will be held Saturday, May 10. It will be in the Yellow Room of Rodli Commons on the UW-RF campus. The festivities will begin at 6 p.m. with cocktails, followed by dinner at 7 p.m. and a program at 8 p.m.

Oostendorp joined UW-RF in 1969 after teaching at the University of Rhode Island and then in the Ellsworth School District. At the University, she joined the faculty to teach speech, splitting her time with the Publications Office. Within the next year, she became the full-time director of publications.

As director, she is responsible for developing visual identity standards for the campus, setting printing guidelines, purchasing outside printing service, managing the campus Fast Copy Center, and overseeing copiers across campus.

The dairy cows will be added to the beef, swine and sheep on the 290-acre Mann Valley farm.  Once the two enterprises are combined, management and feeding practices will be more efficient and manure disposal will be more convenient, noted Rohde and Braun.

"At this point we are optimistic that we can raise about $300,000 from private donations," says Rohde.  "We have heard positive responses but are waiting for final approval (before raising the money)."

Raising this amount of money through private donations for a building project is rare for UW-RF.  Rohde says that other state universities have done it before, but UW RF has never raised this amount from the private sector for a major project.

However, collaboration on this project with the dairy industry is one of UW-RF's goals.  Rohde believes a partnership with students who will become integral parts of the dairy industry will add to the industry's overall prominence and strength.  The facility will also provide opportunities for research, internships, judging contests, tours and livestock sales.

It contains extensive information on the new School's business administration department component. Departmental links are expected soon from economics, and a site will be on-line for accounting by mid-April. Like business administration, those pages also will list courses, degree opportunities, faculty expertise, internships, faculty consulting, student organizations, and selected indexes linking to other World Wide Web informational resources.

Helm, who coordinates the business administration department's extensive computer laboratory and who offers business short courses about the World Wide Web, said the SBE site was constructed in response to business leaders seeking more information about the School.

Visitors to the site will find a link to extensive information about the business administration department, including course offerings, student internships, and extensive faculty biographical sketches that outline their specialty areas and potential consulting areas.

E-mail listings to faculty also are on line, which Helm says has generated continuing traffic from business people who are seeking faculty expertise, or from businesses who are seeking to place internship notices.

Another feature, Helm said, is an on-line form that allows students to apply for internships and to provide an update to faculty advisers while students are actually engaged in an internship. If that interactive communication process works out well, Helm added, it will be expanded to provide businesses with an opportunity to place internship notices electronically through the School.

Helm also is continuously developing an index to resources on the World Wide Web that should be of interest to the business community. This includes establishing links on such varied topics as "Just In Time" inventory practices, ISO 9000 standards for the automotive industry, on-line journals in business operations, on-line journals in technology issues, and links to stocks and mutual funds information.

Those links are particularly valuable, Helm says, because they offer extensive topical information that mostly are for free. "Why buy Business Week or Fortune when you can get it on-line for free?" Helm notes.

A reception and book signing of Harbeck's latest book, "Coming Out of the Classroom Closet," will follow the lecture.  Harbeck's book focuses on the legal and educational issues of sexual identity and women in the classroom.

The Mathematical Association of America is the world's largest organization devoted to the interests of collegiate mathematics.  Anyone who is interested in mathematics is welcome to join, although the group's major emphasis is collegiate teaching.

The two-day meeting will feature guest speakers, both faculty and students, from various universities.  A wide range of mathematics topics will be discussed from surreal numbers to assessing student academic achievement of mathematics.

UW-River Falls speakers are Professors Kathy Tomlinson and Bruce Williams, both of the math and computer systems department.  Tomlinson will address the honors calculus curriculum including goals, structure, content, and outcome.  Williams will present the topic, "What is mathematics: an answer to our liberal arts dilemma."

Friday evening's banquet will highlight outstanding math instructors.  An award will be presented for Distinguished College or University Teaching of Mathematics.  Several area high school mathematics instructors, selected by UW-River Falls faculty, will be presented with an award in recognition of their years spent teaching students.

More than 30 events, presentations and performances will take place on April 23. The festivities will be held in either the Hagestad Student Center or outside on the mall.  They are free and cater to all age groups.

"We want this to be an educational collaboration that promotes a future of understanding, appreciation and the ability to work together in the world," says Linda Alvarez, multicultural student services coordinator.

Organizers of the annual daylong event on have planned several workshops, presentations and activities that connect to the celebration's theme "Our Campus, Ourselves, Our World: Together Making a Difference through Heritage, Service and Vision."

"When people work together they can make a difference," says Alvarez, who believes the events relate to everyday life.  "The challenge for us in the 21st century is to figure out how we bring all of our unique challenges and gifts to the table and collaborate for a better world."

Throughout the day, workshops and performances will explore diversity in a variety of issues:  culture, religion, gender, age, history, geography, literature, disabilities, and gay and lesbian issues.

Black and white photographic developing processes generate an acidic fixer waste which is hazardous due to a high concentration of dissolved silver. Historically, the three campuses had disposed of these wastes via municipal sanitary systems.

The process has similar application to any state institution or private business operating photographic laboratories, according to Grote. "We are committed to helping any organization realize the benefits of this 'garbage' into 'gold' project".

The workshop will provide practical application of sport psychology theory to teach participants the strategies to enhance individual and group performance in the gym, classroom, and office.  The workshop promises to be fun, energizing, motivational, and productive for audiences of all backgrounds, according to UW-RF Professor Faye Perkins.

Topics of discussion include tips for effective communication, stress management techniques, attention and concentration skills, developing self-concept through sport, team building, and the stages of group development.

Keith Henschen is the sport psychologist at the University of Utah Department of Exercise and Sport Science and is the newly elected president of the American Alliance for Health, Physical Education, Recreation, and Dance.

English students at one elementary school study the story of "The Three Little Pigs" from the wolf's point of view, and are assigned to investigate its events.  A class of high school students, after reading the novel, "To Kill A Mockingbird," appeal the story's trial verdict to a higher court: students compile evidence and three student judges review the case.

Reader response is aimed at involving students directly in their learning to advance understanding of literary texts and to help students learn to enjoy reading.  Students are encouraged to participate in the learning process, using their own life experiences to interpret meaning in literary works.

Techniques for teaching reader response are contained in Karolides' recently published book: "Reader Response in Elementary Classrooms: Quest and Discovery," It marks his seventh published book. The topics of other books have varied widely: from censorship to physical impairments to fitness.

"Some theories generally exclude the reader," remarked Karolides.  To interpret meaning, these theories may concentrate on the author, analyzing the text in terms of the author's life and times, or analyze the words and structure of the text.

Under reader response, the readers play an integral part in bringing meaning to the text, thier thoughts, reactions and ideas included in analyzing and learning. The reader cannot be separated from the text.

Karolides said the purpose of his book is to change the way instructors teach and use literature in the classroom.  There are different and more effective ways to engage students in their learning, Karolides said. As examples, teachers might use live dramatizations and role-playing exercises or authentic writing activities to bring meaning to texts.

The book contains a series of articles written by teachers from around the country, including one by UW-RF elementary education Professor Lee Karnowski.. The focus is on teaching methods and techniques. Articles were chosen to offer unique teaching techniques illustrating how reader response can be applied in the classroom.

The articles are grouped according to related topics, discussing different areas related to reader response. The first two chapters, one of which is written by Karolides, discuss the theoretical aspect of reader response.  Subsequent chapters include classroom case studies, cross-discipline teaching, and professional development.

This is Karolides' second book on the subject of reader response; the first, published three years ago, takes a different orientation.  It is directed toward secondary school teaching since that is where the concept of reader response originated.  Reader response teaching techniques are now expanding to the elementary level.

Karolides already is at work on his next book, exploring political censorship, which he hopes will be published by the end of this year.   The book is part of a four volume-set on the subjects of religious, erotic, political, and social censorship.

The untold story of Norwegian emigrant and Native American relationships during the settlement of Wisconsin and Minnesota will be the subject of a sabbatical by UW-RF associate history Professor Betty Bergland.

Bergland will study the migrations of  emigrants from Norway to Wisconsin and Minnesota. She will also will take a detailed look at emigrants from Telemark, Norway, who first settled in Dane County in Wisconsin. As Chippewa and Sioux ceded land over the following decades, the Telemarkers continued to migrate through La Crosse, then , to Minnesota's Houston County and finally to Moland Township in Clay County in the Red River Valley of the North.

The components to be researched in the project include:  the relationships between Norwegian immigrants and Native Americans, the effects of federal land policies on Native Americans with regard to land cessions, and the role of racial ethnicity cultural values in the relationship between Norwegian immigrants and Native Americans.

A young girl's captivation of her Norwegian grandmother turned into a life long career.  Bergland has her doctorate of American Studies from the University of Minnesota, and specializes in immigration experiences, U.S. social history, and women's history in the United States.  Her doctoral dissertation focused on immigrant women autobiographies, using four Eastern European women as a basis for developing a theory of reading first-person historical documents.

She notes that the Norwegian American Historical Association has extensively published history and the writings of Norwegian immigrants.  However, from 1925 to the present there are few references to Native Americans in relationships with Norwegians.

This Fulbright Research project is one of personal interest and intellectual challenge for Bergland.  She plans to spend sabbatical year doing research; afterwards the ongoing research and writing of her findings may take up to 10.  The research will be presented at academic conferences, in scholarly articles and eventually in a book.

"Why do people question intellectual work, I guess, is the bigger question," Bergland says of her quest. "I am trying to understand the truth about immigration and the complexity of this. What is the legacy?"

"We hope to present a well-rounded performance that people can learn from," Zhe said.  The concert will not only be entertaining but also challenge the audience's thinking and offer insight into other cultures.  One of Dance Theater's goals is to provide exposure to modern dance and enhance its appreciation.

The concert will include a special piece in which three students from River Falls will join with six students from the E. Gwynn Dance Company at North Carolina University A&T to perform Cuban-derived choreography.  This piece was a result of an intensive field study of African/Cuban dance and history by Karla Zhe and Dr. Eleanor Gwynn of North Carolina University A&T.

"This exchange is a continued effort to promote a relationship between the two universities and to provide the students with an opportunity to work with individuals from diverse backgrounds," Zhe explains.

Both dance companies have been working individually on the project since September and have met three times to rehearse and coordinate their dancing styles.  One of these meetings took place during a week-long trip to Jamaica that included an intensive study of Caribbean dance and culture and classes with two guest artists from Cuba at the National School of Dance in Kingston, Jamaica.

"Learning, working together, and performing [with the North Carolina students] is a multifaceted experience," said Zhe. The final meeting of the two companies will be the culmination of all the work, the practice, and the cultural exposure."

The concert will also feature a flowing, lyrical piece choreographed by guest artist Patrick Connolly of the Connolly Dance Company.  During a seven-day residency that took place in November, eight members of Dance Theater auditioned for the piece.  The selected dancers worked long hours with Connolly that week learning the movement, rehearsing, and perfecting the demanding technique required.

Connolly and his wife Kristanne, also of the Connolly Dance Company, spent time with dance students discussing the intent of the choreography, character developments, and the reasons behind various movements.   The Connolly Dance Company will be performing at the UW-RF on April 15.

Members of Dance Theater are extremely dedicated, said Zhe.  By participating, they take on a huge time commitment.  The students work all year in preparation for this concert and put in many hours of work.

"Dance is just natural, it's in us," emphasized Zhe.  "Dance is very important, it's a vital art form."  Instead of a brush, the choreographer uses the dancers to create a visual art form, Zhe explains.  The uniqueness of dance lies in the idea that the art is there only for a moment, and then it's gone.

The sites were submitted to Wisconsin WebFair '97, which was coordinated by the University of Wisconsin System, and judged by an international panel of leaders in business, government and education. They reviewed the entries for demonstration that Web-based information can be integrated with traditional print materials, and the sites' success at allowing the unprecedented opportunity for students to see their work published.

"WebFair challenged participants to utilize computers and Internet resources in new and innovative ways. This objective was wonderfully accomplished by UW-River Falls in its two 'Distinguished' on-line sites."

"It seems to me the  benefits of the Web are being utilized in a variety of ways. It provides information to those interested in the University or its' individual entities, as well as providing the educational opportunities inherent in the technology and its applications," Bredahl said.

"Whether educating or being educated, the possibilities of World Wide Web are growing, and as it does, the faculty, staff and students of UW-River Falls are growing with it. The Chiefs page and the Native American Designs site are two very good examples of those possibilities."

The Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp site was built and maintained by Brett Longdin of Sussex, Wis., a journalism major who since his graduation in December has been employed as on-line sports producer for the Milwaukee Journal-Sentinel. Longdin used such advanced treatments as Frames and JAVA scripting to allow easier access to a complex web site.

The site features extensive content information on the NFL team, including daily features, training table menus, special events and other camp information. Contributing content information to the site were journalism interns Chad Urdahl of Grove City, Minn., and Jamie Molitor of River Falls.

Longdin, who coordinated the site during an internship experience, was supervised in its constrution by Mark Kinders, UW-RF public affairs director, and its content maintenance by Jim Thies, sports information director.

The multicultural design was inspired by first studying Native American art both on the web and by traditional library or museum resources. Each student then focused on one type of art and created a graphic design by developing a set of procedures in the programming language LOGO.

Each of pre-service teachers learned Hyper Text Markup Language-the language of web page design-studied resources on, the web, and created a home page describing their individual projects, including information on the art form, structure and LOGO procedures developed, and the graphic itself.

From April 21-26, the parking lot of Historic South Hall will become a construction site as work begins on building the exterior walls for a two-bedroom ranch house. At completion, the walls will be transported to donated land in Ellsworth.

Some 70 students are members of the UW-RF chapter of Habitat for Humanity. Founded by former President Jimmy Carter, Habitat encourages the construction or renovation of housing for needy families. Those families are able to purchase the residence through no-interest loans, with an investment of their "sweat equity" in finishing the house.

The event will be an all-day affair including a keynote address by LaMoine MacLaughlin, who was elected president of the Wisconsin Assembly of Local Art Agencies in 1996, as well as panel discussions featuring practicing artists, and several breakout sessions for small group discussion.

The 1997 seminar includes an extended morning and afternoon panel discussion.  Panelist will include artists, art administrators and consultants. Panel members will also field questions from artists attending the seminar. Breakout sessions will be conducted by area professionals and will address topics aimed at aiding artists in their quest to make a living through art.

This stylish and compelling piece is based on the famous novel by Nathaniel Hawthorne.   Hester Prynne, played by Gwen Heyn, is a woman condemned for the sin of adultery and sentenced to wear the red letter "A" sewn to her clothing.  The story is told through the eyes of Hester's daughter Pearl, played by Jennifer Kinney, as though she was looking back on the events.  The story is set in a Puritan community in Boston around 1760.

"This new adaptation remains true to the dark romanticism of the original, while fusing it with a contemporary sensibility. Playwright Phyllis Nagy is remarkably sensitive to Hawthorne's metaphors and remarkably skilled at evoking them dramatically," said director Meg Swanson.  "It is a brilliantly written piece."

Audiences don't need to have read the book to find the play interesting and thought-provoking, Swanson assures.  The script uses contemporary language that is easy to understand, making it an excellent choice for audiences, including students and adults alike.

His friend and estate executor, former River Falls public schools English teacher Ben Hawkinson, said the estate may generate up to another $100,000 for the University after the estate is closed next summer.

The gift constitutes the largest ever to the University, with the major portion provided for unrestricted use by the UW-RF Foundation in assisting the University, and a portion dedicated toward scholarships.

Born in Janesville in 1914, Tyler began his college education at Beloit College before transferring to UW-Madison, where he graduated with a bachelor's degree in English in 1935. He continued there for his master's degree, specializing in English and comparative languages, including Sanskrit, Greek and Old Norse. Tyler taught briefly at the University of Maryland before entering the U.S. Army at the outbreak of the war. He rose through the enlisted ranks and was commissioned as a warrant officer, performing administrative duties in Panama for most of the war.

After his discharge, he returned to his studies at UW-Madison to pursue his doctorate. He taught at the University of Akron, then left to work as a technical writer for the Goodyear Aircraft Corp. in Akron. He re-entered the classroom as a substitute teacher in the Akron and Cleveland public schools until his appointment at River Falls.

Tyler as a colleague, whose courses included semantics, composition, and sophomore literature. He also served as adviser to the quarterly literary publication of student poetry and prose, "The Prologue."

A somewhat reclusive person, said Brohaugh and Hawkinson, Tyler enjoyed his time with his friends, recalling his days as a student actor in productions at UW-Madison, or commenting on life around River Falls.

Hawkinson agreed, describing Tyler as "a wonderful letter writer." He compared Tyler's writings as similar in style and complexity to Samuel Pepy's, the 16th Century writer who chronicled the Great Fire of London.

After Tyler retired, he remained in River Falls where he lived quietly and was best known for his elaborate Christmas decorating and his gardening. "In the English sense of the word, he lived for his gardening and his perennials," Hawkinson related.

Hawkinson recalled many visits to Tyler's residence, first as a student and then as a neighbor, who lived just a few homes away. Hawkinson described Tyler as an erudite conversationalist who also loved playing classical works on his grand piano. As Tyler fell ill in recent years, Hawkinson assisted him in managing his affairs.

After his death, Tyler left his own substantial inheritance and the proceeds of his estate to UW-RF. A collection of first edition books, pottery, china and household furnishings filled the River Falls Armory last fall for the estate sale.

Political science Professor Tracey Gladstone-Sovell is confronted by some "quirky" concepts each semester when team-teaching the general education course, "Introduction to National, State & Local Government."

The basic political science course is taken by about 600 students at UW-River Falls each year. But many of them have difficulty visualizing such esoteric concepts as the role of the Electoral College.

This semester, Gladstone-Sovell is getting help at solving that and other curricular problems from two of her new mentors: junior-year political science majors Erin Graham of Cottage Grove, Minn.,  and Kelly Frederick of Roberts.

Through a ground-breaking new seminar and practicum, 10 students are engaging in mentoring relationships with faculty to strengthen their curricula by introducing wide-ranging information technology and multimedia applications as classroom teaching tools.

The students represented widely differing levels of information technology familiarity when they enrolled last fall in a special seminar, "Teaching and Learning Through Information Technology." Their majors include political science, biology, geographic information systems, horticulture and education.

"Some students had no concept of the scope or the impact of technology." Muraski said. "They didn't know how pervasive, dramatic and common place it is, even in their own disciplines." Others had exceptional skills, but only limited experience in applying their technological expertise to the content of other disciplines in a meaningful way.

But the students were quick learners, Standiford says. During the fall, they covered nearly all the fundamentals of multimedia and information technology: from learning how to prepare PowerPoint presentations to building Web pages using Hypertext Markup Language to, in some cases, scripting in the JAVA programming language that makes Web pages interactive.

Students studied how faculty members can use technology to teach. They also were coached in how to make the leap from the traditional student-faculty relationship to working as mentors and collaborators. An outcome of that relationship is that the faculty must learn the technology, and then assist in grading how well their mentor taught them.

"Part of the value of information technologies in political science is that there is an incredible amount of information available on the Internet. It's also become a vehicle for people to participate in the communication process with elected leaders. One of the objectives of this course is to instill citizenship in our students."

"The value of using students is that they know the course and the areas where there is difficulty in conveying information. They can tell us the areas that they think can best be enhanced by adding multimedia," says the political science department chair.

Her understanding of student needs and the course content will aide her in suggesting ways that technology can enhance it. "The course is so broad and general; it covers a lot of material at one time. Basically, at that level students need to see things. They only recently left high school, and many of them are used to a lot of overheads and visual aides. I hope to work in PowerPoint demonstrations and a lot more (technology) interactivity between the faculty and students," she notes.

More than 100 deans of students and student affairs professionals from all 26 University of Wisconsin System campuses and most public and private colleges and universities in the Twin Cities metropolitan area will participate on Feb. 26-27.

According to UW-RF Dean of Students Roger Ballou, the annual conference of UWS students affairs professionals will address how to foster students' academic and personal success through an academic and student affairs partnership.

Keynoting the conference will be Dr. George Kuh, a professor of higher education at the University of Indiana, who will provide a national perspective on higher education affairs activities and future trends.

His current research focuses on campus culture, out-of-classroom experiences, and institutional conditions that foster student learning. Kuh holds a bachelor's degree from Luther College, his master's from St. Cloud State University, and his doctorate from the University of Iowa.

Also addressing the conference will be David J. Ward, senior vice president for academic affairs for the University of Wisconsin System. Ward will relate his views on the goals and outcomes for UW undergraduate students, the common ground between academic and student affairs, areas for collaboration between academics and student affairs, and the unifying experiences students should gain, whether from the laboratory and classroom or the athletic fields and student union.

UW-River Falls history Professor Kurt Leichtle has been studying farm publications and personal diaries written in the 1880s by women who lived in Wisconsin and Minnesota and has found that they do not fit the "unhappy farmwife" stereotype that time and has history has given to them.

"Women were less unhappy and more in control of their lives than history books give them credit for.  The letters I read were positive and hopeful; they were written by women who had a firm sense of their identity," Leichtle says.

Leichtle began his search by studying past issues of a Midwest farm journal called "The Farmer."  A collection of letters written and edited by women was published in an "Our Household" section of each issue, providing an intimate portrait of farm life from a woman's perspective.

While reading the 1880s writings, Leichtle says a sense of optimism and enthusiasm came through in the women's voices as they shared money-making ideas that included growing vegetable gardens, collecting antiques and writing.

He says that the letters were written by women who were excited about the future and the opportunities they knew their daughters would have to travel, balance careers, gain educations and enter equal partnerships with their husbands.

Another journal published in Philadelphia around the same time had a column called "Advice for the Lovelorn" that quickly went astray from what the editors had in mind. Leichtle says the column evolved from advice on relationships to advice on vocations. Within four months of its launching, the editors killed the column.

By denying women public identities, Leichtle says, society tried to protect what it felt should be a system of ideals for womens' behavior. But he believes that the system failed because it did not reflect reality.

He says those idealized views contended that women must remain "morally pure" because it was their responsibility to raise children.  To do this, they needed to be sheltered in the home away from the temptations that men encountered in the workforce.

This dominant view in the media and in the public's eye created untrue stereotypes about men and women.  But Leichtle believes the letters women wrote to "The Farmer" spoke the truth and were the real reflections of reality.

Of course, Leichtle has found proof that pessimistic and unhappy women also existed in the 19th century.  He remembers reading about one woman who suffered from depression and eventually died from exhaustion.

The diary of a woman named Jenny Andrews detailed the lives of a couple who more closely fit today's standards for husbands and wives, Leichtle says.  She and her husband worked together, and she was active in the community.

He believes the new vision society ultimately will adopt will not be  gender-based.  Male and female roles will be defined by function.  It will become acceptable for individuals in a relationship, rather than society, to decide who will be the child-rearer and who will be the wage-earner.

Professor Steve Feinstein, chair of the history department at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, will take a two year leave of absence to serve as the interim acting director for a new center for Holocaust studies at the University of Minnesota.

The Holocaust was a major event of the 20th century with the attempted genocide of 6 million Jews by Nazi Germany. Holocaust studies have received increasing attention over the past two decades, according to Feinstein, including introducing the topic into middle school curricula.

The center will serve as a resource to add to Holocaust teaching efforts by providing information and materials for curricular development. For example, it will create resources, programs for speakers, and improve information available on the Internet.  It also will assist K-12 schools in both Wisconsin and Minnesota.

An expert on Jewish history and Holocaust art, Feinstein was the guest curator who organized and developed a "Witness and Legacy" exhibit at the Minnesota Museum of Art in St. Paul in 1995.  The exhibit featured contemporary art depicting the Holocaust.

Feinstein now teaches a "History of the Holocaust" workshop at UW-RF every spring, which includes films and guest speakers.  He is also actively involved in several organizations, including the Union of Councils for Russian Jews and the Board of Scholars Conference for the Holocaust.

Feinstein is working toward the completion of a book about Holocaust art.  So far, he says, "Not much research has been done in the realm of art relating to the Holocaust."  The emphasis has always been on photography as a historical record.  He says that the question many people ask is, "How do you create art that is considered beautiful out of such a horrific experience?"

All aspects of material must be considered when studying Holocaust art Feinstein says. For example, charcoal is made of ashes.  When artists draw with charcoal they, symbolically, could be drawing with the ashes of the many bodies that were burned in Nazi concentration camp crematoriums.

The important thing to remember, remarked Feinstein, is that if the art is too horrible, people won't stay to look at it.  However, artistic response to the Holocaust is highly symbolic.  It is usually less graphic than photographs.  This also makes it an acceptable way to teach children about the Holocaust.

At each of the readings, four students will read their written works of poetry, fiction and non-fiction.  This public forum allows students to voice their ideas and opinions about life while gaining confidence in their writing.

The workshops served many purposes, said art department Chair Michael Padgett. This includes providing an opportunity for talented young artists to exhibit their work in a University setting, to allow faculty to monitor students' creative development, and to expose students to workshops and demonstrations of various artistic disciplines that will excite them to try new techniques.

Among the many workshops were bead making, sculpting, cold glass production, glass blowing, paper making, drawing, desktop publishing, indigo tie-dying, monotype printmaking, colors, and photograms, which is the technique of making black and white photos without a camera.

"Contemporary Issues: Cooperative Learning" is a one-credit undergraduate or graduate course that addresses the skills necessary to instruct students in small mixed-ability learning groups. It focuses on teaching students how to cooperate, complete tasks, problem solve and function more efficiently and effectively in groups. The course meets Jan. 24 from 5-9 p.m. and Jan. 25 from 8:30-4:30 p.m. It is taught by Dr. Judy Cooper. Registration is $20 and does not include tuition or textbook.

"Self-Esteem Education - Raising Students' Self-Esteem" is a two-credit graduate course that teaches the most advanced, most successful strategies to raise student self-esteem. It is a self-paced video course. Call the number above for more information.

Recipients are nominated by faculty and staff and are selected based on their professional competency, participation in UW-RF service projects outside of their job descriptions, and their human relations skills.

"These three individuals are very deserving of this award," said Virgil Nylander, vice chancellor for administration and finance. "They approach their jobs with enthusiasm, commitment and a desire to be helpful to others. We hear that these attitudes and behaviors are missing in many of today's employees; this is not true of these individuals or of employees on this campus.

Murray has served as an electronics technician since September 1976. He has been recognized previously with a Wisconsin Merit Award. On campus, the Journalism Department presents an annual award in his name to a student who provides the greatest service contribution to radio station WRFW. Murray resides with his wife Nancy in Hudson.

"Shame on yourself if you missed this concert," raved the Kansas City Star in September 1993.  "A dazzling performance," announced the Yellow Springs News in response to an invigorating display of musical talent given in Yellow Springs, Ohio, by the internationally acclaimed music group, Guild Trio.

The Guild Trio, a group consisting of a pianist, a violinist and a cellist, has grabbed the international spotlight by awing audiences from around the world.  "The Guild Trio reflects today's objective vision of music, unhampered by individual eccentricities," reported the Greenwich Times after a concert there.

The pianist for the Guild Trio, Patricia Tao, performs extensively as both soloist and chamber musician.  As the winner of numerous awards, she has performed in Portugal, Spain, Italy, Czechoslovakia and Bulgaria and toured the United States.

The Trio's violinist, Janet Orenstein, performs both in the United States and abroad as a chamber musician and soloist as well as being an advocate of contemporary music.  Orenstein received bachelor's and master's degrees from the Juilliard School and pursued additional graduate studies from the SUNY-Stony Brook.  Orenstein most recently was the top-prize winner of the Palm Beach Symphony's Annual Invitational Violin Competition.

Cellist Brooks Whitehouse, known as a dynamic performer, has won competitions throughout the country.  After earning a bachelor's degree in biology from Harvard College, Whitehouse decided to pursue a career in music. Whitehouse received master and doctoral degrees at Stony Brook, which no doubt prepared him for the role of cellist in the Guild Trio.

Williamson will be responsible for all annual giving programs initiated by the UW-RF Foundation including alumni and parent telethons, the Senior Class Pledge Program, faculty and staff solicitations and annual raffles to raise funds for scholarships, faculty grants and other special projects.

Prior to this position, Williamson supervised the telethon program for the University of Iowa Foundation.  She is a graduate of the University of Iowa and  had extensive experience with telethons during her undergraduate years.  She was singled out as the most successful telemarketer in the history of the Iowa Foundation for her success raising record amounts of funds in one year.

A somewhat shy person, said Brohaugh and Hawkinson, Tyler enjoyed his time with his friends, recalling his days as a student actor in productions at UW-Madison, or commenting on life around River Falls.

"This is an incredible opportunity to listen to a world-class musician.  He has numerous talents and abilities and is very captivating," says Kaye Schendel, director of UW-RF's Wyman Performance series.

At a recent concert, Klein was asked to substitute for renowned colleague Claude Frank just 24 hours before a performance and play Beethoven's "Concerto No. 3."  His performance earned him an invitation for the next season.

Enthusiastic audiences and the media greeted Klein last fall as he toured Germany, his native country.  His performances were often encored three times.  A recital at the National Gallery of Art in Dresden, Germany, "An Evening with Beethoven," was broadcast live on the radio throughout Germany.

Also last season, conductors and audiences admired Klein for performances with orchestras.  He made his debut in Canada with the Sault Symphony, and in Florida, he performed the forgotten "Piano Concerto No. 2" by Mozart with the Gainesville Symphony.

The four-day classical tour begins in Delphi, with stops at Appollo's Temple, the Monastery of Ossios Loukas, and the site of the Pythian Games. Other highlights include the site of the game at Olumpia, ancient Corinth and Agamemnon's citadel at Mycenae with its Lion Gate.

Three days in Crete include a visit to the western city of Chania, an optional trek through the Samaria Gorge, swimming in the Libyan Sea, a drive to Heraklion and the Minoan Palace at Knossos. Next comes a journey through the Aegean Islands, including Santorini, Delos and Mykonos. There will be ample free time at each location, and top rated accommodations.

One species that is federally endangered can be found within the city limits of River Falls. The endangered Prairie Bush Clover grows in three areas in River Falls:  a local cemetery, a roadside ditch, and on private undeveloped land located on the edge of a housing development.

Like the Prairie Clover, over half of the 61 endangered and 57 threatened species in Wisconsin require grassland or prairie conditions that have less than one tree per acre.  According to Richardson, only a few protected sites remain.

Richardson says that endangered species are those in jeopardy of surviving. Threatened species live in an environment that is under threat of destruction from forest invasion, agriculture or land development.

He says that the Wisconsin Department of Natural Resources recently shifted its emphasis, also. They no longer focus on specific endangered or threatened species, but rather attempt to save entire communities of plants.

The herbarium serves as a valuable tool for Richardson and other biologists.  By looking at  species' records, they are able to learn about conditions in the environment decades ago that allowed certain plants to thrive.

Richardson says he gets continous requests for samples from colleagues in Madison who are now studying the flora of Wisconsin.  Richardson also dispenses samples to biologists across the state who research various species.

Richardson notes that funding for research is limited because society tends to focus on other areas of science, such as cell biology and genetics.  He feels preserving plant species that represent variety in the environment is just as important.

Richardson says that many people are motivated to preserve when they are told that an endangered plant could one day be the cure for a disease such as cancer, but thinks people should be concerned about saving plant species for more fundamental reasons. When these plants are gone, he stresses, humans cannot bring them back.

As education majors, students will complete a comprehensive program of study in general education as well as extensive academic study in one or more subject areas. Education students will also complete a rigorous series of field-based professional education courses and experiences.

UW-River Falls Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau will participate in a six-month reassignment from the campus to pursue special projects in higher education, including emerging issues, information technologies, and international exchange programs.

Thibodeau will begin his leave on Jan. 1 and return to campus on June 30. Provost Robert Milam has been authorized to assume daily decision-making authority by University of Wisconsin System President Katharine Lyall.

"I think the benefits are very obvious, and they are comparable to what you would anticipate accruing to a faculty member on a sabbatical or an academic staff person on a professional development leave. Hopefully, the benefits will accrue not only to me, but to the campus and to the System."

Thibodeau, who has been a member of numerous AASCU study groups, said the committee report will explore emerging issues in higher education at the national level, including higher education funding, collaborative partnerships, and the changing expectations of the workplace and their impact on what students must learn.

Evaluate methods to measure faculty workload as teaching techniques evolve to accomodate the evolution of information technologies. This will include adapting traditional higher education objectives of instilling critical thinking and learning skills to fit into information technologies as an instructional technique.

UW-RF is the site for a Center for Pacific Rim Studies, and has generated numerous students and faculty exchange programs with higher education institutions both in Taiwan and Mainland China. Thibodeau hopes to extend those relationships.

The chancellor said he will continue to participate in selected campus activities related to UW-RF's five-year strategic plan, "Reach for the Future." That program, now in its 18th month, is reallocating funds across the campus to address issues related to information technology and academic programs.

"I'm appreciative of President Lyall providing me with the opportunity to participate in this reassignment. I'm very comfortable in leaving the campus because of the strong and seasoned leadership of Provost Milam and Vice Chancellor (Virgil) Nylander.

"I look forward to returning to the campus this summer with additional perspectives on the many emerging higher education issues that will have an impact on UW-River Falls into the next century." Thibodeau said.

The University learned of what had been Mark's wish to receive a degree after UW-RF Registrar Judy George came read a letter to the editor of the St. Paul Pioneer Press last May. Henck had responded to a public debate about the appropriate methods to respond to the wishes of a dying child. In that letter she noted that Mark "also had a wish-to be able to graduate from the University of Wisconsin at River Falls. He didn't get his wish."

Working with University records and reviewing Mark's academic record, the Georges, Thibodeau and Dean Gary Rohde of the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences, confirmed his identity and concluded he qualified for an associate degree that recognizes his completion of two years of general education studies.

Mrs. Henck recently related that Mark was diagnosed with cancer in 1987 and that his doctors gave him 3-5 years to live. After one of his monthly trips to St. Paul Ramsey Medical Center for treatment, he told his mother that his wish was to graduate from UW-RF.

As a remembrance, his family established the Mark C. Peters Memorial Scholarship to help ease the financial burden for other students. Each year the $300 stipend is awarded to a student active in the Alpha Gamma Rho fraternity or the Block & Bridle Club, who has an active interest in the field of meat and animal production, and is a past or present member of the Future Farmers of America.

On Dec. 15, Mrs. Henkes and five family members and friends braved a winter storm that dumped eight inches of snow in River Falls to join the celebration as 350 students participated in commencement exercises for undergraduate and graduate degrees at the Robert P. Knowles Physical Education & Recreation Center.

"UW-RF didn't have to do this, but it sure has made all of us feel good," Mrs. Henck said afterward. "Sunday was the icing on the cake. It was a hard day for us but everyone at UW-RF made us feel great."

"One of the things that we like to talk about at River Falls is the ambiance of the campus and our relationships between students, faculty and staff. The caring of the faculty was so apparent when Mark was here as a student, and it was apparent in how the faculty and staff responded to pursuing fulfilling his hope for a degree.

"It was a wonderful interplay of faculty and academic staff looking at the facts of Mark's completion of the degree. It speaks louder perhaps than words of the relationship here between our students, faculty and staff."

Tuchtenhagen estimates the University will have room for up to 60 new freshmen and 175 transfer students as a result of the removal of enrollment caps by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents.

New freshmen must meet standards of either scoring a 22 on the ACT test, or be in the top 40 percent of their high school graduating class and score an 18 ACT. Tuchtenhagen noted that the incoming first-year student admissions profile for the fall semester was near the top of the 13-campus University of Wisconsin System.

Also, Waller hopes the ACED-I will compile and publish research on the benefits of centralized and professional conference services; continue to lead in representing conference services during legislative action; and educate the membership of pending action.

Waller, who has been in the conference planning business for seven years, has a bachelor's degree in business administration from Central College in Pella, Iowa, and a master's degree in counseling and student development from Mankato State University in Minn.

The Ancia Quartet captivates audiences with a rich musical combination of skill  and creativity.  The ensemble performs a wide variety of music, including new music, their own arrangements, traditional classical, and toe-tapping jazz and swing.

"Most people who come to our concerts find something they really enjoy," said quartet member David Milne, who would recommend this concert for all types of audiences. Milne is the tenor saxophone player for the Ancia Quartet and an instructor of woodwinds and jazz studies at the University.

In fact, in their Feb. 4 concert, the Quartet will perform the world premiere of a piece composed by Robert Brownlow titled "In Admiration." Brownlow is a professor in the music department and director of the brass ensemble at UW-RF.

Since its founding in 1990, the Ancia Quartet has performed numerous college concerts, particularly in the Midwest.  Last year the Quartet performed as the feature group at the Minnesota and Iowa State Music Conventions, and at the National Saxophone Convention.

The group is actively involved in working closely with other saxophone quartets.  They recently performed in Berlin in the new music series "Klangfenster '95" in which they presented a program of American quartets and premiered several octets with the Berlin Saxophone Quartet.  The Ancia Quartet also appears frequently on Minnesota Public Radio.

A typical college student, her days are packed with the pressures of classes, homework and exams, two jobs, varsity soccer practice (or some other daily form of exercise), not to mention squeezing in a social life. She also has to find time to sleep, eat, and breathe.

Instead, the female student entered the large, unconventional classroom with high ceilings and a red mat covering the floor.  Students were lying silently on their backs, their eyes closed to the cavernous room, their hands at their sides in a "corpse" position.

The atmosphere is calm as class begins. The buzz of the lights and the occasional creaks and groans of the building can be heard through the silence.  In a soothing, steady tone, Albertson reminds students to focus on their breathing.  	Under Albertson's instruction, students began slowly stretching their bodies into various positions and hold each for around 30 seconds, continually focusing on breathing and relaxing their bodies. Between each stretch the meditators return to the original "corpse" position to relax and further focus the mind, body, and breathing.

Albertson's students are enrolled in his "Introduction to Yoga," a new class that meets for an hour two days each week.  Other classes in the physical education department include such popular sports as volleyball, tennis, and golf, as well as more unique activities such as scuba diving, cross-country skiing, and now yoga.

These classes, in conjunction with a required "Health and Fitness for Life," are all focused on teaching students to develop and maintain a healthier lifestyle. The goal is to have students develop the knowledge and skills in these college courses to maintain a healthy lifestyle throughout life.

Adds sophomore Joanna McCoy, an animal science major from Cannon Falls, Minn., "It relaxes me for the rest of the day. It improves flexibility and it's easy to do.  The positions are easy to learn and we can use what we learn outside of class."

Yoga is both physical and psychological; it provides relaxation and focus for the mind and body.  According to Albertson, over time and with practice, the meditation becomes more intense. "A focused mind leads to deeper and deeper meditation," he says.  However, yoga is not an escape from the present or from reality; the meditator doesn't block out his or her environment. Instead, yoga is an intense awareness, a complete focusing of the mind.

Albertson teaches what he calls "mindful yoga," which is more than just thought and exercise. It encompasses a balanced approach to life.  For example, to help the body stay balanced, Albertson says, as the human bodies stretches in one direction, it counteracts that stretch with another in the opposite direction.

Albertson also emphasizes the principle of moderation, which can apply in exercise, diet, work and other aspects of life. "If you don't practice moderation, you will pay the price," Albertson warns the students.

A third principle is not to be judgmental of yourself or others. Albertson tells students to enjoy and thrive in each posture and to accept their individual and differing abilities. They shouldn't worry if they're not as flexible as others or if they can't hold the posture as long.

The banquet, which was highlighted in a feature story in Midwest Living Magazine, will begin with wassail served at 6:30 p.m., with a brass fanfare to announce the hearty medieval-style feast at 7 p.m.

Groups of family, friends and business associates are encouraged to attend.  For every group of 15, one additional guest may attend for free.  In order to get this rate, group reservations must be submitted together and all must attend the same evening.

"This was truly gratifying to be recognized for the accomplishment of our efforts," Remund said. She added that the recognition  serves as an additional stamp of approval for the event, which enables artists, mainly of visual mediums, to gain the knowledge and tools, as well as networking opportunities, essential to making a living in the arts.

The nearly 150 participants at each of the last two annual events are from a large area of western Wisconsin and eastern Minnesota. Many local artists living in the St. Croix Valley are regular participants.

The 1997 agenda will include a presentation by a keynote speaker, a panel discussion, and several breakout sessions by experienced experts on topics relevant to forming a business of making and marketing art. Participants will learn to understand the economic impact of the arts on a community, as well as offering opportunities for culture and recreation.

The course will be taught Dr. Steven Derfler, area executive director of the American Jewish Committee of Minneapolis-St. Paul. Derfler specializes in teaching courses in archeology, comparative religions, Biblical history and geography. He is an accomplished author and has participated in numerous archeological excavations in Israel.

The Dead Sea Scrolls course will offer an intriguing look back in history when the foundations of the modern Bible were still emerging, Derfler said. The course will explore both the history of the Dead Sea Scrolls and their religious implications today to both the Jewish and Christian religions.

"I think that it is commonly accepted that there has been a revival across the board in America with an interest in religious matters," Derfler said of the attraction in such a course. "It is not simply characterized by a move to the (political ) right. There has been a heightened awareness of religiosity over the last five years.

Course participants will explore a variety of facets of the Dead Sea Scrolls, which were discovered in 1954 in caves near Qumran, Israel. They were hidden in 68 A.D. from Roman armies that destroyed the sect that created the Scrolls.

The Scrolls have slowly been translated, interpreted and released to the public by an internationally prominent team of researchers. But within the last few years, scholars who were frustrated with that pace, circumvented the team and provided substantial amounts of the Scrolls' contents to the world at large. Many scrolls still have not been interpreted and released, and others are still being discovered.

The sect, Jesus's ministry, and traditional Judaism based in Jerusalem constituted a period of religious exploration that set the foundation for the modern Bible, which did not appear until the Fourth Century.

As an example, the Scrolls contained 28 more verses of the Book of Isaiah then the current Bible. In another comparison, the current Bible contains four more verses of the Book of Samuel than did the Scrolls.

Students also will read a translation of the sect's "handbook." The translation describes the total lifestyle of the sect's members that tells new conscripts exactly how they are to conduct themselves in all aspects of communal life. "It is like a training manual," Derfler explains.

It includes a description of hidden treasure troves "that would make Indiana Jones' mouth drool," Derfler said. He said it relates such wonders as a cistern packed with 962 silver chalices. The directions to find it, however, are vague: it instructs the searcher to dig 18 cubits into the earth near a large rock.

Students also will study several  texts on the archeology and excavation of the sites, the methods of analysis, as well as the historical, social and political turmoil of the Ancient World at the time of the Scrolls.

Derfler noted that the course is subsidized in part by a grant from the Jewish Chataqua. The organization pursues educational goals to provide students with heightened awareness of cultural diversity.

The course should help participants to understand the evolution of Western religion that is leading to increased awareness of the roots of anti-Semitism and the ongoing healing process as Christians accept the strong Jewish roots of Christianity. Similarly, it will reflect the increasing acceptance in Judaism of the ministry of Jesus Christ that evolved out of the Jewish religious sphere, Derfler noted.

"What the Qumran Community does is put flesh on the bones of the shared Bible heritage and allows us to appreciate our own spirituality today in a much better fashion, and to respect the other religions that grew from the same sphere-and to understand and appreciate those religions and their practitioners," Derfler said.

Joan Kennedy is used to playing on two different fields. As director of student teaching placement at UW-River Falls, she must place and monitor up to 150 student teachers in area school districts. That, in itself, is a big job.

Kennedy, who is a faculty member in the UW-RF College of Education & Graduate Studies, serves on a University of Wisconsin System Ojibewe language preservation committee along with Native Americans from college campuses throughout the region. The task members meet each Saturday on campuses to develop strategies for keeping their native languages alive.

One result of the meetings is a basic 10-week Ojibewe course broadcast on the WONDER fiber optic distance learning network to campuses in central and northern Wisconsin. The course is particularly designed for teachers of  Native American students who will go back into the classrooms to teach the students the rudimentary basics. Plans are underway for more advanced courses as well.

Kennedy understands the difficulty of learning Ojibewe, a highly inflective language. One word can have 12 different endings and 12 different levels of meaning.  She, too, is in the process of learning.

"I supplemented the textbooks with the truth about Native American history. I questioned the theories which said Indians were descendants of Asians who arrived on the North American continent on the land bridge...how do they know that it wasn't the other way around? Every tribe has a creation story that has them created and put on the North American continent, and those creation stories are sacred to the Native American people.

It was after the death of her husband 14 years ago that Kennedy felt a powerful spiritual awakening. She felt very depressed, and went to see a holy man for help. She embarked on a vision quest and dreamed about a white wolf.

"I'm careful to observe the traditions that go along with these stories. There are some stories that are to be told only when there is snow on the ground, so as to not to encourage the mischievous tricks of  spirits."

Soon, she'll be an author of children's books. She has written two yet-to-be published books depicting classic Ojibewe stories. One is about Eseban, a raccoon that plays tricks on two blind brothers. The other is the Ojibewe version of the "Cinderella" story.

During the two-week institute, she lives in the dorms with the students and shares her experiences, This year, two graduates from past programs are studying at River Falls, and Kennedy serves as their mentor.

Both dance teams have been working independently since September on the choreography of a Cuban-derived dance. It is the result of an intensive field study of African and Cuban dance and the history of the eastern region of Cuba by UW-RF dance Professor Karla Zhe and UNC dance Professor Eleanor Gwynn.

Each group will perform a set of traditional and seasonal choral literature.  The concert will end with both groups singing together.  Selections include "Ride the Chariot," "Hallelujah Chorus" and "White Christmas."

The concert will showcase the winners of the Young Artist Competition, a state-wide event inaugurated at UW-RF in October.  Students 19 and younger displayed their musical talents before a panel of expert judges who rated their performance.

The Alliance received notification from the Wisconsin Department of Tourism on Nov. 11 that it was awarded the money under the department's Joint Effort Marketing Program. The six-county, bi-state Alliance is also seeking funding from the Minnesota Office of Tourism to assist the campaign.

The grants will be used for a promotional campaign targeted toward tourists from Iowa, Northern Illinois, the Dakotas and Kansas City through a "Seasons on the Scenic St. Croix Valley" campaign that will be conducted from late January through early March.

"This campaign also is seeking to 'widen the shoulders' of the tourism season. Typically, the Valley is a busy place from May through January. But the industry has few events to draw visitors during the off-peak months. 'Seasons on the Scenic St. Croix Valley' will fill that void," Marshall said.

A Valley-wide map and a description of each community emphasizing the unique cultural and historical content of the Lower St. Croix National Scenic Riverway, and its diverse recreational and tourism opportunities.

According to E-Marshall, the Alliance board members will soon be contacting businesses to finalize their participation in the coupon book. The cost per business is $199, with the book limited to 125 businesses on a first-come, first-served basis.

"This is a real bargain for the tourism and hospitality industry," E-Marshall said. "With the underwriting of the Wisconsin and Minnesota Tourism Departments, the cost to a business for each customer contact is just eight-tenths of one cent."

The Hudson and River Falls School Districts, in cooperation with UW-River Falls, are piloting a visionary new program designed to prepare students for the future while making learning more relevant and meaningful.

The program is being launched in selected classrooms in elementary, middle school and high school classrooms. About two dozen teachers from both districts are taking part in the program in the 1996-97 academic year.

Goals 2000 calls for schools to help children develop the knowledge and skills necessary to compete in a global economy. For virtually every child in the United States, that means familiarity with computer technology.

"Traditional teaching philosophies compare students to empty vessels, with the task of the teacher to fill the student with knowledge" says Daly. "Constructivism assumes an entirely different approach to learning."

In the constructivist classroom, the teacher's role is more of a facilitator, with the students directing and assuming more control of their own learning.	The basic premise to constructivism is that knowledge is not something only to be transmitted from one person to another, but also is a construction of personal meaning that students gain by interacting with people, information and objects in their world.

The more directly related those interactions are to real life, or "authentic" and varied the situations in which students interact with new concepts, the more it's likely that students will understand and apply those concepts to other everyday situations.

In traditional classrooms, teachers often find it difficult to assess how well students are applying what they learned. Critics say traditional assessment practices such as multiple choice and true-false tests are not an adequate tool to measure achievement in constructivist classes.

Constructivism relies on a variety of  practices to assess if real learning has taken place, including requiring students to demonstrate they have mastered the material by applying it in practical ways.

More of the work is done in project-based small groups, with students working in teams. The cooperative projects are also considered to be valuable because they prepare students more for the world of work, where teamwork skills are imperative.

"This isn't just a new fad or a new 'ism'," says Geoffrey Scheurman, a UW-RF educational psychology professor who is participating in the grant. "It has always been recognized that self-directed learning is more meaningful to students than that which is mandated and controlled by the teacher."

Giving a young child pennies, nickels and dimes to learn counting skills is a simple example of a constructivist teaching practice through a very practical, tangible and life-like medium. Advocates of the constructivist approach believe that information gleaned this way is more likely to be retained and transferred to real life situations than pre-digested information that is merely transmitted from teacher or textbook and absorbed by the student.

Most of  the grant program's constructivist approach relies heavily on technology.  Standiford, who directs UW-RF Educational Technology Center,  explains, "But we do not want to use technology for its own sake.  While constructivist teaching does not require technology, the purpose of this grant is to explore technology applications that support and enhance learning in a constructivist classroom.  The grant provides teachers with the support they need (software, technical consultations, demonstrations) while they develop their own portfolios of technology-supported projects and activities for their students."

Few school districts or colleges of education throughout the country are piloting this kind of program, says Daly. It will be several years before results of the program will be measurable in terms of improvement  in assessments, such standardized tests.

Constructivism emphasizes making learning meaningful for students through real-world activities, so that students will become more self-directed in the learning process. That makes it more likely that students will understand and apply larger educuational concepts to other everyday situations.

It is connected to a state-of-the-art Macintosh computer and a separate screen that displays readings in temperature, wind speed and direction, light and barometric pressure. The station also houses a flow-through rain gauge.

Finding a weather station and the funds to purchase it with was more difficult than she expected. "I called all the area television stations and finally KSTP gave me information about Weather Source."

Weather Source produces smaller scale weather stations for educational use along with the appropriate software and lesson plans. Still, the expense was about $4,000. Elling, with the help of Sue Popelka of  the UW-River Falls physics department, wrote a grant request to the Toyota Corp., but were turned down.

Eventually the whole regional area will be able to benefit from the weather station. Individuals can modem over to the computer in Elling's classroom for weather conditions instead of relying on weather forecasts from the Twin Cities, which can often have drastic weather differences. Plans for a web site are underway.

"While some were concerned that two grade levels would widen the ability gap between the students, that didn't really happen. The students are able to pick friends from a wider group, so they are more likely to choose friends who share their interests rather than confining themselves to their same grade peers."

Elling believes that more freedom in selecting friends boosts the students' self-esteem. In a recent critique of the classroom, one 5th grade student wrote, "I feel liked by both 4th and 5th graders and the teachers."

The students take over some of the administrative duties in the classroom, like taking attendance and wiping off the chalkboards. Elling says that enables students to see her less as a "supervisor" and more of a facilitator of knowledge.

Elling is one of two dozen teachers from the River Falls and Hudson school districts who are participating in a collaborative "Goals 2000" grant project. The grant, titled "It's About Time" is essentially  an educational philosophy dubbed "constructivism" with an emphasis on the use of technology in the classroom. The pilot is a cooperative project between the UW-RF College of Education & Graduate Studies and the River Falls and Hudson school districts.

To facilitate students learning cooperatively, Elling arranges her student's desks in groups of threes rather than the traditional line pattern. One of the lessons she recently taught had students arranging brightly colored squares to simulate a room.

"It certainly does!" Elling replied. In math as well as other subjects, Elling sets up tasks for students to work on in small groups. She asks them to make note of any discoveries they find. Then she introduces the lessons in a more traditional manner. The students get excited to find that their "discoveries" were on target.

Instead of desks, the students sit at round tables around the classroom. The class is outfitted with Apple computers, a color scanner, a QuickCam and a VCR-all to create an environment to produce very visual results for a crop of learners who have grown up in a multimedia world.

In addition to the high tech element in Steffen's classroom, the students will be learning some skills in traditional learning styles. They'll learn their multiplication tables through the numeral 5 by memorization, and practice handwriting and other skills appropriate for their age.

The majority of the classrooms in the pilot project, including Steffen's, will have Internet access donated by the UW-River Falls. The University also is supplying workshops on computer technology and in constructivist teaching methods.

Last year, George Bowman's Hudson High School history students used the Internet to help them create notebooks exploring the Holocaust and intends to use the information superhighway on projects again this year.

Part of the use of technology is that it simply provides a "hook" to get children interested in learning and is easily applied to many constructivist principles, like group work, project-oriented assignments and self-directed learning.

Two concerns parents often have about constructivism are whether  students are learning the progression of material they need to perform in standardized tests, and if the focus away from the teacher will cause discipline problems.

The change in focus doesn't imply that students are allowed to run amok, says Sambs. He reports that among all of the classrooms in his district, the constructivist classrooms have the least amount of discipline problems because the students are so enraptured with learning.

The hope is that the new approach to learning will help students contextualize those basic skills in a way that they have meaning, that the meaning will help the students learn the material better, and those standardized scores will improve.

Visit the Christmas celebration of Clara and her family and follow her on her dream journey to the Kingdom of Sweets.  This ballet is a traditional favorite performed by local dancers and students of the River Falls Ballet under the direction of Lynne Butenhoff.

This annual art sale features artwork of current UW-RF art students and alumni, current and retired faculty, and local professionals.  The proceeds are distributed in part to the Student Art League and to the Art Scholarship fund.  The sale includes glass, ceramics, jewelry, fibers, painting, printmaking, and photography.

This sale provides a wonderful opportunity for the public to purchase unique, handmade artwork while supporting university students and programs, according to sale coordinator Professor Jim Engbretson.

Zdechlik teaches theory and directs the instrumental music program at Lakewood Community College in White Bear Lake.  He is recognized among the jazz community as a prominent director and instigator of jazz music and has gained a reputation throughout the area and nationally for his superb concerts and directorship of the Lakewood Community College jazz ensemble.

The overall cost of your Christmas feast will be slightly higher this year compared to last, according to data collected from faculty at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

The main course of turkey, beef or pork will be higher than inflation, but most of  the fixings will keep pace with inflation. The overall price of food this year is up 4 percent from one year ago, about 1 percent higher then the general inflation rate.

However, chickens and turkeys only take seven weeks to raise, so poultry prices can drop fairly quickly compared to beef prices, since raising cattle requires a longer-term commitment. Recently, feed prices have begun to slide, leading to an expansion in poultry production. But those birds won't reach consumers before Christmas, Walters said.

During September, production of red meat was down eight percent from last year, according to a recent edition of "Wisconsin Farm Reporter," released Nov. 4 by the Wisconsin Agricultural Statistics Service.

Beef cattle have been sold at a lighter weight recently, as well, which also reflects the higher price of corn. The effects of a recent drop in feed prices won't be reflected in lower retail prices for beef until after the New Year.

Meanwhile, the price of beef has gone up at least 8 cents per pound since September and hog prices also increased due to strong exports, economic growth, increased food service demand, and relatively low pork stocks, states the "Wisconsin Farm Reporter."

Wisconsin is the No. 1 state in cheese production, producing an amazing 30 percent of the nation's cheese, as well as being at the top in milk and butter production. Although Wisconsin has more dairy cows than any other state, quantity will not translate into lower consumer prices this Christmas.

The rise in prices is being driven by brisk domestic and export demand, problems with feed quality, a rise in transportation costs, and high feed prices, according to Renee May, UW-RF animal and food science department dairy plant manager.  In addition, the number of milk cows across the nation has dropped, she says.

Wisconsin also is the nation's No. 1 producer of cranberries, contributing nearly 42 of the nation's supply. It's also the nation's leader in beets for canning, cabbage for kraut, snap beans, and corn for silage. It ranks near the top in many other vegetable crops: sweet corn for processing (second), green peas (second), potatoes (third), carrots (third), cucumbers for pickles (fourth), and tart cherries (fifth).

The price of potatoes has actually decreased significantly compared to last year at this time: about a 1.5 cent drop per pound.  However, the price of sweet potatoes has increased by nearly 5 cents per pound, and now stands at an average of 66 cents per pound in the state of Wisconsin.

Wisconsin cranberry growers are reporting a very good crop this year, according to the Wisconsin Farm Bureau. However, the price of a 12-ounce package of fresh cranberries is up 11 cents compared to last year.

Prices range anywhere from $3.10 to $5.65 per foot, depending on the quality of the tree and, of course, where it is purchased. Americans typically choose from two major species of Christmas trees: scotch pine or balsam fir.  These two species make up 30 of the pine trees grown in Wisconsin. Other varieties include Frazer white pine and spruce.

Pointsettias are another popular Christmas decoration and gift.  According to the annual "Floriculture Crops" report published in April, flowering potted plants will see a 2 percent wholesale price increase.

Pointsettias, the largest single contributor in this category, will increase 1 percent compared to the previous year. For consumers, that translates into about 7 cents more for pots larger than five inches. The most common price range for poinsettias is $20 to $25 for a 7-8 inch pot.

Weiss attributes his longevity in the Army Reserve to various reasons, foremost his sense of patriotism and obligation to his country. He also credits the reserve for providing him skills that are valuable in his civilian occupation.

Accuracy in Media, founded by Reed Irvine, investigates complaints of serious media misdeeds and works for the adoption of higher standards in reporting, editing, and approaching the news responsibly.

Wiley has reported from over 100 countries, while being arrested eight times by the former Soviet Union's secret police and in Cuba, in his search for the truth while reporting for WOR radio in New York. Along with covering eight wars for U.S. and foreign news media, several of his freelance articles and photographs have been published in Time, Newsweek and The New York Times.

Area senior citizens can study a range of political or historical topics, from saving and investing strategies, the effect of a balanced budget, Wisconsin lore and legends, and the Revolutionary and Civil Wars in Session II of the Senior Outreach Studies program at UW-River Falls.

The program is oriented toward food scientists and technologists; quality assurance supervisors, managers and technicians; food laboratory directors, managers and technicians; microbiologists and chemists involved in food quality assurance; regulatory agencies personnel and advisors; consultants and researchers involved in food safety and quality; and graduate and undergraduate students interested in food microbiology.

This year the symposium also will be the site of a National Media Fellowship for media seeking to learn more about food safety issues. The Fellowship was awarded by the Washington, D.C.,-based Council for the Advancement and Support of Education.

UW-RF is one of 30 universities selected for a Fellowship program by a national panel of journalists and higher education public information officers. The panel chose the symposium because of the impact of food poisoning outbreaks. Vasavada noted that the U.S. Department of Agriculture reports that 33 million Americans become ill each year, with some 9,000 deaths. The cumulative national economic impact can reach as high as $9.4 billion annually.

A Rapid Methods and Automation workshop will provide an opportunity to discuss conventional and rapid methods available for detection of pathogens such as Salmonella, Listeria, E.coli 0157:H7, Aflatoxin and other mycotoxins as well as for routine microbiological analysis of samples.

The construction project, which was to begin in June of last year, was delayed because negotiations after project bids were opened, says Jim Murphy, facilities engineer.  Construction began in mid-July.

Construction workers are now finishing the exterior remodeling, and the bulk of the work still to be completed is inside the library. Construction activities limit access to many areas inside the library.

Just after the start of fall semester, students were given access to the periodicals section, which are now in their permanent location. Along with the periodicals, electronic references and inter-library loan services are also available to students, Baum says.

Student access to the book stacks is still prohibited since they are in an on-going construction area, so the staff is  "paging" materials-retrieving it directly for the students, Baum says. The constant goal of the library staff is to provide students with the same quality service they received before the library was under construction, so the staff members continue to stress retrieval services.

A major advantage once the building is completed is a substantial addition of study space, Baum points out. Two attractive lobbies with new furniture will accommodate students at new ground- and first-floor entrances, Baum says.

They have toured internationally for over 10 years and have produced six recordings. Their appearances routinely draw critical praise for a repertoire that includes Renaissance, baroque, classical, romantic and contemporary music.

The UW-River Falls Art Department will  host a series of outdoor art installations across the central campus by students and faculty. The works will be throughout the main campus, and will be in sculptural form that are meant to be temporary additions.

The intent behind the project is to make art works that are playful, thought-provoking or startling, and creative. They are intended to compliment the beauty of the campus, which is nestled along the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River, during a team of changing leaves.

Participation will be on an individual or class basis. For example, a fiber optics class of 30 students will create a pathway behind Hathorn Cottage near the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic River. Each student will be responsible for a 20-foot "enchanted pathway" that will wander across campus. Some of the components may include wind chimes, archways, flowers, tunnels, water-based spray paint, gateways, natural substance tiles, fences, creative mowing, banners, mirrors, signage, pinwheels, arbors, rocks, etc.

Part of the workshop includes the completion and interpretation of the Self-Directed Search and the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator.  Other sessions will be spent exploring the career and employer resources information available in the UW-River Falls Career Resource Center.

UW-River Falls Professor Tony Jilek of the animal and food science department returned last month from his seventh trip to Nicaragua.  Jilek has been volunteering his time, expertise and dedication to improving the lives of Nicaraguans in a Wisconsin partnership program for almost 16 years.

"It is a great feeling to be recognized as a friend in these countries. It is like watching your own kids grow and develop; when they accomplish certain things, you take some personal satisfaction in being a part of it."

Jilek is now president of the Wisconsin chapter of Partners of the Americas, a non-profit organization formed in the early 1960s that links regions in the United States to areas in Latin America.  Volunteers assist in economic and social development and training, while fostering inter-American friendship.

Partners volunteers carry out development projects in areas such as agricultural development, natural resources management, environmental conservation, child health and nutrition, vocational training for disadvantaged groups, emergency preparedness and drug abuse prevention.

The Farmer-to-Farmer project-in Jilek's area of expertise-is designed to promote agricultural development and allows agriculturalists to share technology. The Farmer-to-Farmer committee recently selected several projects to pursue over the next five years.

As an illustration, Jilek points to their latest projects involving a small cooperative that has just begun raising, harvesting and processing a biological pesticide produced by a Nim tree.  This organic pesticide, which protects plants from insects and diseases, is being sold and marketed by other suppliers in the United States.

Nicaraguans are willing to work, but they lack knowledge on the best ways of doing things.  "If we could just improve their business skills so they could have a better quality of life, we would consider the project successful."

As Partners president, Jilek wore many hats in Nicaragua during his last visit.  He toured several cooperative sewing centers and was greeted by gifts, welcomed with parties and treated like a family member.

After visiting one of the sewing centers, Jilek said, he will never forget a student from a university who traveled 150 miles to see him.  "There were four or five instances like this where I was treated like a family member coming home," Jilek said.  "It really tugs at your heartstrings."

The awards were presented through polling of recent graduates. UW-RF surveyed graduates from two and four years ago who were asked to vote for two outstanding instructors in humanities, social science, and science & mathematics.

According to Dean Neal Prochnow, Paulson "is a caring, highly organized instructor who has the ability to meet the needs of students, ranging from entry level to returning teachers working toward certification."

Paulson has published numerous journal articles and has presented widely on the subject of radiation, nuclear energy and energy conservation. He is also involved in providing inservice training opportunities for middle and high school teachers in the areas of nuclear power and radiation.

Additionally, he is active in health physics, serving as present of the North Central Chapter of the Health Physics Society. He also is a member of the Upper Midwest Section of the American Nucelar Society and serves on its public information committee.

Paulson holds a masters in experimental nuclear physics from UW-Madison and post-masters training at the Oak Ridge Associated Universities in the areas of radiation, nuclear medicine and environmental monitoring.

Brown has presented regionally, nationally and internationally on such varied topics as screen image of Jodie Foster, Madoona as a cultural icon, the teaching of women's studies, sexist language, Thailand and the sex industry, pornography, and a number of other subjects. Brown spent a semester on sabbatical in Thailand in Fall 1995 to gather research for an upcoming book analyzing Western travel literature and Siam. She is writing an essay-length memoir recalling her childhood experiences in Thailand.

Brown holds bachelor's and master's in English from Virginia Tech and a Ph.D, from the University of Florida in Gainesville. She teaches introductory literature and composition courses, as well as American literature, women in literature and film, sexuality in culture, advanced composition and computer-assisted writing.

He teaches introductory psychology as well as child and adolescent development, adulthood and aging, human learning and graduate level coursework.  He is published in the areas of life span development psychology and child development, and has presented regionally and nationally in his field. He works as a consultant and volunteer for the River Falls School District as well as conducting  a number of independent research projects in a number of  issues affecting humans throughout their life span.

The project has been waiting for funding since 1993 when an environmental and safety consultant reported poor ventilation conditions in the art department and the speech communication and theatre arts department.

Because of pollutants such as clay dust and the heavy metals in clays that exist in art classrooms, proper ventilation will make these areas safer and healthier.  	The project calls for two actions:  ventilation systems will be replaced and modified in the art and speech areas,  and aluminum wiring will be replaced with copper throughout the building.

The Dean's Office will be moved to two remodeled classrooms on the south side of Kleinpell on the first floor, and to make up for the lost classroom space, about 4,500 square feet of South Hall's third floor will be remodeled to create four additional classrooms.

In Kleinpell remodeling will include about 5,000 square feet on the basement floor and 6,600 square feet on the first floor.  Also, a 1,100 square foot addition with fire walls be added to west side to house the art department's kilns and glass furnaces.

"There is no longer any question that there is bias in the media," said Charles Wiley, a spokesperson for Accuracy in the Media. A veteran journalist, Wiley spent several days at UW-River Falls speaking to journalism classes.

But Wiley believes that advocacy journalism is what exists in today's world. In that role a journalist takes what he or she doesn't like about society and reports the information from his or her view point.  It is a tactic that is getting out of hand, Wiley added.

Wiley pointed to failures in the educational system as the cause of journalists losing their sense of their role within a democracy. But that does not exonnerate journalists, he added.  "It is our job to educate ourselves.  There is more to it than sitting in a classroom and having a piece of paper to show for it."

It also investigates allegations of serious media misdeeds, seeks corrections from media; brings a public spotlight to media indiscretions; promotes higher professional standards for reporting, writing and editing.

About 100 people attended a speech by Jeffrey Birnbaum, who reports on national politics focusing on lobbying, the White House and the presidential campaign. Birnbaum's reporting has been recognized nationally, and his insights into Congress and the White House have been translated into best-selling books.

The early days of the Clinton White House are the focus of Birnbaum's latest book, "Madhouse: The Private Turmoil of Working for the President," in which he details the experiences of six senior staffers.

Birnbaum graduated from the University of Pennsylvania with bachelor of arts in journalism and has held positions at the Wall Street Journal in Philadelphia, the Associated Press and the Miami Herald.

The world famous Canadian Brass will bring its unique blend of great musicianship, humor and entertainment to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls as they perform a holiday concert on Sunday, Dec. 15.

"Blending virtuosity, musicality, comedy and wit, they [the Canadian Brass] inspired equal measures of laughter and admiration from the packed house, ultimately receiving the inevitable-and totally deserved-standing ovation," praised the Washington Post following a Canadian Brass performance at the Kennedy Center in Washington, D.C.

The key to The Canadian Brass' performance style is communication between the artists and their audiences.  The players feel strongly that it is important to involve the audience in their concerts, both to enhance the listeners' enjoyment of the music and to ensure that they have fun.

The Canadian Brass add appropriate commentary and tasteful touches of humor to their concerts.  "It was a show that had the near-capacity audience applauding one moment in recognition of the group's fine musicianship, and laughing uncontrollably the next at their antics," proclaimed Jim Farber, classical music critic for the Long Beach (Calif.) Press-Telegram.

The Canadian Brass is most famous for its live concerts, trademarked by their tennis shoes with tuxedos, their unique opening entrance from the back of the auditorium, and their comical "Tribute to the Ballet," an audience favorite that includes the musicians' hilarious ballerina imitations.

The group's dazzling performances, combined with unique programming, has enabled them to bring classical music to vast new audiences, while providing some of the best musical entertainment to be found anywhere.

Editor's Note: This call for community grant proposals has a deadline of Dec. 31. To ensure that interested parties in your community have adequate time to apply, publication of the information in this release should occur by mid-November.

Groups of rural communities working cooperatively to address local issues in Wisconsin or Minnesota are eligible for up to $9,000 in training and technical assistance through a program at the UW-River Falls Rural Development Institute.

In its third year, the Cooperative Development Initiative is funded by the W.K. Kellogg Foundation and provides training and technical assistance to assist start-up cooperative and collaborative ventures through the initial start-up phases, helping to ensure their long term success.

Two projects, one in Wisconsin and one in Minnesota, will be selected to receive $9,000 in custom designed technical assistance over a two-year period.  The initiative will choose groups from several communities that propose projects integrated with cooperation and collaboration.  An innovative project submitted by several people from one community will also be considered.

In past projects, the Cooperative Development Initiative has helped the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance promote tourism, the Northwest Minnesota Development Achievement Center Cooperative improve services for developmentally disabled adults. Also funded were the Southwest Minnesota Housing Partnership to address the shortage of safe, sanitary, affordable rural housing in the area, and the Minnesota Agro-Forestry Cooperative, a producer-owned supply and marketing cooperative of hybrid poplar growers in central Minnesota.

The Initiative stresses the need for communities to work together.  "As resources get stretched tighter and problems are beyond the scope or capacity of a single community or organization, more and more groups are choosing to collaborate to resolve common issues," says David Trechter, Initiative director and extension specialist in cooperatives at UW-RF.

"This is a unique project in agriculture and natural resources management," Rhode says.  "This is an excellent opportunity for the four universities involved to use interactive video technology that will be used increasingly in the future."

According to UW-SP Chancellor Thomas George, "This project has great appeal not only for its creative use of technology and long-distance communication for instruction, but also for its high degree of collaboration among various campuses in the UW System."

UW-Madison.  The three instructors meet between classes on television and through conference telephone calls.  Students contact the teachers and each other with letters sent through computer networks via e-mail.

"It gives future teachers the experience of working with different media, something they will be doing in their careers.  I was very pleased with how well the students work together as teams even though most of them have only seen each other on TV and corresponded by e-mail," says Larsen, of River Falls.

Professors are challenged to stimulate discussion and small group interaction among students in remote locations.  The traditional lecture, where the instructor talks and students listen, can strain students' concentration.  Assignments may require collaboration between students at a distance from each other.  In addition, getting the students' work to the faculty and then back to the student can be a challenge.

E-mail, telephone, and televised conferences are used to solve some of the problems.  "We have students coming together working on joint projects across institutions, learning new content and new teaching and learning processes simultaneously."  Gibson says.  "I think we'll all be better prepared for the next century as a result."

Problems faced by the instructors can be overcome by training and practice, Wilke says. Each campus will use the grant money to train three faculty members in effective methods for teaching at a distance. "We suspect that the teaching methods we develop will not be radically different from the good teaching practices we already know about," Wilke says.  "We will learn to apply them in new ways in a radically new environment."

Collaboration will mean less duplication among campuses, but it creates the administrative problems of scheduling classes in more than one place at the same time and giving credit to students from several institutions.  The project directors will find out whether the real costs of offering this type of distance education stacks up to the real costs of offering face-to-face courses.  Many factors have to be taken into consideration, including preparation time for teachers, the number of students reached, and the number of faculty members involved.  "There are  many pieces of the puzzle to be considered," Wilke says.

Looking into the future, courses in agri-business, economics, horticulture and landscape architecture may be offered in the spring of 1998.  The grant funding will formally be over by then, but "This as an ongoing project that will outlive the grant," Larson says.

Allen is a professional artist from Lake Nebagemon, Wis. Her work combines rich ceramic surfaces on porcelain with the influences and techniques of printmaking. Her images are influenced by American Indian rock paintings from the Lake Superior area, the Southwest, and childrens' art.

Kloppman came to the Unites States from Germany several years ago. Her study of ceramics has taken her from Iowa City to the Penland School of Craft in North Carolina to the Kansas City Institute of Art. She now resides in Stillwater, Minn., and recently completed her master of fine arts at the University of Minnesota. Her recent work is primarily hand built, organic in nature with minimal surface decoration. Her large pieces have a commanding presence.

Lindsay received her MFA from Louisiana State University. After working at Penland she purchased a home and studio in Penland, N.C., where she continues her work as a ceramic artist. Her work is often figurative in nature, taking some influence from ceramics of the Minoan culture of Crete.

McKeachie-Johnson has lived and maintained a studio east of River Falls for 18 years. Her exhibition works are mainly woodfired in a large Noborigama kiln. Her work is influenced by medieval English slipware, the Minoan ceramics of Crete, and the work of Japanese artist Shoji Hamada. She has studied at the University of Minnesota, and the University of Southern Illinois at Edwardsville.

Shellenbarger worked and resided at Penland and continued her studies at the Kansas City Institute of Art. After receiving her MFA from Southern Illinois, she moved to Helena, Mont., to continue her work at the Archie Bray Foundation. She combines elements of throwing, hand-building and drawing in her forms to create lively, entertaining vessels.

The seminar will be led by Professor Barbara Rebhuhn with special guest presenter Richard Lavoie, who is the designed of the popular F.A.T. City Workshop and video. Lavoie's work acquaints adults with the Frustration, Anxiety and Tension inherent in learning disabilities.

Topics to be covered including preventative discipline techniques, managing the distractible child, techniques for behavior management, myths about motivation, developing an individual motivation plan for youngsters, the effective use of natural consequences, and understanding and fostering self-esteem.

"I think the construction of a new Teacher Education Center its a critically important step in the continuing collaboration and evolution of the relationship between our College of Education & Graduate Studies with the school districts in our region," Thibodeau said.

"This will allow us to build a state-of-the-art facility that will infuse technology into our teacher preparation efforts and provide them with all of the skills that they will need. The facility is crticial from an instructional perspective, and it is critical for continuing our collaborative relationship with school districts in our region."

The College is presently housed in the Ames Teacher Education Center, constructed in 1963 as a laboratory school for training teachers. It will be vacated by the College with present plans to use it as a business incubator and small business development facility.

A suite of 12 modern classrooms for teacher training surrounding the building's heart: the Educational Technology Center. The Center serves as the hub for introducing undergraduate and graduate education students to emerging instructional and information technologies.

Creation of a regional Outreach Center that will provide laboratory services from faculty and students to educators and regional residents for the Departments of Communicative Disorders, Counseling and School Psychology, Social Work and the Reading Center. For the first time, the College will have  therapy rooms and group counseling rooms for these services, in addition to upgraded diagnostic facilities.

Dean Daly noted that the College of Education & Professional Studies traces its roots to the founding of the State Normal School at River Falls in 1874 to train teachers. The new facility will carry that education tradition well into the next century, she said.

The building will  solidify the College's "constructivist" philosophical approach to education, Daly said. That advocates a dynamic creation of understanding in which educators are taught the techniques to require their students to be active participants in their education, rather than allowing students to passively have teachers "fill" them with knowledge.

Elementary education associate Professor Brenda Shearer, a nationally recognized specialist in reading education, has been selected as the Outstanding Faculty Member of the College of Education & Graduate Studies at UW-River Falls.

Last year, Shearer implemented a multi-cultural education program between UW-RF, the Hillsborough Secondary School, and the Carriacou School District in Grenada, West Indies.  Participating students and faculty gave cross cultural lessons,  installed several Apple computers and trained the West Indian students and teachers on educational software.

An examination of employer, worker and community responses to tight labor markets and low wage labor in western Wisconsin will be offered to citizens and small town officials as part of a workshop at UW-RF.

The topics Green will discuss include:  factors and symptoms of  the labor shortage, characteristics of the firms facing difficulty, jobs in the greatest demand, responses from residents and employers, and short-term strategies available to communities and employers.

Western Wisconsin counties includes in the survey are Barron, Burnett, Douglas, Pierce, and St. Croix. For his presentation, Green has collected data from employers and workers through face-to-face and telephone interviews from more than 700 employers, with at least 50 from each county.

"Understanding the Labor Force," by Professor Larry Swain, community development specialist, UW-RF Cooperative Extension.  Swain will provide an opportunity to explore people styles to maximize the effectiveness of a workforce.

"Business/Industry/Trainer Responses to the Labor Shortage."  A panel representing area employers, the vocational-technical training system and temporary placement agencies will provide a profile of the current available and trained labor force, employer needs and concerns.

The workshop will be offered from 8:30 a.m. to 3 p.m. and the fee is $45, which includes learning materials, refreshments and lunch.  The fee for a second person to attend from the same community organization or business is $20.  The deadline to register is Sept. 20.

"You've never heard or seen gospel the way these folks do it," said coordinators of the Winnipeg Jazz Festival.  "The Minneapolis Gospel Sound explores contemporary rhythm and blues, original compositions and an infectious level of passion and fervor."

The Minneapolis Gospel Sound has performed locally at the Orpheum, Guthrie, Ordway, and World theaters, and are famous for their now legendary Sunday gospel brunches performed weekly at the Fine Line Music Cafe in downtown Minneapolis.  The group has toured over 200 colleges nationally, averaging more than 50 colleges per year.  They have performed with Aretha Franklin, the Queen of Soul,  entertained during half time of the 1992 Super Bowl, and further gained international recognition at the highly acclaimed Winnipeg Jazz Festival.  In addition, the group's voices can be heard in a nationally broadcasted commercial for Pizza Hut.

The powerful, soul stirring music of the Minneapolis Gospel Sound will appeal to everyone and is guaranteed to bring audiences to their feet.  Lively, up-beat tunes include "Oh Happy Day" and "People Get Ready," as well as familiar crowd favorites such as "Lean On Me" and "Amazing Grace."

Kaye Schendel, assistant director of student activities at UW-River Falls, has been appointed as the National Association for Campus Activities regional conference coordinator for the Wisconsin region.

As conference coordinator, Schendel will select a regional conference committee, be responsible for all aspects of the regional conference, and produce a post-conference evaluation and final report that will include recommendations for future events.  The regional conference will be held in April in Stevens Point.

NACA is a non-profit organization founded in 1960 that focuses on student leadership development, enhancing programs outside the classroom, and improving the campus activities profession.  The organization also works to increase campus-wide programming, including both educational and entertainment activities.  NACA includes over 1,200 colleges and universities and 600 talent and promotional agencies nationwide.

Schendel's position as conference coordinator makes her a primary contact within the region and provides numerous connections with national booking and talent agents.  She hopes this opportunity will open doors for UW-RF and gain further publicity and recognition for the University.

The UW-River Falls Wyman Concert & Lecture Series is in full swing this year with three events set the first week of October.  The events range from a presentation by a World War II veteran about his experiences, to a world renowned solo guitarist, to a lecture on human relations.

Frank Van Dan was born and raised in Hungary and served in the Royal Hungarian Army at the beginning of World War II.  Because he was part Jewish he was interned into a forced labor battalion.  He escaped and joined the Resistance movement against the Nazis.  When Van Dan became in danger of being caught, he used false identity papers to enlist in the German Waffen SS, where he served as an interpreter.  After defecting from the Nazis he rejoined the Resistance and helped Allied and American airmen shot down in battle to escape German-held territory.

The tour will start in Lisbon, home of the 15th century explorers who roamed the world. Next the tour heads to Seville in southern Spain with its splendid cathedral, the 3rd largest in the world, its Moorish quarter, and its profusion of flowers. Nearby is Jerez, world capital of sherry wine production. 	Southern Spain was in Moorish/Muslim control from 719-1492, and tour members will see the many remaining influences in architecture, cuisine, dancing, and music. A short hydrofoil ride will then take the group to Morocco in North Africa and the exotic city of Tangiers. The port is an ancient one, and the crowded market and narrow streets with colorful goods is completely different from Europe.

Returning to Spain, stops include Torremolinos on the Costa del Sol to enjoy the sun and charming hillside villages; Granada, capital of the Moors until 1492; Alhambra, most beautiful of Moorish palaces with its carved ivory, gardens, and fountains; and Madrid with its royal palace, monuments. There will be special visits to the great Prado Museum, with the world's finest collection of paintings by El Greco, Velasquez, and Goya, as well as many others. The new Museum of Modern Art is also on the itinerary, as well as nearby Toledo, once home to El Greco.

Business Administration department chair Glenn Potts has been named to lead an extensive new initiative at UW-River Falls to develop a formal program to provide faculty and student assistance to businesses in the St. Croix River Valley.

The School was approved by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents in May, and will coordinate the activities of more than 21 faculty members in the departments or programs of accounting, business administration, marketing, finance, economics and computer information systems. The combined programs have some 800 students enrolled as majors and minors.

Dean Neal Prochnow, of the College of Arts & Sciences, said that Potts'   extensive academic leadership in the College and business experience made him the logical choice to coordinate program development in the new School.

"Glenn has exhibited the leadership to build our business administration program over the last several years that has led to excellent business program lateral reviews by the University of Wisconsin System, which resulted in our designation as a School.

"We need to continue the growth of our business programs and expand the outreach of our faculty. We need to be proactive in that. I'm very excited about our ability to do that through this new position and initiatives. This is probably one of the best opportunities in the past two decades for UW-River Falls to provide program initiatives to businesses in our service area."

A major responsibility for Potts will be to develop a formal business outreach program between the School and the region's business community. That will be accomplished through a range of activities initiated cooperatively by the School's faculty.

These extensive new activities for interaction between faculty, students and the region's business community "are a major step to creating a first-class business program at UW-River Falls," Potts said. "We are already seeing significant excitement and enthusiasm for this program development."

Launching an extensive survey in January with the UW-RF Rural Development Institute and the Small Business Development Center in Eau Claire of regional businesses to determine the types of assistance they need.

Purchase and make accessible to service area businesses a "Groupware" statistical software package that helps facilitate strategic planning and group decision-making in such areas as production and marketing.

Explore creating a graduate degree program in applied business administration targeted to the specialized needs of regional businesses. As examples, these could be directed toward regional business niche target areas such as the plastics industry or tourism, Potts said.

Expand nternship activities from the current 45 percent of the School's students. "We want to increase that," Potts said. "These students are really quite talented and bring a lot to the businesses where they intern."

Strengthen the School's activities in the University of Wisconsin System Business Consortium Group. This would increase the opportunity for UW-RF students and those from other UWS campuses to participate in each other's international business exchange programs.

Develop articulation agreements with Chippewa Valley Technical College and Wisconsin Indianhead Technical College to ensure that business-oriented courses can be transferred to UW-RF for degree credit.

"I believe that the creation of the School of Business & Economics will allow for the development of new programs in business administration and accounting that will better meet the needs of the St. Croix Valley," Potts said. "We will work hard to identify where that need exists.

"That also will result in a significant improvement in the quality of programs for our students in the sense of their ability to interact with the business community because of internships, certifcate programs and international opportunities that don't exist now.

State University. He chaired the economics department until 1992 when he began to serve as chair of business administration department and led it through its reaccreditation process. His University service also includes two terms as chair of the Faculty Senate.

His scholarly research has included papers on topics such as political influence on monetary policy formation, which was quoted in the Wall Street Journal; the effect of bank structure on credit to local communities; and the economic consequences of international debt for developing countries.

Potts also has extensive business and entrepreneurial experiences. He directed an international business workshop for four years that brought Taiwan business people to establish investments in American businesses with import and export needs.

He also is president of GEM International, Inc., a trading company that imports and exports several products, including the Flu-Flu fishing lure produced for OO Lures of River Falls. His other ventures include exporting synthetic rubber and carbon black, and importing exercise equipment.

Professor Gary Green of the UW-Madison rural sociology department focused on employer, worker and community responses to tight labor markets and low wage labor in western Wisconsin in conjunction. The presentation was tied to an on-going series of workshops to address rural economic development issues sponsored by UW-RF Continuing Education Extension.

Western Wisconsin counties included in the survey are Barron, Burnett, Douglas, Pierce, and St. Croix. Green collected data from employers and workers through face-to-face and telephone interviews from more than 700 employers, with at least 50 from each Wisconsin county.

Green says that communities and firms need to view labor shortages as a collective problem.  They need to find collective solutions to improve child care, reduce job turnover rates and improve worker productivity.

By providing funds that subsidize affordable housing, child care and transportation, communities would provide incentives for workers and employers to stay in the community and invest there, Green said.

Birnbaum is a senior correspondent for TIME magazine covering national politics with an emphasis on the White House, lobbying and the presidential campaign.  He is the author of Madhouse: The Private Turmoil of Working for the President, a recent book that grew out of his coverage of the Clinton White House.

Birnbaum gained in-depth access to senior White House staffers and chronicled their experiences as the Clinton Administration's early promise turned into frustration and disappointment. The Wall Street Journal noted the book "provides a fascinating look at the Clinton White House through the eyes of six top staffers. This riveting account is sometimes funny, often disturbing, and always insightful."

Participants attending the workshop will be briefly introduced to the business of grants and sources for funding, instructed on how to design a project and construct a proposal within a K-12 school district, and led through the proposal-writing process.

Campbell has been the director of grants and research at UW-River Falls since 1990.  He has taught at several colleges and universities and has created and implemented a variety of academic assistance and honors programs.  Along with writing or co-writing hundreds of successful grant proposals, Campbell has led proposal writing workshops for a variety of local, regional and national organizations.

Abrahamson is president of the Educational Services Company and retired acting superintendent/academic services director for the River Falls School District.  He has extensive experience in writing and administering educational grants.

These services are open to the public and are covered by most private insurance and by government-funded medical assistance.  If there is no insurance or the services are not covered, the fee will be based on a sliding scale pegged to income so those who need the services can receive it.

According to Paul Hayden, chair of the communicative disorders department, because this is a teaching clinic the faculty and students seek to see a wide variety of cases.  Individuals of all ages are encouraged to seek out the services if they have a need, Hayden said.

A laryngectomy group consists of individuals who have had the larynx removed due to cancer.  They meet on Wednesday afternoons for  support and therapy.  After having the larynx removed, the client must learn an alternate method of producing sound.

There are three ways to accomplish this, Hayden said.  The first method is an electrolarynx in which a mechanical device is pressed against  the soft tissue in the neck.  This sends a vibration into the vocal tract and produces sound. Another method is esophageal speech in which the patient is taught to use the top of the esophagus as a sound source.  The third option is prosthetic-assisted esophageal speech.

The Speech/Language and Hearing Clinic is handicapped accessible and is located on the second floor of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.  It is open from 8 a.m. to 4 p.m. five days a week during the school year and Monday through Thursday during the summer. Parking is close to the building and spaces are available for persons with disabilities.  For more information on any of these services call 715/425-3801.

The main problem, he says, is the violence.  Movies like "Scarface," a depiction of  Cuban-American gang life, create an impression that Latinos are more violent than other Americans. The urban "Gangsta" movies of the 1990s portray Latinos as drug dealers, pimps and social problems. If Latin women are not portrayed as floozies or as prostitutes, they are often individuals who sing, dance, and entertain-like Carmen Miranda or Charro.

However, Cortes doesn't suggest teachers censor those images in the classroom. To the contrary, he thinks teachers should show  students clips of those movies, if only to illustrate a point. "Teachers can use those [bad] films to show what is wrong with those messages and to help students think critically."

The UW-River Falls institute, "Cinematic Representations of America's Ethnic Minorities," is a four-week intensive institute instructing secondary school teachers on film use when teaching minority literature, history and social studies. It is funded through the National Endowment for the Humanities.

Cortes also explored the concept of "borders," a metaphor he feels is an especially strong motif in films depicting Latino characters. He explained that borders are not only geographic, like the border between Mexico and the United States, but are cultural, racial, sexual and internal.

In the film Valens, portrayed by Lou Diamond Phillips, crosses a geographic border when making a road trip with his brother to old Mexico. In Mexico, he crosses a spiritual border when he undergoes a religious ceremony performed by a  Mexican Indian. Back home in Texas, Valens crosses a cultural border from the barrios to middle class suburban life when he visits his white girlfriend Donna.

Cortes' favorite film, however, is "El Norte," which depicts Guatemalans who emigrate to the United States. He thinks the film is especially good because the characters are multidimensional, and multidimensional characters dispel the stereotypes that exist about Latinos.

As classes begin at UW-River Falls on Sept. 3, the institution will welcome one of its brightest incoming classes, whose members are among the best prepared in the institution's 122-year history for the challenges of pursuing a college education.

He noted that the surge in applications, a near record 2,600 and an incoming class that is nearly 20 percent larger than last year's, comes at a time when many higher education institutions are struggling to make their admissions goals.

"This is their university of first choice, which is very important to understand when you look at our student profile. The students who are coming to us are listing River Falls as the institution that they plan to attend.

"All of these things are coming together pretty well. So when our admissions staff provides information to prospective students about River Falls, they and their parents see it as a place that has a lot of the specifics they are seeking.

"The quality that this incoming class represents is the result of the work of many people over a number of years to focus our strengths and tell people what they are. As a result, we are getting more and more highly qualified students picking River Falls as their first-choice University. That speaks volumes about this place and its vitality and strength."

The near record numbers for the incoming class also were influenced by a policy decision of the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents to remove enrollment limits this year after eight years of caps. "Once those caps came off, we were affected by the pent-up demand from students who had wanted to get in for a long time," Tuchtenhagen said.

Some of the academic disciplines that are seeing the greatest demand are elementary education in the nationally ranked College of Education & Professional Studies; the sciences, particularly in the Center of Excellence for undergraduate physics and chemistry, as well as in biotechnology, food sciences and biology; the School of Business & Economics; and in the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

Understanding the Labor Force, Professor Larry Swain, community development specialist, UW-RF Cooperative Extension. Swain will provide a hands-on opportunity to explore people styles, and how to use the information to maximize your workforces' effectiveness.

Business/Industry/Trainer Responses to the Labor Shortage. Panelists representing employers, vocational-technical training system and temporary placement agencies will profile the current available and trained labor force, employer needs and concerns.

Oct. 15: Jeffrey Birnbaum, an award-winning reporter and author with Time Magazine, will speak at 7 p.m. in the North Hall Auditorium.  Birnbaum is a senior correspondent covering national politics with an emphasis on the White House, lobbying and the presidential campaign.

Feb. 4: The Ancia Quartet will take the stage at 8 p.m. at the Abbott Concert Hall in the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building.  This saxophone quartet captivates their audience with an extensive repertoire which includes new music, classical, jazz and their own arrangements.

The Connolly Dance Company will be performing at UW-River Falls on a date still to be announced.  The company strives to provide audiences of all ages with fresh, innovative, accessible and exciting dance performances.

The impact of that cut, Thibodeau said, was blunted by the University's Reach for the Future strategic planning process that is intended to shift nearly $2.5 million from salaries to classroom support by the year 2000.

This year the campus strategic plan will continue to reallocate resources parallel to the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents' budget request, just approved last Friday, for the next biennium. That will include $52 million for new initiatives in information and instructional technologies, as well as academic advising support to help students more quickly complete their college educations. Further, the Regents requested $59.5 million in new funding to pay for continuing costs such as health care premiums and construction debt service.

"True, we have pressing resource needs, we must work hard to implement difficult strategic planning initiatives, and we must become more proactive and successful in advancing the priority of higher education in Wisconsin and nationally. But the fact is that what we experience here at this University on an ongoing basis-the quality of our academic life and work-is the envy of many working professionals, including a vast majority of our higher education colleagues at colleges and universities throughout this country."

Thibodeau noted that the budget request, while seeking limited new dollars "will, if approved, both stabilize the System and allow us to grow in very important areas. I sincerely believe that the next legislative session will enable us to reverse the cut mentality and stop the fiscal hemorrhaging experienced by the System during the last four years."

That follows more than $27 million in on-going or planned building projects that include the nearly completed remodeling of the Chalmer Davee Library, groundbreaking next spring of the new Ames Teacher Education Center, a ventilation remodeling project for the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building, classroom expansion in South Hall, remodeling of Stratton Hall, campus wiring and classroom technology projects.

Reviewing the previous year's accomplishments resulting from its strategic planning process, Thibodeau said, it was "the incredible intellectual resource base" of faculty and staff that helped the University to make progress during a time of "serious threats."

Welcoming its students for the first day of class on Sept. 3, that includes 1,200 new freshmen who are among the best prepared in the institution's history and who have made UW-RF their first choice for college.

"It is important to emphasize that our strategic planning efforts this past year have sharpened and will continue to sharpen our educational focus," Thibodeau concluded. "UW-River Falls is fully committed to its long tradition of providing truly exceptional educational experiences to its students. That will not change."

The cyberspace presence two UW-River Falls projects-the Scenic St. Croix Valley and Falcon Athletics-have been the recent recipient of plaudits and recognition for the value of their information and graphic design.

Chamber and Business Association presidents and executive directors played a critical role in gathering the information listed on the Web site, according to Mark Kinders, SCVRTA marketing chair, and public affairs director at UW-River Falls.

"These community leaders first had the foresight to form what everyone in the tourism and hospitality industry tells us is unique because of its true collaboration between communities and its bi-state approach. And they have been recognized for their continued, remarkable insight in anticipating and widely sharing the kind of information that visitors want to know," added Sheryl E-Marshall, Alliance president.

The web site, which was built and hosted by UW-River Falls, features a searchable index of Valley resources, including lodging, campgrounds, retail establishments, boat and train tours, marinas and boat ramps, and more. It also provides community descriptions, an index of businesses and attractions, including on-line links, and a continuously updated calendar of events.

The directory reached into numerous departments at UW-River Falls, according to Kinders. He noted that information was gathered through a nine-month project initiated by Professor David Trechter and Linda Jacobson of the Cooperative Development Initiative in the Rural Development Institute. The CDI project assisted the tourism alliance in strategic planning and marketing, and provided the funding to print the 120-page "Ask Us" directory.

Those efforts led to the tourism page selection as a "Best of the USA" site by JT Freelancing, a Wisconsin consulting firm. In addition to being carried in its index in the Wisconsin and Minnesota Web Site directories, the Scenic St. Croix Valley page was chosen as one of two "Excellent Site" designees for the state of Minnesota. Just 100 sites from across the United States will be included in that category.

The JT Site describes the "Best in the USA" pages as "a comprehensive, geographic listing of each state's best web pages" that are "chosen based on creative design as well as content benefiting their state."

The site also earned a favorable review from Bill Geist of Zeitgeist Consulting in Wisconsin. Geist, who represented the state of Wisconsin to the White House Conference on Tourism and has twice served as president of the Wisconsin Convention and Visitors Bureau Association, consults widely to the tourism and hospitality industry throughout the Midwest.

Geist cited the fact that the Scenic St. Croix Valley site is unusual because of its bi-state collaboration and its "good use of search functions to produce information that is customized to (a visitor's) every desire."

"Brett Longdin's work on the Falcons athletic department web site was crucial to its success," said Jim Thies, UW-RF sports information director. "He experimented with several formats and observed other sites. With each new try he came up with something better than before. Now it is recognized as one of the best. In all, several students within the sports information office also contributed to the site, which keeps Falcons athletics at the top of cyberspace technology."

Area senior citizens can study a range of topics including nature, affirmative action, the digital world, and TV news coverage of crime in Session I of the Senior Outreach Studies program at UW-River Falls.

Hirschberger's paintings, done in a native style with a Renaissance texture, depict some of the major aspects of the Holocaust as it affected himself , his family, including the death of his father in a Nazi concentration camp, and Jewish victims of the Holocaust.

Hirschberger was exiled from Germany by gunpoint after his arrest by the Gestapo in 1938, and sent to Poland where he was later arrested by Soviet forces and sentenced to a slave labor camp. He was freed as a condition of the U.S.-Soviet Alliance and then fought in the Free Polish Corps.

"He was horrified by the obsessive use of numbers; the numbers of people killed in each camp; the numbers of people exterminated by various methods; the numbers of Jewish villages erased. His anger was also kindled after reading about those people who distorted the details and questioned the existence of the Holocaust, those who collaborated with the Nazis, and the governments who continued to persecute others even after the war, as well as by the supposedly "reasonable" players during the war: the world leaders who turned their backs and shut their eyes to the atrocities being committed."

Hirschberger's paintings depict historic events and the daily realities affecting the concentration camps, including the 1933 Vatican Concordant that supported the nationalist stance of Germany; the use of Zyklon B to gas Jewish victims; the 38-nation Evian Conference in which only two nations agreed to accept Jewish immigrants fleeing German persecution; pleas for help from the Polish Jewish Combat Organization shortly before the annihilation of the Warsaw ghetto in 1943; the post-war murders of 1,000 death camp survivors in pogroms as they returned to their homes in Poland.

As of July 1, the college absorbed graduate studies at UW-RF and became the College of Education and Graduate Studies. The changes have not stopped there, however. The Graduate School has become the School of Graduate and Professional Studies, added programs and departments, and is reviewing its longstanding academic offerings to ensure they keep pace with new directions in teacher education.

The restructuring is in response to the University's "Reach for the Future" strategic plan that is positioning the institution for the 21st Century.  The structural and funding review exercise was undertaken by the administration, faculty, staff and students last fall to reallocate resources as the institution faces the challenge of an explosion in information and revolutionary changes in instructional technology.

Equally significant, according to Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, is an eroding of the University's traditional funding base, which necessitates greater streamlining of administrative structures and academic services, as well as development of new funding sources.

"Working within the framework of the University governance structure, we've strengthened our undergraduate and graduate programs to better serve all of our students," said Thibodeau. "We are gaining both in our organizational structure and in our program strength. It is a real win-win situation. It has energized our faculty, and the result will be that our students will be better served."

Dean Kathleen Daly said the changes, which were approved by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents, will help the college fulfill its historic mission. That dates back to the founding in 1874 of the State Normal School at River Falls to train teachers for the northwest.

"Restructuring the College of Education to include the  Graduate School and two professional studies departments, along with our new building, will allow us to integrate community service with high technology. That will assure that our graduates will be able to teach and work as life-long learners and citizens in a constantly changing, pluralistic society," Daly said.

The changes are designed to strengthen and solidify the College's "constructivist" approach to education, Daly said. That philosophy advocates a dynamic creation of understanding which will educate teachers to require their students to be active participants in their education, rather than passively waiting for those teachers to "fill" students with knowledge.

"Part of this is about developing childrens' higher level thinking skills, through project-based learning supported by technology." It also relies heavily on the College's strong working relationships with surrounding school districts.

Involving practicing teachers in designing the College's curriculum, assisting in teacher education field experiences, and exploring teaching strategies, such as through the use of telecommunications, will ensure young people are well-served, Daly said.

"We are primarily interested in answering the 'so what,' questions: Does this work? Are children learning?" Those are crucial questions to be asking at a time when there are lively public discussion on new methodologies, such as a reliance on technologies, or whole language, or other teaching strategies.

That philosophy is not surprising. The College has been a national leader for decades in teacher education. It was cited by the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education for the quality of its field-based experiences that places student teachers into real classroom environments. And last year it was chosen by the National Education Association as one of the 11 best programs in the nation. The college was just one of two that was cited for excellence across the breadth of in its entire program based in part on its use of new technologies and its exceptionally strong collaborative relationships with regional school districts.

Daly said that national prominence will be enhanced by some of the additional changes, including the transfer from the College of Arts & Sciences, the Social Work program and communicative disorders. Both will be placed into the School of Graduate and Professional Studies, with an upgrading of communicative disorders diagnostic suites in the new building.

The changes will also impact on the College's traditional departments of elementary education, professional studies and secondary education, counseling and school psychology, and health and human performance.

Adding the two newest departments will enable the College to explore the creation of a regional Outreach Center for client services with the completion of the new Ames Teacher Education Center, according to Daly.

The dean noted that schools and communities are increasingly required to provide intervention services to young people and families.  There is a natural relationship between professional education programs such as counseling and school psychology, and professional programs like social work, and communicative disorders as a unit, Daly said.

"Schools are increasingly doing social work," she noted. "We must treat families holistically. The chances are that when you are dealing with a troubled child, you are probably dealing with a troubled family."

As part of the process, the College will look at increasing the efficiency of how classroom resources are deployed. Daly noted, for example, that numerous graduate level courses include sections on theories of test measurement statistics. An interdisciplinary approach will enable students to learn the content of testing in one combined section, and it will allow faculty to devote more class time to other topics.

The consolidation of disciplines also will be applied at the graduate level for students in shared internships or practicums who will work in multidisciplinary teams in dealing with families holistically.

In another innovative move, the College will be responding to national trends of viewing education as a "seamless" process, a position that is also being advocated by a Wisconsin Superintendent of Public Instruction task force. This approach would mean erasing the "artificial lines" drawn between elementary, middle and junior high and high schools as designated grade levels.

Taking an approach that relies on interdisciplinary, integrated teacher training will lead to those teachers having a broader perspective as they view the educational progress of children holistically rather than by their graded levels, Daly noted. An important outcome of such teacher training, the dean said, will be more collaboration between K-12 teachers.

Wisconsin Gov. Tommy Thompson will join with community leaders, tourism industry officials and the Board members of the St. Croix Valley Regional Tourism Alliance to celebrate tourism activities. Gov. Arne Carlson will be unable to attend due to a scheduled trip to Sweden. Lt. Gov. Joanne Benson, who oversees Minnesota Office of Tourism activities, will attend in Carlson's place.

"Just three years ago Governors Carlson and Thompson participated in the incorporation signing ceremony during our first Cruise as the Alliance became a reality. We all had high hopes for the Alliance. We want to report back that those hopes have been realized and surpassed," Marshall said.

A review of the Alliance's "Ask Us" cross-selling publication that lists all tourism and hospitality assets in the Scenic St. Croix Valley. This 120-page database book is a major tool for businesses to answer visitors' questions about the attractions and activities throughout the Scenic St. Croix Valley.

The directory includes an comprehensive, alphabetized listing by communities of  attractions, automotive services, boat rentals and services, campgrounds, churches, lodging, medical information, parks, boat landings and bait shops, recreation, restaurants and bars, retail services, scenic and dinner cruises, and miscellaneous travelers aids.

Completion of an extensive strategic marketing plan through the Cooperative Development Initiative at UW-River Falls. It included intensive research to identify profiles of vistors to the Scenic St. Croix Valley, and a workshop so that businesses could market more effectively to their target audiences using this psychographic information.

"We're really pleased that Gov. Thompson can join us for Family Fun Night," Halada said. "He played a prominent role in bringing the Chiefs to River Falls, and he continues to be supportive of the Chiefs, River Falls and the University training camp. He's a real cheerleader for Wisconsin tourism and the NFL Cheese League. It will be fun to have him here."

The seminar, sponsored by Gathering Waters, Inc., will provide training for conservation groups to learn how to work with farmland owners and protect their interests.  Farmers can learn about the process these groups are using. The sessions will feature a question and answer session.

Considine is the Agricultural Director for the Vermont Land Trust.  The Trust is the nation's leader in agricultural easements with over 100,000 acres, including about 150 dairy farms.  The Trust's mission is to protect the productive, recreational and scenic lands that help give Vermont and its communities their distinct rural character.

The Wisconsin Farmland Conservancy, a sponsor of the discussion, is a nonprofit land trust organization dedicated to helping rural communities protect their agricultural, natural and economic resources.  It assists in the transfer of farms to a new generation of family farmers, promotes sustainable land use and land conservation practices, and encourages locally-based economic development.

High school teachers from Wisconsin, Minnesota, New York, New Jersey and Florida attending a film institute at UW-River Falls came for a singular purpose: to learn more about film and ethnic studies in their English, social studies, history and literature classrooms.

"Cinematic Representations of America's Ethnic Minorities," running from July 8 to Aug. 2, is funded through a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities and is featuring nationally recognized minority scholars, writers and filmmakers as guest presenters. The UW-RF seminar is the only NEH institute in the nation addressing minority representations in film.

Jasmine Griffin, a teacher of global studies at a private, all-girl Catholic school in New York City, sees the institute as providing a bridge "to get away from rich, white men's history to a new, integrated curriculum that recognizes the culture and contributions of all Americans." While she has not approached film academically before, she appreciates the opportunity to learn film techniques through a minority medium.

The setting of the institute at UW-RF was an added incentive. "If you have ever been to New York City in the summer, spending time in a beautiful, small town in Wisconsin is like heaven. I'm really excited about being here and learning all I can from this institute."

A Miami teacher, Diana Maniscalco, saw the institute description in the NEH summer catalog and thought it would provide her with the knowledge she needs to add film study to her English classes that already integrate history, music and literature.  Her high school is almost entirely comprised of ethnic minorities, 85 percent of whom are African-American, Jamaican and Haitian. Maniscalco recognizes the potential of film as a powerful method to teach students about social and cultural issues.

Maniscalco, who immigrated to the United States from Communist Cuba at the of age four, feels a special affinity with her Haitian and Jamaican students, many of whom left for the United States under appalling political, economic and social conditions. "My experience with these students is they are my nicest and most motivated students. They are really motivated to learn about American culture and live the American Dream."

Joyce Brown, a South Milwaukee teacher, believes that film can be a very effective device for teaching multiculturalism. "As an African-American teaching in a public school, I recognize that the curriculum in all disciplines are not diverse. Kids today live in a visual society, and they often learn better visually than through reading. The best resources are visual aids.  This institute for me is like a dream come true, and I think it will help me become an even more effective teacher."

The program, developed and facilitated by  UW-RF English Professor Carole Gerster with assistance Zlogar, combines the perspectives of ethnic film and literature scholars, historians, and filmmakers themselves to examine ways film has and continues to interpret multicultural diversity in the United States. Participants are being introduced to various methods of cinema study by examining the features of both narrative and documentary film, filmmakers' intentions, similarities and differences between literary and film texts, and film content as historical and cultural documents.

One of the main intentions of the institute is for the teachers to go back to their own schools to mentor their colleagues in film use. Janice Stendel, a history teacher in Sun Prairie, a Madison suburb of predominantly white students, says the vision of the institute and that of her school district are the same. "My principal was very excited and supportive of my attendance at the institute and wants me to share my knowledge with other teachers next fall."

Neidermire, the Director-International for Northwest Airlines, began his career with the carrier after completing his degree in business administration from UW-RF in 1981. He rapidly progressed from institutional investment through the finance marketing and international divisions.  He has achieved a well-rounded professional background with over 14 years experience at Northwest, which as included seven years in the Far East in various management positions. He lives in Apple Valley, Minn.

Clark's paper was based on a study that concluded that short term use of finely chopped corn silage as a portion of a cow's diet had no negative effects on milk production, milk fat concentration, milk protein concentration or cud chewing.

The study was the fourth study Clark has conducted with Professor L.E. Armentano of UW-Madison. Previous studies concentrated on the use of by-product feeds such as cottonseed, distillers' grains and beet pulp as sources of fiber to replace a portion of the forage in the diet.

The current study involved two separate trials in consecutive years using 15 lactating Holsteins per year. A normal diet containing all of the forage in the form of alfalfa silage was compared to three other diets in which half of the alfalfa silage was replaced by either normal, coarse corn silage or rechopped fine corn silage or an equal mix of the coarse and fine corn silage.

Clark found no difference among the diets in dry matter intake, milk yield, milk protein and fat yields or total daily chewing time.  However, a slight trend toward higher milk and fat corrected milk yield was observed as corn silage particle size decreased.

Clark is optimistic about the study, but cautions farmers against chopping forages too fine.  "This [finely chopped] corn silage only represented a portion of the diet and smaller particle size may indeed have detrimental effects if fed as a larger percentage of the total diet or continued for longer periods."

Additionally, Tuchtenhagen said the University is encouraging students who left UW-RF before completing their degree and who are thinking of finishing to re-apply. Also, UW-RF expects to continue to admit more "special" students: those who are seeking only one or two courses for credit.

Prompting the continued enrollment, Tuchtenhagen said, was a policy change by the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents who for the upcoming year lifted enrollment caps for new students. That follows eight years of enrollment restrictions. Tuchtenhagen said he was unsure whether the new policy will remain in effect for next year. It comes at a time when the UW System has seen a decline in its state funding although the numbers of graduating high school students who will  seek entry continues to grow.

A number of activities are available to returning alumni, including a variety campus tours, a visit to the Kansas City Chiefs Training Camp, the St. Croix Summer Theatre presentation of "Grease," a barbecue dinner, an ice cream social, a cocktail hour and a picnic. Some emeriti faculty will be in attendance. A dinner and awards banquet will cap off the weekend.

Tours of the campus include the "taste of UW-RF" prepared from the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences food science department, the television studio, the greenhouse and campus garden, and the Rural Development Institute.

The celebration, which begins at 2 p.m. and runs until midnight in the Stout Memorial Student Center, will feature traditional Scottish food and music.  The dinner will include shepard's pie, fruit trifle, and haggis.  Participants will dance to bagpipe music later that evening.

A special guest also will be present. Willie Grainger, caretaker at Dalkeith House, which serves as the Wisconsin In Scotland site since the program's inception, is making the trip over the ocean for the celebration. Jan Quinn, program  director at UW-RF, says, "He (Grainger) is a very important component, the students all love him."  Quinn will also be hosting a get-together at her home in Ellsworth for Grainger on Sunday from 2-6 p.m.

An original tartan will be presented at the celebration.  The tartan was weaved by UW-RF art Professor Morgan Clifford and represents the four participating school's colors.  It will be registered in Edinborough and will be the official plaid of the "clan."

The Scotland program began in the fall of 1986.  About 75 students from the four universities live and attend classes in Dalkeith House, a castle six miles east of Edinborough, each semester. Over 1,260 Wisconsin students have participated. The castle still contains much of its original marble and paintings, and remains much the same as when it was built in the 1300's.

A faculty member from each school and an adjunct British faculty member teach general education classes.  The curriculum includes mainstream classes, courses relating specifically to British culture, and a mandatory cultural orientation course taught by a Scottish professor.

"Hollywood portrays Asian-Americans as more foreign, more exotic, with the sense of their differences heightened." Asian-American men are typically portrayed as nerds or bad guys, the women as fragile flowers.

Club" creates too exotic of a portrayal of Chinese-American women and their experiences. All came from tumultuous immigration experiences; all have severe difficulties in relating to their American-born daughters. The movie leads Americans to believe this is the typical Chinese-American experience.

Viewing the Japanese internment camps from that angle is too much of a stretch, says Mura, but it is typical of the Hollywood movie machine to view historical events involving minority groups through the eyes of a Caucasian hero.  In "Mississippi Burning," it's Gene Hackman as an FBI agent, and in "Dances With Wolves" it's Kevin Costner.

Mura thinks the reason that Hollywood directors are reluctant to let Asian -American males play the hero is because they find them threatening.  Hollywood has traditionally paired off Asian-American females with white males, and has portrayed Asian females as the archetypal submissive female:  small, exotic, erotic, alluring. Asian-American males must be then be portrayed as weak, ineffectual and asexual as possible. When an Asian male is played as a "good" or neutral character it's usually because he's assisting a white male.

Mura sees a trend toward independent filmmaking by minority artists as part of the solution. Independent films are often funded through agencies like the NEH, the National Endowment for the Arts or private arts foundations. While the budget of these films are substantially smaller than Hollywood productions, the payoff is films that are more artistic or accurate than  Hollywood films.

Independent films about Asian-Americans are now more accessible for viewing than in the past. The independent films "Chan is Missing," "Dim Sum," and "The Wash" are readily available at most video stores. "Chan is Missing" is directed by Wayne Wang, the same director of "Joy Luck ," but Mura believes the range of characters are much wider.

"When people see images of people of color in film they need to be aware of who made the film, and look at those films with a critical, skeptical eye."  Mura believes that when films depicting historical events and contemporary issues of minorities are made by minorities they tend to be more accurate in portraying their culture and point of view. Which Hollywood doesn't do.

UW-River Falls hazardous materials manager Mark Kimball has qualified as a senior certified hazardous material manager. This credential provides national recognition to professionals in industry, government and academia who manage hazardous materials and have obtained the appropriate education and experience. In addition, candidates for this award must pass a rigorous national examination.

Kimball, an alumnus of UW-RF and a staff member since 1972, has more than five years of environmental health and safety experience.  He directs the University's hazardous waste handling program and is responsible for the development and management of chemical safety programs on campus.

The list of hazardous wastes generated by the University is extensive, says Riley. Wastes are generated not only from the chemistry and agricultural science departments, but from the paints and ceramics used in the art department, the chemicals used in film development for photography, and for campus maintenance and construction projects.

The primary goal of the program is to encourage the interest of Native American high school sophomores, juniors and seniors to enter post-secondary institutions after they graduate high school. Introducing students to teaching and other careers in education is a secondary goal of the institute.

During the first week of the institute, the students are taught the theory, method and art of teaching by preparing them to teach lessons in math and science.  The students spend the second week of the institute teaching those lessons to elementary school students at the Mounds Park Native American Magnet School in St. Paul.

UW-RF College of Education & Graduate Studies Professor Jose Vega, institute director, says the students love teaching to younger children. "The students can't get enough.  They actually complain that they don't get enough time in the classroom."

The students also get a taste of college life.  They stay in a residence hall, visit the library, eat at the campus food service building, and rollerblade on campus sidewalks. Vega and Professor Joan Kennedy, the assistant director, also ensure there are other recreational activities available, such as swimming, dancing and rock climbing. At the end of the week, the students prepare for a pow-wow.

If the students successfully complete the program, they are rewarded with a stipend of $200, but the students don't get the money just for showing up. They are expected to attend classes and put forth a respectable amount of effort. If  students cut classes, for example, their pay is docked. Students who show leadership skills, potential and an interest in contributing to the success of the program have the opportunity to participate in the program a second time as assistant teachers.

For some of the students, the experience propels them toward going to college.  Next year, three graduates of previous years' institutes will enter UW-RF as college freshmen, and some are considering other campuses.

The program, funded through the Title 5 Higher Education Act, is one of 11 similar programs throughout the United States and Puerto Rico joined together through the Consortium for Minorities in Teaching Careers.  The consortium was created to increase the participation of minority students in the field of education. The UW-RF program is the only consortium program for Native Americans.

To be eligible for the program, students must be of Native American heritage, have a grade point average of 2.5 or better, and express an interest in teaching as a career.  During the fall and spring, the students prepare for the institute by participating in Future Teacher Club activities that explore careers in education at their local high school.

Ajayi was one of 90 torch bearers in the Twin Cities chosen for the honor because of his commitment to community service. The selection process was directed by United Way, which pored through 400 nominations of those who could be called "Community Heroes."

Ajayi received his Master of Science in Education degree from UW-RF in 1987, and said that the knowledge he gained has been very useful in his business pursuits.  Ajayi now runs an export company in Nigeria and is frequently out of the country, but his family remains in Eagan and his interest in the community remains strong.

At Sunday's festivities, Femi held the Olympic flag that signaled the beginning of Ajayi's run.  A fifth-grader at Northview Elementary, Femi said that things were "a little crazy" at the Babatundes' home the morning of the Torch run, and that his father was "very happy" to be carrying the torch.

Early on Sunday, Ajayi was dropped off at his starting point by an official Olympic bus about two minutes before his hand-off. He bounced off the bus with a big smile on his face and his arms high in the air as thousands of spectators looked on.

The crowd cheered and people quickly pounced on him, asking to have their picture taken with him.  Ajayi was obviously touched by the many children in the crowd and he took many pictures with them and let them hold the torch.

Moments after Ajayi was dropped off for his hand-off, the torch bearer on the previous segment was seen jogging toward him.  The hand-off went smoothly with the men giving each other a high-five before Ajayi headed down University Avenue.  He ran confidently and within seven minutes had covered the 1,000 meters (.62 miles), and then was quickly swept away by the Olympic bus.

Hartman said that Ajayi frequently goes above and beyond the call of duty.  As an example, she noted that while Ajayi was employed at Honeywell, one of his favorite activities was the Minneapolis Paint-A-Thon in which various companies set up teams of volunteers to paint houses for low-income families.  	Many times, when Ajayi thought there was too much scraping to be done, he would drive to the project home himself after work, and scrape the paint off the house so that on the weekend his Honeywell team members wouldn't be overwhelmed by the challenge.

Other volunteer organizations that Ajayi has been active in include the Junior Achievement program in which business people teach high school students how to set up a business. For 10 weeks the students produce and market their products, and even earn wages and sell stock in their company.

In talking about his involvement that led to the Olympic Torch run, Ajayi says, "I may be receiving all the glory, but if companies don't encourage and finance these kinds of programs, it would be very difficult for people to be involved in them."

Oostendorp was cited for her extensive contributions as UW-RF Publications Director, as the faculty representative to women's athletics, and for her community service that included leadership in the Chamber of Commerce, ambulance service, and River Falls Hospital Foundation.

"Liz is the classic example of a total effort by a professional involved in the life of the University and the community. In an era of rapid changes in technology, she does an exceptional job of keeping pace that is well-recognized by her peers."

"I feel really fortunate that our administration, including Gary Thibodeau and (former Chancellor) George Field see university involvement on state committees as being helpful to UW-River Falls," Oostendorp said. She noted that oftentimes technical information is difficult to obtain without participating in statewide associations.

As an example, she noted that Wisconsin law will soon require all state agencies to ensure that 45 percent of all its paper is from recycled stock. While UW-RF has nearly reached that goal, the Council members recently learned that Wisconsin's paper mills are reducing the portion of recycled  materials in paper production. That likely will require the Council to seek a change in state law, Oostendorp said.

"I have enjoyed trying to make things better, whether in the community, on campus or in the state. I like to see things go as smoothly as possible. I like this campus: I think we have one of the best campuses in the nation for a University this size.

The scholarship covers full tuition, with an approximate value of $11,000, over the next four years. It is awarded based on the student's demonstrated academic excellence and leadership success in school and community activities, as well as future potential.

Jordan, who ranked in the top 5 percent of her class, served as president of the National Honor Society, co-captained the women's varsity basketball team, was a member of the executive board for the Superior Basketball Association, and held the position of vice president with the Future Business Leaders of America Wisconsin Region I.

Thomas Locken, an SHS guidance counselor who nominated Jordan, also noted that she helped establish a tutoring service and organized a food shelf drive. "If something has to be done you can rely on Laura to do it. She will inspire others to contribute."

The institute, set for the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, is offered through a grant from the National Endowment for the Humanities and will feature nationally recognized minority scholars, writers and filmmakers.

The scholars, of African-American, Japanese-American, Native American and Latino ethnicities, will present histories of how ethnic groups are portrayed in film media, sometimes perpetuating negative stereotypes.

Diane Glancy, celebrated Native American  poet and fiction writer, is an associate Professor of  English at Macalester College. Glancy, a member of the Cherokee tribe, is the author of "Pushing the Bear," as well as several books of poetry.

Carlos Cortez, professor of history at the University of California-Riverside, is a leading expert in the field of Latino history. Cortez has edited several books about Mexican-American history and has also authored a book about the film history of race and ethnicity in the Americas.

The participants will explore ways to use film in their classrooms to help students understand the evolution of American cultural diversity and the role that film plays in shaping changes in cultural diversity.

The teachers will be invited back to UW-RF during the summer of 1997 to share the results of their integrated curriculum. Some will be invited back to the University for a fall teaching conference where they will instruct other teachers in effective film use.

Although the majority of the participants are from Wisconsin and Minnesota, some are coming from as far away as New York City and Miami. The participants teach in a broad mix of urban, rural and suburban settings in public, private and parochial schools.

The projects range from as small as installing an emergency phone at Ramer Field to as massive as the extensive remodeling of the Chalmer Davee Library. The cost of the library construction alone is $7.2 million.

According to Waldo Hagen, director of facilities management, summer is the prime construction season on campus, and this summer certainly is no exception. "When I say this summer is busier than the typical summer, we  have to take a look at the typical summer--the typical summer is a zoo," says Hagen.

With the increase in construction work comes the inevitable dirt, noise and foot traffic detours. While Hagen concedes that construction may sometimes be distracting or inconvenient, he also says that much of the work is practically invisible.

At the beginning of the fall semester, students will return to find the English and journalism computer labs completed.  In addition, the new lobby should be nearly finished and many of the circulation patterns will be in place.

The irrigation of four playing fields at the Ramer Field Sports Complex, which began this spring, has been completed in time for the Kansas City Chiefs summer training camp. The Chiefs arrive in River Falls on July 25.

The student center ballroom is currently in the design stage for the creation of new office space to house several departments devoted to student programming.  The new offices, which will take up the entire ballroom, will include the student leadership development and programs center, the student activities office and student organizations.

A new distance learning classroom in the Agricultural Science Building is nearly complete.  Along with installing television cameras and appropriate electronic hardware, the room must be properly lit and surfaced to eliminate glare. In addition, the classroom must be acoustically designed to maximize its sound quality.

Along with the regular facilities management staff, the University is contracting out much of the construction work to as many as 30 private contractors.  Many of the contractors are from local communities.

Hagen thinks the improvements will be visible to most of the students and faculty returning for fall semester.  While the returning campus community may not be aware of the enormity of the summer construction, he thinks most will notice improvements in the areas they frequent.

The Foundation also awarded two partially funded grants.  These recipients were library director Christina Baum, in the amount of $4,700, which will be used for computer equipment. The other recipient, Virgil Nylander, assistant chancellor chancellor for administration and finance, received $2,459 for conferences.

In addition, $5,000 is annually set aside for smaller faculty grants to improve classroom instruction. These grants are typically used for materials and supplies for special projects, travel to professional meetings and other needs unable to be funded by tax dollars.

Five thousand dollars was awarded to the Admissions Department for recruiting efforts.  According to UW-River Falls admission counselors, as the competition for top scholars becomes more intense, dollars must be made available to match competition in the area of recruiting the top high school scholars in Wisconsin and surrounding areas.

Gansluckner launched his career in Eau Claire as a teacher, served as an administrative assistant to the late congressman Lester Johnson, and since 1969 and has been involved in financial services in various capacities. He currently represents the Principal Financial Group as a registered representative in the Eau Claire area.

Citizens from rural communities throughout west-central Wisconsin and eastern Minnesota attended a rural development workshop on Growth Management and Financing Development at UW-River Falls on May 31.

Fourth in a series about rural communities and economic development, the workshop was specifically designed for small town officials and community leaders and was co-sponsored by the UW-RF Rural Development Institute and Continuing Education Extension.

Rita Kozak, a land use planner with Williams-Gill and Associates, delivered the keynote address.  Kozak discussed the purpose for a comprehensive land use plan, how land use planning differs from zoning, and citizen involvement.

According to coordinator Karen Leichtle, the program is for sixth, seventh and eighth grade students in the top five-percent of their class.  From June 10-21 they attended classes that focused on active involvement, creative thinking, critical thinking skills, problem solving and career opportunities.

Courses offered included learning conversational Spanish, scuba diving, exploring the internet, writing fiction, Stars on Stage (drama), board games from around the world, creating beaded jewelry, information technology, Wilder Wisconsin, Visual Noise (sculpture), and making Ojibwa moccasins.

Delivering the commencement address will be senior Mike Kulstad, a broadcast journalism major from Red Wing, Minn. Kulstad was chosen to deliver the address from graduating seniors who participated in a faculty-judged selection process.

Performances will start June 11 and continue every Tuesday until July 25 at 7 p.m in the Wahl Amphitheater.  However, no concert is scheduled for July 2 because of Fourth of July weekend.  Each concert is free and everyone is welcome to bring a blanket or lawn chair and enjoy the fun.

July 23: The Kids from Wisconsin, "Wisconsin's Musical Goodwill Ambassadors" will once again close the concert series.  The troupe is composed of  some 32 Wisconsin student musicians and stage performers between the ages of 15 and 20. Their performance features vocals and dancing to big band arrangements, as well as instrumental selections.

The concert will also feature performances by the mallet ensemble and a vibe soloist.  The mallet ensemble will perform three works, and vibe soloist Ryan McCarthy, Eagan, Minn., will perform "John Brown's Body," a piece for jazz combo.

The remodeling of the UW-River Falls Chalmer Davee Library is moving along well despite recent bouts of cold weather, with construction activities to be complete by this late fall, according to facilities engineer Jim Murphy.

When they arrive on campus in the fall, students can expect to see the outside of the library finished; however, remodeling will still be taking place inside to finish up a central study area that will include new study carrels and a reference and help desk, Murphy said.

Though all construction won't be quite out of the way by the beginning of fall semester, students will have access to all areas of the library through a new main entrance, which will be located in the southwest corner of the library.  No longer will they have to use separate entrances as they did this year, Murphy said.

Particularly important, Murphy said, is getting the brickwork completed on the southwest corner so that the roof can be completed in that area and the ultimate library entrance can be made ready for use.

Already concluded are the movement of the library Archives and Government Documents section to their permanent  locations.  The old Government Documents area on the north side of the library is being demolished so that the periodicals can be relocated into that space.  The demolition and move should be concluded by the end of June, Murphy said.

Long-term goals include moving all book stacks to the second floor instead of the current arrangement in which stacks were located on both floors.  The change should be finished by the end of July, Murphy said.

The founder of the UW-River Falls commissioned composer program and former UW-RF music professor returned this week to present the world premiere of his new piece "Earth Songs" in honor of the program's 30th year.

DeJong and his wife travel to New Mexico every year to find new samples of Navajo weavings for their collection.  Through "Earth Songs," he wanted to relay the beauty he's witnessed during his trips to the southwest.

DeJong started the commissioned composer program 30 years ago so that students could get the chance to work with a composer.  This allows the composer to offer students suggestions that will help bring out the intended meaning of the pieces they perform, DeJong said.

A successful financial adviser who has held careers with two nationally known investment firms and is currently responsible for Yale University's $3 billion endowment fund has been named the 1996 Distinguished Alumnus for the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

A native of River Falls, Swensen graduated from UW-River Falls in 1975 with bachelor of arts and bachelor of science degrees.  He earned master of arts and master of philosophy degrees and a doctorate from Yale University, where he studied with James Tobin, a recipient of a  Nobel prize in economics.

Swensen has successfully directed Yale University's endowment since 1985.  He also oversees the various money managers who invest Yale's portfolio.  His success has been measured by the fact that Yale's investment portfolio has outperformed many of the nation's institutional investors as well as the rest of the Ivy League's higher education institutions.

In 1977 Swensen began his career as an economist at the International Monetary Fund.  There he assisted with the preparation of a new publication, "Government Finance Statistics Yearbook."  In 1979 Swensen entered the private sector as an associate in corporate finance for Salomon Brothers, a nationally recognized investment firm, where he provided financial advice and services to corporate and public clients.  He specialized in the development and analysis of new financial techniques, general capital markets analysis and government advisory work.

In 1981 Swensen initiated the concept of the swap market, the exchange of obligations denominated in different currencies. The following year he joined the investment firm of Lehman Brothers as senior vice president of corporate finance and directed its swap market subsidiary. By 1985 the operation exceeded $50 billion.

In 1992 Swensen was appointed as a member of the Pension Managers Advisory Committee to the Board of Directors of the New York Stock Exchange.  He also was recently selected to be a member of the Howard Hughes Medical Institute Advisory Committee, which counsels the Institute on the management of its $6.9 billion investment portfolio.  The Institute is a scientific and philanthropic organization that conducts biomedical research.  Through its grants program, it supports education and research.

"He looks back to his training at River Falls as the foundation upon which he built his successful career. Bringing him back to the campus to honor him is great not only for Dr. Swensen, but for the University."

"The conferral of this honorary doctorate on now-Vice President Lien is particularly appropriate given the fact that he began his academic career at UW-River Falls," Thibodeau said. "He and his wife have very fond memories of River Falls, and the quality of our academic programs and the environment on the campus.

In 1965-66 Lien was an assistant professor in the political science department at UW-River Falls. He next accepted a similar teaching position at the University of Connecticut. He returned to National Taiwan University and served for six years as the director of its Graduate Institute of Political Science before beginning his political career with his appointment as ambassador to El Salvador in 1975.

Lien was a leader in many of the human and capital infrastructure improvements in Taiwan through his many positions. As minister of transportation, Lien established global shipping lanes and air routes to the island nation, and launched the construction of an underground railway network.

During his tenure with the National Youth Commission of the Executive Yuan, Lien played a leading role in recruiting students, scholars and experts residing in foreign nations to return their intellectual resources to Taiwan by living and serving at home.

As Governor of Taiwan Province, Lien participated in some 300 seminars with community leaders throughout the provice. His common touch and dedication won praise as he worked toward achieving balanced urban and rural development, and economic equality for its picturesque farming villages.

Thibodeau noted that Lien's rapid rise and subsequent governmental influence in Taiwan has served the University, as well as the people of Taiwan. In 1990, UW-RF founded its Center for Pacific Rim Studies under the direction of economics Professor Charles Kao. Kao, who publishes two news and business magazines in Taipei, has been particularly active in helping the University develop its links to Taiwan and the Pacific Rim.

"Dr. Lien is a global person in every respect," Thibodeau related. "He understands the concepts of global education, and has always been vocally supportive of our efforts to engage with institutions in Taiwan and the Pacific Rim. In that respect, he has always been a positive influence in the internationalization of education in Taiwan and around the world."

Lien has been recognized previously through an Honorary Fellowship from the Centre for International Studies at the University of Cambridge, and was the recipient of the Medal of Honour from the University of Alcal de Henares.

Establishing a School of Business & Economics within the College of Arts & Sciences. The new School will emphasize a liberal arts-based academic program and include four departments or units: Accounting, Business Administration, Economics and Computer Information Systems.

The structural and funding review exercise was undertaken by the administration, faculty, staff and students last fall to reallocate resources as the institution faces the challenge of an explosion in information and revolutionary changes in instructional technology. Equally significant, according to Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau, is an eroding of the University's traditional funding base, which necessitates greater streamlining of administrative structures and academic services, as well as development of new funding sources.

"Our vision is the recognition of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls as an exceptional undergraduate university with national acknowledgment of, or excellence in, select undergraduate programs while providing outstanding graduate programs in selected professional disciplines. Our ultimate goal is to produce graduates who engage in learning as a lifetime endeavor."

As Thibodeau told the Regents, "This has been and will continue to be an ongoing process involving faculty, staff and students as the many goals, objectives and actions outlined in the plan are implemented."

The School will continue to emphasize the University's dedication to a liberal arts-based education as it provides a stronger coordination of faculty and students within four departments or programs: Accounting, Business Admininistration, Economics, and Computer Information Systems.

The closer collaboration between faculty and their programs also should enable UW-RF to admit additional students into business-related disciplines at a time when Wisconsin is expecting an upsurge in the number of high school graduates who will seek a college education over the next five years with little likelihood of additional state funding.

The School's education approach will be to provide a professional education that reinforces the core values of a higher education institution to provide a liberalizing education, encourage critical thinking, effective communication and problem solving skills, as well as to prepare its students for a leadership role within society. That differs from many business schools which emphasize professional courses over general education offerings.

Prochnow notes that private sector employers are encouraging a return to approaches like UW-RF's. The School will be aided in that effort since it will be housed within the College of Arts & Sciences, Prochnow said.

Prochnow related. "That means its graduates should have a knowledge base that is different from or greater than their discipline. The School will allow us to address what the definition of 'complete' should be."

Its fundamental goals will be to ensure that its graduates are educated for useful citizenship, receive professional training that will allow greater opportunities to be productive, and provide training in life-long learning skills so graduates will be capable of adapting to a rapidly changing society.

The School's structure also will be unusual in that it will regularly provide contact between unit heads to ensure there is an interdisciplinary relationship between academic programs. That also should provide faculty with the collaborative environment that could lead to developing additional innovative academic minors, Prochnow said.

The dean noted the School also will provide a better administrative structure for the University to respond to recent Board of Regents directives that UWS business programs be more responsive to business and industry.

Prochnow noted that over the past few months, as faculty and administrators have sought advice from business and industry leaders about the School, "simply the name 'School of Business & Economics', with minimal publicity, is generating more contact."

Building those networks, Prochnow predicted, also will enable the School to build multi-disciplinary faculty or student teams that can respond to business and industry requests for technical assistance.

Over the long term, Provost Milam added, the School will add an important component to the University's off-campus outreach. These include meeting the needs of business and industry, education, and government through educational programs through Continuing Education Extension, the Rural Development Institute, the Agricultural Resources Center, Office of Conferences & Events, the Extended Degree Program, and the Weekend & Evening Degree Program.

The Overseas Practice Teaching Program works together with overseas schools to find placements for interested student teachers who are completing degrees in Elementary or Secondary Education at a Wisconsin private or public university or college.

The program is designed to immerse participants in the "native" population and culture whenever possible.  Each student is assigned an overseas teacher who is interested in helping a future teacher develop their teaching skills.  	Students teachers stay eight to 10 weeks  practicing their own teaching skills, evaluating the overseas instructor's  teaching methods and helping pupils with homework.  Near the end of their stay, student teachers are expected to assume full responsibility for the classroom, or whenever the resident teacher feels that it's appropriate.

Participants enrolled in the program are responsible for paying their own expenses and are encouraged to live with a host family.  Future teachers must first complete a minimum of eight weeks of student teaching in the United States before they are allowed to go overseas.	Most student teachers are placed in English-speaking countries such as England, Wales, Scotland, Ireland, Australia, or New Zealand.  However, students who wish to student teach a non-English speaking countries are encouraged to do so.  Placements are arranged throughout the academic year, including the summer.

Over the years, the Selzes have aided the UW-RF college in numerous ways, including providing internships by Selz Farms, Inc., and assisting students preparing for regional and national collegiate dairy judging competitions.  Also, Selz has assisted UW-Extension specialists with several applied research projects.

With a herd of 170 registered Holsteins, the Selzes produce a rolling average of  28,000 pounds of milk per cow per year. In addition to outstanding production records, Selz Farms, Inc., has received state-wide and national recognition from Breeder Registry and awards from Genetic Merit for many of the cows in their herd.

Selz has been actively involved in numerous national dairy cattle associations, including 12 years as the director of the National Holstein Association, and also held positions as vice-president and president for four of those years. Selz is a former board member of the Purebred Dairy Cattle Association, the Council on Dairy Cattle Breeding and the U.S. Animal Health Association. He also serves as the National Holstein Association's representative on the World Dairy Expo board of directors.

The Minnesota Agro-Forestry Cooperative is a fledgling farmer-owned co-op  organized to evaluate the commercial potential of providing hybrid poplar trees as feedstock for the pulp and wood products manufacturing industries. Current farmer/members are located in central Minnesota from Willmar to Alexandria to Mora.

Plans call for the co-op to provide growers with inputs, negotiate purchase contracts with major manufacturers, supply management assistance and education to grower-members, and ultimately provide harvesting services for its members. 	Hybrid poplars are seen as a good alternative crop for marginal farm land, and are deemed a good substitute for native aspen.  Assisting with a feasibility study, business plan and board training are among the types of assistance the Co-op will receive from the Cooperative Development Initiative.

Begun in 1993, the SWMHP spent its first two years responding to housing shortages exacerbated by severe flooding and tornadoes in the region.  Strategic planning and board training are among the kinds of assistance the Partnership requested of the Cooperative Development Initiative as it embarks on a more deliberate course of action.

The Alliance is selling the Guides for $30, which includes sales tax.  Businesses who have the Guide will display a window decal encouraging tourists to ask questions about anything from attractions to lodging to recreation to retail opportunities in the Valley.

Eight rural Developmental Achievement Centers (DACs) located in the northwestern corner of Minnesota have formed a cooperative to improve services to their clients and to enhance their own financial stability.  By working together, the eight DACs  will be better able to secure large work contracts for their clients, train their staffs, hire consultants for specialized therapy, and cooperatively purchase goods and services at better prices.  DACs provide day services to mildly to severely developmentally disabled adults.

Assisting start-up cooperative and collaborative ventures in Minnesota and Wisconsin is the goal of the Cooperative Development Initiative, a project funded by the W.K. Kellogg Foundation at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls Rural Development Institute.

The workshop is directed at village and city mayors, council members and other officials; township and county officials; and citizen decision-makers.  Training sessions will be offered to help officials and citizens from small towns understand the economic development process and how it relates to the development of their own communities.

The workshop will discuss finding sources of funding and putting together successful written proposals to obtain that funding.  Topics covered will include a general overview of what grants are and who is eligible for them, a survey of public and private funding sources and how to find them, and the process of writing a proposal.

One of the workshop's presenters will be Bill Campbell, UW-RF director of Grants and Research since 1990.  Campbell has written or co-written hundreds of successful grant proposals.  He has also led proposal-writing workshops for a variety of local, regional and national organizations.

The workshop will also feature special guest presenter Linda Jacobson, the associate director of the Cooperative Development Initiative. The CDI is funded by the W.K. Kellogg Foundation, and provides training and technical assistance to start cooperative and collaborative ventures in Wisconsin and Minnesota.

The workshop is designed for non-profit agency personnel, social service providers, K-12 teachers and administrators (both public and private), artists and art organizations, and others interested in grant funding proposals.

Experts in their fields will address specialty topics of value to school district administrators in a three-part series while aboard the St. Croix River Showboat, the "Majestic Lady" on June 18, July 23 and Oct. 8.

The International Visiting Teacher Program teams experienced teachers and school officials from Minnesota, Wisconsin, and neighboring states with overseas colleagues who have teaching responsibilities similar to theirs for three to four weeks, usually during the summer.

Teachers and officials enroll in the six-credit graduate course "Comparative Education and Supervised Overseas Fieldwork," which is offered by many UW-System universities.  The choice of locale and country is up to the individual participating in the program.

During their stay, teachers become familiar with the educational system, curriculum and teaching methods.  The nature of each participant's involvement in the school  is planned with the overseas teacher or official.  This usually includes such roles as assisting with regular class activities, speaking with students in various classes, and attending school functions and meetings.

Most teachers and school officials in this program are placed in English speaking countries.  However, teachers are encouraged to visit non-English speaking countries even though they may not know the host language.  Teachers must cover all their expenses and are encouraged to live with a host family.

The Anderson's donation of $50,000 will be used for the Kettelkamp-Lineman Endowed Professorship in Biology. Money earned from the endowment will provide discretionary funding for a faculty member for professional development, travel support for attendance and presentations at academic conferences, supplies and equipment, student assistance support, and research.

At college he was befriended by Professor Lineman, who hired Anderson as a student assistant in the botany lab. He noted that he was in "dire need" of the money to continue on in school, and the position allowed him to trade his work milking dairy cows before school each morning for science.

Said Chancellor Thibodeau of the Andersons' gift, "This is an example of an individual who left and went on to prominence who, when he looks back at a distinguished career, says that two people had a particular influence and helped to direct him.

It will continue over the next several years to coincide with UW-RF's massive "Reach for the Future" strategic plan that is reorienting the institution's academic disciplines and administrative support services for the year 2000.

"Our goal is to make the students more aware of the dairy industry and the stages the milk goes through before it gets to the shelves," said Professor Perry Clark, of the animal and food science department, and Dairy Club advisor.  "It also increases the visibility of the Dairy Club," Clark added.

The elementary students got a chance to view baby calves and learn about the six major breeds of dairy cattle.  The students also participated for prizes in several games and contests including Bossy Bingo; dress a calf contest; and dairy trivia.  There were special appearances by surrounding dairy princesses and Dairy Club members dressed as "Molly Moo" and "Buster Bull."

At the contest, students evaluated the quality of cut flowers, flowering potted plants and foliage plants by identifying imperfections on the specimens including cultural imperfections; damage from handling, insects and disease; and overmaturity.  The skills used by these students are important in all aspects of floriculture and ornamental horticulture industries.

Led by head Coach Terry Ferriss and assistant coaches Judy Tostrud, Sheila Drier and Bobbie Wright, the three-person judging team placed first in the overall team competition, followed by South Dakota State University and California Polytechnic State University.

In addition to competing, the students also toured Utah State's facilities that produce genetically engineered wheat developed there to be grown as a food source on space stations.  Students also visited the University's Space Dynamics Laboratory, looked in on some state-of-the-art commercial greenhouses and had the opportunity to speak with the head landscape designer of Salt Lake City's Temple Square spring bulb display.

Obermeyer was recognized for her academic achievements and for her involvement in extracurricular activities.  As a horticulture major from Bristol, Wis., Obermeyer has maintained a 4.0  cumulative grade point average, been on the Dean's List each semester, and has completed her undergraduate studies in four years.  She has also received many scholarships and academic honors each year from UW-RF and has  received a National Phi Kappa Phi Scholarship.

Obermeyer served the college as a student representative to its Curriculum Committee and as an Agriculture and Environmental Sciences Ambassador.  She is a member of Pi Alpha Xi, Alpha Zeta, and the Horticulture Society.

The award, which was presented during the College's annual banquet, also recognizes Obermeyer's participation in UW-RF extra-curricular activities.  She has served as Parker Hall recycling chairwoman and volunteer tutor.  Obermeyer has also participated in the Fellowship of Christian Athletes and UW-RF track and cross country teams.

In this session, participants will explore techniques for effectively using humor in the classroom.  They will also explore the logic of humor and a wide variety of tools that any educator can use to make the classroom more productive and motivational through stories and recreation.

Students can receive one graduate.  The cost for the session is $15 for students who are registering for credit with additional tuition costs.  For non-credit participants, the cost is $60 and includes materials, refreshments and lunch.

Cooper has been a professional educator for 35 years and has taught at all levels.  She has administrative experience as a special education director, elementary and junior high school principal, high school assistant principal and assistant superintendent.

Sitton is a recognized authority in teaching spelling.  She has authored numerous language-integrated spelling, reading and writing materials.  Her experience includes those of a classroom teacher in regular and special education, district language arts specialist, staff development trainer, college instructor, and consultant to numerous school districts and regional education agencies.

The award is presented to a select group of students who have distinguished themselves through outstanding service, leadership and skill.  The students are those who have strived to make UW-RF a better place for students, faculty and staff.

Kelly was cited for his four years of active involvement in Sigma Tau Gamma Fraternity, and is its president.  Kelly has served as a a member of the Student Senate and chaired its Legislative Affairs Committee, and has served on the Stratton Hall renovation committee which created a proposal for future residence hall renovation on campus.  As a member of the UW-RF Long-range Planning Committee, Kelly helped set the goals for the University's massive strategic plan, "Reach for the Future."

Nottestad was recognized for her leadership role as coordinator of the 1995 campus-wide Career Fair and parliamentary procedure activities.  She is also a Resident Assistant and has been active in a variety of organizations, including the Agricultural Education Society, Student Senate, R.O.A.D. Crew, the Association of Women in Agriculture, and Alpha Tau Alpha.   Nottestad has also been involved in the development and implementation of FFA contests and workshops at the local, sectional and state levels.

Patton was cited for his three years of Student Senate involvement.   For the 18 months, he has served as Student Senate President.  As president, Patton chaired the Task Force on Shared Governance, which created a new student shared governance structure under state statute.  He is also a member of the "Reach for the Future" Steering Committee, which is coordinating the University's massive strategic planning effort,  as well as serving on many other institutional and faculty governance committees.

Paulson was recognized for her leadership as a R.O.A.D Crew member, a Campus Tour guide, a first-year student Summer Orientation Student Assistant, and as an intern at the Admissions Office.  She has also been an Agriculture Ambassador, and a member of the Wyman Concerts and Lectures Committee.  Paulson was one of two student representatives to the University's Search and Screen Committee that selected a new Provost, the chief academic officer for the University.

Prestrud was also cited for her service as a R.O.A.D Crew coordinator and leader.  She has worked for the Admissions Office as an intern and Campus Tour Guide, which she now coordinates.  Prestrud is also a member of the Leadership Development and Programming Board and the Wyman Concerts and Lectures Committee.  She's been active in Dance Theatre as a choreographer and as its Vice-president. Prestrud also was active in various Christian organizations on campus, including the Intervarsity Christian Fellowship, and served as president of  the Fellowship of Christian Athletes.

The change is the culmination of a five-year effort to operate with a name that appropriately reflects the breadth of the college's academic training, according to Chancellor Gary A. Thibodeau. It was approved by the Regents as part of the University's massive "Reach for the Future" strategic plan to prepare UW-RF for the 21st Century.

"This lifts up the commitment on the part of the institution for our undergraduate students through a name change that demonstrates that agriculture interfaces with a variety of environmental issues. This takes into account the public's concern with environmental issues.

"What we do in this college is more than that. Therefore, how do students, especially those from a non-farm background, identify and even discover alternatives within the college that are potentially of great appeal to them? They do that through the name of the programs and the name of the college."

Rohde said the expansion is a logical evolution for the University's program, which dates back to 1912. In the 1960s, the College was formed to expand students' educational options. Over the past two decades the college has significantly expanded its course offerings, which, Rohde said, makes it apparent the name "College of Agriculture" was too narrow.

Among the majors that extend beyond  a narrow definition of agriculture would include, horticulture, conservation, land management, food science and technology, marketing communications, biotechnology, geology, and agricultural engineering technology. The college also is exploring an environmnetal science option that will further develop the resource management and conseration areas.

Polls of faculty, students, alumni and the college's advisory board found them overwhelmingly in favor of the name change, and the clear winner among 10 choices to be College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences.

Rohde notes that over the last decade, the number of students attending the college from an agricultural background has been slowly declining, now to about half. The student population also is changing, mirroring national trends: about half are now female, compared to only 25 percent back in 1970.

For the college, that growth will continue to represent a unique relationship. CAFES' enrollment will represent about 25 percent of the University-wide undergraduate population. Thus, UW-RF will have more agriculture students proportionately in its student body than any other four-year agriculture program in the nation.

"We're doing very well because we focus on what we can do best. We work hard at undergraduate education to maintain and enhance it. Our reputation as a college is growing and getting stronger." That's evidenced, he said, by increased enrollments, up-to-date academic offerings, a strong teaching faculty, and strong business relationships through internships and excellent employment opportunities.

Many people helped the UW-River Falls graduating class of 1996 on the road to a college degree, but now graduates must take the lessons they've learned and apply them to the real world, said student speaker Mike Kulstad at Sunday's commencement ceremony.

Kulstad's speech marked the first commencement address to be delivered by a student in the modern history of UW-River Falls. Kulstad was chosen to deliver the address through a selection process among graduating seniors that was coordinated by the Faculty Senate Public Relations Committee.

Kulstad urged graduates to make the most of their educations and to remember all those who helped them along the way.  Students don't graduate from college on their own, he said.  They receive help along the way from parents, friends and professors.

Parents should be recognized for both what they've done and what they haven't done, Kulstad said.  They supported their children and gave advice, but they also knew when to step back and let their children make their own mistakes.

Kulstad also recognized the important role played by instructors who work hard to challenge students to think critically.  Many go above and beyond by giving out home phone numbers and making themselves available at all times "not because they had to, but because they truly cared about us as students," he said.

"Make the best use of your education, and live your life to the fullest," Kulstad said.  "The clock of life is wound but once, and it cannot be reset.  It will continue to go until there comes a time when it will stop.  Don't waste the clock."

His academic accomplishments and student journalism achievements have been recognized through the National Association of Broadcasters Scholarship and the Minnesota Broadcasters Association Scholarship. Kulstad also was selected to receive the Journalism Department's 1996 Wayne M. Wolfe Journalism Outstanding Senior Award.

In addition to her teaching responsibilities in the plant and earth science department, Ferriss also serves as assistant dean of the College of Agriculture, Food & Environmental Sciences, and is the director of the College's Agriculture Cooperative Education and Internship Program.

"Terry Ferriss exemplifies exactly the type of attributes we want to lift up as a role model for all of us. She is absolutely committed to her students. She makes her decisions and allocates her time based on how that will impact students. She is a teacher in the classroom; and outside of the classroom, she is a role model not only in terms of her understanding of the discipline, but in her professionalism and her work ethic.

A recent graduate added: "She took the time to invest more of herself than was expected. She opened her home to student activities, like Horticulture Club events. She also went out of her way to host and schedule quality intercollegiate events that gives UW-RF publicity as a quality school, and added educational opportunities."

In the department, Ferriss advises over 30 students and teaches courses in plant science, horticulture, interior plantscapes, herbaceous perennials, greenhouse management, floriculture, and turfgrass sciences. She also played a leading role in the College's development of a horticulture major.

Floral Quality Evaluation Team, which has twice captured national titles, and Pi Alpha Xi, the floriculture honor society, and serves as the Society's national president. She also assists the Horticulture Society, Student Agriculture Advisory Council, and Delta Theta Sigma Fraternity and Alpha Zeta. Ferriss also has served on numerous administrative and Faculty Senate governance committees.

Ferriss has served on University of Wisconsin System committees, including the Long-range Planning Task Force for Agriculture and Natural Resources, chairing its Food Safety and Education subcommittees. That panel reviewed all academic program arrays at UWS campuses in agriculture or natural resources.

Changes Beck has noticed during his career at UW-RF include the physical growth of new buildings and grounds and the loss of unity and solidarity between faculty and students that he says may have resulted from this growth.

At UW-RF Carstens has served as forensics director, chair of the department of speech communication and theatre arts, and chapter president of The Association of University of Wisconsin Professionals.  He has also served on the Faculty Senate, chaired its curriculum committee and served on many other committees.

In addition, Carstens has served seven years as a supervisor on the Pierce County Board.  He has done research in several areas and received the International Listening Association Research Award in 1992.

Carstens regards his work advising students and interns as one of his most significant accomplishments at UW-RF.  "I feel a pride in the impact I had on their college and professional careers," he said.

He is also proud of the development of the speech communication and theatre arts department under his chairmanship in the 1970s.  During this period, the department moved from primarily a teacher-training program to areas in business communication and mass communication, which comprise the department's largest curricular areas today.

During his career, Carstens said he has seen the focus of the University switch from teacher training to liberal arts.  The University also has much more administration and formal procedure today than when Carstens first arrived.  Furthermore, he said, he has witnessed much change for the better in the campus' physical facilities.

As an artist, Miller often works with computer imagery.  He incorporates the use of ink jet printers and video cameras into his work, and his final products are computer prints and mixed media constructions.  His work has been displayed in two solo shows, one at the UW-Whitewater Gallery and another at the Unity Unitarian Gallery, St. Paul.  His work has also been presented in a national show at the Walt Whitman Cultural Art Center, Camden, N.J.

As part of his responsibility for UW-RF's painting studio, Miller has seen his students produce high-quality work during the past few years.  He says he is proud of his art students and the effects he has had on them, and he says their success is the main reason he has enjoyed teaching.

In addition to his work in the psychology department, Stewart has served on over 21 different University committees and chaired several of them.  He spent 10 years on the Faculty Senate and served on the executive board for four of those years.  He has also served on many college and departmental committees and chaired some of them.  He served as secretary/treasurer, vice president and president of the Twin City Alumni Association.

"Changes that have affected me the most on a day-to-day basis are the proliferation of photocopy equipment and the introduction of personal computers," Stewart said.  "The psychology department is now on its fourth generation of computers."

Among his most significant accomplishments, Williamson includes his work with over 200 prospective middle school and high school teachers and 30 graduate schools from 1972-1993.  During this time he also represented UW-RF and mathematics education on over a dozen state committees or task forces.

"When I joined the staff we had a course listed in the catalog on the slide rule, and the mathematics department shared a huge IBM 1620 computer with UW-Stout," Williamson said.  "Now the hand calculator has greater power than the old computer, slide rules are museum pieces and students graduating without some computer capabilities are extremely limited in terms of the quest for jobs."

"The major change in terms of students is that they are older, have traveled more and often have chosen a five- or six-year college career because of work, career indecision or travel," Williamson said.

The most noticeable changes Wilson has witnessed during her career include changes in the landscaping of the campus grounds and the increased use of technology in UW-RF health and human performance classes.

Some of her career highlights include performing as a soprano soloist throughout the Midwest and appearing as a soloist on two  European concert tours.  Some of her former students have won Metropolitan Opera auditions, and one is presently singing with the Metropolitan Opera.

Other former students have continued to perform in major choral organizations and as soloists in the Twin Cities and throughout the Midwest.  Several are involved in the world of professional entertainment, and a few have gone on to graduate school and been successful in the musical performance area.

"During my tenure at UW-RF, I have felt sincere affection for the students and for the University," Wold said.  "I have also felt great enthusiasm for teaching beginning voice students how to stand on their own two feet when they graduate from this institution."

During his tenure, he served as department chair for four years, and was the interim chair in 1996. His other administrative assignments have included serving as Dean of Men, Associate Dean of Students, and Dean of Students.

He has taught a variety of health and recreation courses, including archery, bowling, tennis, wellness, health consumerism, biomechanics, nutrition, history of physical education and athletics, and the psychology of coaching.

Brown twice has been recognized with a Service Award by the Wisconsin Association of Health, Physical Education, Recreation and Athletics, received a Certificate of Achievement in drug education by the National District Attorneys' Association, and was the honorary director of the national wrestling tournament for the NAIA. He also was active in public service, including serving 17 years on the City of River Falls Police Commission.

Olson received the award for her submission to Liquitex in which she outlined her proposed artwork. The entry explained that Olson proposed to create a  70-by-90-inch quilt of family portraits. Each panel will display items significant to that particular person.  Olson went on to explain that there will be nine panels of acrylic paint on glass that then would be transferred to fabric.  The panels would be sewn together and completed with embroidery, ribbons, lace, additional paint, and more.  The surface of her quilt will be built up in numerous layers of paint and gloss medium.

Each month Liquitex sets aside $10,000 in paint to encourage artists in their development. Participants must be a student enrolled in an art course at an accredited school.  Olson was one of 12 students to recieve the award in April.

The Liquitex Exchange was developed as a means for students artists to display their artwork on the Internet. When Olson completes her work by July,  a 4-by-6-inch picture of the quilt will be taken will be "hung" in the Liquitex Internet Gallery. The World Wide Web site is accessible to an estimated 30 million viewers in over 110 nations.

The award was presented to the Ellsworth resident during the college's annual banquet. Selection is based on nominations from students and faculty, and is awarded jointly by the college and the National Association of Colleges and Teachers of Agriculture.

Student evaluations consistently rank Clark near the top in the department and college, Dean Gary Rohde said. He has been an outstanding faculty member and has provided excellent leadership in the dairy science program, Rohde said.

Clark joined the animal and food science department in 1982. He holds a bachelor's degree from UW-River Falls, with his master's and doctorate in dairy husbandry from the University of Missouri. His primary teaching focuses on principles of nutrition, with additional courses including introduction to animal science, agriculture biochemistry, advanced nutrition, physiology of lactation, dairy cattle evaluation, and dairy production.

He serves as a department faculty coordinator for intern students in animal science and coordinates the Extended Degree course in animal nutrition. He has been a primary advisor to the Dairy Club since 1982 and has coached the Diary Cattle Judging Team. In 1990 he was selected as the University Club Advisor of the Year by the Student Activities Office. He serves as academic advisor to 30-40 dairy students each year.

The agreement provides for a monetary settlement paid to Demers in exchange for dismissal of his lawsuit and voluntary resignation from his current position as Assistant Professor in the Journalism Department at the end of this academic year.

"The total settlement figure ($64,000) represents a payment by UW-River Falls to Demers effectively `buying out' the one year remaining on his contract, plus a payment by the State of Wisconsin of a portion of the attorneys' fee he incurred in this litigation," Thibodeau said. In addition, the University agreed to expunge the personnel record of Demers' non-renewal by his department.

"The issues which Dr. Demers raised were carefully considered by his faculty peers at the academic department level and by a University-wide Faculty Senate appeal group. As Chancellor, I had hoped that resolution could be reached through these mechanisms and I deeply regret that the professional differences which arose among the Journalism faculty during Dr. Demers' employment here reached such a serious level.  I think it is unfortunate that we were not able to resolve the dispute between Dr. Demers and his department colleagues through our normal faculty governance and appeals channels.  However, I am convinced that a jury trial verdict would have reaffirmed the judgment of our campus faculty Hearing, Grievance, and Appeals Committee in this case and that Dr. Demers' claims would not have been sustained.  Nonetheless, it was important for our faculty and students to put the divisive issues which led to the disputes between Dr. Demers and his colleagues to rest.  The settlement achieves that goal in a cost-effective manner," Thibodeau said.

Chancellor Thibodeau also reaffirmed the commitment of UW-River Falls to academic freedom.  "We must not overlook the importance of being ever vigilant in the protection of the rights of faculty members to make themselves heard on issues of public concern," Thibodeau said.

The event will also provide eight two-hour sessions explaining how educators can incorporate global content into the classroom and will emphasize the use of e-mail and the Internet.  The sessions will also discuss tools such as project learning and the development of critical and creative thinking that incorporate global learning into the class room.

"Developing Cross-Cultural Understanding through Literature," featuring Judy Freund and a panel of international educators who will discuss cultural perspectives on various themes and topics and demonstrate teaching strategies for guiding student reflection and development of a global consciousness.

"Connecting Standards and the Global Teacher" will feature speaker Urancek and a panel of educators representing multiple disciplines.  They will try to answer various questions on the role of content integration in curriculum development, skills and knowledge teachers need to help students develop an understanding of global connections.

"Educating for Peace Project" will feature the United Nations Association of Minnesota.  The organization will share materials and activities on linking art instruction with peace education, and projects that link schools with community organizations and local leadership using Declaration of Human Rights as a basis for addressing violence and conflict.

"Understanding Cultures through Music and Dance" will show how the arts provide students with world cultural experiences.  African and Trinidadian music and dance and strategies for developing cross-curricular approaches will be explored by presenters Karla Zhe, Ila June Brown-Pratt, Deborah Timmerman and an African Drummer/Dancer.

"Linking Through Diversity and Creating Context" will allow participants to explore a wide range of classroom projects that help students experience and understand world cultures and global issues.  This session is presented by Enloe.

"Sister Schools-Classrooms Connecting Across the Miles" will include Uraneck and a panel of "Sister School" teachers who will examine effective ways to connect classrooms using e-mail and fax to enhance global and cultural understanding.

Cost for the event is $35 for the full day and $20 for attending just the morning or the afternoon sessions.  A 50 percent discount is available for UWRF students and faculty, and a 20 percent discount is offered to participants registering in a group.  The pre-registration deadline is April 22. Registrations after this date will not include lunch.

The Thursday morning classes are called "Art Potpourri III" and will feature area artists as well as a UW-RF faculty member.  Together they will discuss and demonstrate their particular area of expertise.

Parents, teachers and education students, school board members, school administrators and school-based teams are invited to attend the session at the Hagestad Student Center. UW-River Falls has been selected as one of several regional sites around the nation to host this event.

It will nearly double the amount of funding available for classroom support by shifting the amount of state tax dollars that are earmarked for salaries. Presently, about 7 percent of tax dollars are spent for supplies and equipment; the reallocation plan would increase that portion to 12 percent. The funding also will be redirected into services to students, faculty development, and information technology improvements.

The workshop will focus on the habitat and identification of edible spring mushrooms with emphasis on the morel mushroom.  A discussion of preparation, storage and collection techniques will be included.  A short collecting experience will immediately follow the workshop.

Ballet classes will be offered on  six Tuesdays starting June 11 for beginning child, intermediate child/adult and advanced levels. The beginning and intermediate classes cost $36, and the advanced class costs $54.

Due to increasing enrollment, preregistration is required, and no registrations will be taken at classes. Those who have not registered before classes start are not covered by insurance and will not be allowed to participate.

This is the fourth workshop of the Rural Communities and Economic Development series designed to give northwest Wisconsin and eastern Minnesota small town officials and community leaders a total understanding of the economic development process, how it relates to their own communities and what decisions must be made to promote it within small rural towns.

It will provide an in-depth look at  common economic development issues such as comprehensive land use planning and fiscal and social impacts of growth,  Participants do not need to participate in the previous sessions in order to participate in this workshop.

Highlights include a keynote address by Rita M. Kozak, a land use planner from Williams-Gill and Associates, Inc., on the comprehensive land use planning process and how it differs from zoning. Kozak, who holds a doctorate in land use planning, is a member of the Pierce County Board. UW-Madison Professor Gary P. Green will also lead a review on some key factors that communities should consider when evaluating the impacts of growth.

Richard J. Stadelman, Wisconsin Towns Association executive director, will present a recap on what the Strategic Task Force and Land Use Interagency Council has done in the last year and what this means for local government roles and how local governments can become active participants in the development of state policies on land use.

Other highlights include a Public Sector Tools and Roles in Financing Business Development session summarizing customary municipal, town and county programs to promote economic development.  The session, presented by Pierce County Economic Development Corporation Executive Director Bill Warner, will also include an overview of state and federal resources and contacts, and how local governments can become active participants in the development of state policies on land use.

Cost for the workshop is $45 and includes all learning materials, refreshments and lunch.  Cost for the second person registering from the same agency or community is $20. The registration deadline is May 22.

Described by the New York Times as "one of the most exciting, innovative and delightful dance companies in the entire world," the 17-member Paul Taylor Dance Company has performed in over 400 American cities and in 60 nations.

Wisconsin Dance on Tour, representatives of the 22 communities and the Paul Taylor Dance Foundation have worked together for over two years planning this tour. It is supported by several foundations and is the most ambitious and far-reaching project in the five-year history of Wisconsin Dance on Tour program.

Practices are held twice daily on most days during camp at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, and they are free and open to the public. Fans often see players from just a few feet away, and some players will provide autographs to fans after practices.

In the Oklahoma Drill, a team tackling drill pits defensive against offensive players in a one-on-one battle to tackle a running back. It is the only full contact drill of the camp, and fans are invited onto the field to stand just a few feet from the players.

Fans who are looking for other diversions after practice can venture to the nearby St. Croix National Scenic Riverway.  The only North American river protected for its entire length, the St. Croix River is surrounded by quaint river towns that offers historic sites, antique shops, fine restaurants and dozens of other family diversions. Also an easy drive are the Twin Cities of Minneapolis-St. Paul, and the Mall of America, which is just 45 minutes away.

Also, Lyall will visit with elected governance body representatives for the faculty, academic staff and students. She also will lecture on the Politics of American Cities to a political science class. Lyall will accompanied by David Olien, UWS vice president for institutional relations.

She also held positions as director of the graduate program in public policy at Johns Hopkins University, and held faculty appointments at Syracuse University, Cornell, and Johns Hopkins. Currently, she is a professor of economics at UW-Madison where she teaches freshman micro-theory.

The play is produced, designed and directed by members of Masquers student theatre organization.  Masquers is an open organization of University students from all fields who are interested in the theater.

"A Few Good Men" was the basis for the hit 1992 movie, and tells the courtroom drama story of two young enlisted Marines based in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, who are accused of murdering one of their fellow squad members.

It is the the job of Lt.  J. G. Daniel Kaffee to prove them innocent.  But he must first overcome his own arrogance and escape the shadow of his father's successful law career.  He is accompanied by his side-kick Lt. Sam Weinberg and a head strong Commander Joanne Galloway.  Opposing them are all the rules and regulations of the military and it's judicial system.

Plans to improve efficiency and quality at UW-River Falls are moving right along, Chancellor Gary Thibodeau recently told an audience of mostly faculty and staff at a Reach for the Future update meeting.

"Our Reach for the Future planning document and the structured activities that are now under way to implement that plan will position this institution to enter the next decade and next century as a positive and viable university," Thibodeau said.

Thibodeau recapped the main goals of Reach for the Future:  increasing the supplies and expenses budget, which provides classroom money for the departments on campus; supporting faculty and staff development; and advancing technology.

Because the state of Wisconsin is  committed to cutting back on property taxes, money that would have come to the state from these taxes must be found elsewhere.  Hence UW-River Falls, as well as the other UW-System schools, must give back money to the state.

In addition, the University is setting aside $250,000 to deal with unexpected needs and striving to increase the percentage of the budget that is set aside for supplies and expenses.  Currently that number is 6.9 percent of the budget.  In 1983, 11 percent of the budget was committed to supplies and expenses, and the University would like to achieve this level and raise it to 12 percent as part of Reach for the Future.

"That trendline points in one direction and that's to mediocrity--no question about it," Thibodeau said.  "If we don't increase the support for our programs and our people, this institution will be a mediocre institution in the decade to come.  It is not an acceptable option."

This money has come about as a result of the work of Reach for the Future groups set up to investigate different aspects of the campus and present suggestions for ways that money could be spent more effectively and efficiently.

Some items that require the Board's approval include establishing a School of Business and Economics in the College of Arts and Sciences; changing the name of the College of Agriculture to the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences;  assigning the responsibilities of the graduate programs to the College of Education and changing the name of the College of Education to the College of Education and Graduate Studies; and changing the name of the Graduate School to Graduate School and Professional Studies.

Other items being submitted to the Board of Regents for information include reducing the number of credits required for graduation to 120, combining the departments of elementary education and professional studies and secondary education, moving the psychology department from the College of Education to the College of Arts and Sciences, dividing the responsibilities of General Services among other administrative departments, and increasing the fundraising efforts at UW-RF.

The University faces layoffs of three to five members of the academic staff, Thibodeau said.  Letters of intent to lay off have already been mailed to four classified staff members.  Classified staff includes those such as security employees, grounds crew, painters, electricians and carpenters, and secretarial staff.

Thibodeau stressed, however, that these layoffs will not necessarily result in a staff member's departure, but rather a move to another area.  Another option is to use retirements to creatively move staff into new areas without hiring additional staff, Thibodeau said.

"I think and hope that we can, through our planning process, minimize the impacts on people," Thibodeau said.  "I don't want to see layoffs.  I want to see the opportunity to change our staffing patterns."

The goal is to achieve national prominence in selected areas of all three colleges at UW-RF, Thibodeau said.  Groups have been studying the departments on campus through Reach for the Future to determine where money can best be spent to achieve this goal.

Lyall, who oversees the 26-campus UW System, spent the day at UW-RF visiting with faculty, student and staff governance groups, administrators, lecturing to a class on urban politics, and conducting an open meeting.

At the public session, Lyall responded to far-ranging questions from faculty, staff, legislators and the public. Topics covered the on-going UWS Regents 21st Century Study, efforts to move students through college more quickly, tuition costs, faculty tenure, training and salaries, and campus closings.

Outlining the impact of a $33 million base budget reduction in the UW System in response to property tax relief measures this biennium, Lyall said public higher education is being stressed because of shifts in public funding to corrections, environmental mandates, Medicare and Medicaid, and welfare.

She noted that she plans to make a stronger effort to build support for public higher education by speaking out publicly about the benefits of the University of Wisconsin System as an economic engine, and the contributions of its graduates to the state's robust economy.

"I would hope that the effort we will make for the next biennium is to vigorously advocate for maintaining the existing base budgets for the institution, and asking the state if it will invest in the new distance learning and instructional technologies we will need to serve our students and to reach our continuing education students around the state. We cannot, with budget cuts, reallocate for that technology. I do believe it is an obligation or a  duty of the state to fund that, just as it is the obligation of a private employer to properly equip its workforce for productivity."

Lyall said she also will lobby for competitive faculty and staff salaries. She noted that the UW System struggled throughout the 1980s to gain funding to keep salaries competitive with its peer institutions. That was achieved by the early 1990s, but salaries are beginning to fall behind, she said.

The system president noted that she had responded to a hypothetical question during an editorial board meeting of the Milwaukee Journal-Sentinel when she noted that the system's $33 million budget reduction was equal to the state funding for an entire campus. Lyall said she was asked by the editors how the System would respond if it faced a similar cut during the 1997-99 biennium.

"I said something along the lines that we may need to amputate something. I think it's terrible idea. I agree politically that it would be impossible to close a campus," Lyall related. "But I think we need to face squarely that if we have to take another $33 or $43 million budget cut we would have to eliminate whole programs and units across the system. We've come to the end of squeezing down, thinning out, working our resources over time.

She said she believes it must continue so as to provide academic freedom, Instead, Lyall said, staffing flexibility could be achieved by increasing the variety of employment contracts offered to professors. As an example, she noted that one option could be to provide a higher salary to faculty who work on a fixed contract.

Lyall noted that many students are not aware of the additional costs when they take five years to complete their college education. She said these include substantial additional costs associated with the education, lost income, as well as the lost retirement investment potential on an additional year's income.

"Our intention in the 21st Century Study is not to force students to finish in four years, but to have enough information so they can make an informed decision . . . All of these ideas are being considered seriously as a way to stretch our existing resources just as far as we can. The absolute bottom, bedrock value is that we must maintain the quality of a UW education, otherwise all we've done is provide a cheap education."

At the bazaar, the public and school children were invited to taste foods from different countries prepared by international students on campus. Each country had a decorated display with students available to answer questions about their cultures.

Not only is art a visual attraction, but it can also attract revenue and bring economic as well as cultural benefits to the St. Croix River Valley area when artists are able to develop support networks and effectively market their talents.

The coordinators of last year's seminar expected about 20 artisans; however, an estimated 150 area artists participated in the event.  The success of the seminar expressed the importance of such a resource for the many artists in the area, said Mary Caton-Rosser, a member of the seminar planning committee.

"It shows that there is a need for it," said Caton-Rosser, a free-lance writer and artist.  "There are lots of talented artists in the area that need that stimulation in their lives and need that help with their businesses."

"It's kind of a new day for artists in the area," Caton-Rosser said.  "For years there have been talented people living in the River Valley.  It's been kind of a mecca, in fact.  To finally be recognized and come together as a group to form a network, it's a milestone."

The seminar will begin with a welcome and keynote address from Dean Amhaus, executive director of the Wisconsin Arts Board.  The seminar will include two panels:  "The Visual Impact of Your Art," and "Business Planning and the Marketing of Artwork."

Participants also will be able to pick from among 12 morning or afternoon breakout sessions led by artists, gallery owners or managers, arts councils and agencies members, and business development specialists.

March 21. Music Professor Kris Tjornehoj will discuss the National Standards as they affect music in America, and she will also discuss selections to be heard at an upcoming Coffee Concert at the Ordway.

April 4 class will involve a bus trip to the Ordway for a Coffee Concert.  The concert will feature the Minnesota Orchestra and Gil Shaham, violinist.  It's limited to 25 participants and includes an additional fee of $21 for the ticket and partial payment for the bus ride.

The Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System is seeking comments from throughout the UW-River Falls campus community and its service area to a package of recommendations on the cost, quality and accessibility of a UW education.

The Regents are inviting local citizens, business and community leaders, and elected officials, as well as UW-RF faculty, staff and students to testify Wednesday, March 20, in a public hearing. The hearing will be held from 4-6 p.m. in the fiber optic distance learning classroom, Room 112, of the Kleinpell Fine Arts Building. Testimony will continue to be taken locally at the conclusion of the hearing via fiber optics for those who wish to have recorded testimony provided to the Regents.

The public hearing follows an eight-month study of the UW system, conducted by the Regents with participation by faculty, staff, students, elected officials and the public. The "Study of the UW System in the 21st Century" addresses the key challenges and opportunities facing public higher education in Wisconsin during a time of competing demands for state resources.

The trip included tours in and around Mexico City, visits to the Aztec ruins, the Pyramids, Chapultepec park, and several museums.  As Mexico city is the most populated city in the world, the students and faculty experienced a variety of different civilizations.

"There was a diverse and wide variety of activities to do in and around Mexico city," said Professor Tony Jilek, tour leader and a faculty member in the department of animal and food science.  Jilek, his wife, and Professor Jerry Nolte of the agriculture economics department led the tour.

In addition to spending three weeks in Mexico, students were required to attend six preparation sessions during the fall semester, and submit a 10-page paper that deals with facts and opinions accumulated during the class and issues of cultural diversity.

The institute, titled "Caring for the Children We Share," promotes partnerships that will increase parent involvement and participation in the social, emotional and academic growth of children.  The institute focuses on an audience of parents, teachers, school board members, administrators and site-based management teams.

The second day will open with an address from Dr. Carol O'Connell titled "It Takes a Village to Educate a Child."  O'Connell was the first woman president of the international Phi Delta Kappa educational fraternity.  She has been a teacher in the Dayton, Ohio, school system, a consultant with the Ohio Department of Education and director of elementary education for the Northmont Ohio City Schools.

The institute will also feature Jane L. Grinde, director of Family-School-Community Partnerships and publications for the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction within the Division for Libraries and Community Learning since 1988.  Grinde also served five years as communications director for the Wisconsin Association of School Boards and is a past president of the Wisconsin School Public Relations Association.

Also featured as a breakout session co-presenter will be Sheryl Miller, Janesville, who serves as president of the Wisconsin PTA.  Miller, along with colleague Edie Elliott, will present a session titled "Parents as Partners."

Students are not lacking dreams and aspirations, but they often don't have the means to achieve them, said Harvard University social policy Professor Gary Orfield, this year's visiting professor at UW-River Falls.

Orfield spoke to some 50 students and community members during a public presentation on March 6 on the topic "Race, Education and the Pursuit of Happiness:  Can the Public Schools Make a Difference" as part of the Visiting Professor Program.  During his three-day visit, Orfield lectured to numerous classes, participated in seminars and presented two public addresses.

Orfield was co-researcher on the extensive Indiana Youth Opportunity Study's "High Hopes, Long Odds" research project that surveyed students, parents and counselors to explore why most students completed high school without preparation for college and work, and followed college students for two years.

During his public presentation, Orfield discussed his Indiana education system that surveyed 5,000 students, parents and school counselors across that state.  Seniors in high school were tracked into their second years of college.

According to Orfield, the study showed that many students wanted to go on to college and become professionals, but few were actually on the right track in high school to achieve their goals.  Many seniors planned to go to two- or four-year colleges, but were not taking the courses required for admission.

In addition, many students did not have clear goals.  The study showed that 71 percent of high school seniors believed they'd have well-paying jobs as adults, but only about half of that 71 percent had even vague career goals.

To get on the right track for success, Orfield said, students need good counseling: something that the Indiana study said was lacking in high schools.  Though most counselors surveyed said they'd help students if asked, they didn't take the initial steps when students failed to come to them first.  Eighty percent of seniors surveyed said they had not had long-range planning sessions with counselors to set career goals.

Another deterrent Orfield mentioned was the difficulty of applying for financial aid.  Many families, especially lower income families, had difficulty filling out the forms to allow their children to receive aid, Orfield said.  Furthermore, school counselors weren't helping much.  According to the study, 66 percent of counselors said they spent less than 10 percent of their time advising students about financial aid options.

Many of the problems the counselors faced were typical. They are often burdened with many other tasks, such as lunchroom monitoring, and are significantly understaffed for the number of students they must counsel. Another typical problem the Indiana counselors faced was that they were trained in psychological counseling, rather than in career advising. As a result, they did not have access to appropriate information. Also, most of the students they advised were those who were already college-bound, rather than those students whose parents did not attend college.

Orfield also addressed the differences in goals between African American and majority students.  Fundamentally, he said, they have the same aspirations, but the outcome is often different.  Only 17 percent of minority high school seniors expected discrimination to be a barrier  to their success; however, within two years, 33 percent said they had experienced such barriers.

Orfield compared the education system to a complex freeway system with no directional signs.  Sometimes what looks like a turn-off actually turns out to be a cliff.  What students need is more signs, less cliffs, or both, he said.

"If we can't provide the resources necessary to help people understand better than that, we've got to simplify it so you don't go off cliffs," Orfield said.  "So that there is some connection between your dreams and what can actually happen to you."

The WONDER network covers the widest range of any fiber optic network in the state, blanketing roughly the northern third of Wisconsin. Fiber optic cable, maintained by local telephone companies, has much greater capacity than conventional phone lines, including the ability to carry video signals. It also delivers a flawless picture.

A class taught over the WONDER system allows the instructor to simultaneously teach to any or all other WONDER sites. It expands educational opportunities because the course ordinarily would not be available at the receiving institutions. Students also save time and money in avoiding long treks to distant campuses or remote educational sites.

Robert Hannu, network director, says the system can be expanded with the addition of other schools in the future. It is also compatible with other systems currently operating. UW-River Falls also is connected to 11 western Wisconsin school districts and WITC in New Richmond to form the WestWING network.

The program, based on King's celebrated recent work, "African American Women and Children in Nineteenth Century America," will include lectures, discussions, and receptions that are all free and open to the public. King's work, "Stolen Childhood," chronicles the experiences of children in bondage, a subject not extensively addressed until recently.

What started as an interest in programming during Triplat's junior high years has led to a national award for a project in which Triplat helped to develop a process to improve the quality of sound produced by CD players.

Triplat's project was named one of the top four projects this February in Philadelphia at the National Association for Computing Machinery (ACM) Poster Competition.  Triplat was one of 20 presenters at the national competition chosen by the ACM from among a number of proposals.

"I was surprised," he said.  "Actually it was kind of strange because I thought that they were going to call all of the names, and they called my name so I just walked up front.  Then they just called four names.  I walked up there thinking that I hadn't won, and then it finally dawned on me that I actually won."

"It did surprise me with the fact that it was at the national level and given the fact that there were other larger, more research-oriented universities there," Najafi said.  "But I think that the project did deserve such a rank."

That viewpoint is shared by Don Moses, founder and vice chairman of Wadia Digital, Inc., of River Falls, which was the sponsor for the research. Triplat began the project last summer when he was taking classes at UW-RF and was recruited by Najafi to assist him on the Wadia research project.

"It was a very good relationship for a small company that competes in a global market. Eighty percent of our products are sold overseas. We need to use the talents that are available to us. And the talents at UW-River Falls are tremendous. Jason is a very talented individual. What he did in our market is significant."

Najafi and Triplat tackled an industry problem that stems from CD players having only one filter to distinguish between many different types of sound signals.  While a filter might produce quality sound from one type of signal, such as treble, it probably won't filter other signals equally well, like bass. Thus, the sound won't have the best overall quality.

"The problem is that you have one filter that cannot change," Triplat said.  "It will not do the best possible sound construction for all types of sounds, so we need to have a filter that can change based on the type of sound pattern it sees."

When Triplat joined the project with Najafi, his job was to train a neural network-a computer program that can learn to classify things. When a program that classifies sound signals is applied to the filter in a CD player, the filter can then continuously adapt to different signals to produce a better sound.

"I like taking on a complex problem and being able to solve it," Triplat said.  "When you have a project that you have to write a program for and it's hard and you have a lot of problems, when you finally get it to work it's a kind of cool feeling."

"I enjoy working with students and I respect those students who are very hard working," Najafi said.  "Jason not only is hard working, but he's a good student.  I believe he really loves what he's doing."

A variety of dance styles will be offered, including a high energy jazz dance choreographed by Amy Ely, a sophomore from Elk Mound, and a lyrical contemporary dance by choreographer April Prestrud, a junior from Prairie Farm.

The concert will feature a lively rhythmic piece by guest choreographer Arlene T. Vann, of St. Paul, Minn. Her dance, "All One Tribe" traces the influences of African rhythms to American dance styles. She will provide the accompaniment on an electronically charged drum set.

Several humorous pieces will also be included. A highlight of the concert will be the performance of two abstract contemporary dances: "Pulse" choreographed by Christina Giessinger, a senior from River Falls; and "A Conflict of Prowess" by Ely. These two dances were presented at the American College Dance Festival in February and were adjudicated by professional choreographers at the Festival's Great Lakes Regional at Western Michigan University.

Karolides was involved in gathering and compiling all of the essays and assisted in editing the book. He is writing letters to inform the essayists of the award, who, he says, are equally deserving of credit.

Reese is the president of James T. Reese and Associates, a behavioral science and management consulting firm.  He is nationally registered with the National Speaker's Forum and the Capital Speaker's Bureau.  He has also published seven books, several tapes, and more than 40 articles.

Reese is recognized as an expert in stress management, motivation, and holistic wellness.  His positive message is informative, encouraging, and instructional in allowing audiences to increase their happiness and success by control of their lives.  Dedication to family, values, increasing productivity, and professionalism has earned Reese international recognition.  His programs are presented with compassion, inspiration, and humor.

Liddle was chosen based on high school grades, two letters of recommendation from teachers and two essays stating why she wants to study international business and why she sees the Pacific Rim as important to American business.

According to Glenn Potts, chair of the department of business administration, international business has become a very important aspect of business, and the business administration department at UW-RF has been working over the last two years to develop an emphasis in that area.  Potts hopes the scholarship will help draw promising students into the area.

International business is one of the areas students can specialize in within the business major at UW-RF.  The program includes the study of foreign languages and offers opportunities to study business abroad in Europe, Asia and Mexico.

The department also has a new state-of-the-art electronic classroom where students can develop skills for electronic information processing.  The department is currently in the process of enlarging its internship effort, including international internships.

The Center for Pacific  Rim Studies International Business Scholarship will continue next year.  Applicants must be high school seniors that have been admitted to UW-RF.  Though the study of foreign languages is encouraged as part of the study of international business at UW-RF, applicants are not required to have knowledge of foreign languages.

The commissioned composer project began in 1967 and has since featured internationally known composers such as John Cage, Leslie Bassett, William Albright and Fisher Tull.  UW-RF music Professor Robert Brownlow, the faculty adviser for the commissioned composer project, said Tull's composition for the University, "Quodlibet," is frequently performed by brass ensembles and has been recorded by nationally known brass artists.

The commissioned composer is chosen by students and the faculty adviser for the project.  They try to commission works for the different performing groups on campus each year.  Last year's work was a chamber piece, and Brownlow said next year's piece will probably be written for the wind ensemble.

De Jong's visit will include a three- to four-day residency as part of the project.  Commissioned composers typically give lectures and master classes and attend music classes during their stays at UW-RF, Brownlow said.

These lectures play an important role in the commissioned composer project because they expose students to the life of a modern composer, Brownlow said.  He compared the importance of knowing what's taking place in the music world to keeping up with the latest technology in computers.

During a public presentation on March 26 as part of a three-day visiting professorship, King said she was motivated to write the book because of the fact that 56 percent of slaves in 19th century America were under the age of 21.

After many hours of research, King found that most slave children did not know their own ages, and the owners of the slaves deliberately kept them ignorant.  She added that Booker T. Washington never knew his age.

Chapter by chapter, King summarized the critical points of her extensively researched book about the lives of 19th century African American children. King related her historical research findings about child birth and relationships.  After describing the ways in which African American children were named, King pointed out that parents taught their children behavior appropriate for children and for slaves.

King went on to describe the play and leisure activities that enslaved engaged in when their work was finished.  She determined the popular games they played were marbles, dolls and hopscotch, along with telling folk tales that offered alternatives to the way they lived.  King shared an example of a folk tale about a rabbit and a fox with a message intended to help children survive in the world.

Religion and education goals for many adults was to have the ability to read the Bible before they died, and she claimed that although children played make-believe church and funeral, they did not understand religion.

Tragedy, trauma and the viciousness of the system also were evident.  Even though all 19th century slave children may not have been whipped, separated or abused, King claims that they were all affected and threatened by it.  King recited a quote from "Beloved" by Toni Morrison as she said, "Children were whipped like adults, and adults were whipped like children."

"This is going to be huge. . .we expect a sell-out," predicts Kaye Schendel, coordinator of the event.  She also believes it will be a unique opportunity for UW-River Falls to have a national television show on campus.

MST3K features Mike Nelson and his robot pals, "Crow" and "Tom Servo," who are trapped in orbit on the Satellite of Love and are forced to watch bad movies at the hands of the evil "Dr. Forrester".  Mike and the robots sit as silhouettes in theater seats and make fun of the beamed-up films.

According to Schendel, the show's popularity is best demonstrated by the fact that UW-River Falls has already received phone calls from fans from as far away as Chicago who have already booked plane flights, rented hotel rooms and reserved tickets to the February show.

In announcing their gift, Dr. Kao indicated it was their wish to support three important areas of the University: faculty development, Academic Excellence Higher Education Education Scholarships, and exchange programs with Greater China.

Dr. and Mrs. Kao have been generous supporters of international programs for many years. Most recently, they were instrumental in the establishment of the Center for Pacific Rim Studies. The Center is responsible for providing opportunities for visiting professors and artists from Asia to visit the UW-River Falls campus, and promoting educational exchanges between the two cultures.

Elected as the Distinguished Professor of the Year in 1974, Dr. Kao was the chair of the department of economics from 1971-80. Since then he has devoted part of his time in Greater China (China, Taiwan, Hong Kong) involved in research, lecturing, writing and publishing. Known as a "leading thinker" in Greater China, Dr. Kao has written more than 15 books in Chinese in his field of economic policy and social thought. Two of his books were given the national prize in Taiwan. In addition to his academic activity, he has also been serving as an economic advisor to the central government there.

Mrs. Kao had a successful 25-year career with 3M Company, and is currently working for IBM in Beijing as a computer systems consultant. She is very interested in international programs and cultural exchange in the arts.

The Alliance, founded in 1885, is a major lobbying group comprised of more than 30,000 professionals in the fields of health, physical education, recreation, and dance.  The organization is committed to promoting programs, activities, and policies related to these fields and to provide development opportunities for its members.

The current vice president resigned to work in Washington, D.C. According to Davis, he was chosen to fill the position because as past president of the alliance he gained an appreciation for its goals and operational structure.

Davis will play a key role in advancing the Alliance's work, as a liaison to the organization's elected officers, executive committee, board of governors, and other committees and staff.  He will maintain relationships with numerous associations, government, business and professional organizations and others important to helping the alliance achieve its goals.

Davis received the alliance's Honor Fellow Award in recognition of his meritorious contributions. The award is given to alliance members who exhibit spirit in devoted service, shown leadership, and have made outstanding and noteworthy contributions to the advancement of health, physical education, recreation, and dance.

River Falls: Andrea J. Brantner, master of science in teaching degree in communicative disorders; Debra L. Freeman, master of science in education degree in counseling; Katie G. Grier, master of education degree in professional development, thesis title "Affective Needs of Gifted/Talented Children."

Wisconsin Academic Excellence Scholarships are offered to the top students graduating from Wisconsin high schools.  The scholarships can be used at any school in the state, but within the UW-System, the scholarship covers tuition and fee expenses, with the exception of a textbook rental fee.

Because the scholarship covers tuition and fees at any school within the UW System, the fact that students choose River Falls reflects positively on the University, said Alan Tuchtenhagen, UW-RF admissions director.

"This University has a lot more to offer than simply money," Woodward said.  "It's the programs that we offer; it's the location; it's the size of the campus . . . .  It's the faculty-staff ratio that can be offered here that students are not going to get at another school."

The State of Wisconsin has given its approval for UW-River Falls to begin the planning stage for a $1.8 million capital improvements project that would affect Kleinpell Fine Arts Building and South Hall.

The project involves three areas:  improving the ventilation in the art wing of Kleinpell Fine Arts, converting the third floor of South Hall into classroom space, and replacing aluminum wiring with copper wiring in KFA.

According to Campus Planner Dale Braun, an industrial hygienist noted deficiencies in the ventilation system in KFA in a study done in September 1993.  Because of pollutants such as clay dust and the heavy metals in clays that occur naturally in art classrooms, proper ventilation is necessary to make these areas healthy for students, Braun said.

To make room for the new ventilation equipment, the art department offices will be moved into the current office for the dean of the college of arts and sciences, and the dean's office will be moved into the classroom wing on the south side of KFA.

The classroom space lost in KFA will be replaced by converting the third floor of South Hall into a classroom area.  Due to a lack of funding, the third floor could not be renovated with the rest of South Hall in 1991, and this project will complete that renovation, Nylander said.

South Hall, which is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, served as the original State Normal School, founded in 1874 to train teachers for the northwest. It was declared obsolete in 1971 and slated for demolition. A low-interest, long-term loan from the U.S. Department of Education led to the first stage of its reconstruction.

As part of this capital improvements project, the wiring in KFA will also be brought up to current standards.  The present wiring was installed in KFA during a copper shortage in the 1970s, and aluminum wiring was used as a replacement.  However, according to Braun, the wiring has caused problems such as small fires associated with the condition of the wiring.

Currently, the University is in the process of selecting an engineer to plan the project.  Once plans are completed, they must be submitted to the Wisconsin State Building Commission, which then must approve the release of funding to allow construction to begin.

Braun predicts that construction will not begin until 1997.  Once started, total construction time should be six to eight months, Braun said, though the projects in KFA may take more time due to the fact that construction must be scheduled at times when it won't interfere with classes.

Funding for the project comes from monies set aside for the University of Wisconsin System as part of the state capital building fund, which consists of money set aside specifically for improving state buildings.  The funding is allocated on a need-based ranking of pending projects within the UW System.

A public hearing will be held from 11:30 a.m. to 3 p.m., Thursday, Feb. 22, in the Hagestad Student Center Ballroom.  The committee is providing this opportunity for students, faculty, staff, and employers to present testimony in regard to higher education in agriculture.

"The committee anticipates the students will provide their vision of agriculture in the Midwest, assess the adequacy of the education received at UW-RF, evaluate their employability as a result of internships, and comment on employment prospects," Rohde said.

Immediately following the hearing, the committee will tour campus facilities.  The tour will include the state-of-the-art greenhouse, food science pilot plants, and two laboratory farms that support undergraduate courses in agriculture, food, and environmental sciences.

From 8:30 a.m. to noon on Friday, Feb. 23, the committee will continue the public hearing in the Rodli Commons Yellow Room.  Testimony will focus on cooperatives and rural development.  The Wisconsin Federation of Cooperatives will coordinate testimony on business initiatives by cooperatives, "value added" agricultural enterprises, and rural economic development issues within the state.

This is a rare chance to see Philadelphia Brass.  The quintet seldom tours. The quintet has won several prestigious competitions, including the 1989 Rafael Mendez Competition, and they have an album out called "Renaissance and Baroque. "

Concert highlights include a performance with the UW-RF Concert Choir and student organist, Jillane Krause.  The piece, written specifically for the Philadelphia Brass by Daniel Pinkham called "Creation of the World," retells the first six days of the Bible's creation story.  River Falls High School choral music teacher Roger Tweiten will narrate.  The ensemble will also play music spanning from five centuries of music, including three selections from Westside Story and Hungarian Rhapsody No. 2.

Grant W. Moore, II, the tubist, is the only remaining founding member of Philadelphia Brass.  He is a busy freelance tuba soloist and clinician in the Mid-Atlantic region.  As a dedicated instructor he teaches tuba at Elizabethtown and Moravian Colleges and works often with high school players.   He is a graduate of the Indiana University of Pennsylvania.

The production is a comedy of manners, language, and self-indulgence.  Zimmerman says he chose the play for its language and etiquette. The play is considered one of the greatest comedies ever written, full of unwritten etiquette, graciousness, and style.

"The Importance of Being Earnest" is set in upper-class London in the late 1800's.  It is a story about two gentlemen, one from the city and one from the country, who love to travel into each other's community to impress the fairer sex.  In order to hide their true identity they each take on the name of Earnest.  The two gentlemen fall in love, and must confess that they are, in fact, not "Earnest."

Practices for the cast are somewhat challenging, Zimmerman says. Female cast members wear corsets to practice to perfect their poise.  The male cast members also are challenged by learning etiquette of the late 1800's.

Will received first place in the region in the comedy division for a tape from the campus-based program "Focus On U." The tape features Will's work from last year when he was a senior from Minneapolis majoring in speech communication.

"I think they're both very talented people," he said.  "They will do well in they industry no matter what they do . . . .  I'd say they were among the most talented students we've had come through here."

Will's entry was one of over 300 from 139 schools in 38 states. Will placed first in a 12-state region that is one of the largest in the competition.  Nationally, his video was one of the top four entries among the six regional winners.  The entries were judged by the same panel of industry leaders that select the Primetime and Daytime Emmys winners.

Many of the other regional winners attended schools with larger programs, such as the New York School of Visual Arts, New York University, and Columbia University.  Will was impressed by the caliber of the competition and found it noteworthy that an award-winning college program could be produced at a smaller school like UW-RF, which doesn't have access to the funding or equipment that is available at a prestige institution.

"The thing I think I'm pretty proud of is if you look at the list (of winners) . . . those are really huge, big-name schools with huge, big-name budgets," Will said.  "We're really kind of the underdog here, so I'm real proud of that."

Will titled his entry "Le Faux Mise en Scene," which can be loosely translated as "The Fake Program."  The title and content of the tape resulted from some advice Will received after submitting some of his earlier work to Comedy Central, a cable television comedy network. Will was told that he suffered from what is referred to in the industry as the "Saturday Night Live Disease:"  he had a funny idea, but he dragged it out too long.

One of the segments shows a mock interview with O.J. Simpson, in which excerpts from the audio version of Simpson's book, "I Want to  Tell You," were inserted as answers to questions written by Will and Quam.

An awards banquet will take place March 10 in Los Angeles to honor the winners.  After the banquet, regional winners will meet with agents, writers and producers.  This exposure, Zimmerman said, can help boost the careers of Will, Quam and Shoemaker.

Quam, who is now a graduate student at Mankato State University in Minnesota, hopes that meeting will help him find an internship in film or television, but he doesn't expect it to lead immediately to a job in the industry.

Will lives in the Twin Cities area pursuing acting roles; however, he's still not sure whether he wants to settle on acting as a career or go into video production.  Eventually he would like to get into film, possibly as an actor, writer or director.

While Will's is the only name that appears on the entry, he recognized all of the others who helped in the production of "Le Faux Mise en Scene."  Everyone who worked on "Focus On U" played a part in his receiving the award, he said.

UW-RF faculty and experienced teachers from the cooperating schools supervise the student teachers and interns. Student teachers receive University credit for their work, which continues for one academic semester. Interns receive both credit and salary, are on contract with cooperating schools and assume greater responsibility than student teachers.

As a winter carnival event sponsored by the Hagestad Union Board, three short films and the characters of the irreverent and popular television program were beamed to North Hall Feb. 13 for an evening of laughter and ridicule.

The first film, "A Date With Your Family," was a classic black-and-white film that gave instructions on the proper manners to use at the family dinner table.  While the narrated movie played, characters "Tom," "Crow" and Mike Nelson sat as silhouettes in the right hand corner of the screen and added their own witty commentary to make fun of the perfect, suburban Leave-it-to-Beaver-type family on the screen.

The second flick," Why Study Industrial Arts," also had the crowd roaring with laughter as "Crow," "Tom" and Mike Nelson mocked the old- fashioned, formal language used by the film's main character, a 1950s high school boy wearing thick black glasses and a crew cut.

"Last Clear Chance," told the story of a boy who died when his car collided with a train.  As the tragic event unfolded, the trio resorted to black humor one-liners that had the crowd bursting into laughter.

After the films, as fans stepped up to a microphone to ask questions, comedians Beaulieu and Nelson picked on their hair, clothes or questions.  Getting a straight answer from the wisecracking cast seemed to be an impossible task. The crowd loved it.

One fan asked Nelson if it was true that he attended college at UW-RF and whether his education helped prepare him for his role with MST3000.  Nelson replied that it did because it provided him with the opportunity to live next to a liquor store, and, ". . .because I was able to watch a lot of television."

With the aid of an anonymous donation, the UW-River Falls Gay, Lesbian and Bisexual support office is working to establish a local community chapter of P-FLAG, a national support organization for friends and family members of gay, lesbian and bisexual individuals.

Fox describes P-FLAG as an organization that encourages open communication among friends and family members of gay, lesbian and bisexual individuals to lead to a higher level of understanding, Fox said. "It helps people learn different information than our culture teaches them," Fox said.

During the first meeting, Fox plans to show the video "Straight From the Heart:  Stories of Parents' Journeys to a New Understanding of Their Lesbian and Gay Children."  Besides dealing with parents' efforts to understand their gay, lesbian and bisexual children, the video also addresses religious questions faced by gay, lesbian and bisexual individuals and their families.

The cost of the tour is $2,925, including air fare from the Twin Cities to Athens and return, ground and air transportation in Greece, hotel (double occupancy), breakfast and all evening meals (except in Athens), tour guides, museums, and service fees.  The tour is open to students and the public, and the fee is based on 25 participants.

Orfield has testified in many congressional and legislative hearings, including four U.S. Supreme Court confirmation hearings. He has been a witness in 21 civil rights courts cases on school and housing discrimination, higher education, and on testing issues.

Presently, he is the court-appointed special master for the San Francisco school desegregation case, in which virtually all the issues have been negotiated out of court during the past decade, and where a sweeping new approach to school change has been pioneered, including reconstitution of entire school staffs.

He also led the 1993 study, "The Growth of Segregation in American Schools," which reported a movement toward increased segregation of African-American students following the landmark Brown decision that desegregated schools.

The public hearing was conducted to provide an opportunity for students and faculty to speak to legislators about issues and concerns relating to programs at UW-River Falls, employment prospects and the future of agriculture.

Approximately 20 College of Agriculture students addressed the legislators. Many who testified stated that accessibility of instructors and "hands-on learning" were keys to the success of the college. One of the major themes conveyed by the students was the importance of state-of-the-art technology in their education.

Mike Wachtendonk, a senior animal science major from Seymour, asked the legislators to support a proposal for a new dairy teaching center on campus. Larry Baumann, associate professor of animal science, indicated the University has a proposal before the Board of Regents for an 80-cow, free-stall milking facility.

According to Baumann, the existing facility was built in the late 1950's. He said that it would be more cost-effective to build a new facility than to remodel. Faculty have a desire to incorporate management practices, such as sand bedding and different feeding systems like total mixed rations, which can not physically be done in the current facility.

Ken Sipple, a 1964 graduate, and a college advisory board member and Agriculture Alumni Association president, said that when budgets are restricted, access to post-secondary education is restricted. He also said that there are more jobs and opportunities in agriculture than available graduates. "Therefore, we need to support the enthusiasm of these students."

Bonnie Van Dyk, a College of Agriculture graduate and assistant vice president of marketing at Farm Credit Services, said that there is a very good network between the professors on this campus and agribusiness. Van Dyk said we are "relationship lenders and the faculty in the College of Agriculture are relationship educators."

Assistant Dean Terry Ferris explained the benefits of the college's internship program. "The students get technical, business and interpersonal experience. The employees get motivated students with technical backgrounds. And the faculty get one of the best faculty development programs the University has as they interact with industry."

Katrina Larsen, director of the extended degree and distance education program, shared some of the successes the college has had in securing funding from USDA Challenge Grants for distance education. Recently the college, in cooperation with UW-Platteville, UW-Stevens Point and UW-Madison, has been awarded two grants to train faculty to use distance education facilities. Larsen said, "Next year we'll be offering an agriculture education class to Platteville, we'll receive an agriculture law course from Madison and a waste management course from Stevens Point. This is a way to share the faculty expertise of our universities."

Due to limited time not all people were able to testify. But Ott asked those who were not heard to share their topics with the committee by writing or calling them. He said he hoped "the message came out that we are here because we do care about the support of agriculture education in the state."

The legislators also toured the college's facilities. They viewed equipment obtained for food biochemistry and soils laboratories purchased with funds from the legislature for lab and classroom modernization.

"It brings legislators from other parts of the state to our part of the state," said Rep. Bob M. Dueholm (D-Luck).  He said the hearing allows legislators to get a chance to "hear some different points of view."  Since most hearings are held in Madison, many students and citizens don't have the opportunity to attend, he said.

He also said that the hearing allows legislators to hear fresh ideas that will hopefully increase funding for higher education in agriculture since many students believe that the University is lacking in cutting-edge technology, especially computers.  Even though there is no major legislative action now, Dueholm said that legislators will keep this in mind.

Over all, Dueholm said he was very impressed that students shared their ideas.  "It's good to see so many willing to offer thoughts," Dueholm said.  He also said he was pleased to see that there are so many opportunities for agriculture students, especially for agriculture education majors.

According to Dueholm, the University benefits from the hearing by providing more visibility to the campus.  "It gives the University a chance to show off and to expose 10 of the 99 Assembly members to what River Falls has to offer."

Rep. Barbara Gronemus (D-Whitehall) also believes that students benefited from the hearing.  "It gives students an opportunity to present testimony as it relates to higher education," she said.  Gronemus, who is the former chair of the committee, said that the hearing helps legislators gain a better understanding of what students need, and a better feeling about how the higher education system works.

Gronemus said she was  impressed with how positive the students were.  "That is such a plus," Gronemus said.  She also said that it is very evident that many students come here for the student-staff interaction.  Legislators need to fund the University in such a way that student enthusiasm and staff interaction isn't lost, Gronemus said.

Gronemus said. She said the hearing gives students an opportunity to learn who stands up against Joint Finance Committee's budget writing when members cut agricultural spending in order to balance Wisconsin's state budget.

Sen. Alice Clausing (D-Menomonie) also said she was very impressed with students' enthusiasm at the hearing.  She hopes that the committee's presence will help foster this enthusiasm.  Clausing hoped that her presence at the hearing would encourage young people to get involved in the legislative process, especially since Wisconsin is losing about 1,000 farms a year.  "I am very concerned about farming in the state of Wisconsin,"  Clausing said.

Rep. Sheila Harsdorf (R-River Falls) also expressed some positive feedback on the agriculture hearing.  "I think it's great that they (legislators) are coming to see what the College of Agriculture has to offer," Harsdorf said.  "This type of opportunity is very valuable in getting people to our part of the state.  Hopefully, they (the legislators) will gain a better understanding of what the needs in agriculture are and what they need to be aware of."

According to Harsdorf, the Assembly provides an opportunity to share as well as provide information. "Any time you break out to the public, it's a plus," Harsdorf said.  "I think hearing from students is also beneficial."  Legislators need to "have a good understanding of what our future leaders have to say," she said.  She said the hearing outlined the need for equipment, but it also highlighted the closeness of the college, and that faculty put an effort into teaching students.

The position was created as a result of the University's 5-year "Reach for the Future" initiative that is repositioning UW-RF for the next century as it faces the challenges of emerging technologies and reduced funding that are impacting the educational process.

The Reach for the Future initiative is designed to improve the University's ability to prepare students for the 21st century.  The plan outlines many changes meant to arm students for a competitive, technologically advanced career world.

If the University is going to make changes, data must be gathered to provide a starting point, said Provost and Vice Chancellor Robert Milam.  This requires three steps:  the University must have the ability to compile the data that exists on campus; the information compiled must be credible; and it must be shared.

"The real thing we have to have is credible information before we can make intelligent decisions," Milam said.  "As we go through the Reach for the Future process . . . it becomes apparent almost immediately that you have to have information."

In the past, UW-RF hasn't designated anyone to compile this information.  Rather than having a centralized research office, individual administrative and academic departments have had to complete their own research or hire someone to complete it as needed.

"The data collection on this campus in the past has been somewhat inconsistent in that no one really had the responsibility for collecting and distributing data," said Vice Chancellor of Administration and Finance Virgil Nylander.  "It really occurs in a number of different offices."

One of the most immediate concerns, according to Milam, is that data be compiled for the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools, which accredits the University.  NCA will be visiting UW-RF in April 1998, and data collected by the office of institutional research will help provide an overview of the University and its programs and services.

Hillard said his job will include analyzing trends involving both students and curriculum.  In addition to preparing data for the NCA, Hillard stressed collecting data to determine retention and graduation rates.  Being aware of present data and trends can guide the University in making improvements, he said.

"We're just making sure that we have good information to make well-informed decisions," Hillard said.  "We're making a lot of decisions today with Reach for the Future, so we need a lot of information to support that."

Nylander outlined three important areas that must be addressed by the office:  what data exists; what data faculty and staffneed; and a consistent method for analyzing this data so that results can be interpreted accurately.

Over 500 students and faculty from a 10-state area will be participating in the festival, which will include four days of classes, informal showings, banquets, seminars and performances for individuals from 38 college and university dance programs.  It will feature over 50 master classes in modern, jazz, ballet and ethnic dance.

In the blind adjudication process, evaluators critique each dance without any background on the choreographer or dance program; therefore, dances from all schools are evaluated with the same expectations regardless of size, dance program and level of experience.

"The bottom line is that an educated citizenry is the backbone of a democracy," Thibodeau explained. "Everything that we do as a University is intended to make our students effective and more productive citizens.

"There are many things that will make a difference in how well we accomplish important objectives that are based on external support. Americans have to make a personal commitment to the education of our nation. And those in higher education must lead by example."

UW-RF Foundation Executive Director Chuck Brictson is optimistic that the Capital Gift Campaign will be well-received by members of the University community as well as alumni, businesses and other friends of the University. The campaign will continue over the next several years to coincide with UW-RF's massive "Reach for the Future" program that is reorienting the institution's academic disciplines and administrative support services in for the year 2000.

The purpose of the capital gifts campaign is to raise major gifts from individuals and corporations to support three separate targeted areas at UW-River Falls: technology, faculty development, and scholarships.

Thibodeau and Brictson noted that UW-River Falls has been feeling ever-increasing financial pressures as the institution, through the erosion of state and federal support, has effectively found its social compact with the people of Wisconsin shifted from state-supported to state-assisted public higher education. Just 40 percent of the institution's budget now comes from state tax dollars, with the balance from tuition, gifts and grants.

As public higher education in Wisconsin has witnessed the state tax dollar contribution fall from 14 percent to eight percent of state spending over the past decade, UW-RF has experienced continuing reductions in tax dollar support, including a 3.8 percent decrease this year as a result of property tax relief.

The competition for top students is becoming increasingly keen among colleges and universities. The campaign will undergird an already exceptional academic program array, and enhance the excellent educational opportunities the University  can offer to students.

The scholarship initiative is seeking donors to support UW-RF's Wisconsin Academic Excellence Scholarship. This joint UW-State of Wisconsin program permits the University to provide full scholarships to Wisconsin's best and brightest young people. Presently, 62 Scholars attend the University under this program. The capital gifts campaign is seeking a $1,000 donation for each scholarship. Those donations will allow the University to maximize existing scholarship funds to recruit additional high potential students.

Discretionary funding is being sought for faculty development through the creation of named professorships. The minimum contribution needed to endow a professorship is $50,000. Donors will be provided the opportunity to name the professorships and to select the academic discipline that will be the beneficiary. Money earned from the endowment will provide discretionary funding for a faculty member for areas most effected by state budget cuts: professional development, travel support for attendance and presentations at academic conferences, supplies and equipment, student assistance support, and research.

Funds will be raised for the purchase of equipment to allow students to be exposed to the latest technology in order to prepare them for the future. A primary focus, Brictson said, will be to seek out businesses and corporations that will donate equipment as they upgrade their technology systems.

"The 'Reach for the Future Campaign' is an exciting initiative. It will provide UW-River Falls with the needed resources and technology to meet the demands of the 21st century, and allow it to continue its pursuit of excellence,"  Thibodeau said.

The study program is for high school teachers of English, history, and social studies.  A grant will cover room and board, a weekly stipend for the institute's four weeks, and a travel allowance. A stipend will also be provided for a 3-day follow-up meeting June 9-11, 1997.

The summer institute participants will develop their own multicultural curricular units in literature, history, or social studies using film and will implement their projects during the 1996-97 school year.  The institute will meet again for three days in the summer of 1997 to share results.

The institute will explore ways to read films as historical and cultural texts in order to use film more effectively in helping students understand the changing dynamics of America's cultural diversity and the role of film in shaping those dynamics.

The teachers will be introduced to various methodologies of cinema study by examining the formal features of both narrative and documentary film, the filmmakers' intentions, similarities and differences between literary and film texts, and film content as historical and cultural documents.

Every new freshmen who steps onto a college campus hopes to graduate some day. But nationally one in three never makes it to their sophomore year, even though every indicator shows they should have been successful.

A nationally acclaimed specialist at techniques that help college freshmen stay in school will share his strategies with UW-River Falls faculty, as well as representatives from 14 Twin Cities universities and colleges in seminars hosted by UW-RF.

John N. Gardner, director of the Freshman Year Experience at the University of South Carolina, will present a series of workshops and lectures on Feb. 8-9 for faculty and staff on retaining new students and enhancing the quality of student life.

Institutions like UW-River Falls are admitting students who have demonstrated potential for academic success, Ballou explained. Thus, such institutions have an obligation to provide a climate for these students to succeed. Public universities have  additional accountability to taxpayers to ensure their investment in young people is fulfilled.

"Quality institutions are always working to make the quality of life better for their students," Ballou said. "We must do all we can to enhance the quality of student life. Gardner will help us to do better what we already do well.

Among the issues Gardner will address are the quality of student academic advising, strategies to ensure students are taking the right courses, determining whether students are being successful, and if they are oriented toward the goal of selecting a major and making progress toward graduation.

He offers practical advice to students, such as the importance of forming a significant personal relationship with an adult on campus, identifying academic skills resource centers on campus and using them, developing a schedule and sticking to it, joining study groups, associating with faculty outside the classroom, carefully selecting friends, getting involved in campus activities, attending classes, dealing with stress, finding a good academic adviser, and enrolling in freshmen-year orientation courses.

Jennifer Elsesser, MS: Jennifer is a Licensed Counselor who has experience and training in individual and group counseling. She has worked with a variety of issues and concerns such as depression, adjustment to college, relationship difficulties, body image issues, and stress management. Jennifer also has a background in health education and career development. Call or e-mail Ms. Elsesser at (715) 425-3884 or jennifer.elsesser@uwrf.edu. Jennifer works only two to three days per week, and so is unable to check her e-mail daily. Please call the office to schedule an appointment.

Alice Reilly-Myklebust, RN, MSN: provides general oversight of Student Health Services and coordinates the provision of care by various contracted providers. She also serves on campus as a health issues resource and consultant and works with students, staff, faculty, administration, and members of the community to develop and carry out policies and programming for the optimal health of students. Please feel free to call (425-3293) or e-mail (alice.m.reilly-myklebust@uwrf.edu) Alice with questions or for information.

Keven Syverson, MPH: provides campus-wide prevention-focused programming on issues such as alcohol, tobacco, sexual health, etc. He also speaks to classes, residence hall groups, and student groups and organizations on health-related topics and serves on several campus and community health related committees, and oversees certain prevention grants . Keven can be reached by telephone (425-3755) or e-mail (keven.syverson@uwrf.edu) for questions or more information.

The Planetarium is available for group shows and may be scheduled during the day or evening. The cost per show for groups is $25.00 payable to the Physics Department. Maximum seating capacity is 40 people.

The University of Wisconsin  River Falls Planetarium is located in the Agricultural Sciences Building about 1 block into the campus from the corner of Third Street and Cascade Avenue, in between Hagestad Student Center and the University Greenhouse. There is handicapped access from the North side of the building and steps into the Planetarium area from the East side.

The sundial was designed by emeriti Dr. John Shepherd. It is located on the southern most wall of the Kleinpell Fine Arts building which is located on Cascade Avenue running east-west. It faces what will be the new student center, and the main east-west walkway through the center of Campus. Click here for more information about the sundial.

Physics: There are two options with this degree program. Option I is recommended as preparation for graduate studies in physics or for industrial research. Option II is recommended for students wanting maximum flexibility for study in other areas, as it requires 14 less credits in Physics to graduate.

Dual Degree Major:This major is awarded jointly with a B.S. in engineering after the student has successfully completed a three-year program at UW-River Falls with a minimum grade point average of 3.0 and a two-year program at either UW-Madison or the University of Minnesota.

Internships are an important part of learning how to apply fundamental knowledge outside the classroom. Students learn life-long career skills like resume and cover letter preparation, networking, and career research skills in a one-credit class in the fall of their sophomore year.

The Annual Physics Banquet has been scheduled for the evening of Saturday April 22, 2006. At this banquet we will have the induction ceremony for Sigma Pi Sigma. This year there will be at least 9 students invited to join the honor society. After the induction, our speaker this year will be Dr. Richard (Dick) Peterson http://cas.bethel.edu/dept/physics/faculty/petersonf, President of the AAPT, Professor of Physics at Bethel University, and UWRF alum. In recent years he has been doing some fun measurements on vacuum bazookas, firing pingpong balls at hundreds of miles per hour, and illuminating some interesting physics along the way. Please mark your calendars.

Scholarships are available for incoming and continuing students to recognize students with a high potential for success. Students can also earn money through paid research and other departmental work.

Two scholarships are available each year for new students who intend to pursue a physics or pre-engineering program at UWRF. These are worth $1000 per year and are renewable for up to four years with satisfactory progress.

Details on each of these programs, including application information, can be found by choosing the Physics Department link from the left-side navigation window on the following link to UWRF scholarships.

Last Fall we did a Pasta Bridge competition, building and testing bridges made from a variety of noodles.  It was a lot of fun!  In the Spring semester we held a Jelloscope competition.  The basic idea was to make some lenses out of gelatin, and then set up those lenses to make a simple telescope!  It turned out to be quite challenging, but we had fun with it.  And of course we had fun at our Fall and Spring picnics, and other fun activities.

In addition to completing the courses listed above, student must take additional courses to reach the required 36 credit hours required for a Psychology Major. These courses can be taken from any area in psychology (e.g., courses in the required area section or courses in the additional course offerings section seen below).

Finally, all psychology majors are required to participate in the departmental assessment of the psychology major. This usually involves keeping a portfolio, taking surveys, and a general psychology achievement test in their first and last year in the program.

Psychology majors at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls have the option of graduating with either a Bachelor of Science degree or a Bachelor of Arts degree within the College of Arts and Sciences.  This link offers downloadable access to both these options.

In addition to fulfilling the general education and psychology courses areas requirement, majors must take 		three additional courses (total of 36 credit hours). These course can be taken from any area in psychology. If 	Psychology 101 and/or 201 are not used to fulfill general education requirements, they can count toward the 	required 36 major hours.

The following are descriptions of the courses taught by the Psychology Department faculty at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.  Please see the class schedule to determine when each course is offered.

This introductory behavioral science course emphasizes research methods, biological basis of behavior, human development, learning, memory, social and abnormal behavior.  As an overview course, it is designed to expose students to the major areas of study within the science of psychology with an emphasis on both research and application.

This course is an introduction to the psychology major, and psychology related disciplines and careers, with guest lectures by staff members from Psychology, the Career Center, and other campus offices.  Students will begin to develop a professional portfolio, write a paper on potential psychology-related careers, and participate in departmental events and assessment activities.

This course examines contemporary research in various areas of psychology and applies them directly to the life of the student. Issues such as motivation, self-regulation, interpersonal relationships, sexuality, stress and coping behaviors are examined. Individual and group exercises intended to aid in applying course material to the student are utilized.

Course provides an introduction to descriptive and inferential statistical techniques used in Behavioral/Social sciences. Topics covered include the basic concepts of levels of measurement, statistical normality and randomness; the descriptive statistical techniques of central tendency, variation and correlation and the hypothesis testing of means of proportions.

This course introduces the methods used by psychologists to perform research, including experimental and nonexperimental techniques.  Special emphasis is placed on topics in statistics and experimental design (e.g., within- and between subjects designs, factorial experiments and single-subject designs).  The use of American Psychological Association writing-style to communicate research findings is also discussed.

This course provides a broad survey of literature and psychological research concerning sex differences and gender role development with an emphasis on exploring both the similarities and differences between females and males.  Some key topics include:  historical perspectives of sex/gender, the "science" of studying sex/gender, physiological issues (e.g., reproduction, the brain), theories of gender acquisition (e.g., social learning, psychoanalytic), theories of sex differences, issues of thought and cognition, relationships, sexuality (normal and deviant), and the future of gender/sex.

This course explores research and theory from the field of developmental psychology regarding the nature and processes of human cognitive, physical, and social development from conception through adolescence.  Key topics include: theoretical perspectives, issues of nature and nurture, research methods, prenatal development, birth, sensory change, puberty, memory development, Piaget, Vygotsky, language development, parenting, the development of the "self," moral thought, and sex/gender role development.  Consideration is given to the implications and application of this research and theory to real-life events and problems.

This course examines the work-a-day problems in personnel, organizational and engineering psychology as applied to business. Topics covered include personnel selection, placement, training, the structure of organizations, leadership, management theory and the design of information displays, atmospherics and illumination in the work area.

This course examines the principles of behavior analysis and the techniques of behavior change. The latter include shaping, contingency management, prompting and counter-conditioning. The application of behavioral principles in various environments is discussed, as well as self-change methods.

Psychology 279 is designed to prepare students for participation in Psychology 379 (Internship).  In this course students will get an overview of, and investigate, internship opportunities, develop professional materials (e.g., resumes, cover letters), and participate in departmental work experiences.

This course is designed to acquaint students with findings, principles and theories in the field of animal learning. Emphasis is placed on classical conditioning, instrumental learning and, to a lesser degree, social learning theory.  Selected topics within the field of motivation are also included in the course.

This course provides an introduction to the theories, research and applications of the field of cognitive psychology. Major topics of study include the processes of attention, pattern recognition, memory, language, decision making and problem solving. These topics are presented within an information-processing framework, but a connectionist approach to cognition will be introduced as well.

Course examines the current social, legal and psychometric concerns in psychological-educational measurement. Topics include history of measurement, legal and ethical issues, construction and analysis of tests, interpretation of scores and the technical considerations of reliability and validity.

The course involves the investigation of the study of personality.  Topics include: psychoanalytic, trait, phenomenological, behavioristic and social learning approaches to personality.  Consideration of a variety of perspectives on personality.

This is a survey course examining the general aspects of the exceptional child.  Emphasis centers on the historical, philosophical and social background leading to legislative and educational provisions for individuals with disabilities, definitions and eligibility criteria of each area of disability to include referral procedures in terms of when, how and where; different models for delivery of services; individualized education programs; due  process; cognitive, social, and behavioral characteristics of individuals with various exceptionalities including gifted and talented and attention deficit disorders; and examples of accommodative techniques in the classroom.

This course emphasizes the role of the classroom teacher in collaboration with special educators, parents, and community resources.  Federal and state guidelines for professional roles and program options for exceptional learners to be served in the least restrictive environment will be reviewed.  Course content includes intervention strategies for reading, written expression, mathematics, social-behavioral, and study skills; how to assist students who learn differently; identification of vocational interests and career options; and effective communication skills of the general educator with students, parents and other professionals within the school community.

This course examines several approaches to the study of animal behavior including ethology, comparative psychology and sociobiology. The course also examines the methods used to collect data and surveys the contribution of developmental, social, ecological and evolutionary processes to animal behavior. Students will independently observe naturally occurring behavior and analyze their observations.

Students will gain an understanding of the basic physiological and psychophysical methods used in perception research. This knowledge will then be applied to study how the senses of vision, audition, taste, smell and touch extract and code information from the environment. Special emphasis will be given to the visual mechanisms involved in the perception of contrast, form, depth, size, motion and color.

This course is designed to familiarize students with the anatomical, chemical, physiological and hormonal control of behavioral processes such as sensation and perception, consciousness, emotionality, eating, drinking, thermoregulation, aggression, reproduction, learning, memory and higher cognitive processes.

This course analyzes social-psychological processes which effect individual and group processes. Content areas include a variety of topics such as: power, reference groups, social comparison processes, the operation of group standards, conformity and deviation, sources and criteria of legitimate authority and destructive obedience. In addition, the study of conflict within and between groups is included. Laboratory experiences are related to both the content and methods of study in psychology.

This is an internship program which places selected students in human service agencies, businesses, industries, or organizations to provide opportunities to apply their knowledge of psychology.  The internship in psychology should be preceded by a one-credit work experience, (Psychology 279).  The Internship site must be approved in advance of the work experience by the psychology department.  The intern's duties and responsibilities will be tailored to the needs of the sponsoring organization and the background of the student.  The organizational supervisor, a psychology department supervisor, and the intern will conduct periodic and final evaluations of the intern's progress and products.

This course is designed to familiarize students with an overview of the field of counseling and with the basic concepts and skills associated with school and community settings. There will be a shared emphasis on experiential activities, theories and research in counseling.

This course is presented as an introductory or survey course in the field of learning disabilities, fulfilling a dual purpose: first, as a terminal course for regular education classroom teachers and related school personnel (administrators, guidance personnel, school psychologists, teachers of physical education, music, art, etc.) and others who wish to become acquainted with the issues of specific learning disabilities; and second, as the introductory course in the sequence leading to teacher certification in learning disabilities.  Development of the field, brief examination of major theoretical approaches, current definitions and  terminology used in learning disabilities, issues in diagnosis and assessment, educational adaptations, and techniques and strategies appropriate for use in a regular classroom are emphasized.  Field experience, which could be used to meet the Human Relations component (for Education majors only) is a requirement of this course.

This course serves as a survey of the field of education for school aged high potential students.  A variety of gifted education topics is explored including the historical development o services, definitions and identification, program options, teaching strategies, creativity, and critical thinking.  Field experience can be used to meet Human Relations requirements (for Education majors) is a requirement of the course.

The course serves as an introduction to the field of clinical psychology as a science and profession. Included is a consideration of history, training, issues and problems associated with the profession. In-depth analyses of clinical assessment, psychotherapies, community psychology and therapeutic outcome studies are presented.

This course is an arranged field experience where academic training in psychology can be applied to a specific setting of interest to individual students.  The experience is supervised by both a departmental faculty member and a cooperating on-stie supervisor.  Limited enrollment.

Step 3: Reserve a room for your study. a. Determine the specific dates and times that you will be collecting data. b. Have the Psychology Department Program Associate reserve a room for these dates and times. Please do not attempt to reserve a room without consulting the Program Associate, Ms. Kubera.

The information appearing on the first page your sign-up sheet should correspond exactly to the information appearing on your Study Information Form (i.e., the study name, number, description, etc., should be the same).

In the event that you arrange for several professors to simultaneously circulate sign-up sheets that is, if you prepare separate sets of sign-up sheets for several sections of General Psychology do not record the same dates and times on more than one set.

Have each participant read the Consent Form Cover Sheet at the beginning of the session; then have them sign the Consent Reporting Form. To ensure that participants receive credit for their participation, also have them legibly print their name on the consent form and indicate their psychology instructor.

Please keep extra copies of the Consent-Form Cover Sheet on hand, because some participants may request a copy. In addition, some participants may bring a Study Participation Record sheet to your study. This sheet allows one to maintain a personal record of their participation. Thus, when a participant presents this sheet and requests your initials, you must initial it.

Turn in the Consent Reporting Form or, when applicable, all individual consent forms to the Psychology Department Program Associate, Ms. Kubera. After collecting your data, it is generally advisable to turn in these forms immediately. The deadline for the receipt of consent forms is the Friday preceding the last week of class.

The University of Wisconsin - River Falls Psychology Society is a social organization designed to provide students the opportunity to interact with other students and faculty members in an informal setting. The Psychology Society, which has monthly meetings, sponsors events throughout the academic year that are open to anyone with an interest in psychology and meeting other people.

Some of the most successful recent events included a haunted hayride, a trip to a Minnesota Timberwolves game, and a staff versus students bowling tournament (won by the faculty for the 9th consecutive year).

The University of Wisconsin - River Falls Psi Chi chapter provides members with opportunities to find out more about graduate school and careers in psychology and related fields, engage in and present research, and get to know other students with similar academic interests and goals.

During the course of the academic year, Psi Chi members are engaged in a number of interesting and informative activites.  These activities include promoting research, discussion of potential career paths, and local community service projects.

This page is dedicated to the select few who have earned an undergraduate degree in psychology from the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.  As stated on our welcome page, the intent of this page is to give students some insight into the life beyond UW-RF (i.e., what do people do after graduating with an undergraduate degree in psychology.

Attention Alumni!  If you would like to add your name and information to our web page, need to up-date your current information, or have any suggestions about this site please contact Dr. Brad Caskey at either his e-mail (Bradley.J.Caskey@uwrf.edu) or at the department's snail-mail address (Contacting the Psychology Department).

Ilisa notes that, "the smartest thing I did for myself as a college student was intern.  I interned with the MN Dept of Corrections as a caseworker.  I had a job as a Resident Counselor in a juvenile female grouphome lined up when I graduated." She has since left that position to become a Family Resource Provider (family services) with Head Start.

After her undergradute years at UWRF, Lisa has returned and is pursuing her Master's of Science in Education within the realm of Elementary School Counseling.  She states that she is very much in love with the path that she has chosen and that "Graduate School is excellent."

Foundation, as a Mental Health Counselor.  Her job consists of working with SPMI adults both in the facility and out in the community.  Heather participtes in one-to-one's and after-care client interventions.  She also assists the therapists with assessments, initial program plans and quarterly meetings.  She enjoys this job, but adds, "some days get very interesting!"

A recent UW-RF graduate, Stephanie is currently working at the University of Minnesota in the Facilities Management Department as a Senior Accounts Assistant.  In addition to this work, Stephanie is taking night classes at the University of Minnesota in order to fulfill prerequisites for the M.B.A. program offered at that university.  Stephanie hopes to get accepted in the MBA program and concentrate on Entrepreneurial Studies.

After graduation, John enrolled in the Applied Psychology program at the University of Wisconsin-Stout. Some of his graduate duties include: serving as a Teacher's Assistant, desiging/redesigning/analyzing surveys, and other fun jobs.

Advice for current or prospective psychology majors: Get to know your professors and all the staff that keep the department running smoothly.  Get involved in the department.  Psych club, Psi Chi, department events, and conferences are great opportunities to meet your professors outside of the classroom.  Use the psych lounge...it's a great place to study, to wait for your next class, to see others and to be seen.  In class, ask questions often...it shows that you are paying attention and are interested in the material.  Take every class that is offered in the major, even if it's not required for you to do so...it'll expose you to new ideas and theories, and will hopefully introduce you to an area of study that you will eventually focus upon.  Lastly, you are paying for the college experience...you owe it to yourself to take the most difficult classes and professors...often, they have the most to teach you...just approach every class with an open mind and the attitude ! of "it's okay for me to make mistakes...I am here to learn."

After graduating from UW-RF, Martha was accepted into the Counseling Psychology program at Texas Tech University where she earned her Ph.D. in 1997.  Her graduate internship was at Iowa State University.   Martha is currently the "one and only" post-doc clinical psychology resident at Illinois State University.  Her duties include teaching graduate and undergraduate courses, supervising therapists in training, working with clients, and administrative duties.

After graduation, Janice entered the Master's of Arts in Counseling program at Valparaiso University and expects to graduate in May of 2005. She has also worked as a client assistant at The Caring Place (a domestic abuse shelter) and as a behavioral specialist at a residentail facility for chronically mentally ill males.

Advice for current or prospective psychology majors: Try to get as much pratical experience in as many different settings as possible. It will prepare you for the opportunities ahead and give you a true understanding of what you want to do.

Gail is currently working on Masters in Gerontology at Bethel in St. Paul, expected graduation January 2005.  She recommends the program for students interested in aging....lots of work (writing, writing and more writing...and lots of reading too) and very rewarding. In addition to school, Gail has started an internet business selling jewelry for seniors, including those with hand mobility problems (www.SeniorJewelry).

After graduation from UW-RF, Paul attended Arizona State, where he earned a Master's Degree in motor development and learning.  In 1998, Paul continued his education by being accepted into a PhD program in pedagogy/motor learning with a cognitive psychology minor at Louisiana State University.  As a graduate student, he continues to be interested in the study of sport and exercise (behavioral emphasis), sport pedagogy, performance enhancement (part sport psychology and part biomechanics) and the application of motor learning to teaching and learning.

After graduation, Brenda began her business career working for Copier Concepts.  She then started her climb up the corporate ladder by landing a job as an accounts manager for Xerox "The Document Company." Her current duties in this position include developing new accounts for Government agencies, State agencies, and law offices. In her spare time, Brenda teaches figure skating classes in Spooner, Wisconsin.

Jason started graduate work at Hamline in 2002 on a MEd degree and hopes to graduate in 2005.  He is also working as a teacher in Minneapolis public schools as a fifth grade teacher.  Jason is excited about the birth of his first child this past year.

Advice for current or prospective psychology majors: The advice that I would like to give current and prospective students is to give serious thought on what you really want to do with your degree.  Participate in an internship to gain experience in that field of study and finally attend graduate school once you are finished to further yourself.  Psychology applys to many walks of life so be sure to do something you enjoy and will be happy doing.  But most importantly enjoy college while your there.  Allow the professors to take care of you and keep your mind open to learning and having fun.

Karen's interest in health and fitness has led to several interesting career opportunities. For example, she has served as the Director of the Center for Sustainable Arts (www.sustainable.net) and is the Wellnesss Program Chair for the Service Center in Ladymith, WI.

After graduation Greg worked in the HealthEast Office of Research and Medical Education doing outcomes research and program evaluation for Bethesda Hospital in St. Paul.   He is currently in his second year (of four) in the Psy.D. program at the MN School of Professional Psychology working toward a Clinical Health Psychology degree.

After graduation, Stephanie joined the Peace Corps and spent two years in Tanzania.  She has since spent time in Bozeman, Montana, Fergus Falls, Minnesota, and is now headed to Midway Island (in the Pacific).  She is as accomplished author (national award winner) of children's books (five and counting).  While she has not followed your typical psychology major career track, Stephanie notes that she is having fun and could tell you anything you want to know about publishing a book!  Stephanie is married to UW-RF alumni Tim Bodeen.

The University of Wisconsin - River Falls Psychology Department actively seeks ways to improve the educational experience of its majors.  In this vein, the psychology department has begun to build ties with businesses and numerous health and service organizations.  The result of this endeavor has been the development of an internship program in psychology.  Students participating in the program register for 1-3 credits of Psychology 379 (Internship) and work 50-150 hours over the course of a semester.  Most of these experiences are unpaid and provide an opportunity to gain "real-life" experience under the supervision of a qualified professional.

In addition, the department offers students the opportunity to meet professionals working in the field by sponsoring talks by individuals in the workforce.  The photograph below shows Jana Fallon of ePredix (a Twin Cities-based online selection and assessment consulting firm) talking with Dr. Travis Tubr (UW-RF Industrial/Organizational psychologist - and member of Jana's dissertation committee) after her presentation on "Personnel Selection in Cyberspace."

Remember that the above list is only a sample of the different sorts of internships in which UWRF students have participated.  Many internship possibilities exist for Psychology students each semester.

The following are psychology-related links reviewed and recommended by University of Wisconsin - River Falls Psychology faculty member, Dr. Brad Caskey.  When exploring these links, remember that you can return to this page by hitting the back key.  Also, if you have any suggestions for additional sites or if a link is not functioning correctly, please drop Dr. Caskey an e-mail message at Bradley.J.Caskey@uwrf.edu.

True to its title, this site provides a nice historical review of the mind-body question beginning with Rene Descartes, continuing through the rise of experimentalism in the 1800s and through James descriptions of consciousness.

This site provides access to background information on psychologists from Alfred Adler to Robert Yerkes (almost A-Z).  In addition, there are links to Psychology Department Histories for several well-known universities.  This is a fabulous resource for anyone conducting a biographical study of psychologists.

This site is the home page of The Industrial-organization Psychologist (TIP), the official newsletter of the Society for Industrial-Organizational Psychology.  In addition to providing back issues of the newsletter, the page has links to numerous other I/O related sites around the world, a graduate school handbook, and job/grant information.

The home page for the Society of Consumer Psychology provides extensive links to a wide variety of information of use to anyone interested in advertising. This Ohio State University-based site provides key links to numerous other related organizations (e.g., Association for Consumer Research, American Marketing Association).

Located at Harvard University, this informative and interactive site offers an exhaustive visual review of the human brain.  Hightlights include "Top 100 brain structures" and a "name that brain structure" game.

This interesting site offers the student of neuroscience assess to an immense amount of information on the discipline.  Available links range from software to news groups/forums to centers/labs to exams/tutorials.

This link is to the American Psychology Association.  This organization has approximately 130,000 members and 50 divisions with a wide variety of subspecialties.  Within this link you will find a lot of information concerning both academic and applied issues in psychology.

The American Psychological Society has more than 10,000 members and is the largest general psychology organization focusing mainly on research.  This link provides individuals with access to a plethora of information on teaching and research.  One especially helpful feature is a link to many psychology department web sites.

The American Psychological Association currently consists of areas of specialization referred to as "divisions."  In this informative site you will find descriptions of all current divisions, from Division 1: General Psychology to Division 51:  The Society for the Psychological Study of Men and Masculinity.

This truly amazing University of Augsburg, Germany based-site contains a list and description of all Psychology and Social Science journals (1000+) currently in print.  You can also access many journals to read information about the premise of the journal and about specific publication information.

This link provides access to a colorful and interactive site containing information about Psi Chi, which is the National Honor Society in Psychology.  Both potential and current Psi chi members will find this site a great place to visit.

This site, dedicated to pioneering sex research Alfred Kinsey (1894-1956), contains some of the most current research on sexual behavior in the world. The multiple award winning site allow access to research and publications, library and special collections, and links to other resources.

This in depth site features work by Dr. Gregory Herek, noted authority on antigay prejudice (or homophobia), hate crimes, and AIDS stigma. A few of the more detailed discussion areas include gay people in the military, facts about gay men and lesbians, homophobia, and stopping anti-gay hate crimes.

This interesting site is based out of the Center for the Study of Group Processes located at the sociology department at the University of Iowa. While offering interesting links to numerous social psychology web sites, it most useful feature is it on-line electronic journal, Current Research in Social Psychology.

This interactive site allows the visitor to participate in the prisoner's dilemma exercise.  This classic study of social cognition might be of interest to fans of the television show "Survivor" as it investigates issues of competition versus cooperation.

This highly informative link (based at Wesleyan University) provides access to a ton of information of interest to social psychologists including: a rank-ordered list of U.S. Ph.D. graduate programs in psychology, home pages of some social psychologists, and access to other sites dedicated to social psychology.

Host Dr. Thomas Blass has put together an impressive site dedicated to Stanley Milgram, one of the talked about psychologists in history.  Interesting internal links include, Little Known Facts about Milgram, Stanley Milgram Basics, and Memorable Milgram Quotes.

The University of Wisconsin - River Falls Procurement Card Program was established to provide departments a simple, cost-effective, and convenient way to make low dollar purchases. The program is designed to replace most low dollar purchase orders (Normally Under $1500) and blanket orders.

David is a professor in the department of agricultural economics at the University of Wisconsin at River Falls (20% of the time) and the University of Wisconsin Extension Service (80% of the time). His Extension work focuses on issues affecting cooperatives and on community development. He has been at UW-River Falls since December 1990. Recent research topics include: the role of cooperatives in supply chains, issues affecting low-income groups in Washington County Wisconsin, the impact of changing demographics on County Fairs, and education and economic development in Sawyer County Wisconsin.

The official check-in time at Dalkeith House is between 10 a.m. and 12-noon on Thursday, February 1. If you arrive at Dalkeith House prior to students on the group flight, you can drop off your luggage, but you won't be able to check into your room until the bus arrives from the airport. If you arrive prior to February 1, you will need to make your own accommodation arrangements elsewhere.

Through  Center Hall, you will find the Marble Hall. This hall is adorned with solid marble tables and  a statue of the Duke of Wellington, a great friend of the Buccleuch family. The Dining Hall and Servery are accessed through this hall. Also seen in this picture is the tartan stair, which leads to the first floor.

This is the Servery  where meals are served in the Palace. A professional chef prepares meals for WIS participants  on days when meals are provided. Some students may have serving as their house chore.

The Palace is equiped with high speed Internet in the computer lab. Students are free to use these computers for school and personal needs. Printers are also provided for students, but they must provide their own paper.

Next to the Computer Lab is the Library. The Library has many types of books ranging from reference to romance, fantasy to finance. Students also have many local and international publications available to them in this room. This room is a great place to study or  read.

Students  need a place to live and sleep. Bedrooms come in a range of sizes and  house between 2-5 students. Pictured above is a bedroom on the first floor. This room will house 5 students. Each student has a bed and  a dresser or wardrobe. There is a common desk area in each room.

There are bathrooms and showers located on first and second floors. There is one bathtub  in the Palace located on the ground floor. Bathrooms are cleaned twice a week by a professional cleaning crew.

Continuing on with the tour, we find the Ballroom located on the first floor. It is used for many gatherings, presentations and orientation. The room has high ceilings, beautiful windows, and the walls are covered with  priceless works of art. This room is great for studying and  is the only room  that receives wireless Internet.

Dalkeith Palace provides a safe haven during students' cultural immersion in Scotland. Students and faculty alike grow and learn together in the Palace and, most importantly, create memories of a lifetime.

The organizations allocation of resources and its processes for evaluation and planning demonstrate its capacity to fulfill its mission, improve the quality of its education, and respond to future challenges and opportunities.

Senate committee seeks enforcement of fines for 25-foot rule Students and staff who live in residential buildings at UW-River Falls are frustrated with people who are smoking too close to the buildings, causing residential assistants to look into enforcing more punishable rules.

Students pay for unapproved building The buildings considered necessary in the department of health and human performance (HHP) have been an issue at UW-River Falls since before 1992 when the first proposal was made for a new HHP building.

Hurry up, but do not Panic! Tickets are selling out fast to another new and upcoming band known as Panic! At the Disco. The name came from a song originally named Panic! and transgressed into what we now know as Panic! At The Disco. From Las Vegas and with newly found overnight stardom, Panic! At the Disco has hit everywhere from MTV, local radio stations, to Billboard Charts nationwide.

In conducting the current evaluation, the six members of the Team consulted with the chancellor, the provost and the vice chancellors, other officers reporting to the chancellor, deans, chairs, and professionals responsible for student life, athletics, advancement and administrative areas. Members of the faculty, staff and student body were consulted in both open and scheduled meetings, as well as individually and as members of key shared governance committees. The Team also consulted with two members of the Board of Regents, the Senior Vice President for Academic Affairs of the University of Wisconsin System, community leaders/supporters, and alumni. Overall, the Team found the UW-River Falls family to be proud of their University. People were open and forthright. The Team especially appreciated the friendly and helpful attitude encountered all across the campus.

Appropriately, there were sections devoted to "challenges" and "action plans" included in the key chapters of the Report. Findings from the University's self-analysis were broadly distributed to employees. Appropriate materials were collected in the documents room. In short, the Team found that the information it needed-was either accessible or readily available from the appropriate administrative office. Throughout the visit, the Team was pleased by the level of awareness that an evaluation for continued accreditation was underway.

The Self-Study Report accurately describes (pages 7-17) UW-River Falls' response to concerns and advice contained in the 1988 Team Report of a comprehensive evaluation. The current Team is pleased with the attention given to these issues over the intervening ten years. The Self-Study Report also describes (pages 17-19) the University's responses to concerns noted in the 1992 Report of a Focused Evaluation of the University's graduate programs. The 1992 Report identified four continuing concerns about graduate education: Lack of written criteria for acquiring or maintaining graduate faculty status; Lack of written criteria for expectations of faculty scholarship and linked to promotion, tenure, and salary merit decisions; Little evidence of successful implementation of long-range planning initiatives linked to graduate education; Excessive turnaround time in approving graduate student's programs of study. A Required Report, filed by March 30, 1994, addressed the four concerns and no further actions were required.

The Report articulates their case sufficiently and effectively. After evaluation of the Report and conducting the visit, the members of the Team were unanimous in their view that UW-River Falls does meet the five criteria.

What follows is a summarization of selected evidence, and observations, many evaluative and some critical, which are intended to reinforce good practice, affirm good performance, and/or stimulate further self-analysis and change.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls operates under three mission statements, all of which receive careful review and are approved by the University of Wisconsin -Board of Regents. These missions include one for the UW system, a second for the comprehensive institutions like UW-River Falls within the system, and finally the UW-River Falls Select Mission. The mission statements reflect a commitment to excellence in education and freedom of inquiry. All three mission statements are included in appropriate UW-River Falls publications.

Evidence suggests that UW-River Falls constituents fully understand the mission and have appropriate mechanisms in place to evaluate institutional goals. For example, the mission and accompanying goals served as the foundation of the Reach for the Future strategic planning process. The broad-based involvement of all stakeholders in this planning effort and the resulting strategic goals provide good evidence that UW-River Falls has an understanding of mission and purposes. The relationship of academic departments to the university mission is further articulated and strengthened as departments, through the Academic Planning and Outcomes Review (APOR) process, provide annual reports of activities in conjunction with departmental missions and goals.

While non-academic units have not participated as much in a comparable planning and outcomes review process, they have been engaged in the strategic planning process. A non-academic process similar to APOR is being developed. It promises to provide additional opportunities for systematic review of the goals. Nonetheless, non-academic units appear to have a clear understanding of institutional mission and the roles they play in support of that mission.

The University of Wisconsin system President and the Board of Regents select the chancellor of each member institution. The chancellor is delegated the authority to administer and operate the institution within Regent policies and guidelines.

The university is well administered and managed. Based on a review of resumes, the campus administration has appropriate experience and credentials for their positions. Based on interviews with University of Wisconsin system personnel, the campus administration is well respected. Based on the campus interviews and meetings, the campus administration is respected, and available and supportive of the faculty, staff and students to fulfill the mission and goals of the university.

Report) and the team's meetings on campus, revealed that the campus organization is appropriate and working. Two vice chancellors report to the chancellor. Units are appropriately assigned to each of the two vice chancellors. Individual units (athletics, development and alumni, and compliance) report to the chancellor.

The Provost's Deans Group meets weekly (and more frequently if needed) and is quick to seek inputs from campus stakeholders with regard to various academic and other campus and program-related issues, needs, and opportunities.

Programs are overseen and courses are taught by faculty with appropriate educational credentials. In 1997, 78% of all the faculty hold a doctoral degree. Significant progress has been made in the last ten years since only 65% of all faculty in 1988 held a doctoral degree.

Over the last ten years, there has been an effort to increase the number of the minority in the faculty ranks-women and faculty of color. The team recommends that the campus become more aggressive in seeking members of under-represented groups to enrich the academic community.

Out of the total number of students in the fall 1997, 404 were graduate students which is a decline from 574 in the fall 1988. The reduction in graduate students is a result of: planned reduction in the graduate program array; deliberate reductions in graduate class size; accrediting standards related to specific programs; and changes in the State of Wisconsin's Department of Public Instruction teacher retraining and re-certification standards.

Since the last comprehensive accreditation visit the University of Wisconsin system has had three system-wide enrollment management initiatives. Faced with increased student demand and a declining share of state budget appropriations, the Board of Regents approved a series of enrollment management plans. Begun in 1987 and ending in 1991, the first plan was designed to maintain quality academic programs and to limit student access consistent with available resources.

Since the last NCA visit, criteria for admission to the university have been increased. In 1988, the standard admission criterion was ranking in the upper 50% of the graduating class or having an ACT composite score of 18 or above.

The current admission standard required high school graduates to rank in the upper 40% of their high school graduating class or have an ACT composite score of 22 or higher. In the fall of 1997, the profile of entering students included an average ACT score of 22.7 and an average high school rank of 71st percentile.

Over the past ten years, non-resident students made up approximately 45% of the student enrollment. Due to the proximity to Minnesota, particularly the Minneapolis-St. Paul metropolitan area, almost all of the non-resident students are from Minnesota. Proximity, comprehensive programs, tuition reciprocity, and the small campus/small town characteristics are the primary reasons for attendance by students from Minnesota. Recent legislation enacted in both Wisconsin and Minnesota ensures the continuation of interstate reciprocity well into the future.

The university provides tutoring services, writing and English laboratories, and computer laboratories. The faculty and staff at University of Wisconsin-River Falls are dedicated to providing services for their students to succeed.

The main campus consists of 216 acres. In addition to the main campus the institution operates two lab farms-one consisting of 206 acres which borders the main campus, and a second consisting of 292 acres. Facilities used to support the mission of the University include 31 major buildings and over 50 small buildings constituting over 1.6 million square feet of space. The grounds and buildings are attractive and well maintained.

Over the past ten years, the campus has spent over $16 million on major renovation and updates. Of particular note is the remodeling of the original university building and the library remodeling. The library is well designed and functional.

The university has acquired computers and software in order to electronically access the  materials in the library collection. During the visit, the computer terminals were constantly in use. Also included in the library basement are dedicated and open computer laboratories for student use.

Currently under renovation is the art department. Ground breaking will be held in the next few weeks for the new $6.5 million teacher education center. The university has created a technological infrastructure across the campus enabling students, faculty, and staff to access the electronic networks and the world wide web. A fiber optic backbone linking all buildings on campus has been installed.

The university has completed the interior wiring to connect every office, classroom and laboratory in the academic buildings to the fiber optic backbone. Non-academic buildings such as resident halls have limited access to the network, full rewiring of these buildings is in the planning stages.

To ensure that faculty and staff have access to up-to-date computer technology, the university has established a computer replacement fund that provides for the upgrading of all faculty and staff computers on a five-year rotation. Currently, each faculty and staff member has access to a computer that is not over five years old.

To support the teaching effort, several classrooms are equipped with the latest in technology. These rooms are almost scheduled to capacity. The university plans to have more rooms "on line" by the fall of 1998. Faculty are excited about the technology in the classroom and are using the technology more each day.

The faculty, staff, and students generally feel they are in a safe and healthy environment. In talking to the students, they did feel there is a need for more "blue" phones and there were a few "black" spots on the campus that could be solved with some lighting. University personnel continue to work with the students to solve these problems.

The University of Wisconsin system prepares a biennial budget request with input from each institution in the system. The system budget included both continuing costs and new initiatives from each campus and the system office.

In the general fund, the campus budget allocated more than 90% of the funds to faculty and staff compensation, leaving a small portion for supplies and expenses, travel, and equipment. The university, through internal reallocations, is beginning to increase the portion assigned to non-personnel expenditures.

The goal is to have 12% of the general fund allocated to supplies and expenses, travel, and equipment. Based on the visit, personnel on campus understand the budget environment. The campus has limited but well-managed resources.

The student constituency is represented through the Student Senate. Following a reorganization of Student Affairs, the Student Association created three advisory boards and several subcommittees to mirror the newer Student Affairs structure.

While Student reactions to the newer structure are mixed and creative tension exists as appropriate roles are defined over time, the advisory boards have expanded the opportunities for student involvement. Students also participate on university committees, and student leaders appear to have effective relationships with university administrators.

The 1998 Self-Study Report (p. 31) states "the concept of shared governance is a long-respected tradition at UW-River Falls." However, the development and implementation of the Reach for the Future, the Long Range/Strategic Plan, may have created an imbalance in decision making among the governance groups: the Faculty Senate, the Academic Staff Council, and the Student Senate. The planning process has possibly resulted in top-down management excluding departmental faculty and students in the eyes of some campus constituents. Some members of the Faculty Senate view their participation as "ceremonial" and feel their role has been redefined as obstructing new initiatives. The recent reallocation of funds along with the reconfiguration of departments within or between Colleges appears to some to have exacerbated a division between the Faculty Senate and the Academic Staff Council.

Many other faculty express appreciation for increased funding for computing technology and professional development because of the reallocation of funds, but have a sense of "bum out" because of the intensive committee work needed to prepare Reach for the Future. And some have a sense that the planning process and the new plan reflect a diminished input from stakeholders.

Through the traditional faculty-student relationship, the faculty is sensitive to the needs of students and share concerns regarding issues of diversity, frequency of course offerings, advising needs, and increased class sizes. The faculty must also be encouraged to model principles upholding human rights to the University community. Some faculty, both males and females, label reassignments, or other discriminating decision-making within departments, as "abusive". This kind of climate requires sensitive, proactive leadership and communication from the highest levels of administration.

Mann Valley Laboratory Farm during the 1999-2001 biennium. Animal and associated crop production enterprises provide vital resources for University teaching extension and research. The College administers a highly successful intemship program and participates actively in international programs.

Several new majors and courses have been added since the 1988 NCA review. New majors include Biotechnology and Marketing Communications, Horticulture, and Land Use Planning. Timely, new courses have been added in food and process engineering, industrial fermentations, integrated pest management, plant tissue culture, hydrogeology, landscape construction, and orientation to college, and others.

Academic program assessment plans have been finalized for each of the 14 majors offered in the CAFES. Each program has a faculty coordinator who provides oversight and responsibility for implementation of academic program assessment as well as for reporting results of the evaluations.

Each academic assessment plan includes the mission statement, purpose of the assessment, the assessment plan, and a review of the results. The assessment plan for the Broad Area Agriculture major is typical of most college plans.

It is accomplished by means of testing for incremental learning in the six areas represented by core courses in the major plus environmental science. Beginning in 1998, all students are being tested in these areas during their first year and again during their final year of college utilizing a bank of examination questions developed by faculty. The Department of Agricultural Economics tested more than 500 students in 1996 and 1997.

The College has assembled an outstanding academic faculty and support staff who recognize the value and importance of providing a high level of excellence in the undergraduate experience. Approximately one-half of the faculty have international program and travel experiences that enrich their teaching. Additionally, about one-half of the faculty participate in applied research projects through a state cooperative research program and through private grants from companies and various governmental agencies.

Enrollment increased each year of the 1990s placing the CAFES enrollment-wise among the top 20 colleges of agriculture nationally. Approximately 50 percent of the College freshmen graduate in six years (heavy non-academic work loads, studies abroad, intemships, and other reasons delay graduation for many students).

Employers throughout the Midwest actively recruit CAFES graduates. More than one-half of Wisconsin's high school agriculture teachers are UW-River Falls graduates, as are nearly one-half of the loan officers with Farm Credit Services and the Farmers Home Administration. In the public service arena, the CAFES offers a series of workshops and institutes on an "as requested/needed" basis throughout the year. The CAFES is one of a five-institution consortium in Wisconsin that has a state-funded cooperative research program for faculty which coordinates cooperative extension appointments and works cooperatively on Distance Education course offerings to each of the five universities. The consortium recently completed a USDA Strengthening Grant that provided financial support for courses being taught by faculty on each campus to sister institutions of Wisconsin.

Self-Study Report in terms of faculty workload targets, departmental merit review plans, college goals and challenges, campus-wide Review and Reallocation process, curricular adjustments driven by the final Reach for the Future document, the campus-wide Annual Planning and Outcomes Review process, the number of degrees granted, and the unit organizational chart. Relatively little evidence in available documents was presented regarding tangible evidence of the use of data collection and analysis, as well as curricular or other changes prompted by attention to results of assessment processes. However, assessment plans have been established for each major.

Interviews with administration, faculty, and students revealed awareness of challenges faced by the college that are common to other institutions with liberal arts programs. The college has been successful in re-establishing its niche on campus and in the broader community by creating popular new majors, eliminating ones with low enrollment, and marketing its strengths as evidenced by successful program reviews, student success after graduation, greater use of student intemships, and an increased profile of visibility overall.

Faculty in the college were supportive of planning and reallocation efforts effected by the administration as long as departmental costs remained within tolerances. Pride in teaching, students, the role of the liberal arts, and the rewards offered by a traditional liberal arts education were likewise expressed.

Similar to conversations with other instructors on campus, college faculty revealed their sense of dissatisfaction with the amount of committee work which does not in turn become synthesized by the institution's administration and then widely communicated to the campus. Faculty expressed their desire for the return of consistent two-way communication as a result of working in tandem with the administration and for agreed upon, specified purposes.

General education is described in the 1998 Self-Study Report as "prescribed yet flexible." The program's objectives and areas of emphasis are laudable, but the assessment of these objectives runs the risk of being more difficult due to the abundance of course options within those areas. It perhaps is incumbent upon the institution to revisit its interpretation of the program's balance of prescription and flexibility.

By extension, assessment of student academic achievement in general education is considered multifaceted (see the Academic Policy and Programming Report on the Assessment of General Education). Yet assessment of general education remains at the same time subject to an inconsistently applied "shotgun approach" of too many measures too few times. This fact, as also the necessity of making solid general education objectives "more assessable," is recognized by the Assessment committee and members of the Academic Policy and Program committee.

Students expressed satisfaction with the quality of learning in their general education studies but noted the high reliance upon, and turnover of, instructional academic staff in the program. Students believed greater consistency of staffing would better reinforce the objectives of general education at the university.

The new Teacher Education Building currently under construction for the College of Education and Graduate Studies reflects the significant focus on this Unit since the 1988 NCA re-accreditation visit, and complements the Reach for the Future planning initiative.

Resources provided for this state-of-the-art facility demonstrate the major commitment of the University to the teacher education programs. Although the results of the March, 1998 visit by the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education were not available to the team, the history and evidence documented indicates high standards of professional education, including integration of technology into teaching and learning. The professional education program was one of eleven "exemplary teacher education programs" selected by the National Education Association's Center for Innovationthe only program in the Midwest cited, and one of only three cited nationally for all its professional education programs. Other programs within the College have achieved accreditation by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction or respective learned societies, as appropriate.

Efforts at recruiting and retaining diverse students continue to be an acknowledged challenge within the University. One promising initiative is the collaboration with the St. Paul, Minnesota School District to attract and support public school students with an interest in teaching through the "Teachers of Color" program. The addition of a full time academic advisor for the College of Education and Graduate Studies complements this effort.

The faculty carry appropriate workloads, and are provided support for professional development through the Reach for the Future allocations. The evident diversity of faculty and administration within the College is commendable. There is strong, diverse leadership administering the programs within this College. One issue is how will the retirement of the current dean, the only female in administration at this level or above, affect University diversity as a whole.

Significant strengthening of the School of Graduate and Professional Studies, in response to the 1988 Team Report and the 1992 Report of a focused visit, has been achieved by increased emphasis on scholarly activity of full graduate faculty, by more thorough assessment of undergraduate-graduate "slash" courses, as well as by monitoring of student progress by the assistant dean for graduate studies. While enrollment patterns appear to be uneven, in part because of recent restructuring of academic departments, the major reorganization of degrees and programs currently supports increased enrollment from within the region. Graduate faculty teaching loads, a concern of the 1988 Team Report, have been resolved by bringing all faculty workloads in line with peer comprehensive institutions in the UW System.

Education program within the College of Education and Graduate Studies has in place a continuum of procedures from entry to exit. A more stringent appeal process for entry into Teacher Education supports Wisconsin's standard on the PPST, the highest passing score in the nation. Reflective portfolios are used to evaluate the teacher candidates' competence, and criteria and benchmarks are being developed to coincide with INTASC Standards for both instruction and field experiences. The faculty participate in the University's "Systematic Performance Appraisal Plan", which provides quantitative summaries for teaching, advising, scholarship and service supporting student achievement.

At the time of the last comprehensive visit, the team identified concerns regarding student services programs. The concerns focused on the decentralization of the programs and the apparent isolation of the Dean of Students and Admissions Office from that of the Provost/Vice Chancellor. Within the last three years this concern appears to have been addressed effectively. The Dean of Students now reports to the Provost/Vice Chancellor and both offices are located in the same building.

This tension will take time to subside. It is recommended that attention be given to resolving some of this tension in order to allow the new structure to fully serve the institution and reach a maximum level of effectiveness.

Given the nature of the student population, care needs to be taken to provide services that support the various student groups. Some individuals, including students, expressed concern that certain segments of the student population, e.g., non-traditional students, were not served as well as were other students.

It was also reported that while student services-were traditionally very good and staff friendly, some unevenness of service existed in a few units. Some services were also scheduled predominantly during hours which would limit access to evening or weekend students.

As educational costs continue to rise and students seek ways to pay expenses, the financial support from the university becomes increasingly important to students. As such, it comes under increasing scrutiny and can be a key factor in student satisfaction with the university. Several students expressed strong concern about some of the service that had been provided by the financial aid unit, noting that it was unusual for the student services. The Team urges the university to give attention to student perceptions of services and appropriate training for "front-line" workers.

UW-River Falls enjoys a residence hall system that provides a sense of community for students. Students have a variety of room options, and the lay-out of some of the halls along a mall area adds to the residential atmosphere. The residence halls appear to be well maintained. They provide a comfortable atmosphere for residents and are conducive to the learning environment.

Students enjoy a variety of dining options in different locations. Food services areas are well-maintained and are conveniently located for students. The services also include low-cost options for students.

While a bookstore is available on campus through an external vendor, its inventory includes primarily gift items and a few text materials. The university's Textbook Service is used as a low-cost method of providing texts to students. For a low fee, students are able to rent textbooks for the semester with an option to buy the texts later in the semester.

Efforts toward international education, programming, and student services are currently located in a number of offices at the university. This situation is not greatly different than that noted in the 1988 Team Report. Ten years ago, the Team ofevaluators expressed concerns including under-staffing in international programs, declining numbers of minority and/or international students on campus, and a lack of coordination and central leadership for all programming. Some notable improvements have been made in the numbers of human and fiscal resources to deliver better opportunities and services for students leaving and coming to campus, but the numbers of international students is not large.

At the time of the 1988 comprehensive evaluation, the university's graduate dean was the summer school director. Presently, the summer school coordinator is a special assistant to the chancellor whose primary responsibilities are in summer bulletin preparation, distribution, general marketing, and contract preparation. Responsibilities for budgeting, staffing, and course selection/rotation lie with the faculty and deans of the colleges. This method of decentralization is satisfactory for the campus and is an expected function of campus history and climate.

Summer sessions appear not to generate much high-profile emphasis. A review of head-counts, student FTEs and student credit hour patterns over the last ten years corroborates that impression. Indeed, by these measures, numbers from the recent past are clearly among the lowest of the decade. At a university with this mission and of this size and immediate metropolitan population, opportunities for growth and positive fiscal impact are present and probably should be a greater expectation.

Continuing education at the university has been, and continues to be, an area of emphasis and generally receives accordant staffing, resources, and efforts across the campus and beyond. Credit and noncredit bearing extended degree programs, faculty cooperative extension appointments with the University of Wisconsin - Extension, and shared courses at the Pigeon Lake Field Station have been in place for decades. These efforts are viewed within and without as a necessity, and a strength, of the university.

Organizationally, however, the institution is wrestling with the degree of centralization needed to perform effectively in these areas. It no longer has a director of the Rural Development Institute, is searching for a new coordinator of Outreach, and will shortly be appointing a director of the School of Business and Economics (formerly departments within the College of Arts and Sciences). These deliberations are reflected in the Reach for the Future document (goals VII, VIII, and most notably, X), and are subject to further consideration regarding the specifics of implementation.

Based upon the Reach for the Future Progress Report, the university has made strides in clarifying the role of continuing education on and off campus and is encouraged to bring closure to its specific organizational decisions.

The purpose of the Department of Intercollegiate Athletics is fourfold: (1) to provide a broad-based intercollegiate athletic program designed to encourage participation; (2) to perform proficiently in a highly visible area; (3) to promote the educational development of the participating student-athletes; and (4) to bring students, faculty, staff, and alumni together in building a sense of community.

In 1988, the WIAC initiated a comprehensive study of gender equity and compliance with Title IX requirements among all member athletic departments. The study was completed in 1993. Utilizing student, faculty, and staff input, the UW-River Falls critically examined the climate for women in athletics and presented their findings to the Chancellor and Athletic Committee.

Based on findings from this self-study and on-going annual reports, the University has made commendable progress in the following areas: increasing sports participation opportunities for women, increasing FTEs for coaches of women's sports, increasing salaries for assistant coaches of women's sports, upgrading game programs for women's sports, and increasing training room assistance for female student-athletes.

The faculty and administration are committed to the mission and goals of the university, knowing that attention to these matters is an ongoing organization activity that is never fully completed. The recent accelerated planning surrounding the Reach for the Future process, while attempting to reallocate resources and simultaneously increase educational effectiveness, demands more inclusive communication among the various University constituencies. Institutional survival may be predicated on fiscal strength. Yet an essential issue has developed with respect to continued institutional achievement of agreed-upon purposes. This can be addressed by more effective methods of  communication in bringing all stakeholders into the change process currently underway.

Not only is UW-River Falls redesigning programs to meet emerging needs, but it also is reallocating resources to maintain strengths and correct weaknesses and to meet changing educational needs. Recently admitted students enter the university with increasing levels of academic achievement and ability. Significant changes are improving many academic programs within the University, especially the innovations available for faculty through enhanced instructional technology and information resources, along with increased professional development opportunities.

While the need for assessment has been cited in prior NCA reports, not all departments in the University have fully incorporated the value of assessment as a philosophy supporting planning. The concern at this point is to link the considerable efforts at self-evaluation and planning which have engaged the campus community for the past several years with a more dynamic approach to assessment. How the Reach for the Future initiative will improve educational outcomes has yet to produce clear documentation. Significant growth in campus diversity has yet to be attained.

A reflective analysis of goals met and restructuring completed should be balanced with a more sensitive appraisal of the impact of these changes on internal and external perceptions of faculty, students, and administrators. There is a consensus among all constituencies that the UW-River Falls is an exceptionally good institution, and that these constituencies wish to share in resolving issues surrounding the Reach for the Future implementation.

UW-River Falls has engaged in a significant strategic planning process. Reach for the Future. This process has involved participants from all constituencies, reflecting a commitment to consultative planning. The resulting goals support the overall institutional goals. The planning process includes an annual systematic evaluation of both progress and the goals themselves. The Team commends the university for this significant effort which can serve as a model for other institutions as well as additional UW-River Falls programs.

With the number of people who have become invested in the plan through their efforts and their loyalty to the university, UW-River Falls will need to direct attention to recognizing and maintaining the personal commitments that are being made. The intensive effort that went into this plan and the speed with which the plan progressed have set a high level of expectation among participants regarding outcomes.

The Office of Institutional Research was re-created a few years ago and reflects a commitment to provide support for strategic planning and academic reporting needs. Capable leadership exists in this office to provide planning expertise for both academic and non-academic units.

The Dean discusses these goals and objectives with college leaders during the annual performance evaluation and planning process. This process results in the establishment of an updated set of College goals that focus on program initiatives, staffing, enrollment targets, facility updating, and other plans directed at specific programs. The written objectives are shared with faculty and staff of the College and forwarded to the Provost/Vice Chancellor and Chancellor for review.

The Long-Range Planning Committee for Athletic Facilities has worked closely with the Department of Health and Human Performance, with the Hunt/Knowles staff, and with the Office of the Campus Planning to address present and future needs.

The unit faces at least two major challenges. The first is to maintain this pattern while the university works to increase enrollments. The second is to maintain the level of in-state students given the legislative interest in educating the citizens of Wisconsin. The latter challenge may be particularly difficult as a significant portion of the service area includes the Minneapolis/St. Paul, Minnesota metropolitan area, resulting in a large number of out-of-state students.

The admissions office appears to enjoy capable leadership and to have a good working relationship with other administrative offices. The unit's involvement in the strategic planning process helps to assure that admissions and marketing priorities are consistent with other institutional priorities.

To the institution's credit, current and future efforts toward international education are reflected in its select mission statement (letters g, h, and i), in the faculty and student handbooks, in the fairly large number of committees and subcommittees on campus, in the colleagues themselves (international program coordinators), and in the Reach for the Future document (goal VIII). The challenge for the institution, similar to that of diversity issues discussed under Criterion V, is to better match philosophy and intent with greater success in efforts applied.

The integrity of the university is expressed generally in its commitment to shared ethical values, alignment of practice with policy, expectations for academic honesty, full disclosure of various corporate relationships, and operation without conflict of interest. Specific practices embedded in these commitments are satisfactory overall. Compliance with federal law, e.g. Campus Security Act, is also satisfactory.

The university has demonstrated its present and future intent to operate with integrity in its select mission statement (letters g, h, and i), in its statement of values, and in its Reach for the Future document (goal IV). The university's 1998 Self-Study Report addressed the criterion by discussion of academic freedom, shared governance, personnel rights and policies, student rights, equity and diversity, public information, relationships with external groups, intercollegiate athletics, grants administration and research ethics, and general federal compliance.

Issues of shared governance, personnel rights and policies, and equity and diversity, however, remain important for the institution to monitor further, and in some cases, improve upon. Shared governance, a traditional strength of the institution is perceived by some faculty and students to have eroded. Statements similar to the quote "democracy has become oligarchy" were offered with some frequency. The challenge for the university remains for all voices to be solicited, heard, and communicated with consistently.

For some, a perception exists that a fact/value split is evident on campus between the written procedures of rights, policies, grievances, and appeals and their legal and ethical execution. Although perhaps partly a function of communication both ways, the administration is urged to be sensitive and consistent when acting upon formal personnel policies.

A great concern to the university should be its lack of progress in enriching its campus climate with the attraction and retention of more people of color in the faculty ranks and student body as well as healthier representation of women administrators in mid- and upper-level management. Greater attention in terms of personnel an-d fiscal resources, to the intents of such documents as Affirmative Action Plans and Design for Diversity Reports, particularly given the institution's geographical location near a major metropolitan area, should bring about greater success. The resources of the Office of Equity and Compliance, the Academic Success Center, the faculty Affirmative Action and Multicultural Advisory committees, and the student Diversity Awareness committee should also be brought to bear separately, collectively, and actively.

The Chancellor, Director of Athletics, and the Associate Athletic Director work closely with two faculty athletic representatives to maintain strict compliance and integrity in Intercollegiate Athletics. The faculty Senate Athletic Committee and the Student Athlete Advisory Committee provide oversight and closely monitor the welfare and enhancement of the athletic program and the student-athlete.

"Strengths" are intended to commend the University and to encourage continued good practice in the future. "Challenges" are intended to indicate those areas that need attention immediately and in the next several years.

The goal to achieve greater diversity is based on forward-looking, proactive efforts to enrich and strengthen the campus and its sense of community. Bringing a variety of views and experience to the table enriches the educational experience in many classes and student life, better informs decision-making and governance, and models empowerment to all of your students and to all citizens in your service region. During the visit the Team has heard a firm commitment to diversity from leadership of the Board, the System, and campus constituencies including students.

Members of the NCA Team serve as both evaluators and consultants. In their capacity as consultants, the Team offers below observations and suggestions that are advisory to UW-River Falls; that is, making a change or improvement based on the listed suggestions is not directly related to the University's accreditation.

The Team's recommendations for action, including its recommendation to continue the accreditation of University of Wisconsin-River Falls, are shown on the attached Worksheet for the statement of Affiliation Status. During the Team's visit, the Chancellor requested that the Stipulation on Affiliation Status be removed.

Today's students entering college often have a history of service due in part to the ever increasing number of high schools adopting community service requirements. While the University of Wisconsin-River Falls does not have a service or service-learning requirement, some departments implicitly and explicitly do.  UWRF has a rich history of connections to our local, state, national and international communities, predominantly located in co-curricular activites. As a land grant institution, UWRF has a myriad of projects connecting the University to the community through UW, and the state is home to the Wisconsin Idea.

Here youll  read of major national conferences dealing with civic engagement. The  information provided is what is located on their web sites. Unfortunately,  there are some conferences that have not listed their registration fees and  other important information.

This conference and the Web-based  conversation leading up to it will provide a space where academic and community  colleagues can explore the impact community engagement can have on students  sense of what to do with their lives, and how they might encourage reflection  on where their gifts and desires meet the worlds needs. Along with speakers  and paper presentations, the conference will provide ample opportunity for  workshops and informal conversation.

The Ignatian Center  has supported community-based learning both locally and internationally for  more than 20 years. In 2002, with a grant from Lilly Endowment Inc., the Ignatian Center launched the DISCOVER project to encourage  reflection on vocation across the campus. We have found that opportunities in  the community provide students with rich experiences for reflecting on their  place in the world and what the future may hold for them. We welcome the  opportunity to bring together scholars and practitioners to explore these  questions more deeply.

Civic engagement takes place in  many forms. Whether its designing environmentally friendly buildings,  expressing our opinions on blogs, or creating safe climates in the classroom,  we make a difference in our respective communities at physical, virtual, and  social-psychological levels.

This conference invites you to  explore the myriad spaces where students, faculty, alumni, staff and local  residents can come together to exchange ideas, solve problems, and improve the  physical and intellectual environments on college campuses.

Conference participants will include learners and educators  from diverse constituencies: faculty, undergraduate, and graduate students;  government, community agency and organization partners; student  development and leadership professionals; curriculum specialists;  service-learning directors, funding agency representatives; and institutional  administrators, among others.

Universities are increasingly  embracing the notion of service-learning as a model to integrate scholarly work  and community engagement. Service-learning paradigms have inspired the global  involvement of students and faculty with diverse communities. These connections  must continue to be explored.

The symposium will be held at the  University of Indianapolis,  Indianapolis, Indiana, USA,  and surrounding community partnership sites. This second joint international  symposium aims to bring international teachers, researchers, practitioners, and  community leaders to present their research, teaching, and community service  experiences and to explore paradigms for service-learning in the 21st century.

This  conference is designed to help educators, community service agencies  and students develop high-quality service-learning programs.  Service-learning is meant to be an educational method that combines  elements of experiential education with community service. Youth apply  academic skills to solving real world problems. Leave this conference  armed with the tools necessary to support service-learning initiatives  using new ideas, resources and shared best practices.

The National Gathering is not traditional academic conference, instead it is   a forum where dedicated service-learning practitioners, including community   partners, students, faculty, and service-learning professionals come together to   deepen their practice and renew their passion through in-depth discussions with   other collaborative educators concerned with the intersection of campus and   community. This national conference is an opportunity to develop and implement   creative strategies for teaching, learning, and social justice.

Combining learning circles with concrete workshops on critical issues in   service-learning, CSU Monterey Bay is pleased to   introduce the service-learning field to our campus and the diverse communities   of Monterey County. The National Gathering will feature interactive,   learner-centered workshops and community explorations aimed to inspire   reflection and strengthen our commitments to community engagement.The National   Gathering is a people focused conduit through which new networks of educators   share stories and strengthen each others work.

This course is a comprehensive series of twelve classes in small business fundamentals and business plan development designed to help entrepreneurs develop business skills. Whether you have been in business for years and need some solid planning tools or are just beginning a business, this training will help you.

The Wisconsin Department of Commerce is supporting this series through an Entrepreneurial Training Grant Program. To take advantage of the Commerce grant reimbursement, participants must apply through the SBDC prior to starting the coursework. Applications must be completed at least two weeks prior to the first class session. The goal is for you to complete a business plan for your business start-up or expansion.

Pierce, Polk and St. Croix Counties at specific locations offering specialized assistance to small business managers as well as those interested in starting new businesses. To register for one of our upcoming Business Advising Sessions in a county that's convenient for you, please contact the Small Business Development Center at 715-425-0620 to reserve an appointment time.

This program is divided into two parts. In the first session, you will learn how to set up the software and start using QuickbooksTMand its basic features.  By the end of the first session, you'll know how to set up QuickbooksTMand start using it in your business.

You'll have a week to start using what you learned in the first session before you come back for the second part.  The second session will continue with the basics, including lists, accounts receivable, payroll and reports.

Please stay tuned for an upcoming three-part human resource seminar to assist with your small business needs. If you have immediate needs related to your business, please contact the Small Business Development Center at 715-425-0620 with questions.

Whether you are a seasoned business veteran or just starting out, this seminar will change the way you look at money in your business. The Ellsworth Area Chamber of Commerce introduces its first seminar, highlighting financial techniques that will positively impact your business. Based on improved and simplified financial techniques, this three-hour, hands-on, high-enery seminar is designed to remove the mystery and confusion surrounding financial statements and gives you the techniques to maximize cash within your business. It is a "maximizing cash" class -- NOT an accounting class. This class will empower you to use financial statements to set benchmarks and make decisions, which will have an immediate impact on your business.

The lifetime membership dues for new initiates is $43.00. This includes a one year subscription to the society journal Sociological Inquiry and a certificate. An honor cord to be worn at graduation requires an additional $7.00.

As a means of recognizing academic achievement and social commitment, the sociology faculty will present an "Outstanding Sociology Student Award" each year to a sociology major. The criteria for the award include academic excellence as well as community and/or university service. The sociology faculty will determine who will receive the award.

Demonstrates a commitment to the values and purposes of the sociology profession through the presentation of papers, coordination of conference sessions, attendance at conference sessions and workshops, and/or publication in professional journals and newsletters.

The Department sponsors the Criminal Justice Association . This organization was created to give UWRF students opportunities to learn about the field of Criminal Justice. Meetings vary from semester to semester depending on student schedules. Currently, meetings are being held the first Tuesday of each month in the President's Room of the Student Center at 4:00pm. Each month, speakers are invited to share information about their careers and internship possibilities. The organization also plans field trips to various facilities within the criminal justice field. There are no dues required and membership is open to any interested student regardless of major.

River Falls . The handbook is required for Sociology majors as part of the Sociological Inquiry class and for all transfer majors. We expect that you will read the handbook carefully and continually refer to it to answer questions you might have. Additional information may be found in the university catalog. Please feel free to discuss additional questions or concerns with your faculty advisor or the chair of the department.

Almost everything we do, including our own private reflections and fantasies, is done either directly or indirectly, through and with others--groups. The kinds of groups we belong to help shape the person we become. Sociology is the systematic study of these groups we create, the social arrangements that exist within a society. Sociology then studies the structure of populations (its age, sex, size, and racial composition for example), the spatial structure of communities (the courthouse surrounded by shops, the financial district, theatre district, etc.), the temporal structures (the ebb and flow of workers, etc.), the institutional structures (churches, schools, families, etc.) as well as the behavior of individuals as they both shape and are influenced by society and its social arrangements.

Professional orientation : A professional orientation is for those seeking a sociology major as preparation for attending professional graduate schools in such fields as law, medicine, architecture, business, clergy, or public administration.

Graduate Sociology Orientation : The graduate sociology orientation is for students planning to pursue graduate study in sociology as preparation for a career in teaching, pure or applied research, or clinical practice in sociology.

Immediate Career Orientation : This orientation is for those expecting to seek employment immediately upon graduation. Several career paths are available: criminal justice with jobs in probation and parole; police and corrections; FBI; private investigations; IRS; Security, etc. International/cross cultural with jobs in Peace Corps; International Relations/Foreign Affairs; International Assistance Organizations/International Business, etc. Sociological practice/human services with jobs in vocational counseling; rehabilitation; recreation; health services; etc. Business/industry with jobs in management; accounting, finance, and investment; personnel; marketing, etc. Social action/social change with jobs in community organization; religious work; political advocacy, etc.

A student's orientation should guide their choice of electives in the major and the choice of a minor field, as well as consideration of an internship. These three orientations are further elaborated in Chapter V - Career Orientations, and can be easily conceptualized in the form of a diagram.

Sociology offers us a different way of thinking which better enables us to solve our dilemmas, difficulties or problems instead of watching them continue to get worse. It is a shift in thinking that is possible because the domain of sociology is the study of why people relate to one another as they do. It involves the study of our rules for living together. It studies how these rules are created, how they are organized, how they are perpetuated, how they are broken, how they change and the meaning we give to them. Because sociology offers us this special approach to the rules of social life, to the reasons for relating to each other as we do, it is indeed an "idea whose time has come" and very much worth studying.

For those majoring in sociology, sociology will provide five important benefits. First, we learn more about ourselves and our motivations. Second, it helps us learn how other people affect us, whether it is a parent, friend, spouse, child, or corporation. Third, it helps us understand our culture and how to cope with an often difficult society. Fourth, it helps us become multicultural and global in our understanding and our own relationships. Fifth, it can help us learn how to get through each day successfully by developing a socio-logical imagination which allows us to see the forces affecting us, understand them, and deal with them.

Criminal justice is one of the fastest growing segments of the U.S. economy. It employs people to investigate, arrest, prosecute, defend, counsel, monitor and otherwise control persons suspected, accused or convicted of criminal behavior. Criminal justice is the way society manages deviance, maintains order and keeps society safe. It also insures domestic tranquility and protects individual rights.

Criminal justice professionals are found at all levels of society: international, federal, state, county and local. They are attorneys, judges, police officers, park rangers, corrections officers, security/program/administrative personnel, jailers, probation and parole officers, crime prevention specialists, advocates and treatment providers. They work on the streets, in offices and courtrooms, on hospital wards and in treatment centers, in prisons, jails, and juvenile detention facilities, at work camps and recreational programs, in schools, in retail settings. Virtually anywhere that there are people there are also criminal justice professionals involved in prevention and protection.

The mission of the Criminal Justice Program is to prepare people for productive and exciting careers in criminal justice. Students in this program learn to outline the change in thinking about crime and delinquency, identify major shifts in criminal justice knowledge, and relate that knowledge to social control strategies. They learn to describe the typical components of the criminal justice process in the United States and explain the interactions among them. Students are guided as they evaluate theories of deviance and apply them to discussions about trends and risk factors for crime and delinquency. They assess the effectiveness of intervention strategies (past and present), begin to generate innovative solutions to criminal justice problems, and learn how to impact the future of crime prevention and criminal apprehension. Students are also able to apply their knowledge through a variety of internship possibilities including the law enforcement certification internship.

The Criminal Justice Minor has broad scope and appeal to attract students with diverse interests in criminal justice and other human service professions. It balances theoretical knowledge, including current research, with applied aspects of criminal law, law enforcement, corrections, community-based systems, administration and policy. The program attracts students from sociology, psychology, social work, parks and recreation, political science, history and education.

Anthropology is the study of human variation. Classic anthropology focuses on cultural diversity, the interpretation of cultural remains (archaeology), and human evolution. Current interests in anthropology are more in applied fields and include salvage archaeology, forensic science and criminology, health care and medicine, civil and native rights advocacy, business management, and public administration.

Most anthropologists work outside academia. For example, an archaeologist may examine a construction site for historical material before a building is constructed. A forensic anthropologist may work closely with law enforcement agencies investigating homicides. A biological anthropologist may assist minority women in maternal and child health care programs. A cultural anthropologist may work with African villagers to structure culturally appropriate social and economic development.

The individual trained in anthropology is skilled at working in multi-cultural settings and in organizations where diverse interest groups compete for resources. The student of anthropology learns how to work constructively with varied beliefs and behaviors.

The anthropology minor is structured to provide a solid understanding of the relationship between culture and behavior. Students will learn about many cultural traditions: some ancient, some modern. Humans are studied as both social and biological actors. Cultural traditions are shown to define the conditions of life: how people form partnerships, bear children, nourish them, instruct them, protect them from harm, reward them. Culture is renewed with each generation. The state of health of a culture and its people are interconnected.

Why not? The minor increases the student's awareness of what it means to be human: the range of humanity is revealed. We live in a society, in a world, which is multi-ethnic, multi-racial, multi-cultural. A student who is skilled at understanding the causes and consequences of human differences will be more successful at living and working in this world. Currently, anthropology minors are majoring in biology, education, English, geography, geology, history, music, plant science, psychology and sociology.

Education majors. All Sociology majors are required to take 18 credits of core courses designed to provide a beginning foundation followed by a methods and practice sequence and culminating in an integrative capstone seminar course.

In addition to the 18 credits of required courses, students must take 21 credits of electives within the major chosen in consultation with their advisor. Electives should be chosen based upon a student's preparatory orientation, chosen career path or another rationale. Within the 20 elective credits, at least five courses must be 300-400 level courses (excluding Soc.

Courses within the sociology curriculum are sequenced based on content, expected mastery of skills, and levels of intellectual development. Thus, courses at the 300 level expect that the student has attained a certain level of skill and intellectual development which exceeds that expected in courses at the 200 level. Likewise, courses at the 400 level have expectations exceeding those of courses at the 300 level. Students should expect that the amount and kind of work expected of them will increase in accordance with these expectations so that a 400 level course will consist of a more difficult work load than a 300 level course. For a list of course descriptions go to the online catalog.

Business. Consultation with the student's advisor is very important to assist the student in selecting appropriate courses from within and outside the department, as well as a minor which will enhance one's pursuit of graduate sociology education.

Master's degrees usually involve 2-3 years of advanced course work including a thesis (a major research paper). Doctorate degrees usually involve 3-5 additional years of advanced work plus the writing of a dissertation-- an original piece of research.

With a master's degree in sociology, one is qualified to teach on the community college level, obtain upper level government employment, advance to major supervisory level positions, join a research organization, work in urban planning projects, or do public health work. A number of master's programs are now available in applied sociology. The programs are designed to qualify people for such work as family counseling, policy research, planning, political advocacy, conflict mediation & arbitration, public opinion polling, program evaluation, environmental impact studies, & organizational development & design. Around 70% of sociology Ph.D.'s are affiliated with colleges or universities. Most of those are teaching sociology & doing research, while a few are in academic administration, full-time research, or teaching in other areas. Of the remaining 30%, most are in federal service, secondary school teaching, business & industry, health care systems, international organizations, independent research institutions, independent practice and a wide variety of nonprofit voluntary organizations, such as trade unions, religious groups, and various lobbying and public interest groups. Students are strongly urged to read the booklet Careers in Sociology published by the American Sociological Association for a more in-depth discussion of graduate sociology education. Planning for graduate school, students should start to seriously plan for graduate school during the junior year. At that time they should talk with their advisor about future plans. Planning should continue through that year, with actual selections being made during the first semester of the senior year. Applications to the schools that they are considering should be sent at least one semester in advance of starting graduate school. Any necessary tests (GREs, GMATs, etc.) Should be taken well ahead so that scores are available when needed. Students should take special care to register well in advance of a test date and should allow several weeks for scores to arrive. Many graduate schools are now requiring copies of students' written work as part of the application file. As you write papers for various courses keep this in mind and keep copies of your best work in case they may be needed. It is often wise to construct and maintain you own portfolio as part of your undergraduate education. Talk to your advisor or Career Services about how to construct a portfolio.

In addition to looking over these career paths, to get a nice example of the types of jobs available, go to the Washington Post web site and search their job ads data base using the key word "sociology."

A minor is an important component of a student's program. It broadens the knowledge base and increases the student's marketability. Most careers cut across academic fields; a minor helps to address this reality. The sociology major focuses on human behavior in social settings. A minor in another field can target specific kinds of behavior (criminal justice, policy information, entrepreneurialism, or medicine and health care) in specific kinds of settings (natural resource management, anthropology, international studies, health). The minor can improve the focus of the student's sociological outlook and should be carefully chosen in consultation with the advisor.

Internships offer the student opportunities to put into practice the concepts and theories learned in the classroom. They provide the student with the opportunity to sample potential careers and learn additional skills. A wide variety of internship possibilities exist for sociology majors. Since internships help pave the way to future employment opportunities, they are well worth the investment of time and energy. Students are encouraged to further discuss with their advisor the value of an internship to them and the possibility of completing an internship experience. To set up an internship, see Dr. Wallace in the Sociology Department.

The Academic Portfolio is designed to give you a mechanism for showcasing your accomplishments through many different means and to eventually prepare you for job/graduate school interviews. It becomes a guide for making choices and to demonstrate how you reason, create, strategize, and reflect. Because the portfolio is maintained by you over the course of your academic career, it allows you to assume the responsibility for your own learning and provides evidence of your progress toward meeting your individual learning goals. In doing so, it becomes a means of assessment for the department, allowing it to assess its own success at enhancing student learning in a different and non-traditional manner. You provide faculty an opportunity to observe you in a broader context involving taking risks, developing creative solutions and learning to make judgments about your own performances. Finally, in collecting relevant information throughout your academic program, you will be able to easily convert the portfolio in Sociology 480 into a Professional Portfolio which will assist you in your post-graduate career plans, whether it is seeking a job or applying for graduate school.

The portfolio is something done by you not for or to you. It thereby provides a means for you to learn to value your own work and therefore yourself as learner. As a result, it is you who must select the pieces to be included.

The portfolio should convey your activities. This means you must understand the rationale for the portfolio, the goals of the portfolio, be responsible for the content of the portfolio, and identify what the content of the portfolio reveals about your learning.

B. Liberal Arts Connection :  In this part you include papers, exams, and other works from non-sociology classes along with comments demonstrating your understanding of their linkage to sociology. As before, it can also include a paper, project, group activity, poster, exam, a unique piece, or a mixture of these. You may also include something from an internship, job setting, volunteer activities, or club activities. In this way you will come to understand your own responsibilities toward becoming a lifelong learner. Each piece should also include a statement identifying potential job skills that the piece represents (see section IV. Skills  below).

C. Semester Reflection: Each semester reflect upon what you have collected based upon section III. C . Reflection  below and write a semester reflection piece according to the suggestions in section III. D. Write and Organize  below.

You are required to save all the work produced in all your courses (both sociology and otherwise) each semester, as well as materials from jobs, volunteer work, clubs and organizations, and other activities. If it is something that can't be saved or is too large, take a picture.

Write a semester reflection based upon the 13 questions above which will help you assess your progress toward your career goals, your learning goals, your academic plan and your personal growth and development.

Following is a list of skills appropriate to any Sociology graduate. As you select your classes and collect material for your portfolio use this as a guide to identify the appropriate skills each piece of information details. The skills listed are part of those identified as important by the Secretary's Commission on Achieving Necessary Skills (SCANS) from the Department of Labor and from Bill Coplin's Ten Things Employers Want You to Learn in College.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to equal opportunity for all persons regardless of age, sex, race, color, sexual orientation, developmental disability, ancestry, marital status, arrest or conviction record, national origin, creed, or religious affiliation in its educational programs, activities, and employment policies. The University has an affirmative action program and plan. Direct inquiries to the Assistant to the Chancellor for Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity, 114 Hathorn Hall.

All educational records of sociology students are maintained in accordance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974. Students folders are available in the office of the student's advisor for review by the student and by faculty.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls has established an appeal and grievance policy governing academic matters. This policy defines the general rules regarding what issues may be appealed and the procedure to be followed for filing a grievance. This information is contained in the UW-RF student handbook called On Falcon Wings available at the Admissions Office, 112 South Hall.

Students have the right and the opportunity to participate in the evaluation of their educational experience. The Department operationalizes this opportunity through a variety of mechanisms. Students have a chance to provide feedback to the Department on the instruction they receive in most courses. In addition, evaluation forms are utilized to assess the quality of advising provided.

Regular attendance is one way to demonstrate a commitment to preparing for a professional degree. Consequently, class attendance is not only an expectation, but also one basis for grading in each sociology course. Each course syllabus will define specifically the attendance policy for that course.

At the beginning of each semester, the student will be provided (in sociology classes being taken) a course syllabus which outlines the course of study, textbooks to be used and objectives. Students will also be provided a written description of criteria by which the student will be evaluated and on which the course grade will be based, and the grading scale. The criteria will include the number of exams, any required papers, outside readings, class presentations, type of participation required, and a listing of appropriate dates and deadlines, and attendance policy.

Makeup examinations will be given at the discretion of the individual instructor. Legitimacy of a reason for missing a scheduled exam is to be determined by the course instructor(s), and the time, place, and nature of the makeup examination will be determined by the instructor(s) in consultation with the student.

Incompletes are only given when the situation is serious and clearly beyond the student's control. The incomplete grade indicates that a student was passing the course at the end of the semester, but due to circumstances beyond the student's control was unable to complete a course requirement such as a term paper, outside reading assignment, project, or an examination. It also indicates that the student received consent from the instructor to complete the work for which an "I" grade was given. The "I" grade may not to be used to allow a student to do additional work to raise a deficient grade or to repeat the course.

Following consultation with the student, the instructor will determine the date by which the incomplete shall be removed, at which time an incomplete grade report will be completed. The date and the requirements for removing the incomplete will be recorded on the Incomplete Grade Contract form signed by both the faculty member and student. In no case will that date exceed one calendar year or the time of graduation, whichever is earlier. After this period, if the work has not been completed, the incomplete grade becomes an "F" and is recorded on the cumulative record. Incomplete grades are not removed until recorded in the Office of the Registrar.

All courses will contain assignments requiring students to engage in writing. This may include research papers, term papers, article reviews, essay test questions or any other assignments which allow the student to demonstrate an appropriate level of writing skill.

Some of the criteria used for grading all writing assignments within the Sociology courses will be correct grammar, punctuation and spelling as well as appropriate organization and clarity of content.

Sociological practice/human services with jobs in vocational counseling; rehabilitation; recreation; health services; etc. Business/industry with jobs in management; accounting, finance, and investment; personnel; marketing, etc. Social action/social change with jobs in community organization; religious work; political advocacy, etc.

The department will strive to develop a curriculum providing students with opportunities to develop higher-order thinking skills, and skills in both written, oral, listening and nonverbal communication.

The department faculty will attempt to model learning as a life-long process which contributes to an effective life of inquiry and community involvement. Derived from these goals and objectives, the department has identified six student program outcomes.

A research/writing course experience is required in the major or another field; SCTA 284 Sophomore Seminar or another course approved by the department chair will satisfy this requirement. A senior portfolio experience is required in the major or another field; SCTA 484, Senior Portfolio Seminar or another course approved by the department chair, will satisfy this requirement.

Want to continue your education without committing to a degree program? The University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers credit and noncredit classes, workshops and events year-round that may meet your professional or personal enrichment goals.

Take charge of your professional skills development and personal growth. Browse the list of professional development programs, scan featured credit courses and take a look at noncredit offerings. Then follow the steps below to apply and register for the course or event of your choice.

As a temporary graduate student, you may enroll in graduate courses without being admitted into a graduate degree or certificate program at UW-River Falls. All you need is a bachelor's degree from an accredited institution. The $45 application fee is waived.

NOTE: If you decide to pursue a degree or certificate in the future, you will need to notify the Graduate Studies Office in writing and meet any additional admission requirements. No more than nine (9) semester credits earned as a temporary student may be applied toward a degree or certificate, with approval from the program coordinator and the director of Graduate Studies. And, graduate degrees must be completed within seven years of the date of the earliest course applied toward your degree or certificate program.

If you have never taken a graduate class at UW-River Falls, you will need to apply as a temporary graduate student. Complete your application online at Temporary Graduate Application  or print and complete the following PDF document  and return it to the Graduate Studies office.

You need to apply as a temporary undergraduate student if you are just interested in taking courses for undergraduate credit and not pursuing a degree at UW-River Falls . If you are interested in pursuing an undergraduate degree here, contact the Admissions Office  for application instructions.

NOTE: If you are currently enrolled as a graduate student at UW-River Falls, you will pay graduate tuition rate for an undergraduate course. Contact the Graduate Studies Office (email) if you need to change your graduate status.

Students may also register by printing and completing the Outreach Registration Form (PDF) and returning it to the Registrar's Office. Tuition payments may also be dropped off or mailed to the Cashiers Office.

NOTE: A enrollment deposit of $100 is required before processing spring and fall term registrations for undergraduate students. See Accounts Receivable for information on deposits, payment plans and options.

You can register and make payments online for most noncredit courses and events. Go to Noncredit Registration. Other registration options may be offered and are described within the course or event description.

Consult the program pages for specific application requirements. To take classes for graduate credit, you will need to apply for graduate school but the $45 processing fee is waived. See Applying for Graduate Credit.

The following is an alphabetical listing of the many resources that are available to UW-RF students. Browse for the answer to your question or use the Google search feature in the menu to find the answer within the site. You may also use the Hot Topic links for answers to our frequently asked questions.

All admitted students receive instructions on how to activate your account. (See How to Apply for admission or re-admission instructions.) You may activate your Falcon Account online at https://www.uwrf.edu/apps/nrm/.

Information on fee payment schedules, required deposits, finance charges and payment methods are found at http://www.uwrf.edu/accounts-receive/. You can pay credit tuition online by MasterCard or electronic check. You can also mail or drop off payment at the Cashiers Office, 217 North Hall.

The following list does not include all the graduate courses currently offered. If you do not find a course that meets your needs, use the Class Schedule Lookup to find a course by key word, title, or term.

A variety of one-credit courses offered online and that are designed to address contemporary and timely issues in the area of economics. Topics offered this term include Personal Finance Economics, Transition to Market Economies, Roaring 20's thru Depression, and Money and Banking.

Registration is now open for Spanish and Italian language classes for adults. Classes are offered in the evenings, once a week and are designed to give people the skills to successfully communicate during their travels, whether for business or pleasure.

Outreach and Graduate Studies partners with the College of Arts and Sciences to offer the Community Classroom series each fall and spring. University faculty share their expertise through informal presentations on a variety of topics.

You will need to register on the college's web site to have your file formally reviewed. File reviews for admission occur twice a year. October 1st is the deadline for the fall semester, February 15th is the deadline for the spring review. Incomplete files will not be evaluated for admission.

Applying for teacher education is a separate process then applying for graduate school. Being admitted to the graduate School does not guarantee admission to the teacher education program. Most students apply for teacher education during their first semester enrolled at River Falls.

Students must submit an autobiography describing educational and career histories, experiences working with children and/or youth, interests, long range goals, and reasons for seeking a teaching career.

Graduate Students must have their file reviewed for admission to the Teacher Education program their first semester they are enrolled in the program. Students who are not admitted to Teacher Education will not be allowed to register until they are admitted.

The teacher certified in Special Education: Early Childhood is a professional who is skilled in determining exceptional education needs and implementing programs which facilitate the attainment of habilitation and/or rehabilitation educational goals for children between the ages of birth and nine.

The graduate of the UW-EC program is qualified to work with infants,  toddlers, preschool, and school age  children (through age eight) who exhibit mild  to profound developmental problems in adaptive, motor, language,  and cognitive aspects of behavior, as well as students ages 6 through 9  who have special learning needs. As an integral part of their  training the student will be prepared to work in various types  of service delivery systems (i.e., center, homes, schools, and  clinics), to coordinate intervention efforts with the child's primary care provider (e.g., parents), to function in a multidisciplinary team setting and to work with children on a non-categorical basis.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls offers an early childhood program as a minor for Elementary Education majors that enables them to earn certification for dual licensure. The early childhood program at UW-River Falls offers a constructivist theoretical base with a strong emphasis on practical application of developmental, constructivist theory and experience in the curriculum courses.

River Falls students have classroom experience in all early childhood curriculum classes as well as a semester of student teaching in a prekindergarten and kindergarten classroom in addition to their elementary education student teaching for a semester. Commencing in Spring, 2004, we began a collaborative program with UW Eau Claire by which their Early Childhood Special Ed students could take courses in Early Childhood (see a detailed list) towards certification. This dual licensure program is possible by using a variety of distant education mediums including on-line, ITV, Video IP.

By becoming dual-certified, education students will have more job opportunities.UW-RF student Molly Yoch, the first student to participate in this program, took one course through UW-EC this semester and plans to continue her dual certification by taking two more courses next semester. Ward estimates that more than 60 students in addition to Yoch are interested in enrolling in the program for the summer.

Students teach a minimum of 18 children, working with 10-12 children who experience single and mild disabilities, and 8-10 children who experience multiple and severe disabilities. Study options offer students the chance to learn using traditional face-to-face campus courses, Web site instruction, and two-way real time television. The program requires students to register on both campuses. However, if enrolled in 12-18 credits, the student may avoid paying registration fees on both campuses and only pay it to the home campus. Students also pay segregated fees on a credit basis for each credit taken through the secondary campus.

Allowing  students to return to their hometown does not provide for that variety.  Students have the option of volunteering in any school, and with any  teacher, but those hours are not recorded, nor counted, toward the field  experience requirements.

Although many principals and teachers welcome us into their schools, we are still guests at their discretion. It is not their responsibility to contact you to make arrangements for classroom visits, so do not expect them to return your call. They may not have even received your message. Simply call the school and ask the secretary about begriming and ending times for the school day, and when the individual teacher has a planning period or lunch.

If you have tried repeatedly to reach the teacher or administrator, please have your UWRF professor/instructor contact the Field Experience Office and we will attempt to make contact, or find another placement.

We do our very best to resolve any problematic situations, whether they occur before or during student teaching. It may be possible to find a new placement if the situation cannot be resolved, and either the principal, cooperating teacher, or university supervisor recommends that a change be made.

We work with the student, cooperating teacher, and supervisor to resolve the situation, with as little disruption as possible. If an illness is for a prolonged period of time the student may need to withdrawal and complete student teaching during another semester.

Professional development used in education circles to refer to activities like classes, workshops, inservice, book groups, added certification, advanced degrees, creation of professional development plans by teachers.

Work with colleagues, parents, and the larger community refers to developing professional, positive relationships, communicating effectively, and using others as resources for your teaching and your students.

The Web Resource for Teachers http://www.teachersfirst.com/index.cfm TeachersFirst is a rich collection of lessons, units, web resources, carefully selected and reviewed by experienced educators. Find resources by subject and grade level or by keyword search to save you time as a busy teacher, student, or parent.

Deciding whether to go to graduate or professional school is an important and often difficult decision to make. Pursuing graduate study affords you the opportunity to delve more deeply into a subject area than you were able to in your undergraduate education. In most cases, you will also be able to work closely with professors and conduct research of your own. In addition, you will have to work hard, and often under pressure, and will need to develop personal motivation as much of your work will be independent (particularly true for Ph.D. programs). Because of the demands, as well as the rewards, not to mention the costs, it is important that you give this decision much thought.

We have all heard of the stories of the student who went directly from undergraduate to graduate study, partly out of indecision, only to be miserable in graduate school and still without a career direction. We would like to help you make the best decision for you.

It pays to find out what kinds of employment are most frequently taken by graduates of the program you are considering. Visit the school and ask some of the near-graduates what they expect to be doing after they graduate.

Do students of this graduate department frequently fail to complete their degree programs? Once again, this is not something you will learn from the catalog or the department brochure. Visit the campus and ask both faculty and students.

Is there a variety of points of view in the department, or are most of the faculty members' approach to the discipline rather single-minded? Would you rather be a disciple or develop your own approach to the field?

What have the faculty members published lately? This will give you an idea of whether the faculty's interests are similar to your own. In many cases, what the professor publishes is what he or she spends the most time talking about, both in and out of the classroom.

Are there several big names on the faculty? If so, ask the students how often they actually see or talk with these people. Would you be likely to work with the big name on a research project, see him/her only in class, or just hear about him/her occasionally?

In addition, look at the size of the school/department, the city itself, transportation, geographical location, employment opportunities in your field, cost of living, opportunities to pursue extra-curricular interests.

Choosing a graduate school involves finding a program that matches your academic interests as well as your personal preferences and needs. After all, you will be there for at least two years, and probably longer if you are pursuing a Ph.D.

Many schools have application deadlines well in advance of the entrance date. Be sure to check the particular department in which you are applying for their deadlines. You also need to be aware that financial aid deadlines are often different (and sometimes earlier) than the regular application dates. Be sure to register for the appropriate test well in advance of when the schools need your scores. Begin the application process early. It often takes more time than you count on to complete all of the forms and to get the letters of recommendation and transcripts sent.

In completing the application form and personal statement, make sure you type it or print legibly and that it is written in clear and concise language. It should state who you are, your goals, and why you want to attend that particular school. For many schools, the written essay plays an extremely important role in their selection of individuals. Have someone read it over and check for clarity and proper grammar.

Make sure that you have completed all of the necessary forms and that the appropriate office has received them. You should make some phone calls to confirm that your materials have been received by the graduate school. Never assume that because you haven't heard from an office, your application is complete.

In graduate school, you will be working closely with your advisor, so you should do some research on the individuals who most closely match your interests. The graduate catalog often lists the research interests of the faculty. Check in the college for publications by these people. Are they doing research/writing in areas of interest to you?

Write or call these individuals to let them know that you have applied there, what your interests are, and how they relate to their research. If possible, schedule a time to meet, or at least talk on the phone. This way, when your application comes across their desks, it will mean more to them. By talking with the people, you will also find out if you are compatible in other ways beyond just research interests.

A visit to the school can be particularly enlightening. Does it match the description in the catalog? Sit in on the classes, talk with students currently in the program, talk with faculty, check out the physical and social environment of the campus and community. Ask the questions of yourself and others listed on the previous page. Is this a place you will feel comfortable living/working/studying in for the next few years?

Those tied to specific schools, programs, and departments. Ask the financial aid officer at the graduate school you are considering. Ask the chairperson of your future graduate department. Read graduate school catalog and financial aid materials.

Those not tied to a school, program or department. Examples include the National Science Foundation, Danforth Fellowships, etc. Read the Annual Register of Grant Support. Each award has specific requirements which may not be based on financial need. They may be geared toward an area of study.

"Borrowed" money: Graduate school government loans or Commercial institution loans. Generally, loans through graduate schools and the government are low interest and payment is deferred until your training ends. Commercial loans (banks) have a higher interest rate and may not be as readily available.

Stafford Loan (formerly called the Guaranteed Student Loan) This loan is obtained through a bank willing to make arrangements with you. Interest is usually 8 percent; repayment starts 6 months after graduation; interest is paid for by the government until you graduate. A loan is not based on financial need.

Research, teaching, or residential assistantships. This is taxable income, and usually limits your course load, but can provide you with some good experience; limited number of positions available; often given PhD. candidates. Not necessarily need-based.

Upward Bound (UB) is a federally funded college preparatory program that generates in our participants the skills and motivations necessary to complete a program of secondary education, and succeed in a program of post-secondary education.

Each of the highlighted book titles can be "clicked" and a new window will appear for more information on that specific title. We will be adding additional materials to this list as time allows. To request a book, please complete this form and click the "Send" button at the bottom of the page.

Center for Addiction and Mental Health - The Center for Addiction and Mental Health is a public hospital providing direct patient care for people with mental health and addiction problems. The Centre is also a research facility, an education and training institute and a community based organization providing health promotion and prevention services across the province.

Meth is taking its toll in Minnesota. Methamphetamine, a highly-addictive drug that's been around for decades, has become the drug of choice for many in recent years because it's cheap, easy to make, and a "good high." But it is a costly drug in terms of the devastation it causes for users and their families, and the challenges it brings for law enforcement and health officials.

The Casey Family Program - This is a great site that has information of general interest about foster care, adoption, and kinship care, as well as specifically addressing the development and support of a sufficient pool of competent resource families to provide children and youths with safety, protection, stability and permanency, it also has good information on Chafee Foster Care Independence Act.

Child Welfare -  Access to electronic journals, articles, links.A gateway to inmformation related to the welfare of children, including electronic journal, Child Welfare Review, a library, a resource on issues related to sources on child welfare.

Child Welfare League of America - CWLA is the oldest and largest national nonprofit organization developing and promoting policies and programs to protect America's children and strengthen America's families.

American Indian Policy Center - This site was created to provide government leaders, policy makers and the public with accurate information about the legal and political history of American Indian nations and the contemporary situation for American Indians.

The National Center on Family Group Decision Making - The National Center strives to build community capacity to implement high quality, effective family group decision making processes that are philosophically congruent with the central values and beliefs of this approach.

National Adoption Information Clearinghouse - a comprehensive resource on all aspects of adoption, is a service of the Children's Bureau, Administration on Children, Youth and Families, Administration for Children and Families, Department of Health and Human Services. This portion of the site lists publications with regard to Family Group Decision Making.

Division of Community Supportive Services - The Division of Community Supportive Services is responsible for prevention services, family preservation and family support programs, the Child Safety and Permanency Planning process, and several child welfare collaborative efforts. This link references information relating to several important issues regarding FGDM.

Dane County Human Services -  Family Group Decision Making (FGDM) is families making plans for the well-being of their children. It is families being in charge of their own lives. With the help of the Family Group Decision Making coordinator, the family meets with relatives, friends and other support people in a Family Group Conference (FGC) to work out a plan for keeping all family members safe. If your family is involved with Dane County Department of Human Services (DCDHS), or Court, this may be especially helpful to you. Any family facing big decisions might benefit from a Family Group Conference. This site goes through the steps needed in a family group conference.

Adoptive Families - Adoptive Families magazine is a valuable, even critical, resource for many, many families. Whether families are considering adoption or have already adopted, the magazine quickly becomes one of their most trusted friends and a source of independent, thoughtful information.

Early Childhood Information Clearinghouse - This site provides information about young children, birth to age three, including links to Idaho programs and worldwide information, current practice and research, and child development information.

National CASA - Volunteer Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASA) are everyday people who are appointed by judges to advocate for the best interests of abused and neglected children. A CASA volunteer stays with each child until they are placed into a safe, permanent and nurturing home.

American Association of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry -  Includes fact sheets for families on a wide variety of topics including children and: suicide, bedwetting, sleep disorders, firearms, violence, moving, school, etc.

American Psychiatric Associatio -   Site with excellent information listed under "public information". Subjects include a fact sheet series, families and children section, psychiatric medications, resources for general public, etc.

The major responsibility of the AdHoc Committee on Initial & Ongoing Staff Training is to create a report for the Wisconsin Child Welfare Training Council on what should constitute pre-service, foundation, ongoing and supervisor training for child welfare workers in Wisconsin. The Training Council will then make a recommendation to the Division of Children and Family Services who have the final responsibility for creating the administrative rule and for satisfying the requirements of the Wisconsin Program Improvement Plan regarding minimum training requirements for child welfare workers.

The objective of this International Study Tour is to provide our students a great opportunity to acquire new knowledge, awareness and experience of global issues focusing on an African country. This tour will expose the students directly to a different culture, business and economic environment, political systems, education, agriculture and environmental issues relating to Africa, in general, and Uganda, in particular.

This study tour will provide students a unique opportunity to increase their knowledge of global issues by traveling to, studying, and doing research on topics of interests relating to Africa. The 2007 Study Tour theme is "Globalization and Africa's Experiences ."

"Traveling to Uganda, Africa was an amazing experience. It was an opportunity that I suggest any student to consider taking. Once in Uganda, I was very excited to meet the students from Nkozi University and also the professors. Traveling around Uganda was very beautiful, enlightening, and well worth the time of travel. We were able to see so many beautiful sites that many would never have the chance to see. It was great to be able to learn with other students who shared different perspectives pertaining to such issues in Africa. Overall, the best learning experience was adapting to the culture.

"This is a moment of relaxation from the monotony of classroom teaching and routine programs of the university. At the same time it is academically refreshing and the presentations and discussions always give a diversity of views.

"Africa is just an amazing place and I learned so much in the first couple of days. Meeting new people and getting a totally different view point on life was an irreplacable experience."-- Rebecca Chojnachi, UWRF Biotechnology Major.

Here are answers to some of the common questions you might have when considering whether online learning is right for you.  If you can't find the answer you are seeking, contact us using the Feedback Form or email  the Outreach office.

Go to Applying for Graduate Credit , or contact Graduate Studies Office at graduatestudies@uwrf.edu for application instructions. New or returning students will receive detailed instructions on how to register for courses online. Existing students may register now using eSIS.

For most online courses, all coursework is asynchronous. Information about each online course will let you know if there are scheduled activities. You should log in on the first scheduled day of class to get directions from your instructor.

Of course. Keep in mind that the average time spent on an online class is similar to the time spent in a traditional face-to-face class. For a one-credit course  you will need to spend about 15 hours to complete the required work. If you dont think you will have time, the course you want will most likely be offered at another time during the year.

Generally, students may add a class within the first week  of the term. For the  Online Learning for Educators, students may  do so  by completing a paper registration form (PDF document). After one week, students must get instructor approval before adding the course. Registration after the first day of class will result in a $25 late registration fee.

INSTRUCTOR: John Brickner, is a certified counselor and educator. He has more than 15 years of experience working with children, adolescents, teenagers, and parents in many situations. He has been recognized for his leadership in family education and earned his master's degree in educational counseling at UW-River Falls.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsYou will explore seven instructional steps that will have a major impact on student achievement in your classroom. You will increase your skills and comfort level with clear expectations, essential questions, experiences for learning and evaluation while providing a learning environment for your students that promotes long-term retention and transfer of knowledge. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.  This course meets WI Teacher Standards 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8 and 10.

DetailsThis course presents an overview of Native American peoples and cultures in Wisconsin and Minnesota.  The readings and discussion cover from pre-contact through the near present.  The discussions will range over a variety of issues such as cultural shift and change, political and socio-economic factors and the position of Native Peoples in the general history of the region.  The students will complete a series of readings and participate in a discussion board.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsCreate safe and peaceful classroom and school environments. You will be introduced to positive ideas, practices and preventive applications to reduce bullying and school violence. Discover a practical set of strategies and skills designed to develop a climate of safety and peace in schools. Explore valuable social, cognitive and skill-building approaches to eliminate bullying among children and adolescents. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsA differentiated classroom offers a variety of learning options designed to tap into different readiness levels, interests and learning profiles.   A particular challenge for teachers is being able to differentiate or adapt instruction to respond to the diverse student needs found in inclusive, mixed-ability classrooms.

Explore and discover instructional strategies that can help you manage differentiation and help students find a good learning "fit".  In reviewing research, reflecting, and discussing, we will be able to identify a clear rationale for differentiation; better prepare parents and students for a differentiated classroom and be able to implement changes to provide for a successful classroom structure and overall management of your classroom.  Throughout the course of this class, we will have opportunities throughout online discussions to share both successful and unsuccessful strategies others are using.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsDo your K-12 students vary greatly in ability, readiness, interests and learning styles? Meet the needs of your struggling learners, as well as your more able students, with tiered lessons. In this course you will design a lesson in which content, activities, and the products expected at the end are adjusted or tiered. Use the lesson in your classroom, evaluate how it worked, and get valuable feedback from the both the instructor and course participants. Course evaluation is based on your understanding of the theory as shown by lesson design, overall quality of the lesson plan, and your own analysis of the strength and weakness of the lesson after teaching it. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment. Meets  Wisconsin Teacher Standards 2,3,4,5, 7, and 8; Administrator Standards 1, 2, and 3; and Pupil Services Standards 1, 2, and 6.

DetailsThere are many ways to "shake up" the classroom to create a better fit. When instruction is concept focused and principle driven, as in differentiation, all students have the opportunity to explore, apply and understand the key principles on which the study is based.  Instruction such as this enables struggling learners to grasp and use powerful ideas and, at the same time, encourages advanced learners to expand their understanding.  But when students are all learning at different rates, how do you, as a teacher assess understanding?

Learn how you can provide on-going assessment of student readiness and growth built into the curriculum.  Through readings, reflections and on-line discussions, you will allow yourself to continuously assess student readiness and interest and provide the support when students need additional instruction and guidance.  You will become more aware of the indicators that an individual student or the group is ready to move on.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsSelf-Esteem is a topic that most professionals deem extremely important.  From psychologists, therapists, social workers, school teachers, business managers to parents, we need a clear understanding of what it is and how to build it in our clients or students.  This course will look at self-esteem from a cognitive-behavioral approach based on the work of Dr. Albert Ellis and more specifically Dr. Aaron Beck who developed therapeutic strategies that he called cognitive therapy.  Other clinicians and researchers have built on their foundation.  One of these is an outstanding psychiatrist by the name of David Burns, M.D.  Using his book, Ten Days To Self Esteem, students will learn basic cognitive therapy as it applies to self-esteem.  Then, students will take several of the practical skills they have learned and create a lesson plan to use in their practice or classroom.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsKnow more than how to teach a subject - understand how to mentor a child.  Children come from such a variety of life situations that they often enter the classroom needing far more than an education.  Classroom management is perhaps one of the most essential skills teachers need today.  Master skills that foster a classroom environment of cooperation, responsibility and respect, while also learning how to deal with power struggles and some of the most difficult students and situations.  Develop techniques to establish an orderly classroom while fostering appropriate mentoring relationships. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsFinding it impossible to wade through countless online sources to find one useful lesson plan?  Technology does not have to be impossible or time consuming to use.  Webquest is an interactive way to help you develop strategies for students to find and/or explore answers online.  We will embark on a quest to find Webquest tools that will easily and seamlessly fit into your teaching environment.  You will create a Webquest specifically for your classroom use.  We will also post your work online to share with colleagues. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment. Meets Wisconsin Teacher Standards 1, 4, 6, 7, and 10.

DetailsEngage your students to be creative and critical thinkers, while still addressing their multiple learning styles. Explore Inspiration and Kidspiration, a concept mapping software package that provides a variety of visual learning opportunities which are developmentally appropriate and flexible enough to fit any content area or grade level. With the program's versatility in pictures, writing, animations, and sound, you are presented with a variety of options to reinforce language development, concept building, brainstorming, processing, prioritizing, planning, organizing, classifying, and sight word knowledge. Fear not! This is a fun, easy, inexpensive program with a minimal learning curve.

You will complete 12-15 hours of readings, videos, a lesson plan, online communications, and a project-based assignment promoting the classroom integration of Inspiration and Kidspiration. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsWell-designed rubrics reduce time and effort spent grading student work, boost student achievement, and help level the playing field for all students.  Learn to build rubrics that meet these goals.  You'll create rubrics for assignments you already use, get instructor feedback, and put those rubrics to use with your students. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsFocus on assessments to find out whether your students are learning.  You willl explore the basics of what and how to assess, and  learn to use this knowledge to provide valuable feedback to students, parents, and yourself as you plan instruction.  Identify best practices and apply them in your classroom. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsYou'll review research-tested strategies for improving student study skills and comprehension in the classroom and through homework.  You'll select three strategies that you find most applicable to your classes and your students, create an assignment or lesson plan using each of the three strategies, and carry out your three plans.  Then you'll reflect on their success and consider how to revise them.  A practical and straightforward approach to enhanced learning! This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsRegular education teachers have a critical role in reaching students with disabilities but may feel uninformed about what they can do.  Strategies for inclusion will help you reach the goals of increased learning and social involvement.  In this course you will gain valuable strategies for social inclusion of students with disabilities and discover how to make inclusion a path to increased learning.  You will review specific approaches, apply selected tactics in your classroom, and reflect on their success.  Come away with a growing repertoire of strategies that work.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsDesktop Publishing is an effective way to engage students at any grade level.  Explore the classroom benefits of brochure and newsletter creation utilizing Microsoft Word (Microsoft Word 1997 or newer is available at most schools).  Build the fundamentals needed to use this publishing tool in creating authentic assignments for your class.  Come away with a completed project for use in your own classroom. This course takes six weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsInstructional grouping of students can be a powerful tool for both teaching and classroom management. However, without planning and careful thought, it can lead to loss of quality student and teacher time.

Explore  instructional grouping strategies to best meet the changing needs of  your students. We will review research, reflect, discuss and implement many of these valuable strategies.  Following implementation, we will have the opportunity to journal and discuss with other class participants the effectiveness of the various strategies.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

INSTRUCTOR:  Wanda S. Erwin has worked with instructional strategies through professional staff development and continues to focus on this area as she works toward her Ph.D..  She has been a teacher and administrator in Minnesota and Wisconsin for the past twenty-five years. She has been an adjunct faculty member at UW-RF for the past 5 years.

DetailsReach students at their preferred learning style and meet the growing spectrum of learning needs.  You will explore practical strategies and discover innovative ways to embed Howard Gardner's Multiple Intelligences into your curriculum, as well as recognize where they already exist in your daily lessons.  There's no need to reinvent the wheel - let's honor the work already occurring and seek new ways to differentiate our instruction in order to address growing classroom diversity.  Through the use of professional reading, exploration and reflection, you will acquire skills necessary to incorporate these techniques into everyday lesson design. This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

DetailsThrow away that red pen! Transfer the responsibility of revision and editing to your students using the valuable tools you learn in this class. Explore the Six Traits of Writing - Ideas and Content, Organization, Voice, Word Choice, Fluency, and Conventions - and learn the techniques of sharing that knowledge with your students. Your role becomes that of mentor and facilitator as you conference with young writers and they begin to assimilate the Six Traits into evaluating their own work.  This course takes seven weeks to complete and will not be canceled due to low enrollment.

Synopsis: Vishnu, the odd-job man in a Bombay apartment block, lies dying on the landing.   In his fevered state, he looks back on his affair with the seductive Padmini   while around him is played out the drama of the apartment block dwellers. This   novel blends Hindu mythology with acute social detail.

Beloved is an hypnotic,   beautiful, and elusive, novel. Toni Morrison portrays the lives of Sethe, an escaped   slave and mother and those around her. There is Sixo, who "stopped speaking   English because there was no future in it," and .... Baby Suggs, who makes her   living with her heart because slavery "had busted her legs, back, head, eyes,   hands, kidneys, womb and tongue;" and Paul D, a man with a rusted metal box for   a heart and a presence that allows women to cry. At the center is Sethe, whose   story makes us think and think again about what we mean when we say we love our   children or freedom. The stories circle, swim dreamily to the surface, and are   suddenly clear and horrifying. Because of the extraordinary, experimental style   as well as the intensity of the subject matter, what we learn from them touches   at a level deeper than understanding.

Frank McCourt tells the story of his impoverished childhood and adolescence in   Limerick, Ireland, during the 1930s and 1940s. Written from the point of view of   the young boy, it is a long catalogue of deprivation and hardship: the   alcoholism of his father, the despair of his mother, the deaths of three of his   younger siblings, the grinding poverty and unsanitary living conditions they all   had to endure.

The staff of the Chalmer Davee Library takes pride in our strong service orientation. We recognize the important role we play in supporting teaching, research, and learning, and we come to work every day prepared to provide the best service that we can to faculty and students. Through the years we've heard compliments from faculty and students whom we've helped or served particularly well. Now that the results of the LibQUAL+ survey are compiled, we are pleased to report that our users, especially faculty, give the library staff high marks for the quality of our service. Here's a bit more background on the survey and a summary of our findings.

The LibQUAL+ survey measures user perceptions and expectations of library service quality in three dimensions: affect of service, information control, and library as place. In the spring of 2004, 768 faculty, students, and staff completed the UWRF survey. Users were asked for their judgments on three scales for each survey question: the desired level of service they would like to receive, the minimum they are willing to accept, and the actual level of service they perceive to have been provided. The desired and minimum scores establish a zone of tolerance within which the perceived scores can be compared. As we analyze results, we are pleased when we see small gaps between what users want from the library and what they think they get from us. If there is a large gap between user's expectations and perceptions, then we know we need to improve in that area.

We are making our important electronic resources easier to use, with the introduction of Metalib and SFX software (see related article). Too often students use free web resources and miss the large number of quality resources that we already offer in the library.

Professor Colleen Callahan and the journalism department wrote the text for the exhibit and Leslie Bleskachek, former Coordinator of Television Services, prepared a video explaining the carving of the ancestor poles.

There are approximately 65,000 Asmat (ahz-mott) people living on the southwest coast of New Guinea . They are one of the few remaining hunter-gatherer cultures in the world. Headhunting and cannibalism were important practices within their belief system. According to the American Museum of Asmat Art, almost every Asmat action is motivated by a philosophy of balance. When imbalance occurs, the Asmat suffer from illness, death, hunger and other misfortunes. Therefore, they are vigilant about their responsibility to maintain equilibrium in every aspect of their lives. In the case of headhunting, for example, an Asmat would be acting responsibly when he reacts to a death in his village by killing an enemy from another village.

The Asmat use only three colors: white, red and black. All are believed to have magical properties. One of the artifacts displayed in the gallery is a child's black and white grass skirt. The collection also includes a horn made of bamboo used by the men to announce their return to the village from a successful headhunting raid, ornamental nosepieces, arrows, shields, arm bands, figure carvings, necklaces, and two ancestor poles on which each figure on the pole was named after someone recently deceased, whose death had not yet been avenged.

Last year the UW System libraries jointly purchased a new set of research tools to enhance and improve searching the vast amount of online materials we have access to. The UW System has entered an agreement with the Ex Libris company to use two of their products, SFX and Metalib (designated as Find It and SuperSearch at UW-RF).

The SuperSearch tool is a new search interface which will allow for multiple databases or library catalogs to be searched at the same time. The aim of SuperSearch is to allow users an easier search interface to access our existing resources. Users will have the ability to search using existing subject sets of resources, or they will have the ability to construct personal search sets which can be saved and searched again in the future. You will start seeing SuperSearch during the Spring Semester.

The library is pleased to introduce our new Cataloging Librarian, Heidi Southworth. Heidi is responsible for insuring that materials that the library acquires are fully described and accessible via our online catalog. She'll also work directly with students at the Reference Desk and will teach classes in our library instruction program. Heidi has worked most recently as a cataloger and instruction librarian at Loras College in Dubuque, Iowa. Heidi has a B.A in History from Minnesota State University--Mankato, an M.A. in History from the University of Nebraska--Lincoln and an M.L.I.S. from the University of Wisconsin--Milwaukee.

In January, the library bid farewell to our Archivist, Sue Watson. Sue and her husband Jed moved to Gurnee, IL, where Jed accepted a new position. During Sue's eight years as Academic Archivist, she was instrumental in developing strong archival collections and a record of outstanding public service to the University and area communities. We wish all the best to Sue as she and Jed now make their home in Illinois. Although living in the land of the Bears, Sue pledges allegiance to her favored Packers.

In spite of this fact, we have strengthened our service to the university community by developing electronic collections shared across the UW-System and implementing systems for efficient sharing of library materials.

System and across the country are finding new, more efficient, ways to share their resources with each other. Here at UW-RF the latest development in resource sharing is electronic article delivery to your desktop.

After working in several departments in the library as an undergraduate, she completed the University of Michigan 's Library Science program in 1997 and currently works at the Chalmer Davee Library in the Stacks and Government Documents Departments.

The books are located on a rolling cart immediately to the right after you pass through the security gates. Paperback books are $1.00 and hardcover books are $2.00. New books will be added on a weekly basis, and those that have not been purchased after four weeks will be pulled from the cart.

The effect of technology on information during the past decade has been revolutionary.  With the development of the Internet, information has been made available globally and instantly.  Information is being created at a very rapid pace while the value of information has been increasing at a tremendously higher rate.

The effect of technology on libraries has been especially traumatic during the past decade.  Many people have begun to consider libraries less important than they used to be because they believe that the Internet is the world's library.  Books and other printed information are often considered less valuable and less important than electronic information.  Yet libraries are probably one of the most important components of the information age and they have dealt successfully with new technological advances.  Librarians must ensure that society understands the value and contributions of libraries.

Academic librarians are in the midst of a sophisticated technology environment.  They are facing many challenges but also many opportunities.  Academic libraries have been on the forefront of technological developments during the past decade, so they are in a good position to face what lies ahead.  Libraries were one of the first groups to computerize their information environment through library system software, hardware, networking, web page development and assistance to users.  Librarians must continue to develop new technology skills and expertise in the management of information.

What to expect?  Academic librarians will continue to provide appropriate information environments that utilize both print and electronic formats.  They will create even more efficient interlibrary loan cooperation that will offer desk-top delivery of information.  They will provide the necessary computer access for all library patrons through up-to-date computer facilities.  They will provide practical and effective instruction in the use of all types of information.  There are endless opportunities of what academic librarians can do for you.  But most importantly, they will make the library the center for information storage and use, teaching and learning.

Unique descriptions of hundreds of NW Wisconsin historical collections have been added to the library's online catalog.  You will now find manuscripts, and original, unpublished documents with historical value, as well as historical local government records.

To browse these descriptions enter manuscript collection or local government records as a subject search. To see original primary sources visit the UW-River Falls University Archives and Area Research Center, or for more information visit www.uwrf.edu/library/arc/.

New Popular Literature Collection, thanks to campus donors Thank you to all who donated a wide range of appealing reading materials to help us develop our new Popular Literature Collection.  Our goal of creating a good base collection is nearly fulfilled, and the collection now sits in a special area just south of the periodical stacks on the library's main floor - surrounded by comfortable seating.  As a matter of fact, most of the collection was available for library users in August and students, faculty and staff members have made good use of the collection since the last days of summer school.  The collection now includes an excellent selection of quality fiction, literary award winners, fashionable mystery and science fiction stories as well as some humorous nonfiction titles.

The library staff appreciates the outstanding response to our plea for gifts as we faced reduced funding.  However, we can always use new items and we continue to welcome gifts from students, faculty and staff.  Many more readers will enjoy your willingness to share a "good read."

Now it's possible to have the library come to your office through the "Librarians to Go" service. By filling out a web-based form faculty and staff can arrange to have a consultation with a reference librarian in their office at a convenient time. The librarian can also assist with selecting and searching relevant electronic databases. "Librarians to Go" is available Monday through Friday from 8:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m.

A painting of the original library building was recently donated to the Chalmer Davee Library by Mrs. Chalmer Davee and her son, John.  This work was commissioned by Dr. Chalmer and Helen Davee near the time of completion of the new building in Spring 1954.  It is on display near the reference area on the library's main floor.

Following the infamous May 1954 bucket brigade style, hand-to-hand "book pass" which had students, faculty and librarians moving textbooks and library books out of the former library in South Hall into the new facility, the library building opened before the 1954 summer session.  Two large reading rooms, special facilities for visual and audio-visual education and a little theater graced the new facility.  Formal dedication of the new library building was celebrated in May 1955.  Remodeling over the intervening forty-seven years has updated both the interior and exterior of the library building, but if you look closely you will still see portions of the original structure.

The library is named after Dr. Chalmer Davee who was appointed to the Board of Regents of State Colleges in 1945.  Dr. Davee was instrumental in seeing that the River Falls campus received a share of the substantial building program.  During his tenure as a regent, a new Industrial Arts building was added along with the first two major buildings in 25 years -- Hathorn Hall and the library.

A typical day is often spent staffing the Archives Reference desk and assisting students, faculty, the University community and the general public (both onsite and offsite) in the use of historical material and records.

At faculty and teacher request I provide Archives instructional sessions for classes.  I also meet with individuals who donate historical material through the Archives to the Wisconsin Historical Society and to the University Archives directly.  Being the only archivist means I am responsible for the numerous duties related to the acquisition, reference, storage and preservation of historical material.

Welcome to the virtual newsletter world. We were all set to go to publication with our regular print edition of Library Link when the UW campuses were hit with the dismal news about the plight of the state budget. In response, our campus was asked to reduce printing costs as much as possible, among other cost-saving measures.

We have discovered several positive features in designing this electronic version of our newsletter. First, it's less expensive to produce and distribute. Easy hyperlinks can be provided to many resources that are mentioned in the articles. Color photos may be used as compared to the black and white photos used in the print edition. A convenient way to receive feedback is provided (which will be important to us!). In addition, the newsletter is easy to pass along, by forwarding the web address or copying and forwarding text to others. The electronic version can also be a more "timely" way to publicize "breaking news" in the library.

Group Study Room with Computer/Projector a Success Last year the library established a group study room with a computer and projection equipment. It is intended for use by students who need to do group work on a computer or individual students who need to practice presentations using the computer projection equipment.

At 252 titles and growing (Click here for a list of titles), the International Film Collection in the library represents a major resource for the study of international issues and cultures. The collection was established with a grant from the UW System Institute for Global Studies and is available to students and faculty at UW-RF.

Associate Dean Terry Brown and Dean Gorden Hedahl from the College of Arts and Sciences are the grant coordinators. They are working with the library to create a web page with information about the collection and will include links to study guides for the films.

To more accurately reflect the type of material added to the growing collections in the Curriculum Materials Center, the library has discontinued use of the "Juvenile Literature" location name. "Curriculum Materials Center" has replaced "Juvenile Literature" as the location name in the Voyager library catalog. Work has begun to replace "JUV" with "CMC" on all call number labels.

Library. E-Reserve allows faculty to place course-related material on the web, making material available to students 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. Lecture notes, practice exams, problem solutions, journal articles and book chapters are all well suited for E-Reserve.

We have incorporated our E-Reserve service into the structure already in place for our traditional reserve service. When students search the Voyager library catalog for reserve materials, they can see all materials that you want them to use regardless of format, including books, videos, DVDs, CDs, and electronic materials.

Unlike materials that you place on the P: drive in a course folder, E-Reserve items are available to students from off-campus, even when they connect to the internet through a private internet service provider.

Most UW libraries have a Popular Literature Collection that serves the leisure reading needs of their campus community. UW libraries typically collect items that are on the New York Times bestseller list, reviewed in periodicals such as the New Yorker, or have won literary prizes such as the Pulitzer, Milkweed, and Booker prizes. Commonly, users make the most use of such collections during breaks, vacations and summer school. A good number of UW libraries utilize rental collections such as the McNaughton Plan to stock their collections, while others routinely purchase materials.

Historically, our library has built a Popular Literature Collection using books donated by members of the campus community. This is particularly pertinent at present as we consider budget cuts, lowered materials budgets and impending serial cancellations.

For students, faculty and staff who enjoy reading "just for fun," despite the present lack of funding, the library hopes to continue developing the Popular Literature Collection. For that reason we are reminding you of our need for donations. Please keep us in mind when you clean your bookshelves or finish that good book you have been curling up with lately. Many enthusiastic readers will appreciate your thoughtfulness.

International Encyclopedia of the Social and Behavioral Sciences Now Available As the title implies, this is a major addition to our Reference Collection. In fact, with 3842 articles in 24 volumes the IESBS is the largest reference work ever published in the social and behavioral sciences and will likely remain a standard reference source for many years to come. The next time you visit the library take a look at the set in the Reference Collection (call number REF H41 .I58 2001). The publisher, Elsevier, also has a web page available with sample content and a list of the articles.

Library Council beginning in October 2002. The primary focus of Council's work is to advise the Public Printer, the Superintendent of Documents, and appropriate members of Government Printing Office staff on practical options for the efficient management and operation of the Federal Depository Library Program.

My typical day can be hectic. At the Circulation Desk we do everything except answer reference questions. The training of students is constant because of the many details they need to know working at a public service desk. We not only check materials in and out, but service the photocopier and microfiche machines, answer many questions, do projects for other departments, help students with AV equipment and teach them how to use our Voyager system.

I found out from other folks that he had alienated his children and was all alone except for the social worker that came to visit. One Christmastime, he came in to the library and told me that he had cancer and didn't know how much longer he would live. He said that when he was a young man, he had learned a very long Christmas poem by heart. He wondered if I would like to hear his poem because he didn't think he would make it to another Christmas. When he finished we both cried and hugged.

NetLibrary is a growing collection of over 5600 books in a wide range of subject areas published by commercial and university presses.  The library consortium has purchased over 1600 titles for use by its members, and the remaining 4000 are freely available from the Project Gutenberg collection of electronic texts.

UWRF users can set up a free account with NetLibrary that allows them to search or browse the entire collection, preview e-books for a brief period online, and check them out for up to 24 hours.  During this time the book is not available to other users in the consortium, and at the end of the loan period the book is automatically checked back in.  Other users may put their names on a waiting list to view the book when it is checked in, or the original user can borrow it for another 24-hour period.  The 4000 books in the public domain collection do not need to be checked out, and an unlimited number of copies are available.

In addition to viewing the books online, users can also download the free netLibrary e-book Reader software which allows them to read e-books from any PC or laptop without being connected to the Internet. The e-book Reader also offers users the ability to write margin notes, add temporary bookmarks and highlighting to pages, search for terms or phrases, and increase or decrease the size of the font for easier reading.

NetLibrary and Early English Books Online include many more features for searching and reading electronic books. Contact the Reference Desk or come to the library for a more thorough introduction to these valuable resources.

For someone who hasn't been in the library in a while, things would appear quite different, perhaps even puzzling.  The card catalog, those files in oak cabinets that provided a road map for the sprawling avenues of books and other resources buried deep in the stacks, no longer exists.  It has been replaced by a computer and technology is now the name of the game.

We're still buying books, adding over 3000 titles a year in our library.  There's a certain level of comfort in having a book to hold.  We understand that people would rather curl up with a book than a computer.  But love it or loathe it, e-books have arrived and they're here to stay.  Two years ago, the e-book marketplace was mostly theoretical.  Today, an e-book is a viable option.  Though the shift to a non-print environment has been occurring steadily (moving from print journals to microforms, e-journals, electronic encyclopedias and dictionaries, etc.), advances in electronic reading devices are sure to accelerate this trend.

So, is this a good thing?  Let's take a closer book.  Barnes and Noble refers to the advent of the e-book as an "exciting revolution in reading."  Books can be downloaded directly from the web at a cost generally lower than the print version.  And most e-books can be read on PCs, laptops or handheld devices, so portability is a definite strength.  E-books are also environmentally friendly.  There are numerous benefits for libraries as well.  Using e-books protects the privacy of patrons and they provide remote patrons the same access as on-site patrons, including the convenience of 24 hours a day, seven days a week access from anywhere.  Costs associated with storing and shipping books and replacing lost, stolen, or damaged materials are eliminated.  In addition, e-books can be checked out, read, and returned online.  But more importantly, from a scholarly standpoint, e-books can be searched by author, title, subject and keyword.  Patrons can conduct full-text searches of every word in every e-book.

So where does that leave us?  With a new resource, full of potential and pitfalls, which will join the print books and journals, microforms collections, compact discs, videos, and electronic databases already available to the UW-RF community.

The library has a long tradition of maintaining specialized resources to support the University's agricultural science programs.  With the recent approval of the new dairy science major, the library has expanded its access to a number of important resources.

To increase the library's book collection to support dairy science, the library worked with faculty from the Department of Animal and Food Science to select over $5,000 worth of new books.  Purchases focus on mastitis, milking equipment, lactation, milk quality, and dairy cattle breeding, housing, and nutrition.  Search these keywords in the Voyager Library Catalog or browse the monthly lists of new materials added to the library (http://www.uwrf.edu/library/newbks/) to view recent titles added to the collection.

The Biological and Agricultural Index, a long-time standard source in the library,  provides citations to articles in English-language periodicals, both popular and professional, that pertain to biology and agriculture.  About 45% of the focus is on agriculture.  The electronic version includes references to articles from 1983 to the present, while the print index available in the library reference area begins with 1916.

Agricola, produced by the National Agriculture Library, indexes a wide range of materials including books, journal articles from world-wide periodicals, conference proceedings, government publications, and extension publications.  The library recently added access to Agricola via the web, covering the years 1984 to the present.  A CD-ROM can be searched in the library for access to materials added to the database from 1970 to 1983.

This past summer, with the help of funding from UW-System, the library added BIOSIS  to its suite of databases.  BIOSIS, or Biological Abstracts, is the leading indexing and abstracting publication for life sciences information.  Our subscription covers 1994 to the present, and includes references and abstracts derived from life sciences research journals published worldwide.

The Journal of Dairy Science is now available online as well as in print.  The easiest way to access the online version is to search the Voyager catalog for this title.  Then follow the link that you will see to the online version.  Please note that the online version covers 1995 to the present and can be accessed from anywhere on campus but not from your home.

We plan to develop the business collection further during the academic year with print resources as well as with new electronic books provided by our provisional membership in Wisconsin's NetLibrary Consortium.  The University of Wisconsin System's Office of Learning and Information Technology currently funds this membership.  NetLibrary soon plans to unveil a new collection of Electronic Books for Graduate Business Schools.  We hope to participate in a free three-month trial of this new collection as the year progresses.  NetLibrary's vision is to provide a special collection of approximately 650 academic electronic books assembled exclusively for business school libraries.  This eBook collection will provide a broad mix of theoretical, practical, applied, and general interest titles.  It is to incorporate the works of scholars such as John Kenneth Galbraith, Don Tapscott, Robert Solow, Dan Schiller, Peter Drucker, Edward Lazear, and other leading scholars.  We will provide more information when the trial period begins.

Mary Augustine, Interlibrary Loan, was awarded the 2000 Chancellor's Award for Excellence. Mary worked on campus for over thirty years and retired in July.  Her positions included bookstore manager and head of Interlibrary Loan.   Her charm and knowledge will be greatly missed by all.

Penny Bohn left the reference staff to take a position as Young Adult Services Librarian at the Santa Monica Public Library.   Living in California was one of Penny's life long dreams.  The library staff wishes her the best of luck in her new position.

Last spring Toni Canfield was hired permanently to supervise stacks maintenance within the Circulation Department.  Toni is a familiar face.  She has worked in a variety of positions in the library after obtaining her MLIS from the University of Michigan.

Former library employee Stephanie Zeman received a J.D. from the William Mitchell College of Law last June and passed the Wisconsin Bar this summer.  Stephanie is currently working for the law firm of Davison & Vlack in River Falls.

During the Fall Semester Textbook Services will begin offering access to the Faculty Center Network on our web page (http://www.uwrf.edu/library/textbook/).  This new resource will facilitate easy and efficient textbook adoption research by faculty and staff.  Faculty Center Network will allow faculty and staff to access a textbook/trade book database containing approximately 125,000 titles.

If you wish to tour the site now, before it is officially textbook accessible, you may access a demo version at http://www.facultycenter.net, click on the "Non-members" button, then click on "Demo".  Please note this is a demo version and not fully functional.

The fully functional Faculty Center Network will be available in time for researching textbook adoptions for Spring Semester.  Once it has been installed on our website, Textbook Services will provide faculty and staff with instructions for accessing the fully functional site.

The Library and the College of Education and Graduate Studies have spent the past year creating a new Curriculum Materials Center (CMC) on Third Floor East.  The primary purpose of the CMC is to support the professional curriculum of the School of Education and Graduate Studies.  We provide these materials for students as they learn to identify, select, evaluate, and use a multiplicity of resources in developing the curriculum for elementary and secondary students. With the opening of the College of Education and Graduate Studies Building, and with our new Voyager Library System in place, we have transferred the print materials formerly housed in the College of Education and Graduate Studies to the library.  We have combined these with our children's literature collection.  We are now adding materials in current subject areas for which the College of Education and Graduate Studies offers teacher certification.

While the library houses the CMC, the new College of Education and Graduate Studies Building now houses an exemplary Educational Technology Center that complements our CMC and focuses solely on familiarizing students and area educators with current educational technologies and computer-based information pertinent to their professional course of study.

The 1997 UW System Libraries Strategic Plan clearly states the need for a balance of print and non-print resources.  It also affirms that information will continue to be available in both print and electronic formats but that current budgets cannot support both formats.

First, we're developing the new Curriculum Materials Collection (located on the upper floor of Davee Library) which was recently moved from the College of Education.  This includes 37 new periodical titles in such areas as coaching, environmental studies, teaching foreign languages, health, etc.; a new reference collection; expanded juvenile collection, particularly grades six to eight; teaching activity guides; learning disabilities; and exemplary K-12 textbooks.

Funding is also being used for traditional materials to address collection deficits in such areas as English as a Second Language, Victorian Literature, Ethnic Studies, Counseling, Photography, Contemporary American Literature, and in addition, $6,000 is being held in reserve to begin developing a core collection of materials that support a new Masters in Management Program that is under consideration by the Board of Regents. Money will also be used to bolster the Reference Collection to purchase several expensive encyclopedias we were unable to afford previoulsly.

The second major component of the UW Libraries initiative is a $2 million allocation for statewide electronic resources.  These funds are being held centrally at System for the statewide consortial purchase of electronic resources.  The most emphasis has been placed on developing statewide resources in business, which supports the university as well as the Wisconsin economy.  Priority has also been given to the sciences, an area that has taken the largest cut in periodical subscriptions in recent years.  Databases purchased with this central funding include Academic Universe, CQ Researcher, Statistical Universe, Math Sci Net, BIOSIS, and the Web of Science.  Other negotiations will take place during the coming year.

The third and final component of the UW Libraries initiative is the appropriation of $534,000 for statewide document delivery.  Again, these funds are being held centrally.  This funding is specifically for five-day delivery of interlibrary loan materials via a van service (South Central Library System) to all UW System libraries.  Our library has participated in this program at our own expense for the past few years with three-day service.  The state will now pick up the entire cost of the program and expand it to five days.  This will be a wonderful boost to the already excellent interlibrary loan service that we provide.

A variety of new bibliographic databases and two full text databases have been added since the last newsletter. These databases give the UW-RF community access to an amazing array of scholarly  materials.

CQ Researcher is the web version of the standard print publication.  It covers many of the most current and controversial issues of the day with complete summaries, including all sides of the issues and bibliographies. Users may browse through articles in the current issue or search for past articles using words, dates or other criteria.

Environment is the electronic version of  Environmental Sciences and Pollution Management Abstracts with coverage beginning in 1981.  This database provides indexing and abstracting of more than 4,000 journals covering worldwide environmental literature.  Environment's coverage includes air, land, water and noise pollution, bacteriology, ecology, toxicology, risk assessment, environmental biotechnology, waste management, water resources, and federal environmental impact statements.

GeoRef is the database of the American Geological Institute and covers worldwide technical literature on geology and geophysics. GeoRef corresponds to the print publications: Bibliography and Index of North American Geology, Bibliography of Theses in Geology, Geophysical Abstracts, Bibliography and Index of Geology Exclusive of North America, and the Bibliography and Index of Geology.  GeoRef includes current coverage of more than 3,500 journals, papers, government publications, theses, dissertations, reports, maps, books and book chapters.

A complete listing of library databases is available on the library's home page (http://www.uwrf.edu/library/).     This page also features a "What's New" column that highlights new databases as they are added.   Some library databases are accessible from off campus.  If you would like a list of passwords or need assistance using any of the databases please contact the Reference Desk ( x3343 or via email at refdesk@uwrf.edu.).

Finding information on the web is easy-usually a matter of entering a few search terms in Yahoo!, AltaVista, or another major directory; however, the real challenge is finding useful, reliable, and up-to date information.  With the explosion of information on the web, many potentially useful web sites have been buried beneath a mountain of poorly-maintained and/or inaccurate resources.

Another California-based effort at creating a directory of useful web resources is INFOMINE (http://infomine.ucr.edu).  Librarians from several University of California campuses contribute to this directory, which focuses on resources of relevance to faculty, students, and research staff at the university level.

Finally, one of the best gateways to useful, reliable, and accurate information on the web is in our own backyard.  The Scout Report Signpost (www.signpost.org/signpost/index.html) originates from the Computer Sciences Department at UW-Madison.  With the motto 'Surf Smarter, Not Longer,' a team of librarians and educators known as the Internet Scout Project selects the resources (currently more than 8,400) for the Signpost directory.  They also provide many other useful tools for navigating the web on their main web page (scout.cs.wisc.edu).

Need a book?  Not sure how to go about finding just the one you are looking for?  The Chalmer Davee Library provides access to materials held in our own library, as well as libraries around the world.

Voyager, the online catalog for the Chalmer Davee Library, provides access to the more than 300,000 books and audiovisual materials and the approximately 1,500 current periodical subscriptions, newspapers and government documents held in the library.   This system features the ability to renew materials or place holds or recalls on items from home.

If you can't find what you*re looking for in our library, the next place to search is WISCAT.  WISCAT is a statewide catalog covering more than 1,200 academic, public, school and other libraries in the state of Wisconsin.  This database has more than 6 million records of books, videos and other types of materials and can be searched by author, title, subject or keyword.

WorldCat takes WISCAT a step further and covers libraries from all over the world.  This catalog contains more than 39 million records of books, journals, musical scores, manuscripts, sound and video recordings, etc.  One prominent feature of this database is the ability to place direct interlibrary loans for desired materials without having to fill out additional forms.  WorldCat and WISCAT can be found by selecting the "Other Library Catalogs" link on the library homepage.

But library catalogs aren't the only places to search for books.  If you want to know what has been published on a topic in the past twenty years or find everything a contemporary author has published then you should search Books in Print.  This database contains complete records from virtually all publishers in the United States, including books that are in print, forthcoming, or declared out-of-print or out-of-stock indefinitely since 1979.  This publication resource can be accessed through the "Reference Sources" link on the library homepage.

BadgerLink is a project of the Department of Public Instruction, Division for Libraries, Technology, and Community Learning. Its goal is to provide access to quality online information resources for Wisconsin residents in cooperation with the state's public, school, academic, and special libraries and Internet Service Providers.

Resource Center provides access to lesson plans, classroom activities, instructional television programs, and more, all provided by leading professional education organizations, and aligned to Wisconsin's model academic standards.

Portal provides Wisconsin educators access to high-quality, highly usable, teacher-reviewed web-based resources for curricula, content, lesson plans, professional development and other selected resources. These resources help Wisconsin educators use technology to meet the Wisconsin Model Academic Standards and create the foundation for a statewide knowledge management system.

LRB News Feeds are short, Web-based descriptions of published information that include hyperlinks to original source documents. News feeds disseminate lists, as they are updated, of publications that are encoded as Really Simple Syndication (RSS) files.

The official compilation of the acts and resolutions of each session of Congress. The Statutes at Large consist of two parts, the first comprising public acts and joint resolutions; the second, private acts and joint resolutions, concurrent resolutions, treaties, proposed and ratified amendment to Constitution and presidential proclamations. The arrangement is by the Public Law number.

Wisconsin Assembly during a biennial session. The Acts are published in pamphlet form through out a legislative session. At the end of the session the Acts are bound, in the order of their enactment, into the Wisconsin Session Laws.

Consist of the Statues of 1898 and the additions and amendments and less the repeals made by the legislature. All laws and parts of laws relating to each subject-matter are brought together under various headings and arranged systematically.

Administrative law encompasses laws and legal principles governing the administration and regulation of government agencies (both Federal and state). Such agencies are delegated power by Congress (or in the case of a state agency, the state legislature) to act as agents for the executive. Generally, administrative agencies are created to protect a public interest rather than to vindicate private rights.

The Federal Register is issued each Federal working day. Many laws enacted by Congress require agencies to issue regulations, since the Federal Register is the medium for notifying the public of official agency actions, all regulations must be published in it. Once the regulations are finalized they are codified into the Code of Federal Regulations.

The CFR is the codification of the general and permanent rules published in the Federal Register by the Executive departments and agencies of the Federal Government. The CFR is divided into 50 titles that represent broad subject areas of Federal regulations. Each title is divided into chapters that often bear the name of the issuing agency. Each chapter is further subdivided into parts covering specific regulatory areas.

The Notice Section lists by agency any proposed rules or hearing to be held on a proposed rule. The Emergency Rules Now in Effect section provides a cumulative list by agency of all emergency rules currently in effect. The rules are published in summary only, with full text appearing in the official state newspaper, the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel. The Notice of Submission of Proposed Rules to the Presiding Officer of Each House of the Legislature, Under S. 22.19, Stats., indicates proposed rules that are at the stage of review. Clearinghouse Rule number are provided and with this number, action on the rule can be traced using the Administrative Rules section of the Bulletin of the Proceedings of the Wisconsin Legislature GOV DOC/ WIS Z 1: pt. The Administrative Rules Filed with the Revisor of Statues Bureau alerts the reader to permanent rules that have already gone through the approval process and will become effective after their publication in the Register. A tentative effective date is given for each rule so listed. A phone number is also provided so the reader can contact the Revisor of Statues Bureau for updated information.

The Final Regulatory Flexibility Analyses lists the final regulatory flexibility analyses for rules that have been published that month. This is included on in the end-of-month Register. Two other sections occasionally appear in the Register: Public Notices, which includes information on informational public hearings about rule related matters, and Notice of Nonacquiescence, which give notice of agencies who are not appealing a court decision but who will not consider that decision as binding upon them in other cases.

An agency may adopt a rule only after the legislature has enacted a law granting this authority to the agency. An agency rule that is adopted under the rulemaking provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 14, has the force and effect of law. Rulemaking in Minnesota: A Guide explains each step of the rulemaking process in Minnesota.

The Code of Federal Regulations is the codification of the general and permanent rules published in the Federal Register by the Executive Department and agencies of the Federal Government. The CFR is divided into 50 titles which represent broad areas subject to Federal regulation. Each title is divided into chapters which usually bear the name of the issuing agency. Each chapter is further subdivided into parts covering specific regulatory areas. The database will be updated throughout the calendar year as the individual title databases are updated.

It also describes the three chief branches of the Federal government and their jurisdictions. In addition, it lays out the basic rights of citizens of the United States. In this database, GPO Access makes available editions and supplements from 1992 forward of Constitution Analysis and Interpretation.

The header of each section indicates when a recent Public Law affects that particular section but the text remains unchanged until the annual revision cycle. Prepared and published by the Office of the Federal Register (OFR), National Archives and Records Administration, each law is first published as a slip law and then later compiled into a volume of the Statutes at Large. The Public Laws database contains the text of each law enacted, and is updated irregularly as the publication of a slip law is authorized by the OFR.

ARC & University Archives does not have a research fee at this time but donations to the center are appreciated and can be made directly to the UW-River Falls ARC or made through the University Foundation.

UW-River Falls faculty and staff can arrange to have a consultation with a reference librarian in their office at a convenient time. The librarian can also assist with selecting and searching relevant electronic databases.

Use Interlibrary Loan to request copies of articles from magazines, journals and newspapers.  Also use Interlibrary Loan to request books and other monographs, videos, and recordings not available from other UW system libraries through Universal Borrowing.

Most books and copies of articles are available for loan.  Books which may not be available include reference materials, rare items, mass market bestsellers, and some dissertations.  Videos and recordings may be requested, but are not always available for loan.  The copy limit for articles is usually 30 pages.

Libraries in Wisconsin supply many of the requested items without charge.  The Chalmer Davee Library also participates in a consortium to obtain materials from out-of-state libraries without charge.  When materials are not available through these sources, charges may incur.  They are determined by the lending library, and generally range from $10 to $15 per item.  Please stipulate the maximum amount you will pay for the material on the interlibrary loan form.

Many requested articles will arrive quickly (one to three business days) via "Electronic Delivery" to your UWRF email account. However, some articles will still be sent to the Interlibrary Loan office through conventional mail from libraries that do not have Electronic Delivery capability. Please allow one to two weeks for these materials to arrive. While waiting for your materials to arrive, log onto the interlibrary loan system to check on the status of your request. When your material arrives in the library, you will receive an email notification via your official UW-River Falls email account of the location of your requested material. Students will pick up books and articles not sent through "Electronic Delivery" at the library Circulation Desk. Faculty and staff will pick up books at the Circulation Desk; articles not sent through "Electronic Delivery" are still mailed to campus offices.

Loan periods are set by the lending library; they vary from one to four weeks.  Renewals generally are not available.  To request a renewal, you must discuss this with staff in the interlibrary loan office.  Please return materials on time, since we depend upon the good will of other libraries to provide materials to you.

Archives are divided according to their designation as ARC Collections or University Collections. Presently, the collections pages consist primarily of collection inventories or holdings information, not online records or searchable databases. However, many indexes and historical records have been placed online by volunteers at USGenWeb. Additional holdings information for records housed at the UW-River Falls ARC and University Archives can be identified using the UW-River Falls Voyager Library Catalog.

The UW-RF University Archives serves as the official repository for the permanent historical records of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and houses materials pertaining to the establishment, development and history of the university.

C. The Chalmer Davee Library will adhere to current laws and System policies so that an otherwise qualified individual with a disability may not, on the basis of their disability be excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of, nor otherwise be subjected to discrimination under any library program, activity, or service.

C. A qualified individual with a disability is someone who (with or without accommodations) meets the essential eligibility requirements for participating in programs, services and activities provided by the Library.

D. Essential Eligibility Requirement means the academic or other technical standards required for admission to or participation in the Universitys programs, services, or activities which an individual must be able to meet with or without accommodation.

E. Accommodations are defined as reasonable modifications or adjustments to library policies, services, activities, or processes that enable a person with disabilities to participate fully in library research, programs, activities and services.

D. Within its budget limitations, the Library will furnish appropriate auxiliary aids and services when necessary to afford a qualified individual with a disability an equal opportunity to participate in, and enjoy, the benefits of the Librarys services.

G. The Library will have a designated Library Disability Services Coordinator, who will be well informed and able to provide information to the public and to the Library staff about reasonable accommodations available to library users with disabilities. The Coordinator will provide information about procedures available to resolve problems and grievances.

M. Working cooperatively with Disability Services to provide textbooks for taping and for sign language interpreters, and in obtaining large print reproductions. These arrangements shall conform to Textbook Services Policies.

B. Every effort will be made to provide services for library users with disabilities at the time the request is made. However, some services for library users with disabilities may need to be delayed or scheduled in advance.

C. The Library Disability Services Coordinator may ask to meet with the person making the request for accommodation to gather additional information, to discuss library services that are available for library users with disabilities, as outlined in Section V, and to refer student petitioners to Disability Services in the Academic Success Center.

D. If a request cannot be accommodated under the provisions outlined in Section V, the library user may complete the Accommodation Request Form, Chalmer Davee Library (See Appendix B.) Or requests may be submitted verbally or via email, following the basic format of the form. All requests for accommodation will be submitted to the Library Disability Services Coordinator.

I. The Library Disability Services Coordinator will notify Library staff of the decision, describe the services to be provided, monitor the acquisition of equipment, if necessary, and explain any modifications in policy and procedure that may be required.

The University of Wisconsin System is committed to making individuals with disabilities full participants in its programs, services and activities through its compliance with Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) of 1990. The Board of Regents recognizes that individuals with disabilities may need accommodations to have equally effective opportunities to participate in or benefit from the university's programs, services and activities.

It is the policy of the University of Wisconsin System that no otherwise qualified individual with a disability shall be denied access to or participation in any program, service, or activity offered by the universities.

Individuals will receive appropriate accommodations to their needs in order to fully participate in or benefit from the university's programs, services and activities in a non discriminatory, integrated setting.

The University of Wisconsin System and any of its agents shall not coerce, intimidate, retaliate against or discriminate against any individual for exercising a right under the ADA or Section 504, or for assisting or supporting another to exercise a right under the ADA or Section 504.

The University of Wisconsin System will not give significant assistance to an agency, organization, or person that discriminates onthe basis of disability in providing any aid, benefit or service to beneficiaries of the university's programs.

These procedures should be applicable to any anticipated complaint, including an appeal of a denied accommodation request. g. An institution will not place a surcharge on a particular individual with a disability or any group of individuals with disabilities to cover the costs of measures that are required to comply with the provisions of Section 504 and the ADA. h. An institution will provide funding for auxiliary aids while an individual's application for funding by other agencies is being reviewed. i. Each institution shall provide periodic in service training for faculty and staff to develop their awareness and understanding of the needs of individuals with disabilities and legal compliance issues.

If requested, institutions will assist an individual in making the necessary applications for funding from other agencies. c. Each individual is required to submit documentation verifying his or her disability and limitations which is appropriately current and prepared by a qualified professional. Individuals submitting incomplete information may be asked to provide additional verifying documentation.

Each facility or part of a facility constructed by, on behalf of, or for the use of the university must be designed and constructed in such a manner that the facility is readily accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities.

If a program is not wholly operated by the university but requires student participation (for example, internships, co op, and student teaching assignments), the institution shall attempt to assure that these activities, as a whole, provide an equal opportunity for the participation of individuals with disabilities.

Prospective enrollees for UW Extension and university outreach programs are responsible for making requests for any special modifications or auxiliary aids. Registration forms and program announcements must allow applicants to identify special needs and request accommodations.

All auxiliary aids, services or other accommodations used by individuals with disabilities to provide access to university programs, services, and activities need not be on hand or present at all times.

The university does not provide individuals with disabilities with personal devices or assistance for personal use, including but not limited to wheelchairs, eye glasses, hearing aids, personal assistance for eating or dressing, or readers for personal use.

Accommodations shall not fundamentally alter the nature of the program, service, or activity; require waiver of essential program or licensure requirements; violate accreditation requirements; unnecessarily intrude on academic freedom; or pose an undue fiscal or administrative burden on the institution.

The university retains authority in determining appropriate accommodations after giving consideration to the wishes of the individual, the documentation provided, and institutional expertise in working with individuals with disabilities.

Each institution shall require that all physical education courses, intercollegiate and intramural athletics, and related activities, taken as a whole, provide an equal opportunity for the participation of qualified individuals with a disability. Individuals who cannot participate in standard physical education courses or compete in athletic programs with or without accommodation because of a disability may be offered alternates that are separate or different, provided that the programs and activities are operated in the most integrated setting appropriate. If accommodations are not possible in a required course, a procedure for requesting a substitution should be available.

For institutions which provide insurance plans and health services, the university shall afford these benefits to qualified persons with disabilities in a manner consistent with ADA. A student health center must provide the same types and levels of service for all students, non disabled and disabled. In addition, student health centers should be prepared to provide individuals with disabilities with information about where specialized health services may be obtained, if these services are not provided at the center.

Financial aid awards may take into account the special needs of individuals with disabilities. Adjustments to awards as allowed by the rules or regulations governing the financial aid program may be made by the financial aid service.

Institutions shall not counsel or advise qualified individuals with disabilities toward more restrictive career objectives than non disabled individuals with similar interests. This does not preclude providing factual information about licensing and certification requirements that may present obstacles to individuals with disabilities in their pursuit of particular careers.

Before providing official recognition or assistance to fraternities, sororities, or other campus organizations, institutions shall request and obtain assurance that the organization does not permit actions prohibited by this policy.

Climatic Data for the World This publication contains monthly mean temperature, pressure, precipitation, vapor pressure, and sunshine for approximately 2,000 surface data collection stations worldwide and monthly mean upper air temperatures, dew point depressions, and wind velocities for approximately 500 observing sites.

Her interest in international films grows out of her experience as a child living in Thailand. She participated in an NEH seminar on Southeast Asian culture at the East West Center at the University of Hawaii in Honolulu.

What: The UWRF Wellness Challenge is a FREE opportunity for ALL students, faculty and staff. It encourages healthier living through physical activity, nutrition, safety and overall wellness. This four week program is designed with incentives to develop a commitment to healthy lifestyle choices.

The Leadership Development and Service Committee will be conducting a Leadership Development Series. Dr. Marina Onken  speak about various leadership styles. Feel free to bring a lunch. This is the first in a series, more to follow next month.

This drive is intended to target people with type "O" blood. The Red Cross is short on these supplies.  We are also looking for people to donate their time to help out with the drive. If you would like to make an appointment to donate or sign-up to contirbute your time, please email Intramurals@uwrf.edu. You may also send any questions or concerns to intramurals@uwrf.edu as well or call 425-4444.

On February 7, 2007, thousands of sports educators, coaches, athletic directors, recreation directors, association members, sponsors, students, and parents across the country will show their support of the Day and of this year's theme, "Throw like a girl  Lead like a champion!"

Hyman died of Marfan's Syndrome in 1986 while competing in a volleyball tournament in Japan. Since that time, NGWSD has evolved into a day to acknowledge the past and recognize current sports achievements, the positive influence of sports participation, and the continuing struggle for equality and access for women in sports.

Travelers and dreamers, learn the basic Italian expressions, practical vocabulary, and get some wonderful cultural and travel insights. This relaxed, interactive class of conversation and role playing will help you develop the confidence you need to enjoy a full Italian experience abroad. Creative communication-oriented activities reflect typical situations you may encounter every day in an Italian-speaking environment.

February 9, 2007. Students who will be graduating Spring or Summer may participate in the Spring Commencement ceremonies. A $40 application fee will be added to the student's UWRF account once the application is filed in the Registrar's Office. Students participating in Spring Commencement must provide their own cap and gown, which must be black.

The conference will include workshops, presentations and panel discussions, and it will provide an opportunity to meet and exchange ideas with colleagues interested in civic engagement and the work done by SENCER and Campus Compact.

Senator Robert F. Kennedy was assassinated at the Ambassador Hotel. This film takes us through the lives and reactions of 22 people who were at the hotel that night. The group represents a diverse spectrum of people who represent America at one of its most defining thresholds.

Robert F. Kennedy was assassinated at the Ambassador Hotel. This film takes us through the lives and reactions of 22 people who were at the hotel that night. The group represents a diverse spectrum of people who represent America at one of its most defining thresholds.

How is that status determined, and why would it change? Across the country, community and school groups, and even professional science societies responded to the 2006 Pluto decision with varied emotions, ranging from deep disappointment (poor Pluto) to scientific satisfaction (at last, a reasonable criterion). Through the case of Pluto, learn how science reinvents itself as new discoveries are made.

Incredible archaeological discoveries have been made in Egypt over the past several decades. But not since the 1922 excavation of the tomb of the boy-king, Tutankhamun, have further intact tombs been identified, let alone cleared - until now. Experience the UW-River Falls J-term Journey to Egypt program's visit to the Valley of Kings, as they see the recent excavation in progress - and learn about the discovery of a new, unopened tomb, KV 63. Its construction, grave goods and ritual objects have re-ignited the world's passion for all things Ancient Egyptian. Presented by Dr. Steven Derfler, UW-River Falls Art Department.

The Kingdom of Morocco is truly at the crossroads of the world. For thousands of years, its location at the northwest tip of Africa has allowed it to absorb elements of European, Sub-Saharan African, and Arab culture in its quest for identity. As a result, its culture, history, religion, art and politics is a melange that gives it a unique place among nations.

Continue to explore culture, vocabulary, and grammar as you increase your Spanish language communication skills. A continuation of Spanish I, this practical, proficiency-based non-credit class features creative communication-oriented activities that reflect typical situations you may encounter every day in a Spanish-speaking environment.

Please consider including this event in your course syllabus next semester and encourage your students to attend. This is a great opportunity for students, staff, and faculty to network with area employers.

Students will have the opportunity to participate in mock interviews with area employers, attend the networking luncheon with alumni, receive dress for success consultations, listen to professional presentations featuring alumni and HR representatives, and sign up for the Hire A Falcon online job searching system. For additional information please contact Kristin Wenzel or McKenna Schumacher in Career Services at ext. 3572.

We are planning to have many free or reduced cost services such as cholesterol testing, massages, blood pressure checks, body composition analysis/body fat measurements, hair up-dos, hearing screening, and spinal exams and consultations. There will be many more health related educational materials and interactive activities during the event.

Civic engagement takes place in many forms. Whether its designing environmentally friendly buildings, expressing our opinions on blogs, or creating safe climates in the classroom, we make a difference in our respective communities at physical, virtual, and social-psychological levels. This conference invites you to explore the myriad spaces where students, faculty, alumni, staff and local residents can come together to exchange ideas, solve problems, and improve the physical and intellectual environments on college campuses.

The newly adapted version of the famous story includes new insights into this remarkable young girl and her extraordinary account of the years she endured in hiding with family and friends in Nazi-occupied Amsterdam. The Diary of Anne Frank is a story of poignancy and importance for all our lives today.

How is an evening of poetry, music and rivers relevant to how we connect to nature? Beethoven could not have written The Pastoral Symphony without having spent hours walking in the forest. Carl Sandburg shared his fascination with the Mississippi River and the jazz bands that performed on steam boats in his Jazz Fantasia. Join us for this confluence of the arts, including performances of Bach, Beethoven and Smetana as well as the poetry of Carl Sandburg, Langston Hughes and Kate Green - all inspired by connections to the natural world. Presented by Carol Bjorlie, UW-River Falls Music Department.

Welcome to the new academic year! Speaking of new, this issue of the Library Link newsletter highlights many new things in the libraryan expanded loan period for faculty, the ITS deployment of wireless throughout the library building, expanded space for group study, the development of a digital institutional repository, access to more online journal articles, and some marvelous and generous donations of artwork and resources that enhance our library.

Perhaps most importantly, we have a number of new staff in the library that I am pleased to introduce. Our staff members are our most important resource. Please take a moment to read about them. They are engaged in a variety of activitiesordering books, managing collections, developing reliable technology, cataloging materials to make them easily accessible, teaching students how to find information, answering questions at the Research Help Desk, making course materials easily accessible on reserve, processing interlibrary loan requests, developing outreach programs, and managing archival collections. Our new staff members, joining those of us who have served the University for many years, look forward to working with faculty to advance the librarys missionsupporting the University community by providing a variety of information resources and services to encourage open inquiry, learning, and scholarship.

The sale will take place in the atrium on the main level and will include a large and varied selection of fiction and non-fiction items. New titles will be added on a regular basis throughout the sale.

Thank you to Jim King who used his senior recital to raise funds for the library's Curriculum Materials Collection. Mr. King, who studied business and music at UW-River Falls, spent the last 3 years reading to preschool-age children at the campus childcare center and wanted to increase the selection of children's books available in the library.

Walk-in sessions are free, do not require registration and are   open to everyone including individual students, professors and staff, university   classes, and members of the general public. Proof of attendance slips can be   provided to students whose professors require or offer extra credit for   attendance. Visit the Walk-in Library   Orientation Session website for times and   location.

MINDS@UW is a digital, institutional repository service offered by the Chalmer Davee Library, in partnership with the University of Wisconsin System, for all current students, faculty members, and staff of UW-River Falls. The purpose of MINDS@UW is to create a sustainable infrastructure for the dissemination of digitally conceived scholarly research materials in an ever-evolving, technology based environment.

MINDS@UW seeks to collect published and unpublished electronic scholarly research in any discipline. Submissions can include research papers, pre-prints, teaching materials, datasets, photographs, videos, learning objects, masters theses or dissertations, student projects or papers, posters, technical reports, and conference papers. Materials are indexed, organized by subject into communities and sub-communities, assigned a persistent URL, and integrated into a searchable web-interface.

The Chalmer Davee Library recently completed its first comprehensive inventory in over fifteen years. The project, which required shelf reading then hand scanning each item individually, began in March and lasted through July.

More eJournals Available in Academic Search Premier Thanks to funding from the Student Technology Fee, the library has recently upgraded from EBSCOhosts Academic Search Elite to the Academic Search Premier database. Academic Search Premier provides students with immediate access to over 4,700 high quality, full-text, scholarly journals in a wide variety of disciplines including computer science, engineering, physics, chemistry, language and linguistics, arts and literature, medical sciences, ethnic studies, and many more. Premier offers almost twice the number of titles as did Academic Search Elite as well as offering indexing and abstracts for all 8,176 journals in the collection.

The Student Technology Fee fund is a special fund that supports information technology initiatives on campus. Our students recognize the value of readily accessible scholarly materials and chose to fund this proposal because of the benefits it will provide to individuals in all areas of study. We are proud to provide the Academic Search Premier database and other quality resources as part of our continued commitment to undergraduate research and scholarship.

Toni Canfield, who has worked at the library for 13 years in various departments, transferred into a full-time classified position in the Circulation Department in July, 2006. Toni will divide her time between Stacks Maintenance and Reserve.

Cate Dodson, who has worked at the library as an LTE in the Archives and Reference Department for several years, began a new position in August, 2006. Cate will provide assistance at the Research Help Desk and Interlibrary Loan Department, as well as coordinating the library's online newsletter and exhibits.

Library held a semi-annual booksale in September. Several thousand books were sold over a two-day period. The majority of the unsold books were donated to the River Falls chapter of the American Association of University Women.

Professor of English, Dr. Nick Karolides, held a book signing/author talk in December. Dr. Karolides spoke on the politics of censorship in relation to his latest work, a revised edition of Banned Books: Literature Suppressed on Political Grounds. Signed copies of this and several other titles were sold with proceeds going to the purchase of challenged books for the library collection.

This maintenance includes (but is not limited to): resolving barcode problems, creating new call number labels, deleting records for lost or withdrawn items, closing ceased titles for serials, adding records for new serial titles, and correcting pre-AACR2 records. Also the Cataloging Department is responsible for adding and correcting authority records for all personal or corporation names, all series titles, and all subject headings.

Classification System and Cutter Tables to classify all materials. Periodicals/Journals are an exception to this rule as they are arranged alphabetically, and items such as Web Sites or Databases will not require classification numbers as they do not have individual items attached to the record.

Books, Government Documents, materials for the Archives, materials for the CMC Collection, videos, DVDs, CDs, CD-ROMs, maps and other cartographic materials, standing orders that are shelved in the main stacks, and Web Sites. These items will be processed in date order (oldest will be processed first) with additional preference given to items ordered by University faculty over those items ordered by library staff. Alternating between the various formats will be left to each individual catalogers discretion, keeping in mind that all materials should be processed within one month of receipt by the department.

If the item is a government document, the wait time for checking in OCLC will be three months. After three months, cataloging staff will create a provisional record as dictated in the Cataloging Department Procedures Manual.

The Cataloging Department oversees the Processing Department students who add call number labels, date due slips and any additional labels/notes to the items. The students also stamp and secure each item. In addition, the Processing Department handles all repairs for the library.

All faculty and staff members will receive an e-mail notifying them that the item(s) they ordered have been processed by the Cataloging and Processing Departments and are available for use. The student assistants and student workers in the Processing Department will take care of this task. Instructions for this process are found in the Student Manual for the Cataloging Department.

All materials in the library's circulating collection including books, CMC books, audio tapes, compact discs, records, scores, theses, video recordings , DVDs, and circulating government documents are available for library patrons to check out, take with them and use. All reference materials, all periodicals and newspapers, selected government documents, and maps do not circulate.

Faculty may apply for proxy privileges. They may assign one or more individuals as proxies, so that these individuals can check out materials without the faculty members I.D. card. Faculty members are responsible for all materials checked out via proxy or with their I.D. card.

Students who come to campus and attend classes only at night or on weekends will be encouraged to obtain their University I.D. card at the Food Service Office. As an interim measure, they will be issued a temporary borrowers card at no charge in order to check out materials. They must show proof of current registration.

A. A community borrower is a library patron who wants to borrow circulating library materials but is not in one of the following categories: UW-River Falls faculty/students/staff; emeriti/retired faculty and staff; faculty/students/staff from any school in the UW-System including extension and extended degree.

A. Pursuant to Wisconsin Statutes 43.30, library records indicating the identity of any individual who borrows or uses the librarys materials, resources, or services will not be disclosed except by court order or to persons acting with in the scope of their duties in the administration of the library.

B. A circulating item may be renewed up to ten times, if no other library patron has placed a hold or recall on the item. When the renewal limit is reached, patrons must bring materials back to the library before the materials can be checked-out again.

C. Patrons are notified when the material they recalled is available. Recalled material is held at the Circulation Desk for seven days and, if not checked out by the requesting patron, is returned to the circulating collection.

If the item is not checked out a search procedure follows. If the item is found, the patron is notified and the item is held at the Circulation Desk for seven days. If the item is not found after the first search, the status is set to missing and the patron is notified that they may use interlibrary loan to obtain the item.

A. Items not found on the shelf are entered into the computer system as "missing". These items are searched regularly. If, after one year, they are not located, they are referred to the department of origin for replacement or withdrawal.

A. When an item is overdue12 weeks it is considered lost. Patrons may not renew lost materials. The patron holding the item is billed $50.00 for each lost item. The fee for lost Popular Literature materials is $20.00 Financial holds are placed on the Registrars Student Information System for each student holding lost material. If a patron returns lost material within 3 months, the lost fee is refunded to the patron, minus a $20.00 processing fee that is retained by the library.

B. Patrons may present an identical edition of a lost item in lieu of paying the $50.00 lost fee. These items will be accepted at the discretion of the Collection Development Librarian. A $20.00 processing fee is charged if a replacement is accepted.

The patron will be asked to search thoroughly for the lost materials, but the library will assume the patron is acting in good faith and will not charge the lost fee, place a financial hold on the students SIS record, or suspend a community patrons borrowing privileges.

A notation will be made on the patrons record indicating that they have claimed to have returned material. Should they claim a second time to have returned an item, regular lost procedures will follow.

A. Damaged items are either repaired at the librarys expense or replaced. If the item is damaged beyond repair, the patron is sent a letter of explanation and charged the $50.00 replacement fee. The patron may bring in an exact replacement copy, and is charged a $10.00 processing fee.

In addition to a change machine, change is available at the Circulation Desk. No checks are cashed. This service is a convenience and when no change is available patrons are sent to the Student Center or a bank. Bills over $10.00 are not changed.

A. The University provides an excellent environment for learning, emphasizing the importance of faculty-student interaction in classroom, laboratories, academic advising, and co-curricular activities.

B. The University offers liberal arts programs and degrees to meet regional needs in the arts, humanities, mathematics, natural and physical sciences, and social and behavioral sciences. The liberal arts also strengthen and broaden programs in the agricultural sciences, teacher education, and business administration.

E. The University offers graduate programs in education, agriculture, and other areas clearly associated with its mission. Development of cooperative graduate instructional programs with appropriate institutions is encouraged.

F. The University expects scholarly activity, including research, scholarship, and creative endeavor, that supports its programs at the associate and baccalaureate level, its selected graduate programs, and its select mission.

G. The University continues to develop interinstitutional relationships in cooperative research, graduate training, and undergraduate programs within the state, region, and world. As a border institution, the University promotes interstate cooperation.

I. The University offers students the opportunity to increase their global awareness and sensitivity to other cultures. It also has a continuing commitment to provide opportunities for students to live, study, and travel abroad and to increase the number and diversity of international students on campus.

J. The University provides public service by using its resources to address problems and concerns throughout the state and region. Special emphasis is placed on cooperative extension, and economic development outreach.

The primary mission of the Chalmer Davee Library is to acquire, organize, maintain, promote, and make accessible information, regardless of format, that supports the University's curricular and research needs and service activities.

Librarian under the supervision of the Library Director. The Collection Development Librarian consults with faculty members in developing a library collection that meets the institutional, instructional and research needs of the university. The Library must also consider available funding when approving acquisitions. The materials budget does not allow the library to obtain all requested items. We therefore work with academic departments and programs to set priorities in order to attain materials most essential to the core curriculum. While every faculty member is entitled to participate in the selection process, each academic department or program has a designated liaison who works with the library to facilitate the ordering of materials in that discipline.

Base departmental allocations are formulated using the total number of UWRF FTE faculty in that field. Departments with graduate programs receive additional funds based on the number of graduate students in their area. A supplementary fund is set aside to address collection deficits. Small grants are given to departments and programs from this fund on a rotating basis. Budgets are allocated in the fall. The library then assigns a deadline by which departments must submit their orders. Departmental monies revert to the librarys general fund after that deadline.

Academic departments and programs may request that the Collection Development Librarian review the collection in their discipline when they undergo an Audit or Review. However, the depth of the collection assessment is subject to the availability of contemporary recommended bibliographies in that subject area, or the ability to afford electronic collection assessment services.

The Library will attempt to acquire one copy of all monographs published by UW-River Falls faculty members. In general, faculty publications are placed in the Circulating collection. Second copies (received as gifts) are placed in the Area Research Center and Archives.

Foreign language materials are acquired only to support the language curriculum or as standard foreign language publications acquired for reference purposes. English translations of foreign works are considered using the general selection guidelines.

The library appreciates gifts of books, audiovisual materials, and periodicals, including duplicate titles. The library retains the right to refuse materials that do not meet the library's selection criteria or have processing costs that exceed their worth. The library maintains unconditional ownership of donations and makes the final decision as to their disposition. The library reserves the right to decide the conditions of display, location and means of access to the gift materials. Items not added to the collection are offered to other libraries, sold at library book sales, or are treated as weeded items. Donors may request that the library return materials the library does not utilize. Delivery of gifts is the responsibility of the donor.

If the donor wishes to use the gift as a tax deduction, he or she is responsible for obtaining an appraisal from an appropriate professional outside the Davee Library. The library provides the donor with a letter acknowledging gifts, but cannot legally estimate their value.

Other than collecting K-12 textbooks for the Curriculum Materials Center, the library does not ordinarily collect textbooks. Current textbooks that directly support the curriculum are available through Textbook Services.

Occasionally, a textbook may be acquired if it is deemed by the Collection Development Librarian, in consultation with faculty in the field, to be the best available source of information within a given discipline.

Department of Public Instruction. The College of Education and Graduate Studies, and the library, will make every effort to provide a balanced collection based on the needs of students enrolled in the teacher education program, using the guidelines in section III above. Accurate depiction of racial, ethnic and cultural groups and the absence of gender stereotyping are also considered.

Serials are budgeted separately and are not a part of the monograph budget. In recent years, significant price increases for subscription publications have threatened to absorb an excessive portion of the LibraryBudget.

We therefore limit periodical subscriptions to a certain proportion of the Library Materials Budget. Expenses are monitored and certain limits are established. The limit is adjusted each fiscal year to accommodate the recommendations of teaching faculty and others responsible for collection development. Interlibrary loan requests are examined in order to agree with national copyright laws. Criteria for setting limits are the demand for new periodicals and the assessment of current expenditures, including renewals and cancellations.

University community. In selecting new subscriptions, the relevance of the newspaper to specific courses, current coverage of major geographical areas, representation of diverse political and social viewpoints, and the general selection guidelines will be considered.

Definitions: Electronic resources include such items as bibliographic indexes, abstracts, databases, data files, and full-text multimedia resources that are produced on computer disc or are accessed via the Internet.

A selective collection of materials that serves to introduce and define a subject and to indicate the varieties of information available elsewhere. It may include dictionaries, encyclopedias, access to appropriate bibliographic databases, selected editions of important works, historical surveys, bibliographies, handbooks, and a few major periodicals. The collection is frequently and systematically reviewed for currency of information.

The emphasis at this level is on providing resources that introduce and define a subject. A collection at this level includes basic reference tools and explanatory works, such as textbooks; historical descriptions of the subject's development; general works devoted to major topics and figures in the field; and selective major periodicals.

At the advanced level, basic information about a subject is provided on a wider range of topics and with more depth. There is a broader selection of basic explanatory works, historical descriptions, reference tools, and periodicals that serve to introduce and define a subject. An advanced basic information level is sufficient to support students in basic courses as well as supporting the basic information needs of patrons in public and special libraries.

A collection that is adequate to impart and maintain knowledge about a subject in a systematic way but at a level of less than research intensity. The collection includes a wide range of basic works in appropriate formats, a significant number of classic retrospective materials, complete collections of the works of more important writers, selections from the works of secondary writers, a selection of representative journals, access to appropriate machinereadable data files, and the reference tools and fundamental bibliographical apparatus pertaining to the subject. At the study of instructional support level, a collection is adequate to support independent study and most learning needs of the clientele of public and special libraries, as well as undergraduate and some graduate instruction. The collection is systematically reviewed for currency of information and to assure that essential and significant information is retained.

This subdivision of a level 3 collection provides resources adequate for imparting and maintaining knowledge about the basic or primary topics of a subject area. The collection includes a broad range of basic works in appropriate formats, classic retrospective materials, all key journals on primary topics, selected journals and seminal works on secondary topics, access to appropriate machinereadable data files, and the reference tools and fundamental bibliographical apparatus pertaining to the subject.

This subdivision of level 3 supports undergraduate courses, including advanced undergraduate courses, as well as most independent study needs of the clientele of public and special libraries. It is not adequate to support master's degree programs.

The advanced subdivision of level 3 provides resources adequate for imparting and maintaining knowledge about the primary and secondary topics of a subject area. The collection includes a significant number of seminal works and journals on the primary and secondary topics in the field; a significant number of retrospective materials; a substantial collection of works by secondary figures; works that provide more in-depth discussions of research, techniques, and evaluation; access to appropriate machine-readable data files; and reference tools and fundamental bibliographic apparatus pertaining to the subject. This level supports all courses of undergraduate study and master's degree programs as well as the more advanced independent study needs of the patrons of public and special libraries.

A collection that includes the major published source materials required for dissertation and independent research, including materials containing research reporting, new findings, scientific experimental results, and other information useful to researchers. It is intended to include all important reference works and a wide selection of specialized monographs in the field. Pertinent foreign language materials are included. Older material is usually retained for historical research and actively preserved.

A collection in which the library endeavors, so far as it is reasonably possible, to include all significant works of recorded knowledge (publications, manuscripts, other forms), in all applicable languages, for a necessarily defined and limited field. This level of collection intensity is one that maintains a "special collection"; the aim, if not the achievement, is exhaustiveness. Older material is retained for historical research with active preservation efforts. ** According to the above stated levels of collection development, the library will severely limit the purchase of materials solely for the research of individual faculty and staff members if this research cannot be adequately provided through level 3b. Although attempts will be made to provide on-the-premises research materials for as many faculty as possible it must be realized that it has become impossible for all but the most inclusive large libraries to support faculty research from their resources alone. Faculty and staff members who are engaged in scholarly research that falls outside the bounds of the university's mission and curriculum must use interlibrary loan services.

The following section includes the major classes and subclasses of knowledge as detailed in the Library of Congress Classification System. *Starred sections indicate subject areas that correspond to UWRF's accredited programs.

The selection of jobbers, publishers, approval plans, vendors, etc., will be left to library personnel in compliance with any special Book Bid processes contracted by the University of Wisconsin System. Emphasis will be on speed, accuracy, special services, and discount.

Collection review is done on a rotating basis. Weeding is an integral part of the process. If the condition of an item suggests removal but the content cannot be replaced, consideration is given to rebinding and repair.

Materials selected for removal will be noted by subject and appropriate academic department(s) will be asked to review materials before they are discarded. Those materials removed may be offered to other Wisconsin academic libraries or for sale at a library book sale. The library will dispose of materials not sold at booksales.

The Library recognizes that the needs of its users may exceed the resources available to meet those demands. This discrepancy is particularly apparent in areas that do not correspond to the curricular offerings of UW-River Falls. In order to satisfy many of these special needs, the Library participates in cooperative arrangements with other libraries. Specialized research materials are requested through regular interlibrary loan channels.

The University of Wisconsin System finds it most cost effective and better supports the Wisconsin Idea when all UW campuses participate in the state wide consortial purchase of shared electronic resources. The Council of University of Wisconsin Libraries is currently considering the attached Proposed Guidelines for Shared Electronic Collections. It will become an official part of our Collection Development Policy when it is adopted.

This collection of electronic information resources is meant to help support the basic research needs and common curricula of UW campuses and to serve the needs of distributive learning. It is a collection that is used actively for undergraduate and graduate instruction across UW System and is a primary resource within a particular field of instruction or research. Selection of the resources is based on the rationale, principles and criteria listed below.

In order to qualify for central funding, the selected title needs to have support from the majority of UW libraries, i.e., 8 votes. (Each UW System campus has one vote, and UW Colleges constitutes one vote).

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls, Chalmer Davee Library supports the following documents as published by the American Library Association. These policies serve as guidelines in the general administration of the library collection and services.

Books and other materials have not been selected or have been removed from library collections for prejudicial language and ideas, political content, economic theory, social philosophy, religious beliefs, sexual expression, and other topics of a potentially controversial nature. Some examples of censorship may include removing or not selecting materials because they are considered by some as racist or sexist; not purchasing conservative religious materials; not selecting materials about or by minorities because it is through these groups or interests are not represented in the community; or not providing information on or materials from nonmainstream political entities. Librarians may seek to increase user awareness of materials on various social concerns by many means, including, but not limited to, issuing bibliographies and presenting exhibits and programs.

Librarians have a professional responsibility to be inclusive, not exclusive, in collection development and in the provision of interlibrary loan. Access to all materials legally obtainable should be assured to the user, and policies should not unjustly exclude materials even if they are offensive to the librarian or the user. Collection development should reflect the philosophy inherent in article 2 of the Library Bill of Rights: "Libraries should provide materials and information presenting all points of view on current and historical issues. Materials should not be proscribed or removed because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval." A balanced collection reflects a diversity of materials in the languages in common use in the community which the library serves. Collection development and the selection of materials should be done according to professional standards and established selection and review procedures. There are many complex facets to any issue, and variations of context in which issues may be expressed, discussed, or interpreted. Librarians have a professional responsibility to be fair, just, and equitable and to give all library users equal protection in guarding against violation of the library patron's right to read, view or listen to materials and resources protected by the First Amendment, no matter what the viewpoint of the author, creator, or selector.

Librarians have an obligation to protect library collections from removal of materials based on personal bias or prejudice, and to select and support the access to materials on all subjects that meet, as closely as possible, the needs and interests of all persons in the community which the library serves. This includes materials that reflect political, economic, religious, social, minority, and sexual issues. Intellectual freedom, the essence of equitable library services, provides for free access to all expressions of ideas through which any and all sides of a question, cause, or movement may be explored. Toleration is meaningless without tolerance for what some may consider detestable. Librarians cannot justly permit their own preferences to limit their degree of tolerance in collection development, because freedom is indivisible. (Adopted July 14, 1982; amended January 10, 1990, by the ALA Council).

However, removing or obliterating such ratings--if placed there by or with permission of the copyright holder--could constitute expurgation, which is also unacceptable. The American Library Association opposes efforts which aim at closing any path to knowledge. This statement does not however, exclude the adoption of organizational schemes designed as directional aids or to facilities access to materials.

The American Library Association declares as a matter of firm principle that it is the responsibility of every library to have a clearly defined materials selection policy in written form which reflects the Library Bill of Rights, and which is approved by the appropriate governing authority.

The Library Bill of Rights states in Article 1 that "Materials should not be excluded because of the origin, background, or views of those contributing to their creation," and in Article 2, that "Materials should not be proscribed or removed because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval." Freedom of expression is protected by the Constitution of the United States, but constitutionally protected expression is often separated from unprotected expression only by a dim and uncertain line. The Constitution requires a procedure designed to focus searchingly on challenged expression before it can be suppressed. An adversary hearing is a part of this procedure.

Based on its constitutional, ethical, and historical heritage, American librarianship is uniquely positioned to address the broad range of information issues being raised in this revolution. In particular, librarians address intellectual freedom from a strong ethical base and an abiding commitment to the preservation of the individual's rights. Freedom of expression is an inalienable human right and the foundation for self-government.

Freedom of expression encompasses the freedom of speech and the corollary right to receive information. These rights extend to minors as well as adults. Libraries and librarians exist to facilitate the exercise of these rights by selecting, producing, providing access to, identifying, retrieving, organizing, providing instruction in the use of, and preserving recorded expression regardless of format or technology. The American Library Association expresses these basic principles of librarianship in its CODE OF ETHICS and in the LIBRARY BILL OF RIGHTS and its Interpretations. These serve to guide librarians and library governing bodies in addressing issues of intellectual freedom that arise when the library provides access to electronic information, services, and networks. Issues arising from the still-developing technology of computer-mediated information generation, distribution, and retrieval need to be approached and regularly reviewed from a context of constitutional principles and ALA policies so that fundamental and traditional tenets of librarianship are not swept away. Electronic information flows across boundaries and barriers despite attempts by individuals, governments, and private entities to channel or control it. Even so, many people, for reasons of technology, infrastructure, or socio-economic status, do not have access to electronic information.

In making decisions about how to offer access to electronic information, each library should consider its mission, goals, objectives, cooperative agreements, and the needs of the entire community it serves.

AND FACILITIES. Users should not be restricted or denied access for expressing or receiving constitutionally protected speech. Users' access should not be changed without due process, including, but not limited to, formal notice and a means of appeal. Although electronic systems may include distinct property rights and security concerns, such elements may not be employed as a subterfuge to deny users' access to information. Users have the right to be free of unreasonable limitations or conditions set by libraries, librarians, system administrators, vendors, network service providers, or others. Contracts, agreements, and licenses entered into by libraries on behalf of their users should not violate this right. Users also have a right to information, training and assistance necessary to operate the hardware and software provided by the library.

Some information accessed electronically may not meet a library's selection or collection development policy. It is, therefore, left to each user to determine what is appropriate. Parents and legal guardians who are concerned about their children's use of electronic resources should provide guidance to their own children. Libraries and librarians should not deny or limit access to information available via electronic resources because of its allegedly controversial content or because of the librarian's personal beliefs or fear of confrontation. Information retrieved or utilized electronically should be considered constitutionally protected unless determined otherwise by a court with appropriate jurisdiction. Libraries, acting within their mission and objectives, must support access to information on all subjects that serve the needs of interests of each user, regardless of the user's age or the content of the material. Libraries have an obligation to provide access to government information available in electronic format. Libraries and librarians should not deny access to information solely on the grounds that it is perceived to lack value. In order to prevent the loss of information, and to preserve the cultural record, libraries may need to expand their selection or collection development policies to ensure preservation, in appropriate formats, of information obtained electronically. Electronic resources provide unprecedented opportunities to expand the scope of information available to users. Libraries and librarians should provide access to information presenting all points of view. The provision of access does not imply sponsorship or endorsement. These principles pertain to electronic resources no less than they do to the more traditional sources of information in libraries.

Archives should collect all "official UW-RF publications." b. A reasonable effort will be made to obtain State documents which are of interest to the UWRF community which are not included in the Wisconsin depository system. Such publication will be obtained gratis or at the lowest possible cost, e.g., Wisconsin Geological Survey and Wisconsin Extension documents. c. Currently, electronic publications are not represented in Wisconsin Depository shipments.

Wisconsin State Agencies and Their Call Numbers and is housed in the Government Documents Dept. c. Currently there is not systematic way to identify electronic publication from the state. URLs are added to bibliographic records for tangible items.

D. Bibliographic Instruction. The Government Documents Librarian will actively participate in the Library's instruction program in order to promote the use of government documents and to make the wide availability of such publications known to UWRF students and faculty.

Chalmer Davee Library supplements its holdings through Interlibrary Loan (ILL), borrowing needed materials from other libraries to support the educational, research, and general needs of our University community.

The ILL department is also responsible for lending materials owned by our library to institutions requesting them to answer their patrons needs. Procedure for ILL services are based on the National Interlibrary Code, 1993 and the Copyright Law.

University of Wisconsin-River Falls, no service charge is assessed for locating and requesting materials for academic use. The cost of fees required for requests sent to the Wisconsin Interlibrary Loan department in Madison (WILS) on behalf of undergraduates, graduates, faculty, and staff are absorbed by Chalmer Davee Library. However, undergraduates and graduates are responsible for any fees, such as photocopy charges, postage reimbursement, or handling fees, imposed by lending institutions other than member libraries. All costs incurred for requests submitted by staff or faculty are absorbed by Chalmer Davee Library.

Requests are sent to as many as five libraries, each library is given three days to answer a request. Patrons are informed that a period of five to seven days is the minimum amount of time before a request may be expected to be filled.

Materials requested through ILL are held at the Circulation desk for distribution by patrons. Due to the volume of requests received by ILL, the responsibility of contacting or stopping by at the Circulation desk to ascertain arrival of material is left to the patron.

Chalmer Davee lends materials that are available from the circulating collection. This includes some videos, sound recordings, and circulating Government Document and Archival materials. Books are loaned for a 28 day period. Videos are on loan for a two week period. Renewals are allowed on a case by case basis. Photocopies are available with a limit of 50 pages.

Charging a lending fee for photocopy service to libraries who are not reciprocal was implemented in September, 1995. Our fee is $4.00 for up to 50 pages of copy. Chalmer Davee Library does not charge non-profit libraries located in Wisconsin. Our policy provides two methods payment. We provide an invoice on the request copy accompanying material shipped out. We also utilize the OCLC Interlibrary Loan Fee Management program which allows us to issue charges electronically.

The Library provides workstations for free public access to the Internet as an informational and educational resource. Resources available on the Internet complement and supplement the traditional and electronic collections of the Chalmer Davee Library. A guest login is provided for anonymous use.

Wisconsin System to afford broad access to information technology resources for university students, faculty and staff for use in fulfilling the universitys missions, and for appropriate university-related activities [emphasis added]. Therefore, all internet resources accessible in the Library are provided equally to all library users, consistent with the universitys public service functions.

The Chalmer Davee Library does not monitor and has no control over the information accessed through the Internet, and is not responsible for the nature of nor the accuracy of any information accessed on the Internet.

The Library is not responsible for what a minor or adult may locate on the Internet. As with other library materials, restriction of a minors access to the Internet is the responsibility of the parent or legal guardian.

B. While the library is primarily a resource for the faculty, students and staff of UW-River Falls, as a state-supported institution it is also open to the public. No distinctions are made between different categories of users when providing routine reference service. Reference staff give service to library users accurately, efficiently, and with courtesy without showing favoritism to any one user or group of users.

C. All library materials, including all electronic resources available on Library Infostations, may be used by all library users who come into the library, regardless of their category or affiliation with the University.

D. Generally, users asking ready reference questions will have the information provided for them, while users with more difficult and involved questions will be instructed in how to conduct their own research.

B. Directional questions. Reference staff provide directional assistance and answer general questions about the library and its services. Questions of a mechanical nature about photocopiers and microform copiers are referred to the Circulation Desk.

D. Reference. When assisting patrons one-on-one with reference requests that require the in-depth use of one or more reference sources, staff instruct them on the use of information resources in order to teach them to obtain information themselves.

F. Interlibrary Loan. Reference staff offer interlibrary loan as an option to University- affiliated patrons to obtain materials not available in the Chalmer Davee Library. Staff review requests for accuracy and to determine that the requested material is not available in the library or in a licensed electronic database prior to forwarding the request to the Interlibrary Loan Office. (See Interlibrary Loan Policy for details).

G. Online Search Service. Reference staff recommend staff-mediated online searches, when the situation warrants, to locate information for University-affiliated patrons. (See Online Search Service Policy for details).

Faculty must schedule sessions directly with the librarian who will meet with the class. Generally, classes will be scheduled with a one week minimum lead time. Instructors must be present during a library instruction session. A master schedule of sessions is maintained at the Reference Desk.

The library endorses the Information Literacy Competencies and Criteria for Academic Libraries in Wisconsin (Adopted by the Wisconsin Association of Academic Librarians October 9, 1998). Librarians design instructional sessions with faculty in order to integrate these criteria into the Universitys curriculum.

Reference staff work with staff from Student Services to orient new freshmen to the library at the start of each new academic year. High school groups and other groups not affiliated with the University are welcome to schedule a formal instruction session if need dictates.

Questions from non-UWRF affiliated users are accepted if the subject is clearly something that the UWRF library is better equipped to handle than other libraries in the area. Questions related to local and campus history or genealogy are referred to the University Archives and Area Research Center. For general questions, the non-affiliated patron is referred to their local public library.

J. Telephone Reference Service. Telephone reference calls are accepted, but do not take precedence over patrons waiting for service at the Reference Desk. Assistance provided to telephone callers differs from that given the patron at the Desk. Generally, staff provide answers to directional and factual ready reference questions and help patrons complete or verify bibliographic citations. Callers requiring extensive subject searches or lengthy assistance are asked to come to the library.

An answering machine picks up the phone at the Reference Desk when a staff member is away from the Desk. Callers are directed to phone back within five minutes if they are calling during regular business hours.

L. Medical, Legal, Tax or Consumer Advice. Librarians do not offer medical, legal, or tax advice or recommend particular consumer products, but will give patrons the appropriate sources to assist them in finding information.

N. Referrals to Other Libraries. When another library is likely to have information of relevance to a users need beyond that available at the Chalmer Davee Library, a reference librarian will refer the user to that library. Users are often referred to the River Falls Public Library to access a more popular level of information.

O. Materials on Hold. Librarians generally do not retrieve or hold specific materials for users. Some materials may be held for a short amount of time if a user is leaving the library but will return shortly.

B. Reference Questions. An extended information contact which involves the use, recommendation, interpretation, or instruction in the use of one or more reference sources, or knowledge of such sources, by a reference staff member.

A. Assignment Alert. Advance notice from faculty of library assignments is solicited via the Library Assignment Alert, which is distributed to all faculty at the beginning of academic year and also is available on the library web page. Completed Assignment Alert forms are maintained in a file at the Reference Desk.

B. Faculty Consultations. Consultation with faculty members who give their classes library assignments is occasionally necessary. Such faculty members are contacted when students or librarians have difficulty interpreting an assignment. Any information provided is made available to all staff working at the Reference Desk.

C. Levels of Assistance. Because librarians routinely do not ask the purpose of a patrons question (except to assist with determining the patrons needs during the reference interview), they do not withhold assistance from students working on take-home exams or other class exercises. When a class assignment requires extensive assistance, to save staff time a list of correct sources may be drawn up and kept at the Reference Desk.

The Reference Department maintains a Reference Collection to support reference services. The Collection consists primarily of print, microform and electronic materials. (See Reference Collection Development Policy for details).

Reference Infostations may be used by all university-affiliated and non-affiliated users to access the librarys online catalog, electronic reference sources, and internet resources. (See Policy on Internet Use for details).

A. Materials from the Reference Collection do not circulate outside of the library. Permission to checkout general non-circulating materials (e.g., reference books, periodicals, Curriculum Materials Center materials) to UWRF faculty, students and staff will be granted by librarians at the Reference Desk. Special permission to checkout non-circulating materials from the Reserve, Government Document and Archives collections will be granted by authorized staff in those departments.

The reference area is not intended to be a quiet study area, and consultation in a normal voice between librarians and library users is necessary for effective reference service. Library users requiring quiet study are directed to designated quiet study areas.

The Chalmer Davee Library at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls is pleased to announce the creation of a digital Institutional Repository. This repository is part of the University of Wisconsin System project called MINDS@UW. The project is intended to provide a safe haven for published and unpublished electronic content of any discipline and is designed to capture, store, index, distribute and preserve the intellectual output of the university. For further information on MINDS@UW or Institutional Repositories, please visit our project website at http://www.uwrf.edu/library/minds.

The Library is very interested in including your work(s) in our collection. We believe that your work is important to the curriculum at UW-RF and has long term value for research. Including your work in the repository is a way for you to show to a world wide audience what you have researched, studied and described in your work. Additionally, all items included in the project are permanently retained, allowing for you to retain a link to the digitized version of your work in the years to come.

The Library will take care of describing, indexing and storing your work in the MINDS@UW project. You, however, still own copyright on the work(s), and we therefore need to get your permission to include your work(s) in the repository. Please read and sign the enclosed grant of permission form and return it to me. If you do not wish to allow the inclusion of your work in the collection, please return the form unsigned and indicate permission denied in the signature line on the form. Additionally, in order for your work to be included in the collection, an electronic version of your work (pdf file, power point slide, word document, etc.) must be sent to Heidi Southworth at the e-mail below. If you have any questions about this project, I look forward to discussing them with you. Thank you for your consideration.

The Library is actively seeking submissions from various undergraduate research sources, such as the Research, Scholarly and Creative Activity Day (RSCA Day) and Endeavor. The Library is very interested in including these items in the repository. We believe that these works are important to the curriculum at UW-RF and have long term value for research. Including a work in the repository is a way for students to show to a world wide audience what topics they have researched, studied and described in a paper, poster or other form of a work. Additionally, all items included in the project are permanently retained, allowing for the student to retain a link to the digitized version of the work in the years to come.

Because you were listed as a co-author or advisor for a student's work from a RSCA event, the Library, per policy, asks for your permission, in addition to the student's permission, to include the work in the repository. These works will be accessible to a world wide audience. If you know that the work will lead to a trade secret or patent or if the research will be published at a later date in a journal or scholarly publication, you have the right to tell us not to include the work in the repository. Additionally, you have the right to act as a peer-reviewer for your students' work. If the work was not completed or contained errors, you have the right to tell us to not include the work in the repository.

The Library will take care of describing, indexing and storing the work(s) in the MINDS@UW project. Please read and sign the enclosed grant of permission form and return it to me. If you do not wish to allow the inclusion of the work(s) in our collection, please return the form unsigned and indicate permission denied in the signature line on the form. If you have any questions about this project, I look forward to discussing them with you. Thank you for your consideration.

If you are a student or staff member seeking web site access rights to a department or organization web site, please fill out this form or contact webmaster@uwrf.edu Those who are granted directory access MUST be familiar with web development requirements You may, however, still send your request using the following form. You will be informed when access has been granted.

Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. Following is placeholder for your paragraph text. .

Psi Chi is a national honor society whose purpose shall be to encourage, stimulate, and maintain excellence in scholarship of the individual members in all fields, particularly in psychology, and to advance the science of psychology.

The intrinsic value of membership is rewarding to the achiever in that recognition of excellence leads to self-fulfillment and thus to self-realization. By recognizing that what you do does make a difference, you are stimulated to higher productivity. Accomplishments are enjoyed more when shared with others. Furthermore, the contacts made through Psi Chi will be valuable throughout your educational and professional careers.

Psi Chi is a springboard for professional growth. Opportunities are made available to the members for promoting their research, receiving national and international recognition, meeting and interacting with leaders in their field, and meeting Psi Chi members of other chapters who also will be future leaders.

Climaxing the benefits mentioned above is knowing that many individuals, by their caring, dedication, perseverance, and hard work, have made it possible to encourage young persons interested in psychology to strive for excellence--to reach toward that attainable star.

The ultimate test of the value of any membership organization lies in the accomplishments of its members. In each year of Psi Chi's history, more and more members have undertaken graduate studies. Psi Chi is well represented in the professional ranks of all the behavioral sciences.

TO ARRANGE GAMEPLAY: send an email to all club members using the club email list asking for a reply from those interested in playing on a specific day/time. Unless there is a reply, there is no guarantee that someone will be at the courts when you wish to play.

"Hi I'm a [beginner / intermediate / advanced] player and am looking to play [day of the week] at [time]. If you are interested in playing, please send a reply to this email to let me know that you will be there ."

The UWRF Racquetball Club members are in agreement that the racquetball court walls have not received adequate attention to warrant basic preventative maintenance, as the below photos illustrate. Numerous complaints have been made to Facilities, and our dialogue with facilities regarding repair and maintenance of the racquetball courts is recorded below. If you are anxious to see repair sooner than 2008, please share your thoughts in this dialogue by emailing the director of H&HP, Faye Perkins (faye.j.perkins@uwrf.edu), who is an advocate and has agreed to be our contact for forwarding these complaints to appropriate campus administrators.

The good news in all of this is that instead of separating the planning and construction into two biennium, they are now looking at funding both in the same biennium. So, if we are still considered a "viable project" then our next hope is to get funding for BOTH planning and construction in the 07-09 biennium. This would put us basically in the same place/time line had we gotten funding for planning in 05-07 and construction in 07-09.

We had an external evaluator on campus last Friday as a part of our 7-year program review which is required by the Faculty Senate. He could not believe the state of our racquetball courts--I made sure to include them in our tour of the facilities. I know that he will be writing about them in his report that will be forwarded to the Faculty Senate Program Review Committee and the Provost.

Please send any racquetball court complaints to Faye Perkins at the below address. She has agreed to be the point person for these complaints, and will forward those complaints through appropriate channels.

At the request of our UWRF Racquetball Club, Faye Perkins, Director of the Health and Human Performance Building, recently submitted a work order to have the courts repaired. A timeline for the repairs has not yet been set, but updates on this topic will appear here when our club learns more.

Each semester, our racquetball club conducts one or two "Braggin Rights" tournaments. All individuals at any skill level are encouraged to participate. A "Braggin Rights" plaque is awarded to the winner, and trades hands with each new winner. A fee is required to participate. Eye protection and good conduct is also required.

Official Tournaments on the MN Racquetball, WI Racquetball and US Racquetball Association web sites To participate in an official "sanctioned" Wisconsin, Minnesota or national tournament, you must be a member of the US Racquetball Association. Fee for membership is $30/yr, and you may join either at a sanctioned tournament event, or by accessing the USRA web site. With your USRA membership you receive a monthly racquetball magazine which covers racquetball tips and tricks and other racquetball news, and a host of other benefits, including insurance.

If you play at a sanctioned event, you will automatically have a "National Ranking", even if you lose all of your matches. You can move up one or many rankings by beating folks with a better ranking than yourself.

Tier 1 through Tier 4 and Grand Slam racquetball tournaments are national events that attract stiff competition because large cash prizes from $1,500 to $15,000 are available for winners. Also, competitors receive higher ranking points by competing in these events versus other sanctioned events...which is good to know for the amature waiting to break into the world of pro racquetball. Tier 4 is considered a lesser competitive tournament with a smaller cash prize and competitors receive lesser ranking points than a Tier 1 event. A Tier 1 event will likely attract nearly all of the top pros, who compete to keep their world ranking high and line their pockets with tournament dollars.

The racquetball club offers restringing, regripping and wrist cords to members and non-members. See prices below. Items sold to members are sold at their purchased price and not marked-up. Income obtained by non-members for services are donated to the racquetball club for future on and off campus racquetball events.

Racquet Regripping - if your grip feels slippery during gameplay, try using a glove. If this does not work, upgrade to what the pros use - a Python rubber grip. Note: a rubber grip requires that you wear a glove. In a bare hand, a rubber grip is slippery..

Wrist Cords - if you have a wrist cord that requires you to spin your racquet to tighten it, changing to a professional wrist cord may help your game. A spun wrist cord can affect the position of your racquet when you swing, giving an inaccurate trajectory of a struck ball.

In racquetball, there is no better investment than in a high-quality racquet. Using an old or poorly designed racquet gives you the disadvantage of decreased power, decreased control, and decreased reach (new racquets are 1-3 inches longer than older style racquets). A high-quality racquet will serve you well for years.

Weight: typical weight for racquets are 140-190 grams. Lighter-weight racquets tend to produce more vibration and less power than heavier ones, but are kinder to elbows and shoulders. 170 grams is standard weight.

Material: You'll notice in many lines of racquets that the shape and size of racquets are very similar despite vast differences in cost. There is a  $50 Ektelon racquet on the market right now that looks identical to their $170 Ektelon racquet. So what's the difference? Difference is in the high quality material which will make that $170 racquet much lighter, more flexible and more evenly balanced than their $50 racquet - thus offering more power, control, and less arm strain.

Are you new to racquetball, or do you want to learn new techniques to improve your gameplay? A book on basic and advanced racquetball tecniques may be checked-out from the UWRF Student Center Information Desk (see cover below). It was written by leading US racquetball coaches and professional players. Also, please use fellow club members as resources for learning and illustrating new techniques. To improve your gameplay, try playing with someone who is at a higher level than you...you'll be amazed at how quickly you will learn their techniques.

Sam is a native of Wisconsin, and now lives in Woodbury, MN. Sam began competitive racquetball at 5 years old, and now has over 20 years of competitive racquetball experience. He has played as a top 50 player many seasons on the International Racquetball Tour, and has won a host of state titles. He has competed in countless Open tournaments against some of the world's best players, and has competed in many national US Open racquetball tournaments (racquetball's equivelant to the tennis US Open).

This featured match of the day saw balls slamming against the walls and Ryder diving to return shots flying low to the floor to bring the best two-out-of-three match to a third and tie-breaking game where he was defeated 15-10, 8-15, 11-8. Teaming up with older brother Ben, the Ryders claimed the consolation title in the Men's Open Doubles division.

"I would like to thank everyone who participated and came to watch me in Eau Claire this past Saturday," Ryder said. "I am overwhelmed by all of the support I receive from the community as the top racquetball player in the area."

Sam Ryder of River Falls has found himself competing in over 20 racquetball tournaments this season, including a number of International Racquetball Tour (IRT) pro stops all over the United States. Ryder has aspirations of taking his game to the top level this weekend when he competes in the Wisconsin State Open Racquetball Championships in Eau Claire. This year's State Tournament will draw over 200 of the state's best racquetball players.

Ryder has been a consistent state champion in his age division throughout his career and will be among the top players in the Men's Open Draw this weekend. He will also be the top player competing in the men's under-24 age division, where he says he expects to win the state title.

"My goal is to win a state title for my age division and then to be competitive in the open draw," he said. "On any given day I know I can be the best racquetball player in the state. I just need to prove it this weekend when I get the opportunity."

Ryder is a member of the Hudson YMCA where he does a lot of solo drills since competition is limited for him in the area. He also plans to hold a few racquetball clinics in the near future for all levels of play.

Chris won all three of his games, 11 point average. Other top finishers included: Stephanie Downing who took second place with an average of 9.6. Matt Fitzgerald and Jay Unseth tied for third with an average score of 9.3. As you can see every point counted in this fast-paced game.

On Sept. 12, 2006, a new group on campus called the Socialist Alternative hosted a guest speaker from Ireland to help spread its agenda on campus. I disagree with the notion of Socialism. I feel very strongly that it does not work.

There were roughly 50 students at the meeting. I was very surprised and disappointed when a 25-year-old from Ireland got up and began to speak about Socialism. When I was told there would be a world-renowned expert speaking about the socialist movement, I envisioned a professor from a well-known university.

Overall, the speaker was interesting and I was glad that I went, but I really wish he would have been bold enough to answer questions. I feel he owed it to his audience. I spoke with a few other people who attended and they felt the same way.

The Oct. 6 issue of Falcon Daily announced the Student Organization Committee is welcoming three of the newest student organizations to the UW-RF Community. I was dismayed to find the Socialist Alternative was among these organizations.

I came to this country from the Czech Republic, where I lived in a socialist society for more than 15 years of my life. I was lucky to immigrate to the United States and enjoy the benefits of a functioning capitalist economy.

Socialist Alternative is an organization that fights for the rights of workers, students and communities against the exploitation and injustice perpetuated by the capitalist system. We see the global capitalist system as the root cause of terrorism, war, poverty, discrimination and environmental destruction. Socialist Alternative absolutely rejects the totalitarian systems of Russia and eastern Europe, which have nothing to do with real socialism. The Stalinist oligarchy that oppressed the working class was obviously not a genuine workers? democracy.

We campaign for the building of a mass workers? party to represent workers, youth and the environment against the two parties of big business. We call for democratic socialism where people will have control over their daily lives. Some might say that our stances on particular issues are unrealistic under capitalism. We believe that the realization of these goals is more reason to strive for a socialist society, based not on profit, but on need.

Unlike under the political systems of Russia and eastern Europe, Jan Pospichal was free to speak about his opposition to the formation of Socialist Alternative at the public meeting that we held last month. I chaired that meeting, and Mr.

Unfortunately, the socioeconomic system that the ruling party of Czechoslovakia called socialism in the pre 1989 era is what I associate with socialism. Can anyone from Socialist Alternative point me to a working model of real socialism?

I am delighted that militant action as practiced by Socialist Alternative today does not involve guns and explosives. I doubt it would be possible to take into public ownership the top 500 corporations, banks, and insurance and finance houses without the use of violence.

Major U.S. corporate empires influence every aspect of our political and social lives - from who gets elected to what is played on our TVs and radios. Such powerful entities should not be controlled by a board of directors solely concerned with maximizing profit, but rather by the people.

We argue that the real thieves in this country are the rich elite whose profit-driven agenda fills our world with war and poverty. The working class currently props up this elite by the sweat of our collective brow; meanwhile 50 million American workers go without access to health care. In a socialist society, the wealth created by our labor could be used to fulfill the needs of society. These include such things as: free public education through college, safe public transportation and socialized medicine under democratic control.

It is extremely difficult to communicate ideas in 300 words or fewer. For more complete information than these letters allow, I would encourage anyone with an interest in socialism to attend a Socialist Alternative discussion meeting.

All undergraduate students must complete General Education Program requirements comprising slightly fewer than one-third of the total credits needed to earn a degree. The General Education Program is designed to develop essential academic skills, to acquaint students with their cultural heritage, and to provide them with a broad base of liberal studies in the humanities, mathematics, and in the social and physical sciences. This program will serve as a foundation for study in a major. Further, it will develop breadth of knowledge and will cultivate the critical judgment necessary for mature and responsible lives in work, in leisure and as citizens of the nation and the world.

The University of Wisconsin Board of Regents has approved mission statements for the University of Wisconsin System and for the several kinds of degree-granting institutions within the System. The System Mission Statement and the Core Mission of the University Cluster (predominantly four-year campuses) are included below.

The university offers liberal arts programs and degrees to meet regional needs in the arts, humanities, mathematics, natural and physical sciences and social and behavioral sciences. The liberal arts also strengthen and broaden programs in the agricultural sciences, teacher education, and business administration.

The university offers graduate programs in education, agriculture and other areas clearly associated with its mission. Development of cooperative graduate instructional programs with appropriate institutions is encouraged.

The university expects scholarly activity, including research, scholarship and creative endeavor, that supports its programs at the baccalaureate level, its selected graduate programs and its select mission.

The university continues to develop interinstitutional relationships in cooperative research, graduate training and undergraduate programs within the state, region and world. As a border institution, the University promotes interstate cooperation.

The university provides students opportunities to develop an appreciation of the richness and diversity of American culture and is committed to representing this diversity in its staff and student body.

The university offers students the opportunity to increase their global awareness and sensitivity to other cultures. It also has a continuing commitment to provide opportunities for students to live, study and travel abroad and to increase the number and diversity of international students on campus.

The university provides public service by using its resources to address problems and concerns throughout the state and region. Special emphasis is placed on cooperative extension, extension and economic development outreach.

The mission of this system is to develop human resources, to discover and disseminate knowledge, to extend knowledge and its application beyond the boundaries of its campuses, and to serve and stimulate society by developing in students heightened intellectual, cultural, and humane sensitivities; scientific, professional, and technological expertise; and a sense of value and purpose. Inherent in this mission are methods of instruction, research, extended education, and public service designed to educate people and improve the human condition. Basic to every purpose of the system is the search for truth.

Offer an environment that emphasizes teaching excellence and meets the educational and personal needs of students through effective teaching, academic advising, counseling, and through university-sponsored cultural, recreational, and extracurricular programs.

Expect scholarly activity, including research, scholarship, and creative endeavor, that supports its programs at the associate and baccalaureate degree level, its selected graduate programs, and its approved mission statement.

Promote the integration of the extension function, assist the University of Wisconsin - Extension in meeting its responsibility for statewide coordination, and encourage faculty and staff participation in outreach activity.

The provisions of the catalog do not constitute a contract between a student at UW-River Falls and the university. The sole purpose of the catalog is to provide regulations, course listings, degree programs and fee schedules which are in effect at the time of publication. UW-River Falls reserves the right to change the regulations in the catalog at any time during the period for which it is in effect and to add, modify or withdraw courses at any time. Changes to the information in the catalog may be reflected in the online catalog located at http://www.uwrf.edu/catalog. UW-River Falls, with the concurrence of the System Administration and the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System, also reserves the right to change fees and to add, modify or withdraw degree programs at any time. Effective dates of changes will be determined by the proper university authorities and published through class schedules or other official publications of the university.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to creating an educational community which enhances student awareness and appreciation of diverse ethnicities and cultures and which actively supports tolerance, civility and respect for the rights and sensibilities of each person without regard to economic status, ethnic background, political views, sexual orientation, or other personal characteristics or beliefs. Awareness of and sensitivity to diverse ethnic and cultural heritages are especially sought in applicants.

Accounting involves measuring business activities and communicating this information to investors, creditors, and other decision makers who will use it to make sound, informed, financial decisions. This practice serves to encourage investment activity, which in turn creates jobs and helps the economy to grow.

It is the intention of the department to expose the student to the leading edge of theory while emphasizing the importance of human relationships and the ability to form sound ethical and moral decisions. In short, the program intends to equip the student for lifelong learning.

Students are required to have a minimum of 150 semester credit hours in order to sit for the CPA exam in Wisconsin. As of 2003, forty-eight states and jurisdictions have legislated the 150 credit hour requirement. The 150 semester hours may be completed at the undergraduate or the graduate level. Students should consult their adviser for the best course of study.

Students should plan to take MATH 146 (if necessary) before taking MATH 156 or ECON 205 as required in General Education. The lower division requirements must be completed before the student begins the upper division requirements and the required accounting courses. A 2.5 grade point average must be maintained in the required accounting and business law courses to graduate with a major in accounting.

Overall, one-half of the credits required for graduation must be taken outside of the College of Business and Economics. At least 50 percent of the business credits required must be taken in the UW-RF College of Business and Economics.

Additionally, the following must be completed, or in progress for completion, during the semester preceding admission. Students may register prior to acceptance, but acceptance is required for attendance in CBE upper-level courses. Students with GPAs between 2.0 and 2.25 may petition to the respective department chair for consideration on a case-by-case basis.

Computer Literacy - students who are not prepared to use word processing and spreadsheet programs to complete assignments in Agricultural Engineering Technology courses should elect CSIS 105 in their freshman year.

Agricultural Studies is a four-year Bachelor of Science degree program. Students majoring in Agricultural Studies will acquire broad knowledge in the fields of agriculture, food and the environmental sciences. Students may also pursue individual special interests through elective classes. In consultation with an adviser, students may choose elective courses in areas such as agronomy, animal science, communications, marketing, management, international studies, etc. The Agricultural Studies major also requires completion of a minor in an agricultural subject area.

Careers in Advertising Design and Computer Graphics. Students interested in a career in advertising design and computer graphics are advised to take a Broad Area Art Degree choosing options within the degree to become as broadly and professionally prepared as possible. An internship is recommended in the senior year. Adviser: M. Padgett.

Careers in Art Therapy. Students interested in a career in art therapy are advised to take an art major degree with a psychology minor. A program sheet to guide minor elective choices is available in the art department. Graduate school (M.A.) is required for registration in the field. Internships are available for senior students. Adviser: L. Jermal.

Semester Abroad Program. Each fall semester, art majors may participate in the Study Abroad Program, do an independent research project in a European country of their choice, and receive six credit hours in ART 378 and six credit hours of INTS 377. Participants must meet weekly for preparatory sessions during the spring semester preceding the experience abroad. Adviser: D. Heberlein.

Internship Program. The art department offers a number of opportunities for students to gain on-the-job experience as a supplement to their academic preparation. Students work under the direct supervision of a job supervisor and a member of the art faculty. See ART 379 for details. Adviser: M. Padgett.

Courses in the major or required supporting courses may be double counted to satisfy the General Education science requirements. Therefore, the total General Education credit hour requirement is reduced by the courses that can be double-counted.

The Biotechnology major is an interdisciplinary program that is focused on the molecular basis of life processes and the techniques utilized to both study and control these processes under in vivo and in vitro conditions. The Biotechnology curriculum draws upon the expertise and course offerings of the participating departments: Biology, Chemistry, Animal and Food Science, and Plant and Earth Science. Students complete core programs in Biology and Chemistry, which lead to minors in both areas, and a 30-semester hour, interdepartmental course requirement.

The Biotechnology major is designed to provide those students who are interested in pursuing careers at the interface of biology and chemistry with the academic background required to either secure entry level positions in the biotechnology industry or to continue their education in graduate or professional schools.

Students majoring in business administration have varied opportunities to select a program to meet specific interests. One choice is to complete a business administration degree with a minor. Another is to pursue a broad area business administration degree with an option in marketing, management, finance, or management information systems. A minor is not required with the Broad Area Major in Business Administration.

In order to be admitted to the College of Education, the student needs to be evaluated and recommended by the Chemistry Education Advisory Committee. Contact the Chemistry Department chair for further information.

Note: Substitution of other courses for degree requirements is possible upon application and approval by the department. This is on a case-by-case basis and particularly may affect students who change to a chemistry major or who transfer to UW-RF. Students should confer with their advisor and/or the department chair.

This major is awarded jointly with a B.S. in engineering after the student has successfully completed a three-year program at UW-River Falls with a minimum grade point average of 3.0 and a two-year program at either UW Madison or the University of Minnesota.

This option has a technical and theoretical emphasis providing students with a comprehensive understanding of software engineering, computing techniques and the underlying theories. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of sophisticated software/hardware systems and communication networks.

The analysis and design of information systems with an emphasis on managing, storing, transmitting and providing ready access to information is the key to the CIS option. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of sophisticated information systems.

The Conservation major is designed to meet the academic needs of students interested in a career dealing with the management of our natural environment. The major has the flexibility to accommodate interests in general natural resource management, soil and water conservation, environmental education, forest or wildlife management, environmental regulations or law enforcement, and the like, depending on the students course selection of directed and general electives.

Two options exist for students who select the Crop and Soil Science major: 1) Crop Science, and 2) Soil Science. The Crop Science option is designed for students who wish to focus their studies on plants and the use of plants for food, feed and fiber. Students learn about crop management, biotechnology, crop physiology, crop quality, as well as genetics and plant breeding. The Soil Science option is designed for those whose interests include the basic components and properties of soils, soil conservation, soil fertility, soil hydrology, and the management of soils to produce crops in an sustainable way.

New, first-year students who are candidates for the bachelor's degree and who have matriculated after September 1, 2005, must fulfill the new General Education program regulations as set forth in the Addendum to the Undergraduate Catalog.

Students must complete a three-credit course related to American Cultural Diversity (the University "D" requirement), as well as a three-credit course related to Global Perspectives (the University "G" requirement).

The Department of Animal and Food Science offers three options for Dairy Science majors. Required core courses within the Dairy Science major are identical, regardless of option. Additional requirements are based on the choice of option. The Dairy ScienceManagement option is designed for students seeking careers in dairy farm management or supporting industries such as feed, pharmaceutical, or genetics sectors of the dairy industry. The Dairy ScienceScience option is designed for students that plan to enroll in graduate or professional degree programs following completion of the Bachelor of Science degree. This option is strongly suggested for students that hope to enroll in a college of veterinary medicine at a future date. The Dairy ScienceMinor option is designed for students who wish to supplement their education with an academic minor or second major.

The mission of the Department of Health and Human Performance is to provide leadership and education for a diverse student body in the areas of health, physical education, recreation, dance, and athletics. The department is committed to promoting physical activity and healthy lifestyles throughout the lifespan, whether it be through providing opportunities for exceptional performance in athletics; for a holistic teaching approach in our physical education, health, dance, outdoor education and coaching curriculae; for creative expression in dance theatre; or for recreational and leisure opportunities through activity courses and the Life Fitness Program.

UW-River Falls offers elementary majors an early childhood minor which meets certification requirements to teach kindergarten and pre-kindergarten. In addition to providing further enrichment in techniques for instruction in the primary grades, this minor and certification increases the range of potential employment for an elementary education major. Those who may seek employment in existing day care centers, nursery schools, child and family education programs or those intending to start their own private pre-school should investigate the opportunities opened via an early childhood minor.

The four-year curriculum leading to the bachelor's degree in Elementary Education, designed to prepare teachers for elementary schools, grades 1-6, consists of a minimum of 132 semester hours that give students a broad general education, professional preparation for effective teaching at the elementary education level, and special preparation in an academic minor. Upon completion of these requirements, the elementary education major is certifiable for grades 1-6.

Admission to Teacher Education is required the semester prior to enrolling in the Block sequence. See the college web page http://www.uwrf.edu/college-of education/ for a complete list of requirements for admission and current admission deadline dates.

The B.A. in English, Literature Emphasis-Liberal Arts prepares students to be broadly educated, culturally and historically, and skilled in thinking critically, researching, and writing. The degree prepares students for jobs in business, government and nonprofit organizations, journalism, and publishing.

The B.A. in English, Creative Writing Emphasis-Liberal Arts gives students preparation in both creative writing and literature. This degree helps students interested in pursuing a graduate degree or a career in the publishing and writing fields.

The B.S. in English, Literature Emphasis-Liberal Arts prepares students through their broad education and important general skills to enter various careers, and they choose minors that supplement their career goals. Some commonly chosen minors are history, film studies, journalism, professional writing, art, speech, and one of the modern languages. If a modern language is not chosen as a minor, a modern language course is strongly recommended as a liberal arts elective.

The B.S. in English, Creative Writing Emphasis-Liberal Arts gives students preparation in both creative writing and literature. This degree helps students interested in pursuing a graduate degree or a career in the publishing and writing fields.

The Bachelor of Science (Education) degree is primarily intended to certify students to teach English in public high schools though the core skills it develops have broad application as well. The B.S. in English-Education prepares students to teach literature, interpretive skills, writing, language, research, and critical thinking skills in high schools. Students must choose a minor. Minors in which students can obtain a second certification to teach in that subject are popular choices. Some of these minors include speech communication and theatre arts, a modern language, journalism, and history.

The B.S. in Teaching English to Speakers of Other Languages-Education prepares students to teach children who are non-native speakers of English in the public schools. Depending on the educational setting in which the student intends to work, such a major can work well with any of the minors that are certifiable areas of study.

The Bachelor of Science in Broad Area English-Education degree is designed to provide prospective high school teachers with additional areas of study that support their core English courses and that respond to the current demands of the teaching situations in modern secondary schools. No minor is required with this major; the Broad Area in effect replaces the minor.

A second period course in British literature may replace one of the British survey courses, or a second period course in American literature may replace one of the American survey courses. At least three survey courses must be taken.

The environmental science major is designed to prepare students to face challenges in environmental quality management and sustainable development. Environmental science majors are prepared to monitor, model and manage environmental systems in the areas of environmental quality and risk evaluation, sampling and analysis, remediation and regulatory compliance. Graduates pursue careers in environmental consulting firms, local, state and federal environmental agencies or corporations.

Environmental Sciences and the College of Arts and Sciences, and is administered by the department of plant and earth science. Departments contributing to the major include agricultural engineering technology, biology, chemistry, geography, physics, and plant and earth science. Required foundation courses are in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences or in the College of Arts and Sciences.

History, Journalism, and Speech Communication and Theatre Arts. Film Studies examines film as an art form, as an industry, and as the most popular and most influential communication medium of the twentieth century. Film Studies provides an interdisciplinary approach to visual literacy as it introduces students to film history, theory, criticism, and production.

The geography major allows students to relate their studies in the humanities and social sciences to their work in the natural sciences. The geography curriculum can be tailored to those who have broad interdisciplinary interests and to those who have a focused interest in one of the geography subfields: human geography, physical geography or Geographic Information Systems (GIS) and cartography.

In addition to the geography major and minor, the department offers a GIS/Cartography minor. Coursework prepares students for careers in GIS applications and digital map production. The department offers various courses in cartographic theory, GIS, and map design. All GIS and cartography courses are computer based.

An emphasis is not a minor but is a suggested series of courses taken as directed electives that fit together well, fit well with the geology major and that would help a career in the designated area. Consult with geology faculty for more information.

The mission of the department of health and human performance is to provide leadership and education for a diverse student body in the areas of health, physical education, recreation, dance, and athletics. The department is committed to promoting physical activity and healthy lifestyles throughout the lifespan, whether it be through providing opportunities for exceptional performance in athletics; for a holistic teaching approach in our physical education, health, dance, outdoor education and coaching curriculae; for creative expression in dance theatre; or for recreational and leisure opportunities through activity courses and the life fitness program.

The Department of History and Philosophy offers courses and degrees for those who wish to obtain a liberal arts degree which teaches how to read, think, and write effectively. Thus, a liberal arts degree is the best preparation for careers in business, advertising, government, foreign service, international relations, publications, journalism, and human services. It also is indicated for those who wish to pursue a career specifically in the field of history including teaching at the elementary, secondary, or college level, or working in museums, archives and libraries. Students take courses in a variety of periods, areas and topics.

Required of all participants during junior or senior year. Participants must submit a project proposal outlining their research hypotheses, methodologies, and expected outcomes, and suggest appropriate faculty reviewers to the Honors Director for approval before commencing their work. Each project will be evaluated by three faculty chosen by the student and approved by the Honors Director.

Service learning in this context means unpaid volunteer work that will benefit the community and provide a significant learning experience. Service learning is based on the rationale that learning occurs through reflection on the service.

Kilian, business administration; Charles Rader, geography; Ogden Rogers, social work; David Trechter, agricultural economics The primary mission of the International Studies Program is to create global awareness by providing students with the intellectual skills and substantive knowledge necessary to meet the global challenges of the 21st Century.

Students may complete a first major in international studies within the Colleges of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences; Arts and Sciences; and Education and Professional Studies. Students in the College of Business and Economics can complete the major as a second major. Students in all colleges can complete an international studies minor. Students must complete the appropriate BA or BS Liberal Arts requirements for their respective colleges.

Students complete two years of a foreign language of their choice; e.g., complete any two-year language at UW-RF, complete testouts equivalent to two years, or complete two years at another accredited university and transfer the credits to UW-RF.

Students complete one year of a foreign language of their choice; e.g., complete any one-year language at UW-RF, complete testouts equivalent to one year, or complete one year at another accredited university and transfer the credits to UW-RF.

In order to maintain accreditation and to fulfill the department mission of providing journalism students with a broad liberal arts education, all majors must take a minimum of 80 credit hours outside journalism and mass communication courses, including a minimum of 65 credit hours in the liberal arts and sciences.

Communication emphasis offered in the Speech Communication and Theatre Arts department. All journalism majors must take six supporting courses outside the major, specified under the Supporting Courses category. These six courses may be counted in other areas of the students degree program such as General Education, Liberal Arts, a second major, a minor, or general electives.

Journalism and Secondary Education. Students interested in teaching journalism and/or serving as a newspaper or yearbook advisor at the secondary school level may major or minor in journalism, and must take a second teaching area major such as English or broad area studies. The student should consult with the dean of the College of Education and Professional Studies for specific teaching requirements.

Journalism and Agriculture. This program is designed for students who wish to pursue a career in agricultural journalism. The student develops a major in journalism and a second major or minor in the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences. Students may take AGED 230 (Agricultural News Writing) as a journalism elective.

The land use planning major is designed for those students wishing to pursue a career in public or private planning, zoning, administration/management and sustainable development. The curriculum provides instruction in foundational planning principles and practices, as well as hands-on technical training. The course content focuses on planning issues at the rural/urban interface. It is an excellent major to combine with a wide variety of minors (e.g., cartography/GIS, business administration, political science, etc.) to develop a unique professional niche.

The Language Arts/Reading minor is one of eight recommended by the Department of Public Instruction and the College of Education and Professional Studies for Elementary Education majors who must choose a minor. They select this minor to provide breadth of understanding and skills in English (literature, language and writing), speech, and reading. Course work will support both the specific teaching of these areas and also the teaching of other subjects (i.e. reading, speaking, and writing across the curriculum). Students who choose this minor should plan their programs with Dr. Nicholas Karolides, adviser for the minor.

The interdisciplinary marketing communications major integrates the activities of advertising, public relations, sales promotion, direct marketing, personal selling and cybermarketing into a single professional field of expertise. Students will develop knowledge and skills in oral, written and visual modes of communication.

Practical experience with current technology tools and a required internship program ensure that students have not only strong academic preparation, but also practical experience in marketing communications activities.

A student may complete the major in Marketing Communications in the College of Arts and Sciences, the College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, or in the College of Business and Economics. Please consult the dean of the respective college for college-specific course requirements. It is recommended that a student completing the major in CBE or CAFES have a minor in that college.

German and Spanish options. These programs lead to a B.A. or B.S. degree in liberal arts or a B.S. degree in secondary education. Minors are offered in French, German and Spanish. Two years of Chinese and Japanese are also available.

Modern Language Placement Test, offered in spring Regional Testing and during all registration periods. Students may test out of up to fourteen credits. Test-out credits are not granted until the student completes the next level course with the grade of B or better.

Minor. All applicants for admission to degree programs in music must satisfactorily complete a performance audition. Audition requirements for all performance areas are available from the Music Department. In addition to the performance audition, all transfer applicants must take a music theory and history placement exam.

The results of the exam will determine the appropriate course levels. Music students should consult the department handbook, which clarifies course requirements and provides additional pertinent information.

The minor in Musical Theatre, offered as a collaborative effort between the departments of speech communication and theatre arts, music, and health and human performance (dance), is designed to provide students an opportunity to gain formal training. It includes courses in music theory and performance, dance styles, and stage movement, as well as additional courses in theatrical performance, production, and design, with special consideration to their application in creation of and performance in musical production. This minor is available to all students, including music and theatre majors and minors.

Philosophical inquiry aims at uncovering, analyzing, and evaluating the fundamental values and assumptions implicit in various human activities and practices such as science, the arts, religion, morality, and social and political institutions.

Broad Field Social Studies Major: Political Science is one of the subject fields comprising the Broad Field Social Studies major. For information about this major, see page 112 of the printed catalog.

The Professional Writing Minor Business-Government option provides study and practice in the spectrum of communication from graphic design to computer literacy and emphasizes training useful in business, industry, and government. The minor is not recommended for English Education majors. Students selecting this minor are advised to complete an English internship, ENGL 379.

The Professional Writing Minor Creative Writing option serves as a foundation for general publication or in-house publication in large businesses and also for "professional writing" in its traditional sense: "free-lance" writing as a primary or supplemental source of income or as an avocation. The minor is not recommended for English Education majors. Students selecting this minor are advised to complete an English internship, ENGL 379.

Additional courses in Psychology. All psychology majors are required to participate in the departmental assessment of the psychology major. This involves keeping a portfolio and taking a psychology assessment test in their first and last year in the program.

Broad Field Sciences Programs are monitored by representatives from the departments of biology, chemistry, physics, and plant and earth science. Students choosing one of these programs will typically be assigned an advisor from one of these departments. The Broad Field Science Programs are interdepartmental programs tailored to various interdisciplinary niches in the sciences. These programs are the equivalent of a major and a minor. A student selecting one of these programs is not required to have an additional minor. Two of these programs lead to certification in secondary or middle school education. Students interested in certification in those programs should consult the Secondary Education Handbook for Undergraduates at www.uwrf.edu/college-of-education/ for the detailed requirements for various levels of certification in Wisconsin General Education Requirements Arts and Sciences as listed on pages 22-23; and Education and Professional Studies as listed on pages 31-32. Up to two of these courses may be double counted in the General Education program, depending on your specific course of study.

A person with a broad field science license may teach any science class, middle-school level through grade 10, and any basic science class in grades 11-12 which is not a college-preparatory course, advanced placement (AP) course, or an elective course with more depth of content than a basic course. However, you may teach advanced courses in your areas of concentration.

Up to two of these courses may be double counted in the General Education program, depending on your specific course of study. When planning your course selection, be sure to consider the prerequisites for upper level courses. Higher level courses may be substitute on a case-by-case basis; contact the coordinator.

The degree curricula designed to prepare teachers for the secondary school, grades 9-12, consists of a minimum of 120 semester hours that give the student a broad general education, specialized preparation in one or more academic fields and professional preparation needed for effective teaching. Specific course requirements are listed for each academic department preceding the departmental course descriptions.

The minor in Social Science, available for majors in elementary and middle school (6-9) education is a program of study comprised of several social science disciplines: economics, geography, history, political science and sociology.

The Broad Field Social Studies (BFSS) degree is the preferred degree for secondary teaching in the area of social studies. This degree offers many options and great versatility. The program requires that the student have a concentration (a major) in one of the social sciences and then additional work in the other social sciences.

These are keystrokes that are synonymous with nearly every application and program available on the PC market. These are important to learn because often one is not given the option within a particular program or screen to complete one of these commands from a pull-down menu. Also, these may help dramatically save work time and ease work tasks.

If you will be connecting to the internet, connect the ethernet cord to an ethernet outlet. For ethernet outlet to appear, press on rectangular button (ethernet connector on laptop is bottom of 2 connectors on the laptop's right-hand side.

Learn about the many online resources that UWRF has available to you to assist with your educator job search. Learn what "Credential Files" are, which may be requested as part of your school district application materials. Also, register with the UWRF Hire a Falcon System to have teaching positions that UWRF receives emailed directly to you.

Exceeded sales department's yearly goals by 150% over a nine-month period Learned all aspects associated with firm's sales office, including functions of cashier, wire operator, order desk and research library assistant Designed complete computer software to replicate the four phase mode of the human heart as an intern Co-wrote and edited a training manual for the Carbonate Rock Society. Three years later, the manual is still in use.

The chronological format presents information in a fast and easy to read manner and is also the easiest to write. Jobs are listed in chronological order, starting with the most recent or present (which generally receives the greatest emphasis) and working back through the years. Employment dates, name of the organization and job title appear precede a description of the job tasks and accomplishments.

The functional resume allows you more flexibility than the chronological approach in that particular vocational skills or specialized knowledge may be featured by grouping background experience regardless of where or when the experience was gained. Historical sequence is ignored as elements of training and experience from several sources are grouped to show their applicability to your career goal.

This resume contains elements similar to both the chronological and functional formats. Work experiences are presented chronologically, but the applicant also sets aside relevant skill areas in separate categories. This allows the applicant to highlight related areas of expertise and at the same time satisfies the employer's desire to know names and dates.

Internet and contains keywords in both visible and invisible areas of the page to maximize its ability to be found by common Search Engines i.e. (Google, Yahoo, Excite, etc...). Special formatting guidelines apply to online resumes which do not apply to other types of resumes.

Common software programs for creating web pages & web resumes are Macromedia Dreamweaver, Microsoft FrontPage, Homesite, and Adobe Go-Live. For the Tech Savvy folks, these are named "HTML Editors" which function much like a word processing program by allowing a user to either type and format their web resume from scratch, or copy & paste their already completed resume from another program into a blank web page. By using an HTML Editor, the user avoids learning details of web page programming and can focus on making their resume look good.

Although web pages can be created using word processing programs like Microsoft Word or Corel WordPerfect, results are may often be unpredictable. To ensure that an employer can find your resume and can view your resume as it is intend it to appear, it is best to use an HTML editor to create your online resume.

Employers use keywords when using search engines to find candidate web page resumes or portfolios. Different search engines look for web pages in different ways. All search engines search for web sites using keywords, yet some search for keywords in web page titles, some search page keywords, some search page descriptions, and some search web page content. Most search engines use a combination of these techniques, so an effective online resume will scatter keywords throughout these four parts of a web page to maximize potential page hits.

Updating a page TITLE using an HTML editor: The web page title is the name of a page which appears in the very top-left corner of a web browser. When "Bookmarking" a web page, or when adding a page to "Favorites", the page title is automatically included as a reference for users to return to that page in the future.

Web page keywords are inserted invisibly as "meta tags" into the "Head" of a web page. Viewers do not see keywords, but search engines do. To be effective, use as many keywords and variations of keywords as possible.

"Description". In the "Values:" field, type a description for your resume web page (Example: Web designer with 3.5 years background in building e- commerce web sites seeking a position in Minneapolis Minnesota as a webmaster).

In the "Description" field, type type a description for your resume web page (Example: Web designer with 3.5 years background in building e-commerce web sites seeking a position in Minneapolis Minnesota as a webmaster).

Some search engines "crawl" to find new web sites, like your online resume, while other search engines require that you publish your site with them before your resume may be found using their search engine.

A portfolio is a collection of items organized in a notebook, file, or a similar format. By collecting this information throughout college, you can help to recognize the skills and abilities you possess in relationship to a career. This is also an excellent way to market your qualifications to an employer for an internship or full time employment following graduation.

The concept of using a portfolio originated in occupations where creativity is a necessary skill. Employers seeking to hire persons in jobs related to art, advertising, and journalism often require a portfolio in the hiring process to demonstrate their work. However, a portfolio can also help document work experience, achievements and skills in any field. In fact, developing a portfolio during college will help you to evaluate yourself and your career decisions. It can help you explore careers which match your interests which are documented in your portfolio. In addition, it can help you to compare your skill level to the level needed for your chosen career.

During an interview!!! Using your portfolio during an interview allows you to demonstrate, first-hand, examples of work that you have done, or illustrate your accomplishments. Be careful, though, as your portfolio is merely a tool to use during an interview to SUPPORT your case regarding why you are the best person for the job you are applying for. It should not be used as a show-and-tell item that is dropped onto an employer's table or handed to an employer for them to browse through (unless an employer specifically requests to do so).

Your portfolio should be used by you during your interview to demonstrate points you have made to the employer regarding your experience, skills, or accomplishments that qualify you for that specific job.

Electronic portfolios are typically designed as web pages and are posted to an internet location or burned onto a CD-ROM to be used as a tool to SUPPLEMENT the hard-copy version of your portfolio. An electronic portfolio demonstrates to employers that you are technically savvy, and gives employers the opportunity to receive further information about you either before or after an interview.

Letter or certificate which recognizes you as a scholarship recipient Letter or certificate which designates you as a Dean's List member Graduation program highlighting designation as Valedictorian or special honors Summary of scholarly research project and/or results Newspaper article noting recognition of special honors Extracurricular Activities Special award for participation in an event Trophies/ribbons for winning or placing in a competition Newspaper clippings of individual or team accomplishments Pictures of team or individual participation in an event Letter or commendation from coach, advisor or other individuals associated with athletic achievement.

Examples of handouts, letters, memos, reports, charts, graphs, brochures, etc. using computer software or program languages Correspondence written in a foreign language or documentation of a study abroad or foreign exchange program Evidence of a hobby, craft, or topic of special interest Certification of skill level such as Water Safety Instructor, First Aid, or CPR.

The following are 11 categories of questions that can help you narrow your decision on whether to accept or reject a job offer. Look closely at the categories below which are most important to you and illicit the most "Yes" responses?

There may be other factors that are important in deciding on the right position. Sometimes the question of "am I compromising or settling for less" comes into play. A preponderance of "yes" answers to the below questions will help you sort that out. And, remember that in the 21st Century, saying "yes" to a job offer is not a lifetime commitment. The more important question is, is it right for now?

Is the position in synch with your favorite strengths? Will it allow you to use your honed skills, acquired knowledge, and wired-from-birth talents-the ones that produce that feel-good "tingle factor" that translates to "I can't believe they pay me to do something I love so much!" Do you get to use these talents/skills the majority of the time? For instance, if analytical tasks invigorate you, will you spend the majority of your time doing this? Or does the position also require that 50% of your time be spent doing tasks that aren't your favorite strengths or talents, such as making verbal presentations regarding the results of your analysis. Remember, work is less taxing physically and emotionally when you're doing something that comes easily.

Is the industry in which you work important? Some people aren't picky about the "where" of work, as long as the "what" (functional fit) is present. If industry is important, do you have an affinity for this opportunity's industry? Is it aligned with a cause or higher purpose for you? Will you enjoy working with the products or services that the industry represents?

Is compensation within industry standards? Will you make what you need to meet your financial obligations and goals? If the offer is lower than you had hoped, will you be able to go to work every day without feeling angry, cheated, or undervalued?

The industry may be a good fit, but the company may not be. To better judge this, ask these questions: Are employees treated fairly? Are team spirit and fair play evident? Does the company do what it says it will do in its policies and other communications? Are staff members viewed as the company's greatest asset? How about company stability in terms of finances and future . Has there been a history of downsizing, mergers, or acquisitions? Do trade-journal articles or conversations with competitors or insiders reveal that the company may be in financial trouble?

Does your immediate supervisor have a good reputation? Are employee turnover rates low? Does your supervisor-to-be appear to be committed to professional growth and development, as opposed to stuck-in-a-rut and stagnant? What, if any, "red flags" or concerns might you have about personality conflicts or your boss' management style?

Corporate culture goes far beyond dress code. Is the ambiance and social structure in your comfort zone? Is the company's mission statement aligned with your values? If the company expects everyone to work 60-hour workweeks, is this okay with you?

Is the company's distance from your home acceptable? If the opportunity requires an excessive commute, is telecommuting or relocation a possibility? If no, are there measures you can put in place that will help salvage the commute time, such as taking a course that involves audiotapes? Beyond commute considerations, is the location safe? Will your work space be conducive to productivity and/or creativity? Does the company provide the equipment and support you need to do your job effectively?

Will this position be a logical fit for your long-term plans? If this is more of a "bridge" job than a "dream" job, will it allow you to still have the time and energy you need to work on action steps toward your dream job? If this is a position toward the end of your career, will it allow you to create the legacy you want? If you're in your early- or mid-career, is this the right stepping stone? Does the company have a policy for promoting from within? Are professional development and training programs offered? Will the company reimburse you for training completed outside the company?

Will the position enhance or complement your personal/family commitments? Will the schedule or stress-level prevent you from giving what you want to your spouse/partner, children, or other important people in your life?

An applicant's performance during their interview will either make or break their chances of obtaining a position. Practice makes perfect, so please take advantage of opportunities to mock interview before a real interview.

Attend a campus career event which brings-in guest hiring managers to perform mock interviews. Such events include the fall  Walkthru Workshop, spring Road Trip to Reality, and the Student Teacher Professional Development Day (educators only).

Close-out any open lines of credit that you are not using, as lenders view these open lines of credit negatively. If you make an in-store purchase (i.e. furniture), oftentimes that account remains open even after you've paid-off the loan.

Welcome! It is a pleasure to introduce myself to you as a professional counselor and educator. This portfolio highlights some of my most recent counseling experiences in the Wisconsin K-16 settings of Hudson School District and University of Wisconsin  River Falls. It is my hope that as you tour the American School Counselor Association (ASCA) Standards and read the Personal Disclosure Statement you will begin to see my focus, desire, and facilitative optimism in helping all students reach academic, personal, social, and career success.

To bolster my counseling coursework and practicum knowledge, I have drawn upon  eight years experience with students, grades 7-12, teaching English and Social Studies. These years have given me the opportunity to work with students, parents, staff, and within communities in a variety of classroom and extracurricular advisory settings.

You will also note from my resume that I have gained leadership and team building capabilities through experiences in both business and the military. These global perspective skills have allowed me to better aid students in developing their academic, career, and personal interests for future success.

I hope my portfolio gives you an opportunity to see that I truly enjoy working with people of all ages in a variety of professional educational and counseling environments. I would like to thank the Hudson School District and the University of Wisconsin  River Falls for allowing me to work with their students and staff to complete my practicum. It is my goal to carry on their professional courtesy and generosity by continuing to serve others as a professional counselor.

I am a senior at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, where I will graduate this spring with a major in Marketing Communications and a minor in Journalism - Editorial Emphasis. As this website highlights my marketing skills, my various journalistic and communicative skills are displayed throughout the pages.

When navigating through this site, please note the six main site areas, outlined to left ( also including the Homepage). Each of those areas will have buttons to navigate throughout the website at the bottom of their respective page. Some of the pages have links to other sub-pages. To return from a sub-page to one of the six main pages, please use your browser's "Back" button.

Our graduate degree and certificate programs are designed to meet your personal and professional goals. Our programs are rigorous, yet relevant, educational opportunities that are built on a solid foundation of academic excellence. Our faculty are friendly, experienced mentors who take the time to address each student's professional needs and career objectives.

Class schedules accommodate fulltime or part-time students. Courses are offered in a condensed format during summers for teachers and in the evenings and on weekends during the academic year. In many cases, classes are available through distance-learning options such as online or video conference.

Each year about 700 graduate students attend UW-River Falls classes. As a member of the prestigious University of Wisconsin System , the campus can provide students with extensive academic resources, including more than 125 highly qualified graduate faculty members.

Applying to graduate school is easy! Start by selecting your program of study. The UW-RF Graduate Catalog provides additional admissions information. Staff in the Graduate Studies office are also available to assist you.

Furthering your education is a wise investment and tuition rates at UW-River Falls are competitive with public and private institutions in this area. For graduate tuition rates and other campus fees, go to the Accounts Receivable web site.

Work study positions are available for students who take four or more credits per term. For more information, visit the Office of Financial Assistance. Graduate assistantship positions may also be available from the department of your program of study.

During the final enrollment period of your graduate program leading to the Master's degree, you must successfully complete a written and/or oral comprehensive examination prepared and administered by your graduate committee.

If you are unsuccessful in the comprehensive examination, you may, upon approval of the Graduate Council, reschedule the examination after a delay of six months. If you receive an incomplete on the comprehensive examination, you must make up the deficiencies identified by the chair of the committee.

In the case of an oral examination, you will receive a form for reporting the time (a block of two hours) and location to the Graduate Office, and you are responsible for making these arrangements with the committee. You must make all such arrangements and report them to the Graduate Office at least two weeks before the examination and not later than four weeks before the end of the term or session or the commencement ceremony in which you plan to be granted the degree. For an oral examination to be held during the summer, you should make arrangements during the spring semester.

All Plan A (thesis) candidates will take an oral examination about the thesis. This may be in addition to a written comprehensive, if required by the department concerned. All Plan B or Plan C candidates will take a written and/or oral examination based on specified program requirements. You are responsible for meeting with all members of your graduate committee before the examination to discuss how to prepare for the written and/or oral examination.

You will defend your master's paper in an oral examination by the three members of your graduate committee. Master's papers will be signed by the advisor and sent to the Graduate Office. The paper will not be bound. A copy will be filed in the Archives, as well as in the department.

Because each member of your graduate committee must approve your completed thesis, you must inform all three members of the committee about the development of the problem, research progress, and results, as well as the writing of the thesis. You will defend your thesis in an oral examination.

Three copies of the thesis must be filed for binding. Following approval by your graduate committee, you will pay a ten dollar ($10) per copy binding fee in the University's Business Office. When you present your receipt to the Graduate Office, the Dean of Graduate and Professional Studies will sign the title page of the thesis. The three copies will then be sent out for binding. It is your responsibility to check the manuscripts for proper pagination and deliver them to the Graduate Office.

If you take undergraduate courses, each three undergraduate credits will count as two graduate credits in calculating your load. Graduate assistants must take at least eight credits and no more than twelve credits.

The grade of "SP" (satisfactory progress) may be used in field-based or research-oriented classes where the nature of the work involved requires more calendar time than is available during the term for which the student is registered for the course. Upon completion of the project, this special grade will be changed to an appropriate letter grade.

You must maintain a "B" (3.0) average in your area of specialization, as well as on an overall basis. In determining this average, transfer credit will not be included. If you do not maintain a "B" (3.0) average, you will be placed on probation for the next enrollment period.

If you are placed on probation, you must earn a "B" average in the next enrollment period for full-time students and in the next 12 credits earned for part-time students. If you do not succeed in doing so, you will not be allowed to register for further courses.

If, after discussing the grade with the instructor, you still believe that the grade is inappropriate, you may appeal in writing to the department chairperson. You must do this before the end of the semester (excluding summer) following the assignment of the grade. The chairperson will submit your written claim to the instructor, who will prepare a written response. A copy of the instructor's response will be furnished to you within three weeks after the chairperson receives your request.

If, after you receive the instructor's response, you are still dissatisfied, you must notify the chairperson and Dean of Graduate Studies of this in writing within two weeks of receiving the response. The Dean will convene a meeting with you, the instructor, and the chairperson and try to resolve the grading conflict. Both you and the instructor shall provide copies of any course work which is in your possession. The burden of the proof is on you to demonstrate evidence of misgrading. The Dean will inform you in writing of the outcome of this meeting. If the grade you appeal was assigned by the chairperson, the Dean will receive your initial appeal and request a faculty member to replace the chairperson or program director in the appeal proceedings. If the issue is not resolved in your meeting with the Dean, the instructor and the chairperson, you may appeal to the Vice Chancellor, whose decision is final.

To graduate, you must have met all the minimum requirements for the master's degree. You must have earned all credits accepted toward the degree, including transfer credit, within the preceding seven years. The Graduate Council may approve a single extension in the case of unusual health conditions, fulfillment of military obligations, or similar extenuating circumstances.

If you plan to write a thesis or you are enrolled in a program that requires a committee for a final comprehensive examination, the Office of Graduate Studies will appoint your graduate committee when the tentative degree plan is accepted. Your adviser will chair the committee, which will include another graduate faculty member from your area of specialization and one member from outside your area of specialization. Your committee will evaluate your thesis, conduct your oral comprehensive, or evaluate your examination papers when an open-ended written comprehensive is used.

STEP 1: Select your program of study. Refer to the Graduate Programs page for program descriptions and admission requirements. You may apply to most programs at any time; however, certain programs have firm deadlines and require additional application materials.

Additional application materials, if required, should be mailed to the Graduate Studies office. ALL application materials must be postmarked on or before any applicable program deadlines in order to be considered.

You must re-enter if you have previously taken any graduate classes at UW-River Falls and your last class was before  Fall 2003. There is no additional fee required unless you are changing programs as described below.

Upon receiving these materials, we will notify you of the status of your application and/or mail registration materials to you. Follow the instructions provided to activate your student account and register for classes. A $100 enrollment or registration deposit payable to the Cashier's Office is required before you  can register for classes. For more information on the registration deposit, visit the Registrar's Office web site.

You can take classes for one term before  being formally admitted to the Graduate School. After one term, students who have not yet been admitted will not be permitted to enroll in any further classes until admissions requirements have been satisfied.

If the graduate degree program you have selected requires you to obtain an initial teaching certification, you will need to pass the PRAXIS II  exam and apply for this certificate through the College of Education and Professional Studies, Teacher Education Department. Go to the department Web site  for more details.

When you have been admitted, you will be instructed to meet with your department chairperson or program coordinator, who will appoint your advisor and review possible transfer of credits. Please note that you can only transfer up to nine credits from another institution and that the Director of Graduate Studies must approve such transfers. See  Graduate Catalog Requirements for more information.

During your first term, meet with your academic advisor to discuss your academic program. With your advisor, complete and submit a tentative degree pattern to the Graduate Office for approval. If this is not approved by the Director of Graduate Studies during your first semester, you will not be able to register for further classes.

If you feel that an error has been made in your admissions status or denial of admission, you may present an appeal to the Appeals Committee of the Graduate Council. Refer to Graduate Studies Appeal Procedures  for more details.

The following is an alphabetical listing of the many resources that are available to UW-RF students. Browse for the answer to your question or use the Google search feature in the menu to find the answer within the site. You may also use the Hot Topic links for answers to our frequently asked questions.

All admitted students receive instructions on how to activate your account. (See How to Apply for admission or re-admission instructions.) You may activate your Falcon Account online at https://www.uwrf.edu/apps/nrm/.

Information on fee payment schedules, required deposits, finance charges and payment methods are found at http://www.uwrf.edu/accounts-receive/. You can pay credit tuition online by MasterCard or electronic check. You can also mail or drop off payment at the Cashiers Office, 217 North Hall.

Outreach and Graduate Studies  partners with the College of Arts and Sciences to offer the Community Classroom series each fall and spring.  University faculty share their expertise through informal presentations on a variety of topics.

SOS offers six-week sessions of discussions with university professors and   community members who share their expertise, knowledge and opinions on a broad variety of current and historical events, experiences and issues. Join us for these lively and informative discussions. There are  fall and spring sessions, with  two-hour classes  held one morning each week.

Registration is now open for Spanish and Italian language classes for adults. Classes are offered in the evenings, once a week and are designed to give people the skills to successfully communicate during their travels, whether for business or pleasure.

Outreach and Graduate Studies partners with the College of Arts and Sciences to offer the Community Classroom series each fall and spring. University faculty share their expertise through informal presentations on a variety of topics.

BizNews provides the latest UW-River Falls information each month for business and industry on topics of general interest as well as the latest on UW-RF programs and services tailored to the private sector.

The new site features a class schedule lookup function that allows visitors to find both credit and noncredit classes and course descriptions, as well as a list of program requirements for all graduate degrees and certificates.

Information on the site is grouped into logical categories including Graduate Studies, Continuing Education and Community Programs. People pursuing graduate degrees or certificates can go directly to a Graduate Studies section. Those interested in just taking a course or two can find what they are looking for in Continuing Education. And, those looking for community or youth events can find them under Community Programs.

Kilic will discuss how there is research being done on customer orientation but there is a lack of investigation of the firm's customer orientation and the link to customer commitment. The research model was developed and a questionnaire was derived from the SOCO scale of 450 dealers of a leading jeans producer in Turkey.

Pat Dillon, the WEN director for the northwest region, will be the workshop instructor. She has consulted with hundreds of companies in the SBIR and STTR programs and helped emerging technology companies win more than $20 million in research awards.

Participants will learn the "who, what, where, when, why, and how" of federal SBIR/STTR programs and WEN assistance as well as the federal $2.2 billion Small Business Innovation Research and Small Business Technology Transfer programs. These programs allow innovative companies to participate in the federal research and development arena by funding high risk, early-stage, innovative technologies resulting in new products and services with domestic and international markets, and with government and non-government worldwide markets.

J-Term opportunities mixing study and travel include several trips that are only available over the January term. These include study trips to Ireland, Egypt and Italy. Some of these study trips are open to adult non-credit learners as well as students.

Register now for the Supervisory Management Workshop in December. Offered by the UW-RF College of Business and Economics, this new series will give new or experienced supervisors the skills and knowledge to be effective, ethical and influential leaders in their workplace.

Business leaders and area residents are invited to participate in the open houses. Legislative ideas collected at the meetings will be pared down to four or five issues that will be presented to legislators in Madison in February or March 2006.

"The border county region of Polk, St. Croix, and Pierce is one of the fastest growing in state," said Dan Reeves, president of Polk County EDC. "This growth creates many issues that need to be conveyed to a wide audience of legislators," added Pamela Brion, president of St. Croix EDC. "We can choose to travel to Madison separately, but it is far more effective to work together under one banner," said Trudy Popenhagen, president of Pierce County EDC.

Get recipes, tips, and hands-on practice for using venison this fall and taste the benefits every hunting season. Instructor Steve Watters brings his extensive professional and personal experience to a workshop for people who want to make their own venison sausage and jerky.

Livable places dont just happen  they are created intentionally by people who are rooted in their values and their commitment to a place. "Cultivating Community: A Place to Set Roots" will spark exploration of how to build social capital. This fourth annual community forum will be held on Nov. 29 from 6:30-9:30 p.m.

This year there are over 45 new organizations attending their first Career Fair. This is a very important fact because it gives more students a better opportunity to find internships, jobs and make employer contacts for the future.

Since January 2005, investors making equity investments in qualified early-stage stage businesses are eligible for a tax credit of 25percent of the Investment over two years. The workshop will cover which investors are eligible, what companies may be qualified new business ventures, what the tax-credit program limits are and what the steps are for investors from investing to claiming the credits.

Pam Christenson, director of the Bureau of Entrepreneurship at the Wisconsin Department of Commerce will the lead the workshop, give an overview of tax credits and answer questions. She was part of the team that developed and enacted rules and programs including the tax credits.

In an effort to plan for the future of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls in its role as a regional partner in the St. Croix Valley, new Chancellor Don Betz is inviting community members to take part in a vision and values survey. The survey is online at http://www.uwrf.edu/vision.

The anonymous survey contains seven short-answer questions, each regarding perceptions and expectations of UW-RF. "Your answers  are vital in identifying our strengths and informing the discussions we will have together about planning for our future," says Betz.

"In our 21st century world, the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and all organizations must thoughtfully and intentionally celebrate strengths and plan for the future ... Your answers will provide an essential foundation in shaping our values, vision and mission for the years ahead," says Betz in the preface to the survey.

They survey will provide valuable information as the University soon enters its strategic planning process. The survey results will be discussed in a public forum that will be held in November. Watch BizNews next month for an announcement of that date and location.

A century ago, Albert Einstein wrote five influential papers that radically changed our understanding of the universe. One of the papers laid a foundation for the field of study that eventually became known as quantum mechanics. Join Dr. Matthew Vonk, of the physics department, in this easy-to-understand discussion.

Dont forget to register for the Oct. 27-28 workshop for Supervisory Management. Offered by the UW-RF College of Business and Economics, this new series will give new or experienced supervisors the skills and knowledge to be effective, ethical and influential leaders in their workplace.

Four classes are offered in each two-day workshop and workshops will be held once a month through June. The cost for each class is $99. Discounts will be given when people register and pay for more than one class within a workshop.

This course covers all the information you need to know about developing an estate plan including federal estate and gift taxation and ways to reduce the size of the gross estate such as wills, probate, trusts, and more. Students must have taken the prerequisite course in the program, Financial Planning Processes and Insurance before registering for this course.

With Wisconsin Idea Theater as the backdrop, the forum will address how to nurture community involvement and move people from being observers to participants. The keynote speaker will be Maryo Gard Ewell, daughter of Robert Gard, the author of Grassroots Theater: A Search for Regional Arts in America.

Beginning at 8:30 a.m. on Wednesday, Sept. 14, the first day of the conference concludes with a panel of regional business leaders discussing the role existing businesses play in economic development. The Tastes of the Valleys reception immediately follows, featuring regional cuisine from a wide variety of vendors. A half-day session dedicated to developing action plans and transferring Synergy to Energy will be held from 8:30 a.m. to noon on Thursday, Sept. 15. A panel of legislators will provide the session wrap-up, discussing how the state can partner with the region to move forward.

What do some kinds of fish, birds, mollusks, insects, plants and mammals have in common? They are part of an ever-growing list of invasive species. These destructive species occur in the wrong place at the wrong time because they have been moved there by people.

Many children spend more time with electronic media than is recommended. It is important for parents to gain a greater understanding of what their children are watching --not just on the surface, but in the messages conveyed through programming and commercials. This presentation will increase your awareness of the messages regarding race and gender that are often embedded in children's television and commercials.

In this course, human resource professionals and general managers may enhance their careers by gaining a solid foundation in HR principles and practices. Participants will have the opportunity to network and share real-world experiences while obtaining the skills needed to remain competitive in the HR field. Upon completion of the course, certified HR professionals earn 36 of the 50 continuing education units required for recertification.

UW-RF is offering a workshop-style course for those interested in understanding grants and building valuable proposal writing skills. Participants will explore funding sources, inquiry letters, proposal narratives, budgets and more.

The College of Business and Economics is offering a new series of workshops designed to give new or experienced supervisors the skills and knowledge to be effective, ethical and influential leaders in their workplace.

The Supervisory Management Series is comprised of 20 noncredit classes that may be taken in half-day or full-day increments. In the four-hour classes, participants will receive practical instruction and useful tools that they can apply immediately in their workplace.

Participants may chose to complete workshops leading to a certificate or select from a variety of topics for professional enhancement or refreshment. Topics include beginning management, legal issues, workplace ethics, problem solving and effective hiring.

The first workshop is Oct. 27-28 and additional workshops will be offered monthly throughout the year. The cost for each class is $99. Discounts will be given when people register and pay for more than one class within a workshop.

Classes designed to immerse elementary students in several languages and cultures through songs, games and hands-on activities will be offered on campus this fall by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls outreach office.

The forum is presented by UW-River Falls in collaboration with the Phipps Center for the Arts and the St. Croix Valley Community Foundation. In addition to the forum, artist conversations, book discussions, art showings and an "open mic" night will address this topic. All events are free and open to the public.

"Business Feasibility Analysis" gives would-be entrepreneurs a chance to determine if a business idea is feasible, if it is worth the time and start-up money and how to take the steps to launching a business.

PCPT thought the tour would raise funds through sales and draw tourists interested in natural history to the county. I saw the benefit to public education and outreach and wrote a tour script pro bono.

Pierce County is in west-central Wisconsin. Although still largely rural, it is part of the fast-growing Minneapolis-St. Paul metropolitan area. The county is dominated by sedimentary rocks deposited in shallow seas about 450 million years ago, partly covered by glacial and river sediments deposited within the last million years.

Scenic landscapes are especially visible along deeply incised valleys draining to the Mississippi. Pierce County also has several unique geological features of interest to the general public. Gold and diamonds are found in the county's stream valleys. These likely come from glacial drift, although exploration for bedrock sources has occurred. The gold is in very small particles, but encourages amateur panning groups to visit. Their efforts are often directed at Nugget Lake County Park, named for the historic gold finds. Rocks deformed by the Rock Elm asteroid impact structure also occur in the park.

Stops were chosen with regard to ease of accessibility and location on an easy-to-drive circle route. Some stops, including a commercial cave, require entry fees, but are run by organizations or individuals that welcome tourists. Stops include the confluence of the St. Croix and Mississippi Rivers, Diamond Bluff, Nugget Lake Park, the Rock Elm impact structure, Crystal Cave, the Eau Galle Dam, Glen Park in River Falls, and Kinnickinnic State Park.

The script was produced as an audio CD with corporate sponsorship by Pierce-Pepin Cooperative Services. The recording featured narration by local radio personality Tom Hughes of KWNG radio in Red Wing. The CD has an insert with a summary of Pierce County's geology and a geological and route map of the county by Dr. Charles Rader of the UW-River Falls geography department.

The success of this project shows that tours of this sort can be attractive fund-raising, educational and promotional products even in a region without diverse geology. This will encourage other counties to develop similar tours.

Betz commenced the program by stressing the importance of "teamwork as the essence to success." This 15-year journey has ultimately been built on a growing partnership between organizations: "As we celebrate the 15th year of successful training camp, we're really celebrating a relationship," Betz said.

Former Camp Coordinator and Vice Chancellor of Administration and Finance Mary Halada emphasized how the state-of-the-art facilities blend both the University needs with the Kansas City Chiefs' needs to create a "win-win situation."

Student Senate President Nick Cluppert highlighted the many opportunities that the Chiefs organization bestows onto students. Not only does the presence of the Chiefs generate many internships and jobs, it also "saves the college students money." This affiliation with the Chiefs also lures in many prospective students and shows the University's commitment to "improving our education."

"This partnership between the Kansas City Chiefs and University of Wisconsin-River Falls has yielded benefits on the state's side, and I'm pleased to hear from the Chiefs of the benefits that you've received."

He expressed the state's appreciation of the team and reassured them that they are an integral part of the "Wisconsin family." Doyle enthusiastically commented on the new building addition for the Chiefs, but also accentuated the real reason the facility was constructed. "While the Kansas City Chiefs were a major impetus for this great project, the fact is that this is here for the students of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls."

The Chiefs organization and players are impressed by the promptness of the construction and the contemporary features that it provides. Speaking on behalf of the team were starting quarterback Trent Green, linebacker Shawn Barber and wide receiver Eddie Kennison. Said Barber, "If we compare these to our facilities back in Kansas City, we should almost move our team here."

The addition was funded through a through a special building enumeration project approved by the State Building Commission and passed by the Legislature in February/March 2004. The architect of the project was Ayers Associates of Eau Claire, while the contractor was Ross & Associates of River Falls.

Feel free to bring your business problem or your going into business questions to a one-on-one, no fee business counseling session. You may reserve a time to meet and discuss your ideas by calling the County Extension Agent listed below.

The Synergy Conference is part of a University of Wisconsin System and PK-16 Consortium initiative focused on enhancing the economic, social, professional, and cultural development of our nine county region in West Central Wisconsin.

Topics will include gross income, exclusions, deductions, exemptions, capital gains and property transactions. Students need to have taken the first class in the series, Financial Planning Process and Insurance, or an equivalent course.

Passersby will notice two tall cranes piercing the campus skyline this summer during construction of the new student union. Both a 35-foot and a 55-foot Grove All-Terrain Crane are needed to shuttle building material from the ground up as the student union emerges.

Starting in late August, a new floor will be installed in the Knowles building. While the building is typically closed for public recreation in the summer, it will also be closed in the fall while the new flooring is installed.

New tennis courts are underway off the paved trail from campus to Knowles and the Ramer Field Sports Complex. The old railroad right-away trail also runs near the courts, which will be open to the public when not in use by university classes or athletic teams. Courts available to the public are also located at the east end of campus near the residence halls and the new George R. Field South Fork Suites.

The new George R. Field South Fork Suites will open its doors to student residents this fall, and meeting and conference rooms are already in use this summer. Community, staff and students previewed the hall at a dedication honoring former Chancellor George R. Field in May. Some 240 students will live in 60, four-person fully-equipped apartments. Each wing per floor also has a community kitchen, lounge area and laundry room. The $11 million facility was funded entirely by student fees.

The River Falls Municipal Utility has begun a project to replace the sanitary sewer trunk main at the South Fork of the Kinnickinnic. This will affect the campus in that there will be pipe extended on the surface near the stream, from the Ag Engineering Building on the west end of campus to a point upstream near the campus heating plant.

UW-RF, in partnership with Watchable Wildlife, Inc., has developed a new online graduate-level certificate program to help conservationists, community leaders, and recreation and hospitality providers build the skills necessary to effectively preserve the natural resources and generate jobs and revenue for their communities.

The first of five online courses offered under the Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Certificate will begin Sept. 7. Participants will earn two graduate credits, which will be applied toward completion of the 15-credit certificate.

Extension activities and research conducted to solve problems important to the state and its citizens are two key aspects of being a Wisconsin Idea Fellow. These aspects are also instrumental to my role as an instructor at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

As a state extension commercial fruit specialist, I conduct applied research and work with commercial fruit growers from Bayfield to Kenosha. Additionally, I organize statewide berry meetings and field days in conjunction with the Wisconsin Berry Growers Association. As director of the 35-acre UW-River Falls Fruit Research Facility, I conduct a multitude of cultural and breeding projects designed to provide many side benefits for my diverse clientele. Students in my horticulture classes get to observe fruit crops being grown in simulated commercial conditions and are given the opportunity to develop skills such as pruning. Commercial growers are presented results of UW-RF experiments and learn critical business aspects such as which cultivars to plant for optimum profitability.

I first became interested in fruit breeding while growing up on a commercial farm in Mitchell, S.D.. My father was an amateur strawberry and watermelon breeder and he introduced me to what has become a lifelong pursuit .My first position after graduation was at South Dakota State University, serving as State Extension Horticulture Specialist. The past 16 years have been spent at UW-RF in a teaching, extension and research role. My teaching activities at UW-River Falls involve providing expertise in an introductory plant science course and also in advanced vegetable and fruit production.

The purpose of these extension and research activities is to improve the profitability of fruit growers in the state of Wisconsin. I accomplish this by educating commercial fruit producers through newsletters, meetings, advising sessions, field days and local and national presentations and conferences. Through these channels, I present results of the latest research that I've conducted, whether screening new cultivars (cultivated varieties) from other areas of North America or reporting on the latest cultural techniques or progress in the UW-RF breeding program. Growers are also provided with summarized results of applicable research conducted by other fruit researchers from across North America.

I conduct research on strawberries, raspberries, plums and apricots that focuses on new cultivar development and cultural studies. Lydecker plum, for example, was specifically developed, and the first to be released, at UW-River Falls to serve as a base from which to start improving the feasibility of commercial plum production in the state. Lydecker and other cultivars are being developed with attributes such as winter hardiness, high yield potential, disease resistance and fruit quality. With the help of people at WiSys, a subdivision of the Wisconsin Alumni Research Foundation, a patent on Lydecker has been applied for. While we await final approval, WiSys personnel and I are working to license nurseries to propagate Lydecker so that sufficient numbers of trees will be available for growers to purchase.

UW-RF is a bright spot in the UW-System because it is the only campus actively engaged in extensive fruit breeding and is home to the only plum and raspberry breeding programs in a 24-state surrounding area.

UW-RF has developed a reputation for providing solid extension and applied research programs for the states commercial fruit growers. This would not have been possible , however, without grower, state and UW System support.

Also during camp, there will be a dedication of the new $2.3 million Knowles Building addition, as well as evening practices. A special 15th anniversary commemorative book featuring hundreds of photos from the past 14 camps also is being written.

Participants will meet near Interstate Park on the first day and at UW-River Falls on second day. The course fee is $89 per person and includes the park entry fees, lunches, snacks and the field transport on the second day.

The University has launched a new web site for those interested in graduate studies, continuing education classes or youth and community programs. The site at http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs includes a site map, searchable database of classes and other features that prospective students and community members may find helpful.

Future enhancements will include a page that highlights some of the community projects and partnerships that UW-RF has developed and maintained as part of the universitys objective to expand its role throughout the St. Croix Valley area.

Those projections were offered at UW-RF in March in a special workshop for all chief elected officials, administrators and planners for all layers of government in Pierce, Polk and St. Croix counties.

The Regional Dialogue was an off-shoot of four forums that the University held last winter and fall throughout the Valley to measure the challenges of growth in such areas as urban/rural transitions, education and the arts.

The March discussion was in response to elected officials who cited the need for better information about public policy issues in the Valley, and seeking the opportunity to share information on growth problems and solutions.

One outcome of the recent session was a decision by the government jurisdiction to form a collaborative relationship and shape an agenda for issues discussion. UW-RF was asked to facilitate these conversations, a role the University played with the formation of a regional tourism alliance as well as a regional school superintendents discussion group.

The highest paying jobs, in order, are in utilities, apparel manufacturing, paper manufacturing, internet and data processing services, rail transportation, fabricated metal products, machinery manufacturing, nonmetal mineral products, primary metal manufacturing, printing, transportation equipment manufacturing, and food products. All are substantially higher than the Wisconsin and national per capita income average.

By popular demand, UW-RF has unveiled a new web site as a resource for students seeking internships and for employers seeking interns. It may be found on the UWRF A-Z web index, or by visiting: www.uwrf.edu/internships Internships fulfill multiple needs: students receive important skills and training necessary to compete for jobs in their field after they graduate; for employers, internships fill an employment need and offer the chance to meet and screen potential future hires; for universities, internships help to develop and maintain important ongoing relationships with employers.

Until now, there has been no central resource to navigate students and employers through the maze of coordinating internships at UW-RF. Each college at UWRF coordinates them differently, thus students and employers had been confused by the process. The new internship web site offers clarity to this process.

Because internships are coordinated uniquely in each college, all postings should be submitted through the Career Services office, which will route them to the appropriate department internship coordinators for advertising to their students. A form linked from the internship web site allows employers to submit their opportunities to Career Services.

After submitting internships for posting, employers should then contact relevant university department coordinators to ensure that academic requirements would be fulfilled by the internship, and to learn the process and responsibilities that employers should adhere to while supervising the student. Each department coordinator determines the credit-worthiness of an internship. A list of department coordinators is available on the internships web site.

A new program presenting a variety of timely topics has been created by the UW-River Falls office of Outreach and Graduate Studies in an effort to bring awareness of the universitys resources to families and others in the Hudson area.

The scientists who completed the sequencing of the human genome in April 2003 were heralded by many as achieving the single, greatest scientific feat of the decade. It was the moon landing of the twenty-first century, but what are the benefits of this knowledge and what new information have we learned from this achievement?

This free lecture is held in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library on the corner of Division and Union Streets. No reservations are required to attend. The Community Classroom is sponsored by the College of Arts and Sciences and the Outreach office.

Redefine yourself as a photographer! Learn the proper techniques to take memorable photos of all your special occasions. Explore the photojournalist perspective and discover new techniques to see and take attractive, meaningful and well-composed photos.

Spend two weeks touring early American history this summer! Through a blend of organized tours and free time to explore, travelers will learn more about our colonial beginnings, slavery and the history of the Civil War.

A special course fee of $1,600 includes luxury bus transportation, lodging at three and four star hotels, entrance and admission fees. Tuition for graduate or undergraduate credits and meal expenses are not included.

Wildlife viewing is one of the fastest growing areas of outdoor recreation in the world. Learn how to bring people in close contact with nature and generate revenue while protecting and enhancing the very wildlife theyve come to appreciate.

The first of five courses offered under a graduate certificate program in Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism will be offered online this summer. This program is ideal for resource managers, community leaders, nature enthusiasts, tourism directors, and recreation and hospitality providers.

Amirahmadi discusses the meaning of lean, six sigma, and lean six sigma, during his presentation. In its most simple sense, six sigma is a highly disciplined approach to decision-making that helps people focus on improving processes to make them as near perfect as possible. Done properly, the process will ensure improved efficiency in internal business operations. A goal of lean six sigma is to strive for perfection in the quality of operations at the maximum plausible speed, enabling the business to work out defects and eliminate them.

Amirahmadi holds a doctorate in industrial management systems engineering. He has 20 years experience in education and industry, and is certified by the National Institute of Standards and Technology. He is a former senior management engineer for the Northwest Wisconsin Manufacturing Outreach Center, where he assisted many companies in various industries to increase productivity, reduce costs and improve quality.

Fred Poss, one of UW-RFs facilitators, will explain the benefits of the program and answer questions. Interested individuals may join a learning community beginning this fall. The MSE degree in professional development uses shared-inquiry communities, noted as one of the best learning methods for adults.

The new law extends higher alternative minimum tax exemptions through 2005. This gives Congress additional time to address the issue of AMT applicability to an increasing number of middle income Americans. The original purpose of the alternative minimum tax was to ensure extremely wealthy individuals and corporations paid some income tax. As time passed, more and more middle income individuals fell into the AMT trap.

Individuals will be allowed to elect to deduct state sales taxes or state and local income taxes, whichever is greater. This election is available for tax years 2004 and 2005. Taxpayers may determine the sales tax deduction by accumulating receipts or using tables provided by the IRS. This election is available only to those taxpayers itemizing deductions.

The amount of the deduction for a vehicle contribution to charity will be limited. The deduction will depend on how the charity uses the vehicle. If the organization sells the vehicle without using it in any significant manner, the donor's deduction amount is limited to the gross proceeds from the sale.

Farmers received some tax breaks also. A corporate farm may qualify for the new manufacturers' tax deduction. In addition, weather-forced livestock sales replacement periods have been extended to four years. The benefits of special income averaging have been extended to the alternative minimum tax.

There are new rules for Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plans that place significant restrictions on the ability, timing and amount of deferred compensation. Unless the nonqualified plan complies with the requirements, deferred compensation or bonus may be included in income at the deferral date or at a time when substantial risk of forfeiture has passed. Existing arrangements should be reviewed to ensure that the objectives of the plan are met under the new law.

A new 15-year recovery period for qualified leasehold improvements and qualified restaurant property is available for property placed in service before 2006. This is only available for acquisitions in 2005.

Taxpayers may deduct up to $5,000 of organizational and $5,000 of start-up expenditures in the tax year in which a trade or business begins. Each of these deductions is reduced by the amount the respective cumulative costs exceeding $50,000. Organizational and start-up costs that are not deductible may be amortized over a 15-year period.

A new manufacturers deduction will be phased in over six years to replace the foreign sales corporation/extraterritorial income regime. The definition of manufacturer and production activities is a broad and inclusive one. Traditional manufacturing, construction, engineering and agricultural products processing are included. The deduction is limited to 50% of W-2 wages paid during the tax year.

During brief remarks at the start of the ceremony, Dr. Betz will be introduced by Dr. Terry Brown, chair of the chancellor's search and screen committee. UW System President Kevin Reilly and Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander also will speak.

Dr. Betz will be joined in the morning's activities by his wife Susanne. Betz is the provost and vice president for academic affairs at Central Oklahoma University, Edmonton, Okla. He was named chancellor in February by the UW System Board of Regents after a nationwide search following the death last year of Chancellor Ann Lydecker.

His administrative accomplishments include the founding of the University of Central Oklahoma Center for Undergraduate Research and the establishment of the annual statewide Undergraduate Research Day; the establishment of a faculty enhancement center; co-founding of the Oklahoma Center for Arts Education; serving on the original implementation committee of the American Association of State Colleges and Universities' American Democracy Project; and initiating the Center for Tribal Studies at Northeastern State University.

Dr. Betz, who has also served as a board member and regular presenter for the Oklahoma Educators' Leadership Academy, has made leadership development among faculty, staff and students an integral part of his administrative accomplishments. He has significant fundraising experience and is a co-founder of the University of Central Oklahoma Alliance for Institutional Advancement, an innovative campus-wide collaboration for the advancement of the institution.

The Summit will bring together leaders from across the region to help prepare them to successfully deal with today's changing world. Attendees will learn how to enhance their leadership skills, how to share resources and information, how to create partnerships and networks, and how to implement community-building tools.

"Progress into the Past: Rediscovering our Biblical Roots" is set for March 31. Dr. Steven Derfler will lead you on a journey through maps, plans and imagery of several seasons of excavation in Israel in this interdisciplinary study of ancient civilizations such as those mentioned in the Bible. Dr. Derfler has studied ancient civilizations for over 25 years. In addition to teaching at UW-RF and the University of St. Thomas, he directs study tours to Egypt, Morocco, Greece, Turkey, Israel, and Jordan.

Learn some of the latest research in the area of social cognition and children with autism during two Saturdays in April. The College of Education and Professional Studies offers this new course for parents of children with autism spectrum disorders or those adults who work with these children.

The class is held Saturdays, April 16 and 23, from 9 am to 4 pm. Participants will receive "tried and true" strategies and interventions that work for teaching social skills to children with autism. This course would be benefit special education teachers, school counselors, school psychologists, speech/language pathologists, related service providers, parents of children with ASD, directors of special education and educational assistants.

This course is a basic introduction to computer equipment and terminology. Whether you are buying a new or used computer, know what you want the computer to do for you and how much you are willing to spend.

Tourism is a vital economic force generating nearly $20 billion in economic impact in Minnesota and Wisconsin. The St. Croix Valley of Wisconsin and Minnesota has an array of natural, cultural and historic resources drawing tens of thousands of visitors from near and far each year.

Topics covered include regional partnerships among agencies and tourism groups, customer service and industry trends. The day begins with a continental breakfast and networking session at 8 a.m. followed by a keynote at 9:15 a.m. by Craig Schowalter, owner of Business Plans, Etc., who will discuss the benefits of optimizing tourism through agency partnerships.

Schowalter embodies entrepreneurial spirit. He assists businesses with large-scale economic development plans through his company Business Plans, Etc. in Washburn, Wis. He also owns and operates South Shore Rowing Center, which is also in Washburn. Additionally, Schowalter has created a system of weight loss and lifestyle change in a program, Positive Pursuits.

Virtually every facet of the academic and outreach work that I do with students and communities of the St. Croix River Valley revolves around the concept of sustainability. This particular word (euphemistically evolving from Sustainable Development), sometimes receives mixed reactions from the general public due to the political baggage that is sometimes associated with it and the notion that it is somehow not capitalistically sound. Nothing could be further from the truth.

Clearly, this word would not have arrived on the scene, especially in the business arena, were it not for the economic, environmental, and social conditions (both domestically and internationally), that not only warrant our serious attention, but that also generate the most profound of economic and business opportunities for the future.

The WBCSD has evolved to become one of the most influential NGOs in the world in support of sustainability-based business performance. As further evidence, even the Dow Jones since 1999, has provided the DJ Sustainability Index as a benchmark of the best companies for combined economic performance, environmental management, and corporate social responsibility.

Sustainability-based business models are often thought to be only a multi-national corporate phenomenon. Quite the contrary. Small- and medium-sized businesses are just as effected. For example, a few of years ago, one of the major U.S. auto manufacturers required that its thousands of vendors for supplies and equipment become ISO 14000 certified in order to remain eligible for contracts. ISO 14000 is the International Organization of Standards voluntary framework for Environmental Management Systems.

This example should not be seen as a threat, but as an example of opportunity knocking and as a signal for strategic planning. I doubt that Im telling you anything you dont already know, but sustainability as a business opportunity is already here. Please let me know if I can be of assistance. (kelly.d.cain@uwrf.edu or 715/425-3729).

These periodic get-togethers over lunch feature timely talks by distinguished business professionals and the opportunity to network with fellow graduates and UW-RF faculty. Social/networking starts at 11:30 a.m. with lunch and speaker at noon. Cost is $20.

Belize, a small Central American country nestled between Mexico and Guatemala, was once a refuge for pirates and buccaneers. Today, Belize has been transformed into the ideal retreat for a new group of adventurers: tourists.

On Tuesday, Feb. 22, at 7 p.m., Dr. Ed Robins will discuss Belizes dependence on its rich natural resources, and recent concerns voiced by conservationists. Can Belize respond to growing environmental issues and still maintain the tourism industry that its economy depends upon?

Robins is professor of anthropology and chair of the department of sociology, anthropology and criminal justice at the UWRiver Falls. He directs a student study tour to Belize, internship opportunities there, and a joint research program with Green Reef Belize.

The class, Financial Planning Process and Insurance, will focus on the basics for successful financial planning; the legal, ethical and regulatory issues affecting financial planning and the time value of money concepts. The course will also cover the insurance principles and risk management concepts that will help professionals in identifying their clients needs.

This program is also the only CFP Board-registered program offered in west-central Wisconsin and conveniently close to the eastern suburbs of the Twin Cities. Besides preparing individuals for CFP certification, the program provides practical training for anyone currently employed in a variety of financial services, legal or administrative professions. The courses may also meet continuing education requirements for a variety of professions.

Improve your understanding of young children and discover new ways to encourage behavior through positive reinforcement by attending a child development workshop at the UW-RF on Saturday, March 5, from 9 a.m. to 3 p.m.

The Rhythm of Guidance workshop features The Power of Guidance author Dr. Dan Gartrell as the keynote speaker, and offers a rare opportunity for parents, teachers, and college students interested in working in the field of early childhood education to meet with insightful and experienced professionals in a comfortable small group setting.

Workshop topics will focus on a range of developmental issues from conflict intervention to developing effective childcare strategies. A catered lunch will be provided and a chance to engage in an open discussion with Dr. Dan Gartrell will be available during his book signing session. Parking is free and childcare services will be available at no extra cost.

Rathburn examined the success of new executives to CEO positions from data previously collected on head coach successions, change, and performance in the National Football League. Rathburn's research shows top executive succession positively influences the performance of an organization by studying the timing of the change and the experiences of the new CEO.

An online job posting system that connects Wisconsin employers to University of Wisconsin graduates, the program's goal is to add value to Wisconsin businesses while investing in the overall success of the state's future.

Geographic Information Systems (GIS) have been around for the better part of a quarter of a century now mainly catering to needs for location-based analysis in the sciences, resource management, planning and government. Only in the past decade have GIS been applied to applications in business.

The challenge for most businesses when dealing with GIS (and other information technologies for that matter), is moving beyond replacing existing business procedures with computer based procedures, but instead the development of new procedures that allow us to capture nuances and changes in business data that happen to include location. Its estimated that 90 percent of all data is spatial data, and this is true for most businesses. Businesses have data that refer to the locations of their facilities, workforce, customers, resources, products, goods and services. Examining the locational characteristics of each or many of these could open up new insights to their operations and markets.

Image the possibilities of some of the changes in the way GIS could impact your business. If we think in historical terms, in 14th century Europe virtually no one knew where they were. Accurate locations were only possible over short distances, most places were not named well enough to ensure that one could return to them with any certainty, and most navigation was accomplished by memory and sheer luck. It took an explosion of geographic information along with many other significant developments to shake Europe out of the Dark Ages and lead to the Age of Discovery and the emerging economic potential of the world. Geographic or locational data were key in the economic transformation from the Middle Ages to the Renaissance and on to modern times. Location, today, is so basic that most businesses currently do not employ the power of this knowledge encoded in their information databases.

How many of you actually know where your customers are and have seen a map of them in relation to where your business or operations is? Mapping them could provide you with a quality of information that is more easily interpreted about location important to your business and help you relate to who they are socially, economically, and demographically.

How many of you have multiple facilities or properties that need to be managed? Maintaining operations in areas away from your core business areas may cost time and money. More advanced applications examine basic business functions for the utility of spatial data that could determine more efficient service or sales regions, monitoring inventory or equipment movements, or looking for new markets for your goods, products, or services.

Location may be more fundamental to your operations than you ever realized. This is not necessarily the where you are absolute location or your site, but in regards to your relative location or your situation. Every new technology comes with a cost and, as in most business decisions, these need to be considered carefully. The old real-estate adage, its all about location, continues to be true even in the footloose business environment of the internet.

In addition, the current economy has put increasing pressure on people in the workforce to update their skills and return to school, and attending UW-River Falls can be a convenient and affordable way for them to do that.

Students interested in starting spring term can contact the UW-RF admissions office at 715/425-3500 or by e-mail at admit@uwrf.edu. Applications and transcripts should be sent to the admissions office as soon as possible to ensure that students are included in the spring term registration program.

The class will be offered on Monday evenings on the UW-RF campus from Jan. 24 to April 18. The course provides human resources professionals and other general managers and supervisors with an overview of key areas in human resource management. The SHRM Learning System will be used for study materials.

Dr. Ed Robins will discuss Belizes dependence on its treasure trove of natural resources, and recent concerns voiced by conservationists over transformation of the resource base. Can Belize respond to growing environmental issues and still maintain the tourism industry that its economy depends upon? Images of Belize will be presented.

Robins is professor of anthropology, and chair of the department of sociology, anthropology, and criminal justice at UW-RF. He is director of the Belize Program, which includes a student study tour to Belize during spring break, internship opportunities in Belize, and a soon-to-be joint research program with Green Reef Belize.

This program is also the only CFP Board-registered program offered in west central Wisconsin and conveniently close to the eastern suburbs of the Twin Cities. Besides preparing individuals for CFP certification, the program provides practical training for anyone currently employed in a variety of financial services, legal or administrative professions.The courses may also meet continuing education requirements for a variety of professions.

The purpose of a CEE is to provide K-12 educators with ideas on how to teach or incorporate economics in their curriculum. It gives students a working practical knowledge of economics through a variety of subjects, says Professor Brian Schultz, economics professor, director of the CEE at UW-River Falls, and statewide director for the CEE.

The UW-RF center offers a number of services, from workshops, in-service training, and graduate courses, to access to a well-stocked library of resources. The Resource Library in South Hall gives teachers access to an assortment of economics teaching materials including lesson plans, Advanced Placement books, and videos. There are even children's literature stories that help teach children economics.

The UW-RF center offers five one-credit graduate courses offered online each semester as well as during the summer. The courses are flexible to meet the demands of busy schedules, says Schultz, and provide teachers with opportunities to improve the quality of their courses and make economics interesting for students.

Its prominence is particularly important in the St. Croix Valley, which enjoys the advantage of an exceptional branded image: a National Scenic Riverway that is one of the few rivers on the North American Continent that is protected for its entire length.

Riverway communities market themselves as quaint, historic river towns. That resonates well with many other stakeholders in the Valley, including preservationists and such other organizations as the St. Croix Scenic Coalition. Groups such as these seek to preserve and potentially expand the green belt that surrounds the Riverway. They want to ensure that the unique presence of the River is preserved for future generations as the Twin Cities metro moves inexorably to the east.

State agencies, such as the Wisconsin Department of Tourism and the Minnesota Office of Tourism, view the St. Croix Valley as having other additional strategic advantages for building on the increasing importance of tourism in the Valley.

Foremost is the proximity of the Twin Cities, which has the fourth highest per capita income of the nations top 25 metropolitan areas. A quick perusal of the Sunday travel sections of the Star-Tribune or Pioneer Press demonstrates that the travel trade industry recognizes that many Twin Cities residents have sizable discretionary income and are willing to spend it on travel.

Similarly, the Valley enjoys another advantage through the increasing wealth accumulating among its residents who adjoin the Riverway. A recent study by Amerigis, a highly respected urban demographics research center in the Twin Cities, shows that the St. Croix Valley on a proportionate basis compares favorably to such other upscale enclaves as Minnetonka and Edina. Upscale businesses, recreation destinations and community events helps ensure that disposable wealth stays home.

Indirectly, the Valley offers another distinct tipping point for economic development purposes. As more than 40 states pursue highly skilled technology professionals and their businesses, numerous studies have found thatall other factors being equalthe deciding criteria for relocation is the quality of life that a region offers.

To expedite the process, the campus has slightly revised its time line. Shortly after interviewing candidates near the airport, the committee will meet to discuss which of the semi-finalists it would like to invite to campus.

On Dec. 20, the committee will meet with a subcommittee of the University of Wisconsin System Board of Regents and UW System President Reilly to brief them on the results of its deliberations. The finalists should be publicly announced after Jan. 1 and will visit campus at the beginning of February.

President Reilly and the Board of Regents will select the Chancellor based on feedback from the campus and their own interviews of the finalists. We anticipate that the appointment of a new Chancellor will be announced at the Board of Regents meeting on March 11.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering the first course in a series of classes for the Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Graduate Certificate this January. The certificate program, which may be completed entirely online, is designed to help conservationists, community leaders, and recreation and hospitality providers build the skills necessary to effectively preserve their natural resources through sustainable community planning.

According to a recent study of the Fortune 200 companies, many of the worlds top 200 companies were established within the last 25 years. Explore the opportunities that await todays entrepreneurs by attending a class on Entrepreneurship offered by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

Students will learn how successful entrepreneurs start new ventures and assemble the resources needed to get their initiatives up and running. The many facets of entrepreneurship will be examined through lectures, guest speakers, case studies and outside readings.

The College of Education and Professional Studies and the Outreach and Graduate Studies Office are hosting a workshop on Saturday, March 5, for educators, child care providers and anyone else who works with young children. Mark your calendars and plan to attend The Rhythm of Guidance on the UW-RF campus.

The people of Wisconsin and the University of Wisconsin System have developed and maintained a rare relationship.This relationship is called the Wisconsin Idea. It began in the Nineteenth Century when the political leadership of the state and the University of Wisconsin faculty in the departments of economics and plant pathology took on the responsibility of developing a mutually beneficial relationship. The names associated with the development of the Wisconsin Idea include John Bascom, Charles Van Hise, Richard T. Ely, John R. Commons , Robert M. La Follette, Hiram Smith, Harry Russell, Richard E. Vaughn, and others.

The University of Wisconsin took on the responsibility of outreach to aid the economic condition of the state and the responsibility to help our political leaders design a state government structure to better serve the people of Wisconsin . A noted scholar regarding the Wisconsin Idea defines it as follows.

"The university provides public service by using its resources to address problems and concerns throughout the state and region. Special emphasis is placed on cooperative extension, extension and economic development outreach."

The very structure of the University of Wisconsin System reflects the special relationship between the university and the state. Unlike most states, Wisconsin has deliberately placed universities and campuses around the state so that the faculty and other resources of the university can identify with all regions of the state and the people of Wisconsin feel a connection to the university. For example, I am a faculty member of the University of Wisconsin System , but I clearly identify with west central Wisconsin and this region is the focus of my activity. This does not exist in other states.

It has been a mutually beneficial relationship through most of our history. The university depends on the people of Wisconsin to support it. This support is particularly important in tough budget times. We depend on the people of Wisconsin to understand that a strong and healthy University of Wisconsin System is not an expense but a valuable investment in the future of Wisconsin .

I was identified by the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin System as a Wisconsin Idea Fellow in recognition of the work I have done as part of the Wisconsin Idea. I am proud to be a member of the faculty at the University of Wisconsin - River Falls and I am proud to be a citizen of a forward-looking state.

Kansas City Chiefs President Carl Peterson announced on Nov. 3 that the club has agreed to exercise its option to continue conducting its training camp at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls in 2005.

Kansas City 's 2005 training camp on the River Falls campus will mark the 15th consecutive year the Chiefs will conduct their preseason work in Western Wisconsin . The team has three remaining one-year options in its existing agreement with UW-RF should the Chiefs wish to exercise them.

"On behalf of the entire Chiefs organization, we're delighted to return to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls for a 15th consecutive year," Peterson commented. "We have enjoyed our relationship with UW-River Falls and look forward to continuing that partnership for another year and the possibility of ensuing years. I want to personally thank the entire River Falls community and particularly the staff at UW-River Falls for making training camp so productive for us the past 14 years. They have never become complacent and have worked diligently to improve each year."

"The University and the Kansas City Chiefs have had a mutually beneficial relationship that we are pleased will continue into a 15 th year. The campus, the St. Croix Valley and all of Wisconsin have gained immeasurably from the attention and the economic impact that the Chiefs bring with them. We look forward to welcoming them back in 2005 to their summer home."

St. Croix County small businesses who are selected to be part of a study of self-employment by University of Wisconsin-River Falls economics Professor John Walker have a chance to win tickets to the Minnesota Vikings-Green Bay Packer football game in Minneapolis on Christmas Eve.

Walker is conducting research on self-employed business proprietors in St. Croix County . A random sample of 900 of the 2,100 self-employed small businesses in the county have been selected for the study. This includes sole proprietors, incorporated businesses, partnerships, and independent contractors.

Questionnaires, which will take about 15 minutes to complete, will be sent to the selected businesses within the next few weeks. All information submitted to the study is completely confidential. A self-addressed, stamped envelope will be provided.

Following completion of the study, results will be available to the public in an effort to inform decision-makers seeking to improve economic opportunities in west-central Wisconsin . The results will also contribute to Synergy 2005, an annual conference which brings together businesses, local governments, and universities in western Wisconsin to promote economic growth. Walker 's study is also inspired in part by the "Wisconsin Idea" in which Wisconsin universities share their resources to promote community development.

Since its inception, the Center has actively engaged and participated in economic development issues in the St. Croix Valley , says director Hamid Tabesh. Acting as a liaison for the college to the region, the center helps to identify the expertise faculty can offer to the business community.

The center also assists faculty in the pursuit of grants to fund appropriate research, identifies research projects that meet economic development needs of the St. Croix Valley , supports and encourages collaboration and the exchange of ideas between faculty and staff, among other functions. Additionally, it provides an outlet for the presentation of scholarly research activity in the form of seminars.

"This disease accounts for the majority of senile dementias after the age of 60 and it is the largest unmet medical need in the field of neurology today," said Dr. E. Katherine Miller from the UW-River Falls biology department. "Simply put, Alzheimer's disease is epidemic in the older population."

As the featured speaker, Dr. Miller will address the biology and pathology of the disease in non-scientific terms, and provide current and accurate information about the disease and the different treatment options that are offered. Information on support groups for caregivers also will be provided.

The goal of archaeological research is to put "flesh onto the bones" of ancient text. On Monday, Nov. 8, discover how excavation of the world of our religious roots can be incredibly connected, not only historically but also spiritually.

Dr. Steven Derfler, a professor in the UW-River Falls art department, will journey through maps, plans and imagery of several seasons of excavation in the ancient land of Israel . Participate in the interdisciplinary approach to the study of ancient civilization by identifying places in written narratives such as The Bible.

According to Admissions Director Alan Tuchenhagen, new freshmen hail from more than 400 high schools. Although this is a large number, the age statistics of freshmen shows 44 percent of new students are older than age 18.

The concepts of community and place have many meanings to different people. An exploration of what creates a sense of community is the topic of the third annual St. Croix Valley community forum, "Better Together: The Experience of Place," on Tuesday, Nov. 16, from 7 to 9 p.m. at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson .

Society is affected by instant communication, urbanization, ease of mobility, and rapid technological change. While these changes can connect-or disconnect-us, people yearn for a sense of belonging and interdependence.

This issue is especially relevant for the bi-state region of the St. Croix Valley , as identified in past community forums sponsored by the University of Wisconsin-River Falls, as the area transforms from a once primarily rural area to a suburban area.

Through an art exhibition, performances, and discussions-the forum will address questions such as what creates community, does where we live matter, how to foster the spirit of connection among neighbors, and how lifestyle choices fit within the region's rural roots and urban future. All events are free and open to the public.

The forum is presented by UW-River Falls College of Arts and Sciences in collaboration with the Phipps Center for the Arts and the St. Croix Valley Community Foundation. It is funded by in part by a grant from the Wisconsin Humanities Council, with funds from the National Endowment for the Humanities. Any views, findings, conclusions or recommendations expressed in this project do not necessarily represent those of the NEH. Assistance for the exhibition was provided by the Wisconsin Arts Board.

UW-River Falls Career Services Office would like to remind you of our free services to area employers. If you are seeking a permanent employee for a position requiring a college degree, we would be happy to list your position on our webpage and refer qualified candidates to you from our database. Both of these services can be accomplished using our webpage, www.uwrf.edu/ccs, clicking on Employer on the left-hand tool bar. We also can set-up an on-campus interview schedule for you in Career Services for your permanent positions. If you wish to interview in Career Services, or to interview students for part-time positions at a table in the Student Center, please contact June Schubert at 715/425-3572.

Looking for a great way to connect with students at all levels of study? Participate in the Oct. 20 UW-River Falls All-Campus Career Fair. Freshmen and sophomores attend the Career Fair to locate part-time and summer employment, and to obtain career information. Juniors seek internships and part-time employment, and seniors are looking for job opportunities available to them upon graduation.

The Career Fair is a great way for you to find qualified applicants to meet your employment needs. To learn more about the UW-River Falls Career Fair or to register, please connect to our webpage at: www.uwrf.edu/ccs, click onto Employers, then go to the Career Fair link. On-line registration and payment is available from this link.

The fair helps students develop their networking skills, speak with employers, and evaluate their marketability in their field of interest. Students at any level of study are encouraged to attend the career fair. First- and second-year students will learn about possible career paths from the many businesses attending. Sophomores and juniors may find possible internship opportunities to gain valuable work experience. Seniors will be exposed to a variety of future job opportunities.

Registration for January Term 2005 at the UW-River Falls opens Oct.13. Individuals may register for classes and other programs offered Dec. 27 - Jan. 21. Undergraduate and graduate level classes, professional development opportunities and special travel opportunities are offered during the January term. A schedule of credit and non-credit classes will available on the Web at http://www.uwrf.edu/master-class-schedules/welcome.htm.

On Oct. 18 Physics Professor James Madsen will present Looking up from the Bottom of the World, a brief overview of history of cosmology and a discussion of some of the important discoveries in the last century. The contributions UW-River Falls is making as part of the international Antarctic IceCube project will be presented as an example of how new experiments are expanding our knowledge of the universe. Dr. Madsen has been a member of the AMANDA (Antarctic Muon And Neutrino Detector Array) and IceCube projects for the past four years.

On Oct.25, the forum, Voting Matters: Living and Voting in a Battleground State, will feature a faculty panel to offer an overview of the Electoral College and voting procedures and an analysis of voting patterns and current political advertising. Highlights of campaign tactics used by the parties and candidate organizations are also provided.

Both lectures begin at 7 pm and no reservations are required. All presentations in River Falls will be held in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library on the corner of Division and Union Streets. In Hudson, presentations will be held in the Conference Center of the Hudson Hospital on Stageline Road, south of Interstate Hwy 94 and east of Carmichael Road.

With rapid housing development, increasing diversity, longer commutes and growing dependence on high tech communications, how can we reawaken the ties between communities and individuals? How can we recreate a sense of community and identify more fully with the people and issues around us?

Keynote speaker Lewis Feldstein, author of Better Together: Restoring the American Community, will present hopeful signs of people reconnecting across America to solve problems through building relationships and participatory involvement. Other evening highlights include a reception, open mike and gallery showing of artist representations on their experience of place from 5-7 pm, local musician Chris Silver, and an interactive community dialogue.

The 2nd annual Synergy Conference, hosted by the UW-RF, was held Sept.15-16 at the Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson. With approximately 160 attendees from various organizations throughout the west -central Wisconsin region, participants had the opportunity to come together to promote economic development in the region and to focus on four challenges that are currently facing the people who live and work in the Chippewa and St. Croix Valleys. These challenges included: Health Care, the Digital Divide, Quality of Life and Rural-Urban Transitions, and Workforce Development Challenges and Opportunities for West-Central Wisconsin. The goal of the Synergy 2004 Conference was to aid participants in developing action plans that will be implemented throughout the coming year.

To culminate the first days activities, participants were treated to the Tastes of the Valleys event which gave everyone the opportunity to enjoy food and refreshments provided by area agriculture producers, restaurants, and hospitality providers from the Chippewa and St. Croix valleys.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls has named interim directors of Outreach and Graduate Studies to fill the vacancy left by departing Dean Lee Zaborowski. Dr. Zaborowski has accepted a position within the UW-Extension in Madison.

Katrina Larsen, formerly assistant to the OGS dean, will direct the outreach and continuing education activities while Dr. Doug Johnson, an associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences, will direct the Graduate Studies programs. A permanent replacement will not be named until after a new UW-RF chancellor is hired.

A new C.H.I.L.D. Center to meet the needs of youngsters was dedicated on the campus on Sept. 20 The family of late Chancellor Ann Lydecker also participated in the unveiling of a sculpture that will commemorate Ann.

The Small Business Development Center at the UW-River Falls is devoted to helping people realize their dreams by helping them start their own businesses. Contrary to what some say, businesses just dont happen. Usually, they are the results of well-planned efforts and months, if not years, of work. To aid in new business creation, the SBDC is focused on providing entrepreneurs with the tools to make business creation easier, more successful and less stressful.

Counseling: Believe it or not, you can make an appointment and see a small business specialist at the SBDC for free. SBDC business counselors are experts in the area of entrepreneurship, and can often solve many of your problems within the initial meeting.

Topics ranging from business plans, finance, marketing to strategy can all be dealt with and can help you start your business off on the right foot. Since Feb. 1, 2004, over 160 business owners and future entrepreneurs have met with the River Falls SBDC with great results.

Classes: Great entrepreneurs are made, not born. The truth is, anyone can be an entrepreneur, you just need to match up your dreams and skills with the right business opportunity. To aid in this endeavor, the SBDC provides entrepreneurial training classes for new business owners. Also, we provide classes for existing businesses on the topics of cash flow, marketing, human resources and management. New entrepreneurial training classes begin Sept. 28 and run through the middle of November.

Resources: Through the SBDC, you have access to an entire list of professionals within the University and private sector. If we cannot help you within our center, we will connect you with someone who can.

If you are a current business owner, a frustrated employee with dreams of owning your own business or just curious about what it takes to start a business, the SBDC is your partner in helping you realize your dreams whatever they may be.

As UW-River Falls enters the 2004-05 academic year pursuing a national search for a new chancellor, it will continue with the vision laid out by the late Chancellor Ann Lydecker. Interim Chancellor Virgil Nylander delivered that message during an all faculty and staff meeting on Monday, Aug. 23, which signals the start of the school year.

Classes began on Sept. 2, with an expected student body of 5,900 graduate and undergraduate students, including more than 1,200 freshmen. Nylander said the campus will pursue four major focus areas that were reached through consensus discussions by Lydecker, new UW System President Kevin Reilly and the other campus chancellors last spring:improving financial aid for students who are economically stressed; providing better access for working adults; enhancing academic quality; and ensuring that UW campuses play a leading role in shoring up Wisconsin's economic development.

As the campus prepares for the next legislative session and the debate over the budget the Regents have requested of Gov. James Doyle, Nylander said it is crucial to restore funding after several years of cuts that have taken more than $3.2 million in tax dollars from UW-RF. During the last budget session, when the UW System was cut $250 million, UW-RF lost 18 positions and money for academic support.

Nylander said the time is ripe for a public discussion of the importance of public higher education in Wisconsin, with distinct funding criteria such as that accorded to K-12 education, local government and corrections.

Continued expansion of the University's outreach into the St. Croix Valley. Nylander noted a series of forums last spring took steps to identify issues and build coalitions around such challenges as the impact of change on community/rural relationships; education partnerships; and arts and cultural initiatives.

He noted that the University is working at creating a single point of contact in the Regional Development Institute for all requests from communities, business and industry, education and non-profit organizations.

UW-River Falls College of Arts and Sciences presents the third annual community forum from 7-9 p.m. on Tuesday, Nov. 16, at The Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson. With rapid housing development, increasing diversity, longer commutes and growing dependence on high tech communications, how can we reawaken the ties between communities and individuals? How can we recreate a sense of community and identify more fully with the people and issues around us?

Keynote speaker, Lewis Feldstein, author of "Better Together: Restoring the American Community," will present hopeful signs of people reconnecting across America to solve problems through building relationships and participatory involvement. Other evening highlights include a reception, open mike and gallery showing of artist representations on their experience of place from 5-7 p.m., a performance by local musician Chris Silver, and an interactive community dialogue.

The new session will invite business and community leaders to participate in an interactive discussion that examines the relationship between population and workforce development patterns, community assets, job creation and business development. All these factors affect the future of key sectors of the west-central Wisconsin economy. The additional session is sponsored by the West Central Wisconsin Workforce Development Board and Workforce Resource, Inc.

Conference participants may choose to attend one of four concurrent work group discussions on Wednesday afternoon. Individual registration is $95 but organizations are encouraged to send teams of individuals to cover all areas and pay a discounted rate. The fee is also discounted to $75 for individuals if registration is made online and before September 10.

The conference will be held at The Phipps Center for the Arts in Hudson and is sponsored by Xcel Energy, the West Central Wisconsin Workforce Development Board and Workforce Resource, Inc., and other organizations. A reception on Wednesday afternoon called Tastes of the Valleys gives participants a chance to experience regional cuisine favorites from throughout the west-central Wisconsin area.

Did the universe have a beginning, and if so, when? What will the universe look like in the future? Physics Professor Jim Madsen, discusses the state of what we know about the universe and the contributions UW-River Falls is making in the scientific field of cosmology. UW-RF is the only undergraduate institution of the international IceCube project. In this research, students and faculty are discovering new techniques in searching for evidence of dark matter and studying neutrinos, some of the most energetic phenomena in the universe. For the past five years Madsen has been active in the Education and Outreach efforts for the AMANDA (Antarctic Muon And Neutrino Detector Array) and IceCube projects.

David P. McClure, president and CEO of the U.S. Internet Industry Association, the primary trade association for Internet commerce, content and connectivity, will present the keynote for the session on The Regional Digital Divide. McClure has written and lectured extensively on management and technology issues and is considered an authority on strategic business planning and technology integration for businesses.

In addition to these noted speakers, professionals and experts in all three areas will participate in panel discussions at the breakout sessions of the conference. Moderator for the regional event will be former U.S. Congressman Steve Gunderson, senior consultant and managing director for the Greystone Group, a strategic management and communications consulting firm and former Wisconsin state legislator.

In the past 40 years, voter participation has declined from 63 percent of the voting population to 51 percent, due, in part, to the perception that "my vote doesn't matter." A faculty panel will offer an overview of the Electoral College and voting procedures and an analysis of voting patterns and current political advertising. Highlights of campaign tactics used by the parties and candidate organizations are also provided.

The class, Financial Planning Process and Insurance, will meet on Thursday evenings from Sept. 9 to Dec. 9 and will focus on the basics for successful financial planning; the legal, ethical and regulatory issues affecting financial planning and the time value of money concepts. The course will cover the insurance principles and risk management concepts that will help professionals in identifying their clients needs.

This program is the only CFP Board-registered program offered in west-central Wisconsin and conveniently close to the eastern suburbs of the Twin Cities. Besides preparing individuals for CFP certification, the program provides practical training for anyone currently employed in a variety of financial services, legal or administrative professions. The courses may also meet continuing education requirements for a variety of professions.

Without a doubt, the most common question posed to Chris Bye, director of the UW-RF Small Business Development Center, from small business owners is if they should incorporate, and if so, what is the best option? Not being an attorney, Bye is careful in his response. However, in recent years the questions regarding incorporating have become much simpler to answer with the advent of the LLC.

"LLC" stands for Limited Liability Company. It is a means for a company to identify itself with the state in which it is based, but more importantly it provides liability protection to the business owner at a very affordable price.

By that, the LLC creates a separation of the business owner's personal assets from those of the business. This is of great importance if the business were to be sued. With the LLC (or any incorporation), the business owner's home, car, retirement, etc., should most likely be protected against any legal judgments against the business. This would not be the case in a traditional sole proprietorship.

If limited liability were not enough to make all sole proprietors switch to an LLC, what makes the LLC even better is that you can form one yourself online. Simply go to the Wisconsin Department of Financial Institutions website (http://www.wdfi.org) and follow the instructions. The cost is only $130, and it becomes official in only a few days. The rules under the LLC are very broad, and the benefits are substantial. In today's litigious age, there is no reason for any business not to be an LLC.

The Chiefs first held its camp in River Falls in 1991 and will return for its 14th season on July 28. The goods, services and financial support provided by these corporate sponsors not only show strong support for the campus, the River Falls community and the Chiefs, but enable the Chiefs to hold a more economically feasible training camp in Wisconsin.

Several corporate sponsors provide financial backing rather than goods or services, which enables the University to do the extras. Many of these fan-related services would not be considered the fiscal responsibility of the visiting Chiefs, such as advertising or security.

Sponsors also underwrite such activities as the free Punt, Pass and Kick competition for children aged 8-13. With the assistance of athletes from the River Falls High School, each child demonstrates his or her skill with a football and receives a participation ribbon. Eighteen talented young boys and girls take home a trophy, which were presented by Coach Dick Vermeil the past two years.

Depending upon the level of support provided, corporate sponsors may be entitled to special privileges such as meals with the team at their training table, admission and complimentary tickets to special events, advertising on the field and in the Camp Journal.

The University and the Chiefs organization are extremely grateful for the assistance provided by these businesses each year. If you, or anyone you know is interested in becoming a corporate sponsor, please contact Chuck Brictson, who coordinates the efforts and benefits at 715/772-4523.

The Punt, Pass and Kick Competition will be July 31 before the afternoon session of practice at Ramer Field with awards being handed out following practice. Competition will begin at 1 p.m. with registration starting at 12:30 at the field, or register online at http://www.uwrf.edu/chiefs/ppk.form.2004.html. Girls and boys will be divided into six groups (ages 8-13), and everyone will receive a ribbon. Trophies will be given to the top three finishers in each division.

The UW-RF Outreach and Graduate Studies now offers the convenience of online registration and payment for its noncredit courses. Participants may now register online for both the SHRM Certification Preparation Course and the Financial Planning Process and Insurance class. Payments may also be made on online using a Visa or Mastercard credit card. Visit the Outreach and Graduate Studies web site at http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs/business_outreach_schedule.html to learn more about these courses.

The second in the series of courses to be offered online for the Wildlife Recreation and Nature Tourism Certificate will begin Sept. 7. In "Wildlife and Visitor Management in Nature Tourism," students will begin to understand the dynamics between the needs and behavior of wildlife and that of human attitudes and behavior. Based on principles of sustainability, participants will critically analyze and propose a combination of alternative management techniques and solutions for conflicts between humans and game and non-game wildlife species.

In addition, the third course in the series, "Site Planning and Development for Wildlife Tourism," will be offered on the UW-RF campus Sept. 13 - Dec. 20. Through this course students will develop the comprehensive infrastructure and ecological sensitivity they need to effectively and efficiently maximize visitors' wildlife-viewing experiences while protecting the resource, and enhancing the quality of life for the host community.

Participants will inventory and rate the existing wildlife viewing opportunities based on universal design guidelines for viewing sites, trails, signage, visitor centers, day use areas, comfort facilities, public transportation, parking, and accessibility for the diversity of domestic and international visitors. Students will then design a specific wildlife-viewing project with supporting documents for their chosen site and present their designs to public officials and other interested parties.

Participants for these courses should have already completed the prerequisite course in the series, "Wildlife Recreation, Nature Tourism, & Sustainability-based Systems" or receive the consent of the instructor. All participants must apply and meet minimum requirements for graduate study at the UW-River Falls before registering for these courses. For application instructions for Graduate School, go to http://www.uwrf.edu/ogs/1get_started.php.

Work Opportunity & Welfare-to-Work Credits. These credits are scheduled to expire for wages paid to individuals who began working for you after 2003. However, Congress is considering the extension of these credits.

One of three mini-courses offered by the UW-RF College of Agriculture, Food and Environmental Sciences, this one-day workshop is offered on Saturday, June 19, 8:30 a.m. - 4:30 p.m. The workshop will focus on the importance and impact of maintaining agricultural biodiversity, and practices that promote or diminish biodiversity. You will participate in discussions on cultural diversity, globalization, and controversial issues such as genetically engineered plants and animals.

Online registration for the nine-county, Sept. 15-16 conference will be available in early June. Check out the web site at http://wcw-synergy.net for more information on the conference and registration instructions. Also, watch your mailbox for a "Hold the Date" postcard that was mailed to chamber of commerce members and other organizations in late May. Soon to come: information on sponsorship and exhibitor opportunities at the conference.

Freshmen, sophomores, and juniors benefit from the opportunity to learn about career options, to make connections between their majors and career interests, and to learn about part-time or summer employment opportunities, and to find internships that will enable them to gain important relevant work experience.

Seeking a great evening, free outdoor concert as a diversion for  business clients or guests? Check out this year's 2004 Summer Concert Series. It features music for all ages and tastes, from rousing rockabilly and progressive bluegrass to world music with attitude and big band with class. All concerts are at 7 p.m. the day of the performance in the open-air Melvin Wall Amphitheater on campus or in the North Hall Auditorium in case of rain.

Much has been and continues to be written in industry and business journals about the importance of ongoing employee training. The continued growth of technological developments and specialized knowledge necessitates virtually retraining even the most highly educated worker several times during a career. In fact, one in five adults has trouble with occupational knowledge - the basics of holding and advancing in a job.

Resupply: Does the person have the right tools, materials, machinery and resources needed to achieve the performance goal? Is the person motivated to perform? If not, provide the necessary tools, materials, machinery, and resources necessary and/or motivate through incentives, rewards, and recognition.

A final word: it's a must to provide training and/or resources for training if you, the employer, are changing the scope and nature of skills required to perform in the job, or if you are changing the technology or tools employees are expected to use to perform their work. The "norm" varies widely in how much organizations provide for training and development opportunities above and beyond these, however. Using the 6R's can get you a long way to determining whether training is really the most effective way to invest in your employees.

The action came during the Board's regular meeting in Madison. Chairing the Regents selection committee is Charles Pruitt of Shorewood, who is a partner and co-managing director of A.B. Data, Ltd, a direct-response marketing firm based in Milwaukee. He is also a board member of Children's Outing Association and the Herb Kohl Educational Foundation. Pruitt is a former assistant professor of political science at St. Olaf College in Northfield, Minn., and the President's Marketing Task Force for Macalester College.

UWS President Katharine Lyall is expected soon to announce the selection of faculty, staff, students, alumni and community members for a UW-RF search committee who name a slate of finalists to the regents special search committee. The search is to seek a successor to Chancellor Ann Lydecker, who died in a traffic accident in March.

Developed in partnership with the international Watchable Wildlife, Inc., this program is ideal for resource managers, community leaders, nature enthusiasts, tourism directors, and recreation and hospitality providers. For more information, visit the web site at www.watchwildlife.com or send an email to watchwildlife@uwrf.edu.

Eight faculty and staff members at UW-River Falls are among 100 employees recognized across the University of Wisconsin System by its Board of Regents on May 7 for their outreach and economic development activities.

"These individuals are actively fulfilling a fundamental mission of UW-River Falls and the University of Wisconsin System. The 'Wisconsin Idea' says the borders of the university are the borders of the state, with the intent of sharing our expertise widely beyond the confines of the campus.

Individuals who have English as a second language (ESL) face many communication barriers from language, culture and differing expectations that may hamper success in school, on the job, and in the community. Learn and practice strategies for bridging these communication gaps through a summer course at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The course, ESL in the Workplace, provides an insightful introduction to multicultural communication. Participants will gain practical tools and resources to use while working with non-English speaking adults and have the option of gaining ESL-tutor field experience for a local business.

Judy Mortrude, an ELL instructor and workforce education coordinator with the St. Paul Public schools, will teach the course. Classes are Monday through Friday, June 21 - July 2, from 8 a.m. to noon. Students can take the course for two undergraduate or graduate credits and pay the corresponding tuition. Or for those not interested in receiving college credit, course cost is $129.

Virgil Nylander, recently retired vice chancellor for administration and finance, will return to the University to serve as interim chancellor effective June 1, and Mary Halada, interim vice chancellor for administration and finance, has been appointed vice chancellor for administration and finance effective immediately.

"After careful consideration and discussion with President Lyall, I have decided that I will not seek candidacy for the chancellor's position at UW-RF," says Coombs, who was named interim chancellor after the death of Chancellor Ann Lydecker March 25. "I will return to my position as provost and vice chancellor on June 1 and continue in that position through the 2004-05 academic year."

"I'm very pleased that Dr. Ginny Coombs, Dr. Virgil Nylander, and Ms. Mary Halada have agreed to form the senior management team to lead UW-RF during the coming transition," said Lyall. "UW-RF offers excellent educational opportunities to students who want to prepare for 21 st century jobs and lives. This UW institution will continue to be a special part of the UW System, fulfilling a critical role for students and families in western Wisconsin and Minnesota. The senior management team has my full support as we work together to move UW-RF forward."

Coombs is pleased to work closely again with Nylander and continue working with Halada. "Virgil, Mary and I have worked well together these past three years, and we are committed to provide a smooth transition for the new chancellor," said Coombs.

Nylander said he hopes the University will have a new chancellor in place by June 2005. He explained that a nationwide search should conclude in the spring of 2005. However, because of academic contract considerations, the selected candidate would likely be unable to join UW-RF before the conclusion of the academic year.

Nylander, who retired in January, joined UW-RF in 1969 as a faculty member in the psychology department. He served as department chair and later as associate dean of the College of Education before joining the administration in 1987 as assistant chancellor for administration. Nylander earned his doctorate in experimental physiological psychology from Iowa State University and bachelor's and master's degrees in psychology from Colorado State University.

Prior to her interim appointment to replace the position created by Nylander's retirement as vice chancellor for business and finance, Halada was the assistant to the vice chancellor and budget officer at UW-RF. She had also worked as director of auxiliary reporting and food service and assistant to the director of auxiliary services at UW-RF. Additionally, Halada has been the camp coordinator for the Kansas City Chiefs Summer Training Camp at UW-RF since it began in 1991. Halada has a master's degree in management and administration from the Metropolitan State University in St. Paul and a B.A. in business administration from Grove City College in Pennsylvania.

The free forum is intended to help the region in forming collaborations to address the impact of growth on the arts, education and urban/rural relationships. The half-day session will summarize more than 300 issues raised during forums previously held in River Falls, Osceola and Ellsworth. Participants will have an opportunity to select a limited number of priorities for action and plan the next steps for implementation.

The second annual gathering of regional development organizations and business partners, this year's conference will focus on the issues of affordable healthcare, the "digital divide" and rural/urban quality of life. More details on the conference will be available soon.

Explore the practical art of rhetorical criticism and hone your skills to effectively analyze contemporary political rhetoric while listening more critically to our nation's political candidates and leaders. At a free lecture open to the public on Thursday, May 6, at the River Falls Public Library.

James Pratt, UW-RF professor in the speech communication and theatre arts department, will discuss how representative democracy rests on the assumption that intelligent and informed citizens are critical listeners. He will provide suggestions on how to listen to the speeches of political leaders, evaluate their persuasive appeals and evidence, and determine whether they are credible sources.

Farmers, extension agents, agriculture consultants and teachers will learn about the essential characteristics of sustainable soils, how to maintain soil sustainability through cropping and conservation practices, and the importance of organic matter and nutrient management. Noncredit course fee is $89; undergraduate and graduate credit options are also available. Contact Kristen Allen, Outreach and Graduate Studies, at kristen.allen@uwrf.edu  or call 715/425-3751 to register.

For both serious and casual golfers, the tourney will have prizes in team, individual hole and event categories. Registration begins at 10 a.m., with a shotgun start at noon, followed by a social and silent auction from 5-6:30 p.m. Dinner will be served at 6:30 p.m. The registration fee for the golf tournament, which includes green and cart fees, door prizes, a tournament memento, dinner and entertainment in $100 per person. For just the dinner and entertainment the cost is $30 per person. Registration is due by May 1. For more information about registering or becoming a tournament sponsor, contact Tournament Director Rich Hafdahl at 715/294-2334 or rlhafdahl@attbi.com .

The library staff is friendly and supportive in assisting anyone who needs help. A community borrower's card, offered for a $20 annual fee, obtains checkout privileges. However, the print, audiovisual, and electronic sources, all publicly available at the library, are free of charge.

Federal Depository Library. The government documents department offers extensive collections of federal, state, and local documents including statistical information, census data, laws, and proposed legislation. The library staff encourages new users to call or email to make appointments. Library staff will provide instruction on how to use resources and point users in the proper direction. "We serve anyone who calls or comes in," says Michele McKnelly, the government documents librarian. The government documents department number is 715-425-3874.

Additionally, federal census data also can be accessed on-line at the Library. With it businesses can investigate potential markets for their product within specific areas. Using this data to search for specific population characteristics may impact their decisions, such as determining the availability of a skilled labor force within a particular geographic area.

Voyager Online Catalog. This service locates materials in the library, as well as the government publications, and can be accessed through your business or home computer at www.uwrf.edu/library/govdocs/.

The library also accesses specialized databases to supplement its book and periodicals collections. Some examples include LexisNexis Academic, Congressional, and Statistical. Community members must come in to use these databases at the library. However, besides the cost of 10 cents per copied page, this is a free service.

Business Databases. Many are listed at www.uwrf.edu/library/db/#Business and also are lucrative resources. Companies can use these to acquire vital marketing information. These databases offer full-text industry newsletters and trade publications. Community users can access all of these leased databases from within the library.

Another excellent business database is Stat USA, a comprehensive trade source serviced by Commerce. It is accessible only at the library. The contents are extremely helpful for creating international marketing plans and strategies. USA Trade Online is a sub-database that provides import and export information for over 18,000 commodities.

Another electronic resource is Reference USA. Merchants who market locally can match Zip Codes against standard NAICS codes (North American Classification System codes) to develop extensive data profiles on potential customers.

Loss of common identity. Urban sprawl. Limited Wisconsin daily news. A need for comprehensive planning. Maintain a sense of community. Improve the trust and appreciation for PK-16 education. Share more information about the arts. Integrate new residents into the community.

These were among the 300-some issues that were raised during three Community Forums facilitated by UW-RF in River Falls, Osceola and Ellsworth. More than 100 persons turned out to share their thoughts on the impact of regional growth on the arts, education and rural/urban relationships. They brainstormed about their concerns for the future, the region's on-going successes, and the issues they think should be addressed over the next five years.

An open, half-day Regional Forum will be held in late April to share the results of the Community Forums; to share information how they are being addressed, and to discuss the next steps to form regional collaborations. Stay tuned for the April issue of "BizNews" for details.

For UW-RF and other college students, the four, three-week sessions offer an opportunity to complete their program requirements in less time than during the regular academic year. Classes that were in high demand at UW-RF this spring may be more accessible during the summer session. Other educational opportunities, such as international study opportunities to China, France, Greece, Puerto Rico, Scotland, and Uganda, are also offered during the summer session. These travel programs are hosted by knowledgeable faculty members and are open to the public while space is available.

"The Laramie Project" is a simultaneously funny and emotional docu-drama that examines a community's responsibility and response to the tragic events surrounding the murder of Matthew Shepard, a gay college student at the University of Wyoming in 1998. This breathtaking theatrical collage that explores the depths to which humanity can sink, and the heights of compassion of which we are capable, will be presented by the UW-RF Theatre Department in April and May.

At a free lecture offered Tuesday, March 30, by the College of Arts and Sciences, a panel will explore the historic events, the issues raised by the play, the techniques of docu-drama used to structure and dramatize the material, and the choices UW-RF made in preparing the piece for presentation in River Falls. The panel participants will be Robin Murray, costume designer, and Kenneth Stofferahn, set and lighting designer, both professors in the Speech Communication and Theatre Arts Department; and guest director, Suzy Messerole, the co-artistic director for the Outward Spiral Theatre Company in Minneapolis.

For many students nearing graduation, the notion of entering the "real world" can be somewhat daunting. They are facing many new challenges, such as landing a job in today's tight job market and dealing with financial management concerns, especially with the increasing debt load many students have accumulated to pay for higher education costs.

UW-River Falls' Career Services Office is sponsoring a day-long event on March 2 called: "Disorientation: Managing the Transition from College to Career." The day will feature a series of panels and presentations to help students learn tips to market themselves effectively to employers; understand how to evaluate and negotiate job offers; become knowledgeable about employment benefits; learn sound budgeting and financial management skills; develop networking strategies; and receive advice on how to succeed in their first job.

Mock interviews will be offered to help students polish their job interviewing skills. Career Services is seeking Valley employers to conduct half-hour mock interviews, which will run from 9:30 a.m. until 4 p.m. throughout the day. If you are would like to assist with mock interviews, please contact Nancy Pace at 715/425-3572.

The topics were selected from more than a dozen issues identified in Twin Cities foundations regional studies on the impact of growth in the St. Croix Valley. The three selected topics were recommended to Chancellor Ann Lydecker by a community forums advisory group of regional leaders.

Two forums held earlier in River Falls and Osceola found the two-hour facilitated forums helped to identify current challenges and successes in each of the areas; shared information on how communities, groups and individuals are addressing them; and identified future challenges that will arise over the next five years; and to provide networking opportunities within the topical areas.

Results of the three forums will be consolidated and shared with all participants. The chancellor expects to hold a day-long session later this spring to give Valley residents the opportunity to review the findings and determine what steps to take next.

Ask any parent or caregiver of a young child and they'll tell you "it's all about development." The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a one-day workshop for teachers, childcare providers, educators-in-training and parents of young children.

In "Violence to Our Minds," Professor Nicholas Karolides, associate dean of the College of Arts and Sciences and professor of English at UW-River Falls, will present a summary of the current state of censorship, including recent developments stemming from the Patriot Act and Internet legislation and suggesting trends in censorship.

The second event is a forum discussion that explores the historic events and issues raised by the play "The Laramie Project." The performance will be presented by the UW-RF Theater Department in April and examines a community's responsibility and response to the tragic events surrounding the murder of a gay college student in 1998. Discussion includes the techniques of docu-drama used to structure and dramatize the material and the choices UW-RF made in preparing the piece for presentation.

Both lectures are from 7-8:30 p.m. in the lower level of the River Falls Public Library. No reservations are required to attend. For more information, contact the Outreach and Graduate Studies office.

Center will offer nine weeks of Entrepreneurial training course. They will cover all aspects of small business management with an emphasis on business plan creation. The first class will be held from 6-9 p.m. on campus.

Also being offered this spring is a Quickbooks training course, Small Business Financial fundamentals and Small Business Survival Strategies. The Quickbooks class is scheduled to last two Friday mornings from 9 a.m. to noon and will be held on the UWRF campus.

A new organization has been formed in the St Croix Valley to assist technology based start-up and early stage companies with growth. This new organization, The St.Croix Valley Angel Network, Inc., is structured as a non-profit organization comprised of individual investors and corporate sponsors.

Angels and business sponsors within the network pay an annual fee to participate in the business case presentations of companies seeking equity. The members may then select to invest in these companies.

Over the next few months UW-River Falls will facilitate a series of community forums to identify how Valley residents are addressing their concerns about quality of life issues in three areas of regional development: the arts; education; and community/rural relationships.

The topics were selected from more than a dozen "problems" identified in Twin Cities foundations regional studies on the impact of growth in the St. Croix Valley. The three selected topics were recommended to Chancellor Ann Lydecker by a community forums advisory group of regional leaders.

The Chancellor expects the two-hour facilitated forums to help identify current challenges and successes in each of the areas; to share information on how communities, groups and individuals are addressing them; to identify future challenges; and to provide networking opportunities within the topical areas.

Discussion forums have been scheduled throughout the Valley, with each forum addressing all three topics. They are free and open to everyone. Chancellor Lydecker particularly encourages community leaders to attend representing such areas as non-profit organizations, government, education, the business community, and civic organizations.

However, there is an opening session that is free and open to the public. The kick off features a keynote presentation by Ed McMahon, vice president of The Conservation Fund. The presentation is "Safeguarding Community Character in the St. Croix Valley" and will include examples of successful accommodation of growth in other regions.

During the seminar, invited teams representing communities and such interest areas as tourism will explore strategies and tactics to help shape the Valley's future. They will hear from such presenters as former Vice President Walter Mondale.

The department of plant and earth science class's assistance followed a request by Mayor Harvey Stower and the Amery community redevelopment committee to UW-RF for assistance in sorting through 21 redevelopment challenges or opportunities.

With strategic planning help from the College of Business & Economics Dean Barbara Nemecek and Professor Glenn Potts, the community participated in facilitated discussions to prioritize its projects and build stakeholder support groups.

Cain's class, with additional assistance from Professors Charles Rader and John Heppen in the department of geography and mapping systems, integrated six of those issues into a single project: developing a comprehensive planning map; designing a master trail corridor; developing a trailhead plan; redeveloping the former Lake View school property into a housing and library complex; redevelopment of the Michael Riverfront Park on the Apple River; and a landscaping plan for major highways in the community.

While the class covers all aspects of starting a business or being involved with a small company, the course will emphasize good business planning. Case studies and guest speakers from the business community will demonstrate practical application of theories.

Alzheimer's disease affects over 12 million people worldwide and more than four million Americans. More than 37 million Americans know someone with the disease. This tragic disease accounts for the majority of senile dementias after the age of 60 and it is the largest unmet medical need in the field of neurology today.

At a free lecture offered Tuesday, Feb. 10, by the College of Arts and Sciences, the biology and pathology of this disease will be discussed in non-scientific terms. The speaker, Dr. E. Katherine Miller from the UW-River Falls Biology Department, will provide current and accurate information about Alzheimer's disease and the different treatment options that are offered. Information on support groups for caregivers will also be provided.

Chiefs President Carl Peterson announced in December that the club has agreed to terms of a one-year contract with a series of option years. Following a one-year contract for 2004, there are four one-year options included in this agreement should the Chiefs wish to exercise them.

Although not contingent to the contract, the Chiefs have asked the State of Wisconsin for improvements to the Knowles Physical Education & Recreation Center on campus, which serves as the team's training facility. This year five Missouri and Kansas public universities aggressively courted the team. The Knowles improvements would make that facility comparable to those at the Missouri campuses.

Past studies cumulatively show that the camp can generate up to $4 million during the team's stay in the St. Croix Valley. A recent survey found that many hospitality and tourism businesses are heavily or greatly dependent on the Chiefs' fans for income.

Cordua often is contacted often for his expertise in minerals. He has been recognized with honors by Midwest Federation of Mineralogical and Geological Societies, and is and inductee of the National Rockhound and Lapidary Hall of Fame.

The CD is an audio tour designed for people to listen to during self-guided auto tours. The tour starts in Prescott, makes a circle around the county, and ends in Prescott. Included with the CD is a geological and relief map of the county, a synopsis of the geological and cultural history of the county, biographies of the contributors, photos, and a listing of each track on the CD.

"The tour is directly related to what Pierce County is all about: nature, recreation and relaxation. Our tag line is 'Explore our Backroads' and this tour does exactly that. Visitors explore the roads that are not only significant to our past, but are what Pierce County is today."

It's been nine months since the UW-River Falls launched "BizNews," this electronic newsletter sent to members of local business communities, chambers of commerce, and economic development organizations. Our objective is to provide you with a convenient and helpful source of business-related information and expertise, and announcements of programs, courses, and special events offered at the university.

Please visit our Web site at http://www.uwrf.edu/biznews/form_subscribe.htm and let's know what you think. Thanks in advance for your participation. We will summarize your comments in an upcoming edition of BizNews.

Wildlife-viewing activities are one of the fastest growing segments of wildlife-related recreation and hold great potential for stimulating the St. Croix Valley economy while celebrating its natural wonders.

The importance of wildlife recreation is particularly apparent in the St. Croix Valley: from canoe-rentals in St. Croix Falls and Taylors Falls to the north and through six state parks along the Lower St. Croix. In the lower valley, three distinct biomes meet at the St. Croix and Mississippi. Their wildlife marketing potential is being captured through the presence of the Carpenter Nature Center, the Koch interpretive park in Hastings, and the Prescott interpretive center on Mary's Heights.

The course will introduce students to the "big picture" model of wildlife recreation and nature tourism, through the lens of sustainability-based systems. Special emphasis will be placed on sustainable community planning, and cost-benefit analysis, as well as professional skills necessary to navigate complex political dynamics essential to the success of a project.

The online format uses multimedia interactions and allows students to complete course work at a time and location that is convenient. All participants, regardless of residency, will pay the tuition rate of a Wisconsin resident. For more information or to register for the course, visit the web site at www.watchwildlife.com  or send an email to outreach@uwrf.edu .

This partnership is offering a workshop on campus, Feb. 10-13, titled "Preserving Community Character." The goal is to provide a regional vision for the St. Croix Valley and tools for planning economic development while preserving natural and historical resources.

As you enter nearly every small and mid-sized city in the United States, you are likely to be greeted by a sign saying, "Welcome to Our Town ( insert name )." These signs are frequently erected by and include the symbols of many of the service clubs in the community.

Service clubs, non-denominational groups organized to provide fellowship and dedicated to helping meet community and global needs, are a significant 20 th century American gift to the world. Service clubs such as Kiwanis, Lions and Rotary, are distinguished from fraternal, religious and professional/trade related organizations, by including people from a wide range of occupations, backgrounds and beliefs primarily to work together providing service to those in need. Such organizations are central to creating a sense of community. While businesses provide the muscle and vitality for a community, and the churches and religious organizations speak to the soul and conscience, the service clubs are organized to address the heart.

With mottoes like "service above self" (Rotary), "we serve" (Lions) and "we build" and "serving the children of the world" (Kiwanis), the clubs are clearly focused on helping others. Each of these groups has grown into large international organizations with membership in countries around the globe. Each of the organizations has taken on a grand project-Kiwanis is working against iodine deficiency disorders (IDD), Lions have been working to prevent blindness and to provide services to vision-impaired people, and Rotary is working to eradicate polio worldwide. Each organization also supports numerous projects to improve health, public safety and the well being of people around the world.

Local clubs provide extensive support for community projects, providing assistance to the schools, offering scholarships, contributing to public service and charitable causes and making our communities better places to live and work. Each club will have its own particular flavor and will have specific projects that they have adopted and supported. These might range from reading programs with elementary students to supporting youth recreation opportunities to creating and rejuvenating public parks.

If you are not aware of and involved with one of these organizations, BizNews strongly encourages you to get involved. To sustain successful businesses, it is important that the heart of the communities in which they are located be kept strong and vital.

Looking for a great way to entertain a visiting business prospect for an evening. Or to prove to a potential employee that the St. Croix Valley has a great quality of life? Or just seeking a relaxing evening for yourself?

April 22-24, 29, 30 and May 1 brings "The Laramie Project," a play that is a breathtaking theatrical collage that explores the depths to which humanity can sink and the heights of compassion we are also capable of.

In accepting the award, Chancellor Lydecker told the assembly, "I firmly believe that our higher education institutions can and must play a significant role in preparing people of color, women, and persons with disabilities for career and life success in our 21 st century world. And, very importantly, through these diversity efforts we also prepare all students for that diverse and global new century."

In a written statement, Gov. Jim Doyle conveyed his congratulations to UW-RF and other state agencies that received recognition, observing that "our employees are the state government's greatest asset, and by expanding the diversity of our workforce we gain new strength and a broader vision that enables state government to better serve the people of Wisconsin."

During the ceremony Lawton noted that, "Creating a diverse workforce pays dividends to both the individual workplaces involved and to the state as a whole. I encourage other employers, in both the private and public sectors, to learn from their experience."

UW-RF was cited for a comprehensive package of initiatives designed to encourage students of color to enroll at UW-RF, to support them academically and personally while enrolled, and to prepare them for success upon graduation.

Industry cluster development, regional partnerships, Gov. Jim Doyle's "Grow Wisconsin" economic development initiative and a white paper discussion on the costs of health care in Wisconsin were center stage at the Wisconsin Economic Summit IV in Milwaukee in October.

He and several panelists outlined the great promise of Wisconsin's growing technology sector. They also urged that the private investors and government not overlook the opportunities still available in Wisconsin's traditional industries, including manufacturing, agriculture and tourism.

John T. Byrnes, executive managing director of Mason Wells, a Milwaukee private-equity company, emphasized that Wisconsin has particular strengths in several technology sectors. These include information technology/mass data storage; health care and life sciences; and distance education/e-learning. The convergence of these sectors could be very powerful in the future.

The report includes information on the growth of bioscience in the state and across the nation; the economic impact of bioscience research, development and industry; and economic development efforts stemming from the wide range of highly specialized research taking place at Wisconsin's institutions.

"The UW System is the producer of two of the state's top commodities-knowledge and graduates-and we will need an abundance of both if we are to remain competitive, and prosperous, in the 21st century," Doyle told summit participants.

Participants will learn the strategies and techniques of direct marketing using a multimedia approach, including the Internet. The course also covers how to measure response to your marketing efforts. The three-credit course will be held on the UW-RF campus, 4 - 7 p.m. on weekdays from January 5-23, 2004.

The UW-RF Center for Economic Education in the College of Business and Economics, in collaboration with Economics Wisconsin,  is offering a series of five, one-credit, online classes that explore contemporary and historical issues in economics. While designed for middle and high school teachers in social studies, business education and math, anyone with an interest in economics may take these courses.

The classes are offered online beginning Jan. 26-Feb. 9. All course requirements must be completed by May 7. Tuition for each course is $269 and all participants will earn one graduate credit for each course completed. For more information and to register for the courses, visit the Outreach and Graduate Studies web site at www.uwrf.edu/outreach  or send an email to brian.l.schultz@uwrf.edu .

The UW-RF has approved two new graduate-level certificates this past month. Classes for both the Service-Learning Certificate and the Community Education Certificate will be available online beginning in January 2004. For more information on either program, visit the Outreach and Graduate Studies web site at www.uwrf.edu/outreach  or send an email to outreach@uwrf.edu .

More than one million students participated in service-learning last year through the national Learn and Serve America program. When students are engaged in meaningful service to their schools and their communities, both they and their communities benefit.

UW-River Falls worked with the National Youth Leadership Council with support from the State Farm Foundation, to develop this program, which will assist educators in understanding, planning and applying service-learning methods in their classrooms and their communities. This certificate will benefit anyone who uses or wants to use service-learning methods as a unique, hands-on and experiential teaching and learning strategy, including teachers, school administrators, and community leaders or others who support civic engagement of our youth.

The C. S. Mott Foundation has found that more than 10,000 schools in this country have community education programs. Very few opportunities exist for formal training in community education that supports community school programs. This is especially urgent now with the advent of hundreds of new and continuing after-school programs being developed as a result of the No Child Left behind Act.

In cooperation with the National Community Education Association, UW-River Falls created a new graduate-level certificate in community education to meet this national need. This program will benefit anyone currently working in the field of community education including community education directors and coordinators, after-school project directors, principals, school building administrators, extension agents, and adult educators.

Many small businesses in this country are family-owned and operated enterprises. Roughly 30 percent of these family businesses maintain themselves as family firms to the second generation and only 23 percent continue to the third generation.

Consider the vision for the family business. Its an important piece for the family. Do you want to leave a legacy via the family business? Does the business promote your family values and traditions? What about other stakeholders?

Last, consider those consultants that offer more than just recruiting or worker placement. Some consultants offer personality assessments. These assessment can be used in hiring decisions, team building and promotion assessment. The analysis may help you determine best fit for a new or continuing employee. The granddaddy of these assessments is the Myers-Briggs analysis. However, there are a number of evaluative tools available. Your consultant can help you.

Among the topics for discussion will be health care costs and strategies; collaboration and cooperation through regionalization and clusters; connecting businesses with University of Wisconsin campuses' resources; biomedical research and education; champions for the arts; and high tech start-ups and technology transfer.

Grow Wisconsin economic development program. Also facilitating sessions will be the Wisconsin secretaries of commerce, revenue, workforce development, department of administration, agriculture, trade and consumer protection, tourism, housing and economic development authority, natural resources.

Among the many highlights were personal appearances and presentations by Gov. Jim Doyle and three of the Governors Cabinet Secretaries. The day and a half event provided a rich array of information on area demographic changes, a model for regional strategic planning, and roundtables where all participants could interact and provide input to regional economic growth.

Thursday morning was devoted to summarizing insights from Wednesdays discussions, presented data and the roundtables. The final conference session was a training time for participants to focus on how to develop local and county teams to continue the foundation outcomes of Synergy 2003. The goal for the coming year is to build and activate local and county teams to create ongoing dialogue, conduct fact finding, and formulate recommendations of action at local, county, and regional levels.

UW-Stout is the only higher educational institution to receive the Malcolm Baldrige National Quality Award, wininng in 2001. Faculty, staff and administrators from the Stout discussed how their institution applied the Baldrige framework to improve strategic planning, enrollment management, academic and support process management, student services and the campus's new e-Scholar laptop initiative.

The Survey Research Center has been doing high quality, confidential, low-cost survey work since 1996. The Center assists towns (townships), municipalities, cities, non-profit groups, school districts, and other organizations with their data gathering and analysis needs.

The Center has extensive experience with telephone, mail-out, and face-to-face surveys as well as other types of information gathering techniques, such as focus groups. It offers clients any survey-related service they need, including: survey design, survey logistics (copying, mailing, data input), data summary and interpretation, and report generation.

Fees vary by the length and complexity of the questionnaire but, for a standard 4-page survey, the Center charges $8.50 per completed telephone survey and $7.50 for each returned mail-out survey. Face-to-face surveys are billed on an hourly basis.

Each class will consist of a presentation, a coffee break and a discussion period. The Tuesday classes, Morning with a Professor, will feature a potpourri of information in the presenters area of expertise or interest.

Post your job vacancies with us. Graduates and alumni have access to an on-line updated list of the job openings, which are also distributed campus-wide to academic departments for posting. To submit job opportunities, visit our web page and click on the "Employers" link at www.uwrf.edu/ccs.

If you are recruiting for permanent, full-time positions, Career Services will schedule an interview date that is convenient for you to use one of our interviewing rooms. We will promote your recruiting visit to appropriate seniors and the faculty.

The 7,800-square-feet facility is available for both the campus and River Falls community. It will have six classrooms for children ages six weeks to 12 years, and be able to provide services for up to 96 children. The classrooms will surround a central play area with office and support space. The outside architecture is of a modern-looking style.

The childcare center is a component of UW-RFs College of Education and Professional Studies. It serves as a fieldwork site for students enrolled in programs in early childhood education, elementary education, communicative disorders, social work, counseling and school psychology.

Topics will include market analysis and marketing plans and strategies; public relations and promotional issues; financial planning using industry-specific averages; personnel practices, risk management, alternative business opportunities, and writing a business plan.

Its not just keeping track of compensation and vacation anymore. There are many laws and regulations with any number of record-keeping requirements. Some of these rules apply to all organizations, both large and small. Some apply to you if you provide goods and services to governmental agencies or just sell to companies who provide such services.

You may want to outplace this human resource function. There are a number of organizations willing to take over your HR activities. They will mostly provide record keeping, but they also can provide suggestions and sources for employee benefits. Pension processing comes to mind in this area, but also insurance programs and other benefits.

Its another project you can outsource to an outside expert. Dont forget the temp agencies! Not only can they supply temporary help, but also many provide rent- to-hire" employees. Remember, they have done all the screening: background checks, references, and such, have already been completed.

Payroll preparation can be tough duty. Errors make employees unhappy and may prove costly in fines and penalties. Consider outsourcing the job! There are a number of organizations to help with payroll preparation, but check them out carefully.

Polk and St. Croix counties. As outcomes, the summit will develop and asset-map key regional economic sectors, shape strategies for their development, and promote the region to Wisconsin decision-makers.

Nilsestuen oversees the Wisconsin Department of Agriculture Trade and Consumer Protection, and is a UW-RF graduate. He is the former president of the Wisconsin Federation of Cooperatives, and was pivotal in forming the Wisconsin Milk Marketing Board, serving as its first general manager.

The Conference draws 125 participants nationally and internationally from business, industry, government regulatory agencies, and education to review the latest information on pathogens, toxins and contaminants that can occur in food, water and the environment. The discuss strategies and approaches to guarantee safety, and also review the latest techniques and equipment in rapid detection.

This event, held in the Hagestad Student Center, offers walk-in assistance to students on a wide array of career and job search preparation issues. A major benefit for UW-River Falls students who attend is the opportunity to receive a half-hour mock interview from an employer.

She noted that at a recent retreat by UW-RF senior administrators, their discussions "made it very clear to me that public engagement is a key ingredient in a universitys ability to address its own future, as well as the future of the region. We have a critical role to play in the development of the greater St. Croix River Valley. We cannot ignore our public responsibility. The demographics, economic trends, and environmental issues confronting this region provide numerous 'real-life' opportunities to engage our students with uswith our communities."

" The majority of our students come from this general geographic region  the greater St. Croix River Valley and areas south and east of here. They come to learn from us, to learn with us. They are preparing for our future as well as theirs. They will be the government, business and education leaders as we move into later phases of our lives. We have multiple reasons for having a vested interest in their personal success the private benefits of their education but we also have a vested interest in the public return on their education as they contribute to their local communities and to the greater society."

Its hard work just selling the product and servicing your customers. How are you going to handle the myriad of questions, problems and opportunities that occur at start-up or on a day-to-day basis? The solution: outsource, or call in the experts.

If you are just starting out, begin with your lawyer and CPA. They should work together to help you decide on the best form of business organization. Will you be a C-corp., S-corp., LLC, or a partnership? They can give you guidance in this tax and legal area.

Your CPA will help you write your business plan and budget, plan cash flow and help prepare your bank loan request. As your business grows, a CPA can help you to discover new ways to improve your business performance, manage information and plan for business succession.

Dont forget your banker. A good banker is not just a source for loans, but can offer sound financial advice and procedures. Remember, your banker has seen lots of different businesses and their financial performance.

A new service from UW-River Falls, BizNews is a monthly electronic newsletter covering topics of consequence for business and industry. Each month our newsletter will bring information to you about economic trends and their implications for businesses in the St. Croix Valley. We'll share information about upcoming programs offered through UW-River Falls or other agencies.

Also, we'll continuously list our contact information so you can learn how to take advantage of faculty consulting, internship opportunities, or other campus resources available to business and industry.

To help you receive BizNews more quickly, we've established a sign-up page on our web site. It's easy to do..and we won't spam you with unwanted e-mail or share your address with anyone else. You can also browse back issues of BizNews.

In the next month or so, we will invite you to visit our site again as we add some additional electronic forms in which you can directly seek information about classes, programs or services. As information or offerings develop in those areas, we'll contact you so that you can find out more.

The first course in the program will introduce students to the big picture model of wildlife recreation and nature tourism, through the lens of sustainability-based systems. Special emphasis will be placed on sustainable community planning, and cost-benefit analysis, as well as professional skills necessary to navigate complex political dynamics essential to the success of a project.

Through the use of art, storytelling, drama and music, this community event will present a thought-provoking look at the changes taking place in the St. Croix River Valley as symbolized by the loss of the barn. A gallery showing of contemporary images of rural life and a reception will be followed by a spirited program of song, verse and prose that explores our changing culture and landscape.

Following the formal program there will be a lively dialogue among the artists and audience about the changes taking place in the St. Croix Valley and our responses to them. Views from the Barn Door is a collaborative venture of The Phipps Center and the University of Wisconsin-River Falls in support of Barnstorm Wisconsins 2003 Year of the Barn.

Java will be used to teach the basic concepts of program analysis, design and implementation. This course teaches the foundation of real-world programming and object-oriented programming. For more information and registration instructions, visit www.uwrf.edu/outreach.

"I have never experienced working for a company that has so many satisfied employees," says one staff member. Jones provides 146 hours of professional training a year. Ranked No. 2, Container Store provides 162 hours of training a year. Both firms have low employee turnover rates.

Management and trainers agree, as companies try to do more with leaner workforces, the need for training grows. Employees are taking on more responsibilities and are given broader job descriptions. Upgrading and broadening employees' job skills are a must, especially in technology and information management areas. Enhanced computer skills are a must. It's the best way to keep up with the work and information flow.

Finally, think long-term. Linking organizational needs to learning provided by your company helps employees perform at the high-level management desires. Increased motivation, productivity and customer satisfaction will follow.

UW-River Falls offers a five-class, 15-credit undergraduate certificate that provides an excellent opportunity to enter the information system industry or refine existing skills. The program teaches the critical skills needed by modern business: programming and web development.

Anyone who completes the certificate is prepared to become an information systems consultant, and matches computer technology with business needs. Courses in Java I and II will be offered this fall beginning Sept.

The program is designed to build effective, ethical and influential leaders through participation in a selection of half-day workshops. Participants will receive practical instruction and useful tools that they can apply immediately in their workplaces. Workshops can be taken in half-day, full-day or two-day sessions. We expect to offer the workshops in the fall. Call 715/425-3335 for more information.

Fork Suites is scheduled to open in June 2005. The $11.5 million facility will have 240 student residents housed in 60 suites, each consisting of four private bedrooms, one bath, a living room and a kitchenette. This type of arrangement is known as transition living, because it is similar to apartment living, but it is located on campus.

Paid for entirely through student fees, the project will generate $6.7 million in regional purchases of construction materials supplies and materials, generate over 90 jobs in the construction and trades industries, and return over $353,000 in income taxes.

The authors suggest that this lack of knowledge has practical consequences for individual consumers. Good decisions about savings, spending and credit management can best be made by informed individuals.

The report paints a somewhat dark picture of the current Wisconsin educational standards as they relate to economics. However, some private and nonprofit organizations have been working to improve the situation. Economics Wisconsin, sponsored by the Wisconsin Council on Economic Education, provides economic and financial education to elementary and secondary teachers. This training occurs primarily at Centers for Economic Education on college and university campuses around the state.

Finally, the authors provide a series of recommendations to improve the situation. A few of the recommendations are: improve the Model Academic Standards in economics, develop a model high school course in economics and improve the states assessment program as it relates to economics and personal finance.

Connections for Life workshops for math and social studies educators. State Farm Insurance and the AnnMarie Foundation of the Phillips Plastic Corporation are sponsoring the workshops on Tuesday, June 17, for middle school teachers and Wednesday, June 18, for high school teachers.

Health education practitioners and those preparing to be health educators can benefit from attending the Health Education Summer Institute at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls. The five-week institute begins on Monday, June 16, on campus.

Participants will develop their expertise in health education and may earn credits toward educator certification. The program includes courses on community-based health promotion and disease prevention, safety education, and understanding addictions, among other topics.

This isn't merely a "job fair" targeted toward graduating seniors, but an event that provides a forum for students at all levels to learn about various career fields and network with employers. Employer representatives who attend the Career Fair benefit from the opportunity to promote their industries and organizations, to recruit highly qualified interns and permanent staff, to meet UW-RF faculty and staff, and to strengthen ties with the University.

Recent articles in the St. Paul Pioneer Press highlight the changing demographics of our cities and town as well as our workplaces. We in Western Wisconsin are experiencing significant inward migration of foreign-born workers and their families.

Anecdotal evidence suggests that these immigrants shop where they feel comfortable communicating. A business with employees who can speak a language other than English proves to be attractive to immigrant members of the community and their sales dollars.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is offering a conference on managing workplace or community change on June 4. The conference, "Changing Workplaces, Changing Communities," is for employers and community leaders who must ease the transition to culturally and linguistically diverse workplaces and communities when their workers speak little or no English.

The one-day conference will address issues confronting employers, community leaders and the resource and service people who work with these groups. Legal issues confronting employers, working with interpreters in culturally and linguistically diverse workplaces, personal reflections on being a new immigrant, and what to do when you and your clients don't speak the same language are among the topics covered.

"TESOL for Specific Purposes," will be offered in River Falls and via interactive television in Viroqua, Wis., beginning June 16. This practical, hands-on course is designed to train tutors who can help non-English speaking adults communicate more effectively in their workplaces and their communities. Participants who successfully complete the tutor-training course may register for field experience tutoring non-English speaking workers employed in local businesses.

Stout, Eau Claire, Superior and Stevens Point SBDC's are collaborating on a business plan curriculum for businesses in the tourism industry that have been hurt by a lack of snow. This Tourism project is for businesses that are North of Hwy 29. It will be a 24-hour course offered over 8 weeks. Some of the classes will be delivered via interactive television and some will be face to face. The $850 course fee will be paid in full by the Department of Commerce.

Career Services - "What Color is Your Personality?" Students and families will enjoy this interactive workshop to help you discover your natural strengths and talents utilizing the True Colors method. Through this workshop you will learn about your personality, gain career insight, and put soul into the work you do.

Comedians: "The StageBenders." Compared to a contemporary Abbott and Costello, Kim Thomassen and Gust Alexander were two junior high school buddies from Minneapolis who liked to make each other laugh. Today, under the playful moniker "The Stagebenders," Thomassen and Alexander are America's top comedy duo, playing to sell-out crowds and rave reviews.

During his first official trip to campus as chancellor-elect, Dr. Don Betz shook hands with more than 300 people who attended the March 2005 reception. Speaking to those gathered in Hagestad Student Center, Dr. Betz expressed his belief that "UW-River Falls has a great future. I hope to meet with every stakeholder--on and off-campus--and we will continue to be involved in regional development. There is a definite connection between quality of education and quality of life."

The Mu Performing Arts group presented Taiko, a Japanese style of drumming, at the 2005 Unity in the Community day. The celebration of diversity is an annual spring event on campus, attracting hundreds of students of all ages. Numerous musical groups perform and an all-campus picnic is held.

Computer science assistant professor Anthony Varghese has been on the cutting edge of human physiology research that has resulted in a dozen scholarly treatises published in some of the leading human physiology journals in the world. His research has been used by such companies as Medtronics to improve its defibrilators; by Physiome Science (now Predix Pharmaceuticals) to support clinical trials of a proposed drug; and by Endocardial Solutions, Inc., to improve software used in operating room computers that enable cardiologists to effectively map the inside of a beating human heart. The programs hes designed have allowed him to assist medical scientists in two distinct areas: understanding the fundamentals of how human heartbeat is regulated; and modeling the interaction of drug therapies before they are launched in laboratories and then introduced to humans in clinical field trials. Computer science students assist him in his research and in the networking of computers to resolve complicated problems. That latter process is known as clustering or griding and its becoming more prevalent throughout industry. If the university gains back some of its faculty and laboratory support money cut during recent years, he will be able to pursue more cluster activities. And that will prove beneficial to students in their value as employees to business and industry, as well as in providing computing capacity to other faculty across the university who might want to model the problems they are researching.

A Celebration of Undergraduate Research in April 2004 at the State Capitol rotunda in Madison. Students and faculty from 15 UW campuses shared their research findings with state elected officials, federal research representatives and members of the public. Some 100 students presented. UW-RF biology major Michael Salmela spoke at the event, representing all UW System students. He talked about the importance of undergraduate research and its value to students. The research he conducted with biology professor Tim Lyden helped him land a National Science Foundation grant for undergraduate research in neuroscience at the University of Minnesota in Summer 2004.

Horticulture professor Brian Smith runs the only fruit research facility in the 26-campus UW System dedicated primarily toward fruit breeding. The campus has the only plum and raspberry breeding program in a 24-state surrounding area. Brian received his third State of Wisconsin Agricultural Development and Diversification grant this year, a $10,000 award to develop new varieties of raspberries for Wisconsin commercial fruit growers. About 120 students per year gain direct hands-on experience in Brians fruit breeding program, and four students are full-time employees of the facility each summer. His research program focuses on developing winter-hardy varieties of strawberries, raspberries and plums that result in high quality, good yield fruit with superior pest/disease resistance for Midwestern commercial growers. Such varieties help make growers more competitive, profitable and diverse in their fruit production.

The College of Arts and Sciences awarded more than $5,000 to 17 undergraduate students to support on and off-campus student research. Donations from nearly 500 alumni and friends created the CAS Fund for Excellence designed to support student participation with faculty in specific areas of student interest. The funds have contributed to projects from nearly every program and segment of the college and have supported activities ranging from science experiments to arts performances to social science projects and presentations. Individual grants cover supplies, project expenses, research, travel and conference attendance.

The fund also promotes educational opportunities that exist beyond the classroom, which result in empowering experiences for participating students. Some students have already reported that their research had an impact on their applications for graduate schools and job opportunities.

The university launched a pilot program in Spring 2004 that took advantage of an expanded partnership with Arlington High School and Eastern Heights Elementary School in St. Paul, Minn. On top of traditional classroom observation, UW-RF education students became tutors in an after-school program designed to help kids with their studies and to expose college students to diverse student populations.

High and two-thirds of the population at Eastern Heights Elementary. Most are from economically-disadvantaged families. Many of these students are new immigrants, still learning English and adapting to American culture. The challenges to succeed academically are enormous. According to Jill Moe, director of the Upward Bound program at UW-RF, the tutoring program worked on all levels: UW-RF students received quality educational experiences, learned the value of civic engagement, and developed cultural competence, while the St. Paul schools got much needed assistance in helping their students succeed. More than 100 UW-RF students were expected to be involved in the program in Fall 2004.

Bank of River FallsPrescott, the COMPASS Scholars Annual Scholarship is a unique opportunity to help students succeed. The program is for incoming, first-year students interested in majoring in some area within CBE. The recipient must be from Wisconsin and be a minority student. The students ability to obtain federal funding is essential. The bank then makes up the difference between the cost of school and the money the student acquires through federal funding. In this way, the student is fully funded for all expenses through their first year at the university. The bank also offers the student a paid internship at the bank for the academic year and during the summer. Work schedules are flexible to accommodate a students hectic schedule. The scholarship is applicable for one full year of academic study and may be renewed each year for a maximum of four years to Wisconsin students of color.

Man, a one-person show addressing the enigma of cultural, racial and ethnic identity; Preacher Moss is the End of Racism Comedy Tour, an insightful presentation on racial understanding vs. racial interaction; and Ellis, a Twin Cities singer, songwriter and guitarist. Unity in the Community Day held on the campus mall featured cultural performances including an Irish Trio and a Native American storyteller. Students, faculty, staff and the community took part in brief activities that challenged the norms and encouraged greater acceptance and appreciation of difference.

One hundred young people in grades 6-12, potential first-generation college students, experienced dorm life, academic courses, recreation and social experiences through the Explore program. Funded by the Wisconsin Department of Public Instruction, Explore gets young people excited about college.

The program provides hands-on learning from UW-RF instructors and student counselors and helps prepare students for ACT and SAT college entrance exams. Courses in math, science and creative writing were offered along with some repeat favorites like Bio-detectives and World Dance. Bio-detectives introduces students to fingerprinting, investigating crime scenes, forensics and DNA sampling. World Dance immerses students in dance and music from a variety of cultures.

TRIO program designed to enhance the learning of students from limited income families where neither parent has completed a four-year college degree. Upward Bound students attended weekly tutoring sessions at Arlington High School and participated in monthly Saturday programs held on the campus. A four-week summer residential program included courses in language arts, math, science, and foreign language. Another week was spent camping at the university's Pigeon Lake facility in Drummond, Wis., with an additional week devoted to service-learning in which each student volunteered 30-40 hours in several St. Paul communities.

Upward Bound helped prepare students for college through tutoring, academic-skill building, social and cultural activities, college career awareness and personal and academic counseling. The UW-RF program has been remarkably successful.

Teen University offers young students who show strong academic drive a glimpse into their future as potential college students. Approximately130 students finishing grades six to eight attended the week-long program, now in its thirteenth year. Teen University aims to keep kids at the top of their class and encourage college attendance by providing an early campus experience with several academic and creative courses. Subjects in 2004 included 20th-century literature, scuba diving, natural resources, biotechnology, fly fishing and fly tying, mystery writing and other topics. This year, a favorite course among students was a look into the fascinating world of cartooning and comics.

College for Kids encourages young students who show high academic potential, motivation and talent to attend college. This year 250 students who finished grades three to five took various academic enrichment classes each morning during the two-week program. In addition to offering creative and outdoor classes, College for Kids aims to keep promising youth at the top of their class and encourage eventual college enrollment by providing a campus experience along with several academic courses. Courses this year included Ancient Egyptian Art and Artifacts, Fly Fishing and Fly Tying, Harry Potter Adventures, Japanese Culture, Mystery Writing for Kids and others. This year, a favorite course among students was Orienteering, which gave students the freedom to explore campus using a map and compass to find specific points in the landscape.

Diversity Award to UW-River Falls in Fall 2003 for its innovative practices to promote diversity on campus. The award recognizes efforts and achievements of state institutions of higher learning in preparing minorities, women, and persons with disabilities for employment in the State of Wisconsin. UW-RF was cited for a comprehensive package of initiatives designed to encourage students of color to enroll at UW-RF, to support them academically and personally while enrolled, and to prepare them for success upon graduation. Recently the award was renamed to honor UW-RF Chancellor Ann Lydecker who died in a traffic accident in March 2004.

In November 2003, the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education granted unconditional reaccredidation of the universitys teacher education programs, both initial teacher preparation and advanced preparation programs.

The site evaluation team that visited UW-RF praised the colleges faculty as excellent teachers and scholars who contribute to their profession. In assessing students, the team found that both undergraduate and graduate teacher candidates clearly and pervasively demonstrated that they are able to assess whether their students are learning. And the team also noted that practicing teachers in surrounding school districts who supervise UW-RF student teachers praised the quality of candidates placed with them for their enthusiasm, their knowledge of the latest teaching techniques, and their ability to manage classrooms.

Teaching Excellence Award in September 2003, recognizing her outstanding career achievements and exceptional commitment to teaching. Award winners we re selected from among the more than 12,000 faculty in the University of Wisconsin System.

Cowen previously was cited at UW-RF as its Distinguished Teacher, the highest award that can be presented at the university. Cowen teaches a wide range of courses, from freshmen general economics and senior capstone courses to teaching courses within the discipline for economics majors, such as quantitative analysis, labor economics, intermediate microeconomic theory, and public regulation of business. Cowen is the second UW-RF faculty member to receive this prestigious award. English Professor Nick Karolides, a specialist in literary censorship and an expert in reading comprehension, was recognized by the Regents in 1994.

Officials with the theatre festival noted that her win two years in a row is unprecedented. The fact that she won in two different categories has set a benchmark for excellence in college theatre production that will be difficult to replicate. Moria was presented with a special joint resolution of commendation from the Wisconsin Senate and Wisconsin Assembly to recognize her signal achievement.

UW-RF horticulture students placed second out of 10 teams at the national evaluation and design competition held at Colorado State University. Students judged 31 different classes of floriculture plant material as part of the competition.

Alter Jr. Award for excellence in overall chapter operations. The national award signifies top-notch academic and philanthropic activities sponsored by the chapter. Each year Theta Chi brothers in River Falls participate in the American Cancer Societys Relay for Life, Red Cross blood drives, Salvation Army bell ringing, and numerous other volunteer activities.

Students have a new place on campus for study and relaxation due to the generosity of alumnus Dennis Dahlka, class of 1977 who died in 2002. The Dahlka Gardens were established using a small portion of the nearly half-million-dollar bequest Dennis made to the university. Most of the gift will become part of an endowed fund used to provide scholarships to Wisconsin residents. The gardens, planted with a variety of ornamental prairie grasses, perennials and pines, will serve as a living classroom for students studying horticulture, as well as a relaxing outdoor lounge to meet friends, read, eat or just catch some rays. The Dahlka Gardens are the only irrigated area on campus and are larger than all other campus garden areas combined.

The university awarded its 2004 Distinguished Alumnus prize to international development and relief worker Sigurd Hanson. For more than 25 years, Hanson has guided the provision of life-sustaining assistance in food, medical services and security to over a million residents of Third World nations. His goal throughout has been to help individuals and families to be healthy, self-reliant, and safe. Currently, he serves as the Country Director for World Vision-Pakistan where he oversees a consortium that is carrying out a $15 million USAID democracy program. Prior to that he directed more than 1,600 aid workers in providing basic necessities and security to tens of thousands of refugees disrupted by the Afghanistan war. In 2002, millions of readers across the world caught a small glimpse of the daunting task he faced through a series of installments of his Peshawar Diary, which ran in October and November on Time.com.

Hanson received the universitys highest award to alumni at commencement exercises in May 2004 when he also delivered a message to graduates about commitment and dedicated service to better the world.

Falls and represents the broadest base of support for the UW-RF Foundation from alumni, faculty, staff, and other friends. It requires a minimum contribution of $100 for annual membership. Qualifying gifts for the Falcon Society may be unrestricted or designated for a specific program or department.

PROCEDURE: Note:  The State Telephone System (STS) and governmental cellular service contracts were developed for the exclusive use of state agencies and are not to be used for personal calls.  The University and other state agencies have been granted tax-exempt status for such business calls and it would be a violation of regulations for individuals to take advantage of this tax-exempt status.  In addition, personal charges should not be charged to university accounts.  Personal long distance calls may be made from University telephones if properly placed and charged to private phones.  Coin (pay) telephones are also available at various campus locations.

The Information Technology Services Department mantains an inventory of equipment itemized above. Only such approved equipment (much of which is available on state contract) will be installed and serviced by University staff. Purchasing and installation of other equipment is discouraged and may not prove compatible with existing or future CENTREX line features or University approved equipment.

It is understood that many campus smokers will face some difficulty as this policy is implemented.  Those individuals who wish to quit smoking should contact  Campus Counseling Services.  Counseling Services will be able to assist through the development of support groups and provide both general information and referrals.  Some health insurance plans also provide assistance to those attempting to stop smoking.  Contact the Personnel/ Payroll Services Office to determine insurance coverage prior to enrolling in a program.

Using appropriate resources, it is the intent of the University to provide a mutually profitable and harmonious safe working environment with University employees.  Therefore, the University will attempt to provide a safe work place, proper equipment and materials, and establish and monitor that proper safety procedures be practiced.

With this attitude in mind, joint cooperation between the employee and the University will contribute significantly to safe working conditions and strive for accident free performance to the advantage of the entire University community.

Risk Management is the assumption of responsibility for recognizing, measuring and controlling the exposures to loss of both human life and property which are created by the activities of the University.  The University is insistent upon promoting a policy of sound risk management that provides facilities, services and working conditions that are conducive to safety, security and maximum efficiency.

UW-River Falls strives to operate a risk management program that is consistent with UW System, State, and Federal requirements.  Such programs attempt to protect employees, students and members of the general public involved in University activities on or off the campus.  It is also entrusted to protect the physical properties of the University and State.  The University also expects its faculty, staff and students to exercise good judgment in connection with safety regulations and methods relating to their personal safety and well-being.

The Risk Management Coordinator provides guidance, advice and other aid as may be needed by department administrators, faculty members, staff and students.  The Coordinator gathers information regarding accidents and incidents and files claims accordingly and acts as a liaison between the University and Central Risk Management and/or State Risk Management.  The Risk Management Coordinator works closely with the Public Safety Department, the Workers Compensation/Personnel Office, the Property Control/Purchasing Department, the Physical Plant and Campus Planning Office in all loss control matters.  The campus risk management responsibility is coordinated by the Purchasing Director in cooperation with the Department of Public Safety.

Departmental chairpersons, unit supervisors and instructors are expected to encourage employees, students and visitors to comply with safety rules and regulations such as wearing of personal protective equipment and safety guards in place.  Their efforts should be directed toward maintaining a safe working environment in all areas under their direction.  Their duties include the protection of University property within their department area from theft and damage.

Department and unit heads should report all accidents and injuries to the Risk Management Coordinator within 12 hours after their occurrence.  Thefts or malicious damage, lightning and weather related damage, or any other destruction of property should be reported to the Risk Management Coordinator as soon as possible after the occurrence.  These initial reports will be followed by written reports to appropriate University and State offices for possible insurance claim and reimbursement.

POLICY/PURPOSE: To provide the best parking possible to everyone, it is the responsibility of everyone to familiarize themselves with the parking regulations.  May we encourage you as a user of the system to acquaint yourself with these regulations and park properly on campus.  Citations are issued to persons who encroach on the rights of others by their disregard of the published parking rules.

PROCEDURE: Signs.  No person may erect, post or attach any signs, posters, pictures or any other item of a similar nature in or on any building or upon other University lands except on regularly established bulletin boards or as authorized by the provisions of this code or by the Chief Administrative Officer.  The following buildings have individual established posting policies: Student Center, Library, Rodli Commons, and the Residence Halls.  They do not necessarily follow the regulations contained herein.

Bulletin boards which are under the jurisdiction of the college department, residence hall, or administrative office that maintains them be reasonably restricted to the posting of material(s) relevant to the functions of the offices involved.

University building walls and trees are not to be utilized for the posting of materials.  The custodial and grounds department are instructed to remove all materials posted on these facilities and objects immediately.  Posters or table tents designed with the primary purpose of promoting consumption of alcoholic beverages will not be permitted.

"Keys. (a) No person may duplicate a University key or request the unauthorized duplication of a University key. (b) No person may transfer any University key from an individual entrusted with its possession to an unauthorized person or be in unauthorized possession of a University key. (c) Keys in the possession of unauthorized persons may be confiscated."

Step 5:  Keys must be signed for and will be issued only to the person whose name appears on the Key Request Form as the person requesting the key. Example: secretaries, student help, etc. cannot sign for or pick up faculty keys.

Safety Office, where a Lost/Stolen Key Form must be completed and signed. Replacement keys will not be issued until that form is on file with Public Safety. A copy should be attached to the request for replacement keys.

A key will not be issued in an instructor's name if they key will be used by a student. If a student fails to return the key issued to him/her, a hold may be placed on the student's academic records until the key is returned.

Facilities Management will operate and maintain a fleet of vehicles for the use of UW-RF faculty, staff and students who are engaged in the official business of the University. This policy is adopted in order to promote the safe and efficient use of state owned vehicles.

Any person to whom a vehicle is personally assigned must sign a "Personal Use Agreement for Personally Assigned Automobile" form (copy attached) indicating understanding and acknowledgment of certain fleet procedures. A copy of this agreement will be kept on file by the Fleet Scheduling Coordinator.

A letter from Public Safety stating that the person is not authorized to use a State vehicle should be sent to the Accounting Department so they know the person is entitled to the higher rate of reimbursement.

POLICY/PURPOSE: This policy establishes guidelines for withholding students' registration, transcripts, and diplomas because of unsettled financial obligations to the University.  Withholding of registration, transcripts or diplomas is never taken on behalf of any individual, concern or enterprise including other universities within the UW System, not directly associated with the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The authority to withhold registration, transcripts, and diplomas stems from action by the University of Wisconsin Board of Regents.  The most recent instance of such authorization is recorded in the minutes of the July 20, 1970, meeting.  At that meeting, the Regents approved the following recommendation for all campuses in the University of Wisconsin System: "Upon written request from any University official involved, the Registrars of each campus are empowered to withhold degree certification, transcripts and academic record information, registration records, and/or permission to register in cases where a student has unpaid fines, has a delinquent loan account, has refused to return books or property of the University, has refused to replace or repair University property which the student has damaged, or is otherwise indebted to the University until the fines or indebtedness are paid or satisfactory arrangements for restitution has been made."

University of Wisconsin System Academic Fee Notes: "No student shall be issued a transcript (certified or not) until all accounts receivable have been paid.  At the institution's option, this provision may be waived when the accounts receivable are less than $25.00."

Removal of Holds as a Result of Bankruptcy - For bankruptcies filed on or after October 1, 1979, the offices will remove holds on records of students whose debts have been discharged in bankruptcy and proceed as described above, except that student loans are not dischargeable during a period of five years beginning when the loan is due, unless the debtor can prove undue hardship.  If a student loan is involved, transcript and record service to include issuance of diplomas will be withheld unless there is a showing of undue hardship.  Registration will be allowed if it can be demonstrated that fees and tuition will be paid on a cash basis.

Federal Trade Commission 1977 law that states that any person under 18 years of age must have medical clearance from a licensed physician before they can be fitted with a hearing aid.  Any person over the age of 18 has the option of signing a medical clearance waiver statement.

Federal Communication Commission 1977 that any patient who purchases a hearing aid is entitled to try the hearing aid for 30 days and the patient may cancel the purchase agreement any time during that 30-day trail period.

Dangerous weapons as defined by Wisconsin Statute 939.22(10) or any object that resembles a dangerous weapon are strictly prohibited on University lands or in University buildings or facilities, except with the written approval of the chief administrative officer or designate or for peace officers performing law enforcement duties.

Storage of weapons and ammunition normally associated with sporting purposes shall be located off-campus for students living in residence halls.  Public Safety shall be responsible for administering the policy.

The University must recover two components of costs when undertaking any extramurally funded project.  Costs to be recovered are costs attributable to the specified project and costs incurred for the general support and management of the project.  Indirect costs  incurred in coordinating or supporting the project are real costs to the University.  Funds paid to the University for indirect costs of a sponsored project are reimbursement for expenditures actually incurred covering utilities, custodial services, building and equipment use charges, library services, and general and departmental administration.  The Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance and the Controller's Office are responsible for monitoring this policy.

Chancellor will arrange the actual transfer of funds from the general indirect cost account to the related accounts based upon the Dean's recommendation. The Controller's Office will determine which accounts will be established or utilized to reflect these transactions.

To attract athletic campus to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls campus which will provide coaches with additional salary, revenue for the University, revenue for Health and Human Performance (H&HP), recruitment of students, and increase public relations with the community.

To establish local policy and procedures for requests to name a building,  facility,  room, floor, or other sections of buildings or grounds after a person.  The Board of Regents has approved a specific resolution (#7166) that deals with this subject, and it is important that individuals or groups who want to forward a name for consideration be aware of campus and Board of Regents policies and procedures.

Individuals and groups can forward a request to the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance  requesting that a building,  facility,  room, floor, or other sections of buildings be named after a person.  The request should include a brief biography of the person and a statement as to why this recommendation is being made.

If the request involves the naming of an entire building and the request involves a living individual who has been formally associated with the University of Wisconsin System or has held public office, a waiting period of at least five years from the previous association with the University System or any public office in the State should be observed. Exceptions may be considered where a gift stipulates the naming.

If the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance deems that the proposed name merits consideration, he/she shall forward the request to an appropirate shared governance board. As a rule, the Faculty Senate shall consider the naming for all GPR facilities, and the Student Senate for Program Revernue facilities. There may be times in which confidentiality of the person's name is important, and discussion shall be posted under "closed" or "executive" session.

When naming involves Program Revenue facilities that are less than the entire building, the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance may choose to forward the recommendation to the Facilities and Fee Committee or any of its sub-committees rather than the Student Senate. It shall be the goal of the Vice Chancellor to obtain input from the students who best represent the proposed building and/or facility being named.

Following the action of the appropriate shared governance committee, the request for naming shall be forwarded to the Chancellor. The Chancellor is authorized to name facilities when naming involves less than an entire building, such as rooms, wings or exterior amenities.

That, upon the recommendation of the President of the University of Wisconsin System, Resolution 5415 (February 2, 1990), creating UW System policy for naming or dedicating university facilities, be rescinded and the following new policy adopted:It is the preference of the Board to commemorate the contributions of individuals to academic excellence through the naming or dedication of scholarships, programs, professorships, and other similar actions.  However, the Board recognizes that from time to time there may be a desire to name or dedicate some facilities or portions of university's buildings or grounds after a person.  On those occasions, every such request that involves an entire building must be presented to the Board for formal approval.  These requests are to be brought to the Physical Planning and Development Committee and the full Board of Regents for discussion in closed session at least one month prior to requesting formal Regent action.

If the request involves a living individual who has been formally associated with the University of Wisconsin System, or has held a paid public office, a waiting period is required unless a situation is presented where a gift stipulates the naming.  Normally, at least five years must have elapsed from the time a person who has been formally associated with the University of Wisconsin System, or has held a paid public office, has terminated that association, or left the paid public office.

The Chancellor of each institution is authorized to name facilities when the naming involves less than an entire building, such as rooms, wings, or exterior amenities.  This authorization is subject to the same limitations regarding waiting periods as those pertaining to entire buildings.

Each University department shall address, presort, and affix accounting codes as applicable prior to submitting to Postal Services for pickup and delivery.  The University postal clerk is the official University contact with the U.S. Post Office.  Other employees may not take unmetered mail to the post office.

Pickup and delivery points are assigned to each building or group of buildings.  There will be a pickup and delivery service daily each morning.  Outgoing mail will also be picked up in the afternoon only in North Hall, South Hall and Kleinpell Fine Arts.  Mail may be hand carried to the Mail Room at Central Stores/Postal Services prior to 3:00 p.m. for submission to the U.S. Post Office.

"Those freshman and sophomore students who are not veterans, married or living with parents or guardian shall be required to live in a University-operated residence hall when such accommodations are available."

Records Management responsibilities as handled through the University Archives.  It is the goal of Records Management to make the handling of records a routine process which effectively documents the spectrum of University operations.  It is University policy to provide professional assistance and records system control to University offices and departments so that these units may contribute to the University's mission with a minimum amount of time and resources devoted to records maintenance.

Records Management through the auspices of the University Archives will coordinate in preserving documents relevant to the history of the University and ensure reasonable compliance with external laws and regulations regarding the disposition of records.

To assure that all departments and administrative units of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls develop and implement efficient records management practices and are in compliance with Wisconsin Statutes governing public records, unit and department administrators should establish and maintain a program for economical and efficient management of their records.

The Records Management Program shall also provide for coordination with the University Archivist in developing and implementing techniques to provide for the maintenance and security of records.  The program shall facilitate the disposal of records determined not to be of permanent value.  It shall also provide for the preservation of those records deemed to have permanent legal, fiscal, administrative, research, or historical value.

The purpose of the records inventory is to gather as much information about the unit's records as possible.  It is a complete and accurate listing of all the information about a series of records including the series title, dates, types of storage equipment, the departmental function documented by the records, as well as physical information about the records such as location, volume, etc.  The inventory also provides the unit/department with an opportunity to evaluate departmental records and to make recommendations for their disposition.

Records Disposition Authorizations (RDAs) are written based in large part on the information gathered in the records inventory.  Wisconsin Statutes prohibit the destruction of any public records without the approval of the State Public Records and Forms Board.  To obtain this approval, an RDA is written by the University Archivist/Records Manager using the inventory worksheets completed by the unit/department and submitted to the Records and Forms Board for review.

The disposition of a records series is final when it is either destroyed or legal custody is transferred to another agency.  In effect, RDA is a legal agreement between the University and the Records and Forms Board that a given records series will be retained for at least a certain number of years and then disposition will be handled in a certain manner.  RDAs are subject to amendment and change by the same process used to create them initially.

Either on their own initiative or at the Archivist's suggestion, unit administrators or department chairs discuss the need for a records inventory and its objectives with the University Archivist/Records Manager.  It is essential at this early stage that there be administrative commitment to the process.

The Archivist amends the RDA as necessary and sends it to the unit head for his/her signature.  Upon its return to the Archives, the RDA is submitted to the Records and Forms Board in Madison for approval.

Maintaining a reasonable public safety environment is an incumbent burden on the University.  The exercise of flexible tolerance must be maintained in consideration of the totality of the circumstances surrounding the adjustment.

Any University of Wisconsin-River Falls Security Officer or any jurisdictional peace officer may issue citations in accordance with the provisions of this policy and the Wisconsin Administrative Code - Chapter 18 - Conduct on University Lands.

Persons guilty of computer software copyright violations may be subject to disciplinary action by the University.  Such violations may also subject any persons involved to criminal or civil prosecution.

Summary statements of this policy shall be posted in all areas that are open for general use of computers.  Reminders regarding this policy will be periodically sent to all University Departments and offices.

Every department should make sure it has an original disk of the software and original documentation for each computer. If not they should check to see if a special site license was obtained. Each department should take some precautions against unauthorized copying of software under their jurisdiction. If you need assistance, please contact Information Technology Services. Unrestricted access to machines is inviting copying, loss of software and data and infection by computer viruses.

In spite of inclement weather, it is unrealistic to close a campus.  There are numerous vital services that must be maintained such as security services, food services for residential students, power plant operations, snow removal, etc.  However, if inclement weather is severe enough, class can be cancelled, the campus can be closed to the public, and all non-emergency personnel can be directed to leave university property.

"Remissions of non-resident tuition, but no other fees, except in special circumstances as approved by the Chancellor, may be remitted to worthy and needy foreign students and to students who are United States citizens but whose residence is not in the United States.  The number of such remissions which may be awarded in any academic year shall not exceed 2% of the total full-time enrollment of students at that institution for the preceding year."

The Office of the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance is responsible for overseeing the implementation of this policy and to insure that the tuition remission funds are appropriately allocated.

Have demonstrated and documented initiative in finding on-campus work opportunities and were unsuccessful or have sought off-campus work opportunities with the proper INS authorization, or applied for supporting scholarships or grants and were denied.

Students who have been screened and referred by the Institute of International Education or similar organizations as demonstrating severe financial need and who would be unable to attend UW-RF without this financial support.

Students who demonstrate outstanding academic credentials, who demonstrate and document severe financial need, show potential for significant contribution to the University and/or community, and who would be unable to attend UW-RF without this financial support and are for these reasons specifically recommended by a department, the Graduate School, or a faculty member.

Students who demonstrate and document severe financial need, outstanding scholarship, have actively participated in multicultural activities or have made other significant contributions to the University and/or community, and who are specially recommended by the Chancellor.

Priority may be given to applicants who meet any of the above criteria and are applying from either "unrepresented" or "under represented" countries among our international student population, or from countries which are generally referred to as "developing" or "low income."

They fail to complete the minimum "full load" of credits per semester or maintain at least the 2.5 GPA per semester or to make adequate progress toward their intended degree.  Students will be warned in writing when any of the former (a) or (b) occurs.  They will be given three months (a) to be re-instated to lawful F-1 status, and/or (b) a full semester to improve their academic situation to satisfactory academic standards.

If a remission is denied or withdrawn, student may make a written appeal for reinstatement in future semesters providing proof and/or documentation of change of circumstances, or demonstrating "extenuating circumstances" (i.e., medical reasons, etc.) In which case, depending on the circumstance, exceptions may be made.

The appeal requests should be addressed to the International Student Tuition Remission Committee, which is composed of the International Student Advisor; the Director of International Programs or the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance, or designate; the Dean of Students, or designate; and the Director of Financial Assistance, or designate.  In the case of an appeal presented by a newly admitted student, the staff member in charge of international student admissions will be added to the Committee.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls is committed to safeguarding all personally identifiable information we obtain about our students, staff, other constituents and visitors, whether internal or external. The only personally identifiable information the university collects via electronic mail, administrative systems or the campus web site, including those web sites currently being maintained by third-party, trusted providers is that which is voluntarily provided by our constituents and visitors. Tracking information is collected and analyzed so that we may improve our service offerings to our users. This tracking information is kept confidential to the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The University of Wisconsin-River Falls maintains both paper records and computer information systems to carry out its educational mission. Federal and State laws and regulations govern access to these records. The university establishes local policies and procedures to ensure compliance with these laws and regulations and to protect the integrity of university records and the privacy of individuals. The following policy statements are applicable to all areas of the university and must be observed by all persons dealing with such information, including all university employees and students, as well as other individuals or entities that share university information for business purposes.

Data contained in the university's information systems are the property of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls and represent official university records. Exceptions to this policy are: faculty developed curricular material, student developed curricular material, certain licensed information such as electronic journal subscriptions and personal data or personal information that may be temporarily stored on a university owned electronic device. Questions regarding exemptions should be discussed with the university legal counsel.

Managers are also responsible for ensuring that their staff and student employees attend appropriate training sessions offered by the university. Managers are also responsible for ensuring that their staff and student employees are in compliance with laws, regulations and local policies.

The Gramm-Leach-Bliley (GLB) Act requires financial institutions to ensure the security and confidentiality of personal information that is collected from customers, such as their names, addresses and phone numbers; bank and credit card account numbers; income and credit histories; and Social Security numbers. As part of its implementation of the GLB Act, the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) has issued the Safeguards Rule. This Rule requires financial institutions under FTC jurisdiction to secure customer records and information. The FTC has ruled that colleges and universities are financial institutions for the purposes of this Rule, and must be in compliance by May 23, 2003.

In recent years, several scandals have emerged which call into question the ethics of some academic scientists.  For instance, researchers investigating the efficacy of new drugs have been found to be very well-paid consultants to the pharmaceutical companies which had invented the new drugs and proposed them for FDA approval.  In the face of Congressional pressure, the Public Health Service and the National Science Foundation created new rules governing conflict of interest and financial disclosure which will prevent such abuses.  Early versions of those rules were proposed in 1994.  After comment and reconsideration, final rules were published in the Federal Register on July 11, 1995 (vol. 60, no. 132, pp. 35809-35819; editorial corrections appear in the July 31 issue).

Chapter UWS 8 of the Wisconsin Administrative Code currently serves as the Code of Ethics for unclassified staff.  It requires unclassifed staff to report significant outside activities and interests each year.  Those requirements are unchanged by this policy paper.  UWS legal counsel has determined that UWS 8 is not sufficient to meet the new rules.  Consequently UW institutions must implement a policy in accord with the new rules; hence this UW-River Falls policy paper.

If the investigator is satisfied with the Conflict Review Committee's proposed resolution, it will stand.  If s/he is dissatisfied with the Conflict Review Committee's proposed resolution, s/he may appeal to the Provost & Vice Chancellor who will consult with the applicant and Conflict Review Committee as deemed necessary and appropriate to the particular circumstance.  The decision of the Provost & Vice Chancellor shall be final.

I and/or my immediate family receive or expect to receive payments totaling $5,000 or more per year from a single for-profit business enterprise that would reasonably appear to be directly and significantly affected by my research or educational activities which are funded or may be funded by federal agencies.

I and/or my immediate family have ownership interests of 5% or greater in a single for-profit business enterprise that would reasonably appear to be directly and significantly affected by my research or educational activities which are funded or may be funded by federal agencies.

Do you and/or your immediate family have a financial interest from or in a for-profit business that is reasonably likely to be directly and significantly affected by the research or educational activities for which you have received or expect within the year to seek and receive funding?  If not, then the interest is not reportable.  If yes, go to step 2.

Do you and/or your immediate family together receive from such a business $5,000 or more per year, or is the ownership interest you and your family have together in such a business 5% or more of the total ownership interest?  If no, then the interest is not reportable.  If yes, you must report the interest(s) on the other side of this form.

It is critical that adequate insurance be maintained. University staff does not have the training, expertise or time/resources to evaluate numerous and disparate polices, either domestic or international, to ensure that insurance policies other than the one negotiated by UW System meet the requirements of UW System and U.S. State Department policy.

Computers that are replaced through the Computer Replacement Fund will be returned to ITS for reuse, sale or disposal.  If a department requests to reuse the computer within the department, approval must be given by ITS.  If the approval is given, caveats may be attached which could indicate how long the computer may be used, what levels of support the computer will receive and what use the computer may be put to.

Tax Stamp@ which must be displayed whenever alcohol beverages are being dispensed. The University is legally responsible for paying State and County sales tax and recording all sales. A University employee and/or food service contract employee must be present at and supervise all events in which alcohol beverages are served.

UW-RF Outreach is responsible for managing its annual allocation, collecting tuition, monitoring expenditures, providing for compensation of instructional costs, and justifying to UW Extension the assessment of other costs to be charged against Fund 104. Charges in 104 must be based on at least full recovery and may be higher than regular tuition.

OGS will submit to the Provost a brief plan and budget (not to exceed one page) outlining how residual fund will be expended prior to receiving expenditure authority. OGS will waive its 20% for any colleges with a total residual fund balance less than $5,000.

Summer and J-Term programs and courses should be offered to meet the needs of various student populations and provide maximum academic access for these learners. The University Long Range Plan encourages academic units to plan course offerings to meet the needs of learner populations such as currently matriculated students, working professionals, life-long learners, youth, regional businesses, organizations and agencies.

These policies are designed to allow UW-RF to offer the best possible mix of classes to meet diverse learner population needs, provide reasonable remuneration for faculty and staff while allowing the colleges to minimize course cancellations and accommodate budget constraints.

Instructors of classes with enrollments that do not meet minimums will be paid on a reduced scale proportional to the actual level of enrollment below minimum. Generally, minimum class sizes will be seven (7) for undergraduate classes and four (4) for graduate classes. Exceptions to these minimums must be approved by the college Dean.

It is the policy of the University of Wisconsin-River Falls to comply with all applicable provisions of the copyright law and to promote understanding of the protections provided to the owners of the copyright.

States (Title 17, U.S. Code) to the authors of "original works of authorship," including literary, dramatic, musical, artistic, and certain other intellectual works. This protection is available to both published and unpublished works, and gives the owner of the copyright exclusive right to reproduce their work, to prepare derivative works, to distribute copies of phono records, to perform their work publicly, and to display their work publicly.

UW-River Falls bases its copyright policy on U.S. Copyright Law and revisions such as the Digital Millennium Copyright Act and the Technology Education and Copyright Harmonization Act. As copyright law continues to evolve, the University will respond by educating the University community to develop practices and procedures that comply with current law.

When using copyrighted works to fulfill the University's mission of teaching, research and service, all faculty, staff, and students are expected to make informed, good faith decisions that comply with copyright law and its fair use provisions.

With the advent of wireless computer technology, it has become necessary to establish coordination and management of the shared radio frequency spectrum that is available to the campus. Since various devices and technologies utilize similar and potentially conflicting radio frequencies, it is necessary to properly coordinate and manage the use and deployment of these devices and technologies in order to ensure the reliability of wireless and other radio frequency-based services. For example, cordless telephones that operate in the 2.4Ghz frequency spectrum, as well as many microwave ovens, can cause interference with wireless computer access. Approved by the Technology Policy and Planning Committee-April 20, 2004.

The Chief Information Officer and Information Technology Services (ITS) are responsible for the design, implementation and operation of shared radio spectrum services on the UW-River Falls campus. The CIO will work to ensure that the best interests of the university will be served through the proper design, installation and management of all radio spectrum technologies and devices. Should an issue of interference arise within the campus boundaries, the CIO will determine and implement the proper course of action to rectify the issue.

Note: The benefits and privileges identified in 2.0  may be revoked or adjusted by Administration upon periodic review. Any changes in benefits and privileges will be clearly communicated to the University community.

NOTE: The benefits and privileges identified in 2.0  may be revoked or adjusted by Administration upon periodic review. Any changes in benefits and privileges will be clearly communicated to the University community.

The Offices of Provost and Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs and the Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance are responsible for overseeing the implementation of this policy and to insure that UW-RF meets GPR enrollment and tuition revenue targets.

Courses that are part of on-going Outreach programs such as those listed below should be reviewed every three years by the Provost in consultation with the academic Dean and the Dean of Outreach and Graduate Studies to determine if the courses/programs should continue to be offered through Outreach/104 funding or moved to GPR funding.

The academic deans will submit a list of and justification for courses being considered as possible Outreach offerings to the Provost ninety days before the start of each term. The Provost will review the potential Outreach offerings in light of the University's need to meet enrollment and tuition revenue targets. Courses approved as Outreach offerings will be managed by the appropriate college Outreach program manager.

The Vice Chancellor for Administration and Finance is responsible for ensuring compliance with this policy. ITS Telephone Services will assist the Vice Chancellor by providing information concerning cellular service assignments, usage patterns and rate plans.

Cellular telephones, like any other State-owned equipment, assigned to an employee are done so for valid, job-related reasons. No equipment so assigned should be considered as part of a State benefit program.

The new DOA policy requires that the additional operating costs of a cellular telephone must be cost justified and approved by an appropriate University official. Valid justification for an employee having a State-owned cellular telephone include: frequent travel; job responsibilities that require the employee to be out of the office for extended periods of time and require mobile communication in order to perform their job duties; employees who are continuously on call.

In October of each year, each supervisor of a University employee who is assigned cellular services will receive a listing of those employees from the Vice Chancellor's office. It is the supervisor's responsibility to review each assignment of cellular services to determine if there is an on-going need for the service. An appropriate indication must be entered on the listing for each employee, the listing signed by the supervisor and then returned to the Vice Chancellor.

Any employee assigned a State-owned cellular telephone must sign a DOA issued form (available at the above DOA website in PDF format) which the supervisor must retain on file for the duration of such assignment. When an employee leaves their position or is no longer authorized for the assignment of a cellular telephone, the device must be returned to ITS Telephone Services.

The "Cell Phone Monthly Invoice Review Certification" form must be signed by the employee and supervisor, attached to the monthly bill, and kept on file by the supervisor for a period of three years. Employees are responsible for keeping track of and identifying their personal calls. Any personal use of a State cell phone, including essential personal calls and calls permitted under a collective bargaining agreement or the Compensation Plan, should be identified by the employee and discussed with his/her supervisor or designee on a monthly basis.

Use for Personal Calls            Only essential personal calls should be made with a State-owned cellular telephone. Essential personal calls are defined as calls of a minimum duration and frequency that are urgent in nature and cannot be made at another time or from a different telephone. Examples of essential personal calls are to arrange for care of a child or other family emergency, to alert a family member of an unexpected delay due to a change in work schedule, or to arrange for transportation or service in the event of car trouble, etc.             Although the DOA policy does allow for employees to make non-essential personal calls on their State-owned cellular telephones and to then reimburse the State for those calls, UW-River Falls administration would prefer to avoid the administrative overhead required by such transactions and, therefore, request that no non-essential personal calls be made at any time. In the event there is an emergency which requires personal use of the Sate phone, the user is to notify their supervisor and reimburse the University for the calls at the State contract rate plus a $.06 per minute surcharge and any additional amounts for applicable toll or roaming charges, miscellaneous fees and taxes. Reimbursement for any personal calls should be deposited with the Accounts Payable office by departments along with a copy of the annotated bill noting the personal call(s) and their cost. If an employee needs to be able to use their State-owned cellular telephone to make non-essential personal calls, it may be possible to obtain a second, personally-owned and paid for phone number and have that number assigned to the same cellular telephone as a second line.             Use of a State cellular telephone in violation of this policy or the DOA policy may result in revocation of the assigned phone and possibly disciplinary action against the employee.             Employee Safety in Using a Cellular Telephone While Operating a Motor Vehicle             Employees are responsible for operating a motor vehicle while conducting State business in a safe and prudent manner. Employees are encouraged to utilize hands-free accessories whenever possible in order to maximize their attentiveness while driving.

The Privacy Act of 1974 established a set of criteria that must be met in order to solicit a person's Social Security Number. Additionally, Federal laws such as the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) place restrictions upon the use and access to private information which Social Security Numbers are considered to be. Finally, retention and storage of items containing Social Security Numbers must also be considered to avoid inappropriate access or the retention of private information beyond the period for which it is legally required.

Generally, faculty, staff and students can be identified by means other than their Social Security Number (e.g. Falcon Account Number). Therefore, the rationale for soliciting a Social Security Number will need to be compelling or the request for such a solicitation will be disallowed.

These guidelines apply to both electronic solicitations and paper-based solicitations of Social Security Numbers. There are, however, some special considerations for each type of solicitation. For electronic solicitations, care must be taken to ensure that the electronic form of the SSN is available for viewing only to those individuals with an approved need to know. Additionally, the storage and transmittal of electronic data containing a SSN must be properly protected by encryption and/or firewall technology.

Paper-based solicitation must also be properly secured so that only those individuals with an approved need to know have access to the SSN information contained on a paper document. Storage and transportation of paper records containing SSN information must be done securely so that inappropriate individuals are not able to view the SSN information contained on the records.

Per the Privacy Act of 1974 (as amended), any solicitation of Social Security Numbers must contain a disclosure stating to the person whose SSN is being solicited whether or not it is mandatory for them to provide their SSN to you.

The CSIS department is located in the College of Business and Economics and offers its graduates a wide range of degree programs. The College serves over 1200 undergraduate students and approximately 100 graduate students.

The University of Wisconsin -River Falls is a member of the University of Wisconsin System and is located in scenic west central Wisconsin, 30 miles east of the Twin Cities metropolitan area, with easily accessible year around arts, cultural and recreational events.

The department provides an excellent environment for learning, emphasizing the importance of faculty-student interaction in classrooms, laboratories, academic advising and co-curricular activities. A favorable student-faculty ratio offers an opportunity for meaningful interchange between faculty and students.

The Computer Science and Information Systems Department is located in the College of Business and Economics (CBE) and offers its graduates a wide range of degree programs. CBE serves over 1000 undergraduate students and approximately 100 graduate students. UW-River Falls is a member of the University of Wisconsin System and is located in scenic west central Wisconsin, 30 miles east of the Twin Cities metropolitan area, with easily accessible year around arts, cultural and recreational events.

UW-River Falls provides an excellent environment for learning, emphasizing the importance of faculty-student interaction in classrooms, laboratories, academic advising and co-curricular activities. A favorable student-faculty ratio offers an opportunity for meaningful interchange between faculty and students.

There are two areas of specialization or "options" in our major program. Each is listed below with a brief description. The links will take you to more details regarding the option and its required coursework.

This option has a technical and theoretical emphasis providing students comprehensive understanding of software engineering, computing techniques and the underlying theories. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of sophisticated software/hardware systems and communication networks.

Our department offers class sizes from 30 in introductory courses to 15 - 25 in our more advanced courses. Hands-on approach to learning and problem solving is emphasized in our programs. Our small size classes offer students individualized interaction with their faculty and other students.

All our classrooms are equipped with the latest multimedia technology to provide modern and efficient learning. Computer labs are outfitted with state of the art computing and communication facilities including desktops, UNIX workstations, networking technologies and graphics workstations. Advance labs allow our students to work with state-of-the-art technologies and explore topics in areas such as Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Genetic Algorithms, Computer Vision, Wireless Computing, Data Warehousing, Data Mining, etc.

Opportunities for professional development beyond coursework are available. Our Internship program offers our students an excellent opportunity to acquire practical work experience, job-hunting and interviewing skills and professional communication skills.

The Computer Science and Information Systems department has an active local chapter of the Association of Computing Machinery (ACM) providing students generous opportunities to meet and learn from students, professional speakers and faculty representatives. The chapter is run by the students and provides a range of activities and services, including: talks by local practitioners, visits from prominent speakers, technical and career workshops, field trips to computing installations and chapter social activities.

The Computer Science and Information Systems department is located in the College of Business and Economics and offers its graduates a wide range of degree programs. The College serves over 1200 undergraduate students and approximately 100 graduate students. The University of Wisconsin -River Falls is a member of the University of Wisconsin System and is located in scenic west central Wisconsin, 30 miles east of the Twin Cities metropolitan area, with easily accessible year around arts, cultural and recreational events.

The Computer Science and Information Systems department offers its graduates a common foundation for analysis, design and development of computer and information systems within four distinct areas of specialization or "options" in our major program.

This option has a management emphasis offering students comprehensive understanding of information systems and a strong foundation in fundamental management skills and practices. Graduates will develop skills relevant to the analysis, design and implementation of information systems.

Opportunities for professional development beyond coursework are available. The Computer Science and Information Systems department has an active local chapter of the Association of Computing Machinery (ACM) providing students generous opportunities to meet and learn from students, professional speakers and faculty representatives. The chapter is run by the students and provides a range of activities and services, including: talks by local practitioners, visits from prominent speakers, technical and career workshops, field trips to computing installations and chapter social activities.

Located within the SBE's Economics Department in North Hall, the Center is well structured to provide educators with valuable assistance. K-12 educators can participate in many different Center-sponsored and organized activities.

These activities will include workshops, in-service training, graduate courses, access to a well-stocked library of resources, training for the "The Stock Market Game.", access to SBE professors as classroom speakers and information specialists, and Internet interaction with UWRF faculty members.

The Center's activities will be conducted in a variety of different methods and locations. Some activities will be held on the UW-River Falls campus. Events will also be scheduled at locations within CESA 10 and 11. Distance education technologies will be used to reach multiple locations. The Internet will also provide opportunities for asynchronous courses, student activity pages, and informal interaction with economists.

UW-River Falls SBE faculty will offer courses at times and places convenient for you. These courses will help you develop a deeper understanding of basic economic concepts and give ideas on how to best teach these concepts. Partial tuition scholarships are available for Wisconsin teachers.

The UW-River Falls Center for Economic Education will provide economic education training workshops on a variety of topics including assistance with "The Stock Market Game." These workshops will help you include fun and effective materials and projects in your class.

Falls, is the current director of the Center for Economic Research (CER) at the College of Business & Economics (CBE). Hamid's research interest is in the area of applied economics and he actively participates in local, regional, national and international professional conferences. As the director of the CER, Hamid contributes to regional economic development conferences related to the St. Croix valley and the state of Wisconsin. The center provides a web-based outlet for faculty, staff and student research efforts. In addition, faculty, staff and students make presentations of their research in "Friday Seminar Series" sponsored by the center; these presentations are free and open to the public. For questions about the CER please contact Dr. Tabesh at the following address.

The mission of the Center for Economics Research is to assist and encourage research that supports economic development of the St Croix Valley and the mission of the College of Business and Economics and the University of Wisconsin - River Falls.

Outdoor education is an experiential method of learning by doing which takes place primarily through exposure to the out-of-doors and often outside the confines of traditional educational activities and settings.

Outdoor Education prepares students for instructional and management positions in adventure-based outdoor programs, non-profit agencies, college recreation programs, school-based programs, state and national parks, nature centers, wilderness adventure businesses, and therapeutic outdoor programs.

The completion of a BSW at UWRF requires the student to proceed through three stages of admission. The first stage involves securing admission to UWRF and declaring social work as a major. The second is applying for formal admission to the major itself. The last step is the application for admission to field placement.

The second step, applying for admission to the Social Work Program, is designed to accomplish two goals. First, it is based on the need to maintain a program of excellence in the classroom and to assure the availability of quality field experience placements by limiting the number of students admitted to the program. Second, it is intended to identify and admit to the program those students who may reasonably be expected to complete the program academically, to be accepted by agencies for field placement and to perform competently as professionals upon graduation.

All students who meet the minimum requirements for the Social Work Program are invited to apply. No student will be denied admission on the basis of race, sex, disability, age, religion, or sexual orientation. This program is committed to having a diverse student body. Students should be aware however, that meeting the minimum standards does not guarantee admission to the program. The program reserves the right to limit the number of students admitted to the program each semester. Students have the right to appeal a denial of admission to the program by following the procedures outlined in the Social Work Student Handbook.

Appropriate participation in classroom activities Ability to meet deadlines Ethical conduct Ability to maintain positive relationships with faculty and other students as well as clients and supervisors in volunteer placements Willingness and beginning ability to examine own values and biases as they relate to social work practice Ability to communicate effectively both in written and oral form Maintenance of at least one year in recovery if student has history of chemical dependency.

A student accepted into the University as a transfer student, who has been refused admission to another Social Work Program, will be asked to sign a release of information allowing the UWRF Social Work Program Director to communicate with the faculty at the previous Social Work Program. Whether the students will be accepted or not will depend upon the number of students already admitted to the program, the reason for the student not being admitted from the previous program, and the results of an interview with the Program Director.

If you are interested in pursuing an accredited BSW degree, you have come to the right place. We hope you will get the information you need from your visit to this website. If you would like information about the Social Work program, please follow this link. If you have further questions, please feel free to contact Dr. Ogden Rogers, Program Director and he will either answer your questions or connect you with someone who will. Look around and feel free to contact anyone else identified in these pages who you think might be helpful to you in making the decision about whether Social Work at UW-River Falls is the right degree program for you.

Were talking about narrative and the bodydeep, underlying and overarching concepts that draw together what we traditionally consider literature and what we traditionally consider medicine. And the field has changed both literature and medicine for the better, I believe.

Its a Thursday during business hours and Mark Lacek is wearing camouflage shorts, a black T-shirt and flip-flopsbecause he can. Work, for him, has always been about surrounding himself with the best people, not so much about following suit. This is the guy who, growing up, wanted to invent shoes with little pontoons that would allow you to walk on water; who wondered what cows thought about as they grazed; the college student who developed a pizza delivery business and thought about formingwith his roommate RonMcRonalds, to compete with McDonalds.

His business resume upon leaving River Falls, however, reads like one good move after another. After establishing WorldPerks for Northwest, he saw opportunity to expand that customer-loyalty idea into a business. His near-death experience made him determined to leave corporate life and focus on the kind of business he enjoyed doing. In 1993 he formed the Lacek Group, a consulting firm that allowed him to do exclusively what he successfully enjoyed doing for Northwest.

Aside from business, Lacek has been an adventurer, musician and athlete, climbing Mt. Rainier, playing rhythm guitar in a rock band, and big-game hunting in Africa and Australia. He says hes reached a point where his life, as his business, benefits from a clear focus.

Over the past years, he has made time to take friends and family on trips to Mexico, Alaska, and elsewhere, and that family includes the Laceks two children, Ally and Emmy, ages three and five respectively.

The five Mary Ella Jerome Family Foundation scholarships honor talented women who attended UWRF. In addition, Mary Ella pays tribute to her father, who was a leader in the agricultural industry as well as the community, region and beyond. He received the 1975 Distinguished Agriculturalist Award from UWRF and many industry and national accolades. The Wallace Henry Jerome Agricultural Scholarship is made to a student majoring in agriculture.

He's headed up three National Institute of Health grants, worth more than $10 million, that have led to advancements in the early detection, understanding and treatment of cancers and lung disease. Steve has guided a technological revolution in digital imaging that has vastly improved diagnostic capabilities.

He has recently been tapped to head up a quality and safety initiative for the nationwide network of Mayo-owned institutions. The project is designed to make Mayo the world's first high-reliability health care institution, completely eliminating needless injuries and deaths caused by human error.

Incredible advancements are taking place in digital imaging, with significant implications for diagnosis and treatment of disease. Dr. Swensen will present on the state of medical imaging today and forecast future developments (magnets to molecules). In addition, he will address medical quality and safety opportunities (the moon).

In eighth grade, Steve Swensen remembers writing a letter to the University of Wisconsin-Madison inquiring about admission to medical school. It wasnt a whim. The bright adolescent became the focused collegian, the driven medical student, the hard-working resident, the accomplished doctor, the groundbreaking researcher, and the respected leader in his field. His passion for learning, helping and healing has never wavered.

For his stellar accomplishments as a teacher, researcher and caregiver; for his insightful leadership at one of the nations premier medical institutions; and for his dedicated pursuit of new knowledge to detect and cure life-threatening disease, Dr. Stephen Swensen has been named the 2005 University of Wisconsin-River Falls Distinguished Alumnus.

Uncle Glen put Steves father, Richard, on to a teaching job at the college in River Falls. So the Swensen familythen composed of Richard, wife Grace, and son Davidsettled into a rented house where May Hall now stands. Steve was born in fall 1955, followed by another brother and three sisters. Originally, the plan had been to stay a year or two; but that short-term commitment to the college soon became a lifelong devotion to the campus and community.

The family built a home on the edge of town and Richard steadily advanced in his career, eventually becoming Dean of the College of Arts and Sciences. Steve and his five siblings attended Campus School, a laboratory grade school led by college faculty and student teachers. Steve remembers classes in North Hall before the Ames building was constructed, and how his bold brother David would waltz into President Kleinpells office unannounced and often come away with a candy bar or two.

It really does take a village, says Steve. The people who taught us from kindergarten through grade school to freshman chemistry [at the college] were all part of the community that raised the Swensen kids. And more than anything else it was the UW-RF faculty and student teachers who spent a huge amount of time with us.

Even more momentous was freshman calculus. During that first quarter, Steve figures he spent more time looking at the blond in the second row than he spent scanning the blackboard. But that paid off as well. Steve married Lynn during their senior year at UW-River Falls. Twenty-one years into their marriage they adopted two infants from South Korea and have spent the past seven years discovering the joys and challenges of parenthood.

Following college, Steve spent four years in medical school at UW-Madison; completed his four-year radiology residency at Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn.; and then furthered his knowledge of chest diseases with a year-long stint at Harvard. After that, he returned to Mayo where he has been ever since.

At Mayo, hes assumed a variety of roles over the yearsclinical radiologist, researcher, teacher and administrator. Eight years ago he became chair of the radiology department, managing a $400 million budget and overseeing 1,200 employees, including 152 physician-radiologists. Hes headed up three National Institute of Health grants worth more than $10 million, designed to increase the ability to detect lung cancer in its early stages. Steve has guided a technological revolution in digital imaging that has vastly improved diagnostic and treatment capabilities. As a leader in the highest of high tech fields, hes come a long way since that slide rule vote in freshman chemistry.

During good weatherbetween the equinoxeshe will run or bike the ten or so miles from home to work. Once there, he will change into suits and ties stored in the locker room and tackle the days meetings, presentations and consultations. He responds to his 100-plus e-mails each day while walking on a treadmill, because, he says, research shows that standing up and moving improves thinking and decision-making. Hes devoted to Mayo Clinic and its mission.

Roxanne Emmerich overcame all odds. Coming from poverty to being listed by Sales and Marketing magazine as one of the 12 most-requested speakers in the country today. With a $20 contribution from her family to go to college, she now owns and/or runs four businesses doing millions in sales. Join this author, speaker, nationally-recognized entrepreneur, and River Falls graduate to discover how to turn a world of challenges into a world of possibilities.

Emmerich is familiar with the struggle most students face when beginning their careers. Starting out with nothing, she began her career in banking, building on what she learned to found her own banking company with a partner in 1997. Today her banking company, North American Banking Company in St. Paul, is an $80-million bank holding company.

In 1988 she founded The Emmerich Group, Inc., working as a business strategist and consultant to present speeches and develop audio and video training systems for hundreds of clients. She has produced 24 video training programs.

She has also published more than 500 articles and five books on topics ranging from technology to financial services. Two more books will be published this spring. She has twice been voted Entrepreneur of the Year.

Emmerich rejects much of what she learned in business school. She says banks dont know how to talk to their customers--how to ask the right questions, give the right answers and follow through. They need to create their own sales system and that is what she can help them with.

Her other activities include a position as chair of the Certified Speaking Professional Council, the highest certification in the speaking profession. She is past state president of the American Society for Training and Development, and director of the YWCA Foundation.

Emmerich is the founder of a youth scholarship program for underprivileged college freshmen, and a board member of Youth Horizon. She has also served as host mother to three high school foreign exchange students since 1998.

As an undergraduate student at UW-RF, Emmerich was voted outstanding senior by the faculty in the College of Agriculture. She graduated with high honors and received the prestigious Chancellors Award.

Many colleges and universities across the nation have had a long tradition of honoring those of its graduates who have distinguished themselves in various ways throughout their careers. The University of Wisconsin-River Falls Distinguished Alumnus Award was established in 1959. The first recipient was Dean Smith, a physician from La Crosse, WI. It was presented at commencement ceremonies in June 1959.

Once an individual has been nominated for this award, they remain in contention, basically forever. Each year nominations are sought by the External Relations Committee from alumni, and from faculty and staff who may know of a deserving alumnus. Alumni are encouraged to nominate anyone they feel meets the criteria for selection, even themselves.

Rain and a Good Harvest. Taken during a National Geographic Society Expedition, this photo has graced the pages of the magazine. The Dragon Boat Festival of the Miao people in southeastern Guizhou Province is to induce optimum wind and rain in anticipation of a good harvest. Men wearing horse-hair broad hats stand ceremoniously while paddling with oars. A boy impersonating a young girl with silver headdress, neck adornment and costume hits a gong to regiment uniformity. Fireworks are periodically set off by a man at the bow of the boat.

Asses in Wilderness. At an elevation of over 4,500 meters in the wilderness of western Tibet, Tibetan Wild Asses display their ability to sprint up to 50 km/hr, an impressive speed in such rarefied air.

Path to Enlightenment. Hua Shan is one of the five most celebrated mountains of China. Situated in Shenxi Province, it boasts some of the most difficult and precipitous trails leading to several Taoist temples in the mountain.

President of the China Exploration and Research Society, former photojournalist and expedition leader with the National Geographic Society His boundless curiosity has taken him to the most remote regions of China where, for 30 years, he has photographed the diverse people and endangered species of that nation's compelling environments. His commitment has led to ongoing work to document and conserve the rich heritage of these fragile societies.

For the extraordinary artistry of his work, for the pathbreaking success of his discoveries, and for the international awareness he has brought to his exploration activities, Wong How Man has been named the 2002 Distinguished Alumnus at the University of Wisconsin-River Falls.

The journey from UW-River Falls student to "China's most accomplished living explorer" (TIME magazine) is a remarkable story, reflecting one man's personal philosophy that "solving a worthwhile problem soothes the heart; using an innovative approach is where the fun and challenge come in."

It was chance that brought Wong How Man to River Falls from Hong Kong in 1969. Having been accepted at three schools, he chose this university because the name conjured up images of a wonderful waterfall beside which he could live and study. While disappointed by the falls, the rest of the River Falls experience was rewarding.

"Turns out to be one of the best choices of my life," he concludes. "My training under those two curricula [he double-majored in journalism and art] provided me with an inquisitive and artistic mind. Today, that training, and the human sensitivity I learned from River Falls, have brought me from journalistic and artistic work to conservation projects with both nature and culture in remote China."

As a student, Wong served two years as president of the International Students Organization, acted in such school plays as "Three Penny Opera" and "Land of the Dragon," and worked in the audio visual department. He also fished in the Kinnickinnic; survived and "learned to love" Wisconsin winters; discovered American football, rodeo and the joys of horseback riding in the fall; and began "drinking milk like water" at Rodli Commons.

Following college, Wong returned to China to take up duties as a free-lance photographer and journalist. Beginning in 1979 his assignments led to exploration of remote China and its minority ethnic populations. Then, from 1982 to 1986, he led six expeditions for the National Geographic Society, one of which studied the Yangtze River from mouth to source, discovering a new source for the river in 1985.

Although exploration satisfied Wong's thirst for knowledge and adventure, he soon found himself charting a more challenging path toward conservation. In a recent Time magazine article that named him a "Hero of Asia," he explained the transition. "Everywhere I went I encountered people and customs that I knew were going to vanish almost as soon as I'd photographed them. I realized that to be an explorer in today's world you can't escape becoming a conservationist."

So, in 1986, Wong founded the China Exploration and Research Society (CERS), a nonprofit organization with a clear mission: to explore remote regions of China, conduct multidisciplinary research, implement nature and culture conservation projects, and disseminate results through education and popular channels.

Wong, innovative ways used to conduct projects can produce the most impressive results. Case in point is a restoration project at a Tibetan nunnery. "The financial investment to cover labor and building materials was relatively insignificant," he relates, "but by hiring local villagers to work hand-in-hand with the nuns, we created an exciting dynamic. For a long time, there had been tension in the community between the nuns and the villagers. Bringing them together to work on the restoration project made them close friends.

His work is regularly featured on international television on such networks as CNN, ABC, CNBC, the Discovery Channel and others. Often hailed as a latter day Marco Polo, Wong How Man has redefined the role of an international explorer for those who would follow in his footsteps. His quest takes him beyond mere discovery to ensure that the world he encounters remains for others to discover as well. In his own words: "As an explorer, I aim to instill the spirit of exploration into new geographic discoveries.

He was an assistant coach with the club team for two years prior to the team reaching varsity status. He is a coach and evaluator for the Wisconsin Amateur Hockey Association. He is also a coach and scout for the Girls Metro STP program in the Twin Cities. He is majoring in health and human performance with coaching and health minors.

Wallace, who earllier this year was named to the first All-NCHA team, was one of two defensemen named to the first team. She finished second in scoring for the Falcons with seven goals and 20 points. She led the Falcons with six power-play goals and she had one game-winner.

Paulson finished third on the team in scoring with 19 points and she led the Falcons in goals with 13. She scored one power-play goal, two short-handed goals and one game-winner. Paulson was named to the first All-NCHA team in 2004. Wallace finished second on the team in scoring with seven goals and 20 points. She led the Falcons with six power-play goals and she had one game-winner.

Jenny Kern played in every game for the Falcons in 2004 and will be a key player on the blue line this year. She is in her final year of competition after plaing at MSU-Mankato. She played 59 games over two seasons with the Mavs. She sees the ice very well and will add important pieces to the Falcon defensive corps. She played high school hockey at Park Center and earned All-State honors one year. She earned All-State honorable mention two other years. She helped her team win the 2000 Minnesota State Championship. Kern also played on the Minnesota Selects four years. She is the daughter of Brian and Diane and has one sister. She is majoring in health & human performance.

She finished with 24 goals and 46 points in 2002. She also competed with the Minnesota Selects. She was named to the second All-Area team and holds school records for season and career points. She is the daughter of Bob and Laurie and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in business.

Molly Buehner played in every game for the Falcons at forward in 2004 and will be a solid player in the lineup this winter. In 2003 she played with the Cedar Falls High School boys team. She also played in the Chicago Showcase. She has a solid all-around game, but especially plays well in the defensive zone. Buehner showcases her skills with her play on the penalty kill. She is an outstanding student and was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll in 2004. She is the daughter of Jim and Catherine and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in accounting.

In 2004 she finished with nine assists and played in every game. She has great stick handling skills. Her size and work ethic will make her a valuable player to the Falcons. Nierenhausen was named to her all-conference team, the Minnesota Selects and the Junior Stars. She played at North St. Paul, Minn., High School. She is the daughter of Mark and Ev and has one brother.

Jenny Wallace was a regular in the Falcon lineup in 2004 playing in 26 games. She had one goal and one assist for two points. She scored her goal in an 8-1 win over Eau Claire in the NCHA Tournament. She adds great stick handling and ice vision to the Falcon blue line unit. She played high school hockey at Buffalo, Minn., and made the all-conference team for three years. Wallace also played for the Minnesota Selects for seven years, yet she says the highlight of her career is winning the conference championship three consecutive years. She is the daughter of Richard and Nancy and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in business management.

During her senior year at Shattuck-St.Mary's, Minn., Prep School, she had eight points with one goal and seven assists. She helped her team win the State AAA Tournament to advance to Nationals. She is the daughter of Dane and Donna and has one brother and one sister. She is undecided on a major field of study.

Ranae Bergh joins the Falcons as a first year player and is an important addition to the Falcon blue line corps. She played the past two years at Shattuck-St. Mary's and helped the team to the National Tournament in 2003 and 2004. She is the daughter of Randy and Carol and has three sisters. She is majoring in animal science.

Worker award all four years of her high school career. She was named to the all-conference team twice. During her senior year she had 16 points with eight goals and eight assists. She participated in the Junior Fest and the Senior Classic. She is the daughter of Mike and Deb and she has one brother and one sister. She is undecided on a major field of study.

Mandi Mohwinkel, a freshman out of White Bear Lake, Minn., High School, will join the Falcons as a goalkeeper. During her senior year she was named to the all-conference team. She was also named to the All-State academic team. She also helped her team to a second place finish in the 2002 Minnesota State Tournament. She is the daughter of Neal and Barb and has two brothers.

Jenna Scanlon joins the Falcons from Apple Valley, Minn., High School where she was the team captain her senior year. In 2003 she scored 39 points with 21 goals and 18 assists. She helped take her team to a third place finish in the Minnesota State Tournament. She was named to the All-State and all-conference teams. She was also named her team's Most Valuable Player. Scanlon also played in the Chicago Showcase, was a part of the Minnesota Selects, played in the Junior Fest and the Senior Classic. She is the daughter of Charlie and Barb and she has three brothers. Brother Andy is a goalie for the UWRF men's hockey team. Scanlon is undecided on a major field of study.

The following games are listed with the most recently played games first.  Only games that have been completed are shown.  The line score for each game is shown, followed by a list of reports that are available on-line.

But the Falcons bounced back to tie the game at 17:00 when Amy Bruggeman scored her fifth goal of the season with assists to Buehner and Jenny Wallace. That set up Scanlon's game-winner in overtime. Kristen Hurley assisted on the final goal.

Saturday and Sunday at UW-Stevens Point. The Falcons will play UW-Superior in one semifinal game that is scheduled to start at 7 p.m. The third place game is set for 2 p.m. followed by the championship game at 5 p.m. on Sunday.

During the second period, Baron scored an unassisted goal at 3:12. It was her seventh goal of the season. Later in the period the Falcons got a scare when goalie Amber Linder lost her stick. It was a mad dash to get the puck, but the Falcons played tough and were able to clear the puck without any damage.

Lou Paulson came out aggressively and got the scoring started just 19 seconds into the first period. She was helped with assists from Leah Baron and Jenny Wallace. At 14:35 Kelly Hurley scored with some help from Kelly Jensen and 20 seconds later Paulson put in her second goal with Wallace there for the assist.

Baron scored a power-play goal at 4:23 of the third period with an assist to Lindsay O'Keefe. It was Baron's fifth goal of the season and her first game winning goal of the year. The Falcons scored just 21 seconds after UWS was called for a minor penalty. Lindner picked up her first shutout of the season and improved her record to 4-3-0. Lindner made nine saves in the first period, 17 in the second and 12 in the third.

Overall, Middlebury outshot the Falcons 42-21, but Coach Joe Cranston believes his team played well against their tough competitors. "We played really well and didn't worry about the scoreboard. It was our best team effort."

Overall the Falcons were 2 for 6 on power plays and they did an excellent job keeping the other team from scoring on their power play opportunities, leaving the Eagles 0 for 4. Coach Joe Cranston commented that, "Our power plays look good and our penalty kills are good, but when its 5 on 5 we were sloppy." The Falcons The Falcons had 40 shots on goal while the Eagles only managed 19. It was Amber Linder who defended the goal all 60 minutes and blocked those 19 shots.

Scoring came late in the game and it was Jenny Wallace who scored the first goal for the Falcons when she capitalized on a power play at 13:40 of the second period. She recieved assists from Lindsey O'Keefe and Lou Paulson. Paulson had the next goal of the night at 3:40 of the third period.

O'Keefe was there to give her second assist for the night. The finale goal of the night was scored on a power play by Leah Baron at 8:25 of the the third peroid, with assists from Jenna Scanlon and Kelly Hurley.

The third period started out strong for the Falcons when Lindsay O'Keefe scored on an unassisted power play to make a goal 57 seconds into the beginning of the period. Paulson went solo to make her second goal for the night at 9:58 and O'Keefe finished up the scoring for the Falcons by making her second goal for the night at 12:46 with an assist from Renae Bergh. Finlandia managed to get one goal in before the buzzer at 19:05.

The Falcons finally found their way to the net when Lou Paulson scored with an assists to Jenna Scanlon on a power play at 7:50 in the second period. The third period would see no scoring action from either side and the game ended 2-1. Marlene Yaeger defended the goal all 60 minutes and made 27 saves for the night.

The first period saw little shooting opportunities for the Falcons when the Yellowjackets out shot them 14-5. The Falcons found their shooting rhythm the next period, however, when they out shot their opponents 9-8, but both would battle out the third when they each ended up with 6.

The game remained scoreless after the first period, but the Falcons had trouble finding open shots. During the first period, Gustavus outshot the Falcons 22-4 and it did not improve much after that when by the end of the game they were only able to find 10 opportunities to their opponents 44.

Cranston commented. The sixth ranked Gustavus improved their record giving them their first victory and improving their record to 1-0-1, while the Falcons suffered their first defeat giving them a record of 3-1-0.

It was all Falcons after that as they silenced the Royals with three more goals. Kelly Jensen came in right away to score 1:58 into the first period with an assist from Kacie Anderson. Jenny Wallace had her first goal for the night when she scored on a power play at 8:53 with Paulson giving her 2nd assist for the night. Jenny Kern had the final goal for the Falcons at 15:35 with some help from Wallace to finish the game 8-1.

The Falcons women hockey team's first home game was also their first shut out as they beat the St. Benedict Blazers, 7-0. They played consistant all the way through scoring three goals in the first period, three goals in the second, and one goal in the third.

Freshman Kelly Jensen started the team off early, scoring the first two goals. "We got the jitters out from the game before and were able to dominate this game." Coach Joe Cranston commented afterwards.

Goalie Marlene Yaeger had her 11th career shutout and even contributed to the scoring by giving an assist to Renae Bergh who scored the team's fifth goal at 5:30 of the second period. Yaeger made 13 saves in the game.

This team is proving to be a threat from every position on the ice. Defense is able to keep the puck down on the other end of the ice, while the offense is having little trouble finding open shots. The Falcons out shot the Blazers 51-13 and had similar results last night when they outshot St.

"I think last year we lacked a little depth, and I think this recruiting class will give us the depth that we need," said Falcon Coach Joe Cranston. "Last year we had to depend on freshmen to step in and contribute right away. Next year will be our best core of returning players that we have ever had. I think this recruiting class will help with our overall team speed too. It will be tough to replace Lindsy Carlson and Jodi Hensch, our two all time leading scorers, but with so many more experienced players coming back, and a good recruiting class, I think next year will be a good one."

The Falcons are raising money to host a six team tournament this season, and are planning a trip out East next season. The team is taking $150 donations from people and businesses to sponsor us, and in return they receive a beautiful Sponsor Plaque. If you would like to donate please contact Joe Cranston at 715-425-2835.

Kern started playing hockey when she was 13 years old and has been hard at it ever since. Both her parents, Brian and Diane, are athletic and encouraged her to compete in sports. She played for Park Center, Minn., High School and earned All-State honors. She also played on the Minnesota Selects for four years.

She started playing hockey when she was 11 years old, in her home town of Roseville, Minn., where her dad, Tom, coached her for her first two years of competitive play. Her brother was also a hockey player.

She ended up being a stand out for the hockey team and during her senior year she finished with 44 points and was named to the second All-Area team. She also made the Duluth News-Tribune as a Prep Newsmaker. She set a school record for assists and also played with the Minnesota Selects in 2001.

She started playing for the Falcons during her freshman year and has been a major factor ever since. Her previous work as a figure skater has helped her pull away from her opponents and to get to the open ice. Last year she played in every game, helping her team by scoring nine goals and 16 points.

Besides working hard on the ice and on the court she also is a strong worker in the classroom. In 2004 she was named to the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. The junior is majoring in health & human performance.

Baron, as an upperclassman feels like a leader on the rink and pushes her teammates to work hard. She has learned what it takes to be successful at the collegiate level. She believes the number one thing athletes need to be able to do once they get to the college level is to, "really be coachable and listen to everything the coach has to tell you."

Before games, Paulson likes to get focused by listening to music and visualizing game situations. Her technique is definitely working; Paulson is consistently contributing to the scoreboard and working her butt off on defense.

The Falcon game against Augsburg on Nov. 23 showed the type of skills and talents Paulson brings to the ice. Paulson scored her most impressive goal of the season when she scored an unassisted goal with two Falcons in the penalty box.

Coming into games on Jan. 14-15, Paulson is tied for second in scoring for the Falcons. She has played in every game and has six goals and five assists for 11 points. She is tied for the team lead in goals and assists.

Their ability to 'sense' one another on the ice has made them an unbeatable force both on offense and defense. They have been playing on the same team for almost 12 years and that has developed into some strong chemistry between the women.

Injuries have upset the Hurley sisters this year with Kristen missing the first 15 games due to knee surgery during the summer and Kelly had to sit out three games due to a hip injury. But both look to be back at 100 per cent now. Kristen played in her first full game last Friday and Cranston said, " she played great; she came back and played through the pain."

Luckily, they have an uncle, Billy, who played prep and college hockey and even practiced with some NHL teams. His influence, along with receiving hockey sticks as Christmas presents, got the two girls interested enough to join a hockey clinic in Memphis. And they haven't stopped playing since.

Kristen knew they could get out of the streak. She is really excited to back on the ice after her knee surgery and her first game was at home against Superior. Kelly also thinks the team could be doing better. "I am not really disappointed, but I know we have not reached our potential."

Kelly thinks this year could be a rebuilding one. "I kind of figured we wouldn't be as successful as we were last season because we lost some big names who really helped us out and we brought in so many freshmen."

Kristen knows how frustrating a sport can be, especially if you are stuck on the sidelines with an injury, but she knows that, "If you love it then do it. It can be frustrating but remember to always have fun."

Emily Nierenhausen has returned for her second year on the defensive line for the Falcons. She is one of the few remaining defenseman and during her 2004 season she finished with 9 assists and played in every single game. Her stats are filled with accomplishments such as being named to the All-Conference Team and being a member of the Minnesota Selects and the Junior Stars.

During her first year with the Falcons, Wallace's defensive nature was to play tight to the net, but this year she has found her way to making a big offensive impact. Coach Joe Cranston commented that, "this year she (Wallace) is our most offensive defenseman."

This year Wallace is responsible for six goals and 12 assists and has been on the ice for every game so far this season. Even with all of her successes, Cranston said this has been a learning year for Wallace.

This season is definitely different from what Wallace had expected. "It was frustrating to go from doing so well to an eight game losing streak, but I think it helped bring the team together because we all had gone through the same thing and had the same frustrations."

That bond is what Wallace believes will be a big strength for her team going into the playoffs. "We are really fired up! We want to show that we are not an eight game losing streak type of team and feel we have something to prove."

Wallace is worried, however, that because hockey is a five month long season that some of her teammates may begin to lose their focus, "It's the end of the season and some get tired and start to wear and tear, we really need to stay focused."

Family has been a big influence in Wallace's hockey career. She started playing when she moved to Buffalo, Minn., High School and started watching her older brother compete. "My friends and I would always watch my brother play and we would cheer him on. It was also a way for me to meet people."

She led the team with 25 assists. She scored three game-winning and three power-play goals. She also led the NCHA in scoring in 2004. Hensch was named to the first team for the second straight year. She was fifth with the Falcons in scoring with six goals and 14 assists for 20 points. She scored four power-play goals and one game-winner. Carlson and Hensch formed two of the top defensive pairings in NCHA history.

Nicole Magnuson was a first year player for the Falcons after transferring from MSU-Mankato. She finished second in scoring for the Falcons with 16 goals and 17 assists for 33 points. The 16 goals led the Falcons. She scored one power-play goal and two game-winners. She finished fourth in the NCHA in scoring. Paulson had a second strong season for the Falcons.

Rachel Goodwin had her best season as a Falcon last year. She finished with three goals and five points while cutting her penalty minutes in half. She showed her smarts by being named to both the NCHA All-Academic team and the WIAC Scholastic Honor Roll. This year look for her to fill in as a defensive forward and working the penalty kill. In 2002-03, she had four assists. She scored seven goals and 15 assists as a senior at Duluth East High School and helped the team to two state tournament berths. She also played with the Minnesota Selects team and was an assistant captain. She is the daughter of Chuck and Marion and has two brothers. She is majoring in pre-pharmacy.

Kern is a first-year Falcon after transferring from MSU-Mankato where she played 59 games over two seasons. She sees the ice very well and will be a good addition to the team. She played high school hockey at Park Center High School and earned All-State honors one year. She earned All-State honorable mention two other years. Kern also played on the Minnesota Selects four years. She is the daughter of Brian and Diane and has one sister.

Nicole Magnuson joins the Falcons as a defenseman after playing the past two seasons at MSU-Mankato. In 61 games she scored three goals and eight assists at Mankato. At Chisago Lakes High School she was named to the Minnesota All-State second team and was given honorable mention to the team another season. She was her team's MVP and was a finalist for the Ms. Hockey award. Magnuson competed with the Minnesota Selects team and was named to the all-conference team. She is the daughter of Allen and Kim and has one brother and one sister. Her brother, Josh, played hockey for the Falcons from 2001-03. She is majoring in health & human performance.

She was named to the second All-Area team and holds school records for season and career points. She is the daughter of Bob and Laurie and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in health & human performance.

She also played in the Chicago Showcase. Look for Buehner to contribute as a defensive-minded forward. She will probably see considerable playing time during penalty kills. She is the daughter of Jim and Catherine and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in accounting.

Amy Gilbertson is a first-year Falcon who has shown strong offensive skills in the preseason. Last year she served as captain of the traditionally successful Farmington High School team. She received All-State honorable mention three years and holds the Farmington points record. She is the daughter of Doug and Tammy and has three brothers.

The highlight of her high school career was scoring an overtime game winner in the sectional finals her junior year. She is the daughter of Ken and Tracie and has one brother and one sister. Her twin sister, Kristen, also plays for the Falcons. She is majoring in biology.

Allison Schaber begins her freshman year with the Falcons. She shows tremendous skills as a defensive forward with good speed and toughness in the corners. Last year she played for the St. Paul Blades. She made all-conference five years and led her team to one conference championship. Schaber played six years on the Minnesota Selects and five years with the Junior Stars. She is the daughter of Tom and Patty and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in sociology.

Freshman Jenny Wallace adds great stickhandling and ice vision to the Falcon blue line unit. She played high school hockey at Buffalo, Minn., and made all-conference three years. Wallace also played for the Minnesota Selects for seven years, yet she says the highlight of her career is winning the conference championship three consecutive years. She is the daughter of Richard and Nancy and has one brother and one sister. She is majoring in business management.

Magnuson scored again off a slap shot with just three seconds left in the first. Carlson got her second assist of the game on the play. In the second period, Lindsay O'Keefe tallied another Falcon goal at 5:16, with another assist going to Carlson. Carlson put the fifth Falcon goal in the net at 9:34 with assists going to Leah Baron and O'Keefe. Lake Forest put their only goal past Falcon freshman goalie Amber Lindner.

The backbone of every hockey team is goaltending and the Falcons have a talented duo at that key position. Marlene Yaeger is the returning starter and she had a banner filled season last year. She was named a JOFA All-American West first team All-American. That came after she was named to the first All-NCHA team for the second straight year and was named the Co-Player of the Year in the NCHA. She finished with an 18-6-4 record with a 1.60 goals against average and a .930 saves percentage. She finished fourth in the nation in saves percentage and 10th in goals against average. She was the highest ranked player in both categories in the West region. Amber Lindner gives the Falcons another talented player in goal. She prepped at Moorhead, Minn., High School.

"Yaeger looks very good right now, and she is always up for the Point games," Falcon Coach Joe Cranston said. "Lindner has been injured, but is starting to come around. I think our two goalies play very different styles and will compliment each other."

All-American West first team for the second straight season. Carlson had eight goals and 18 points last year while Hensch finished with six goals and 18 points. Carlson's six power-play goals led the team and she was the top power play goal scorer among defensemen in the nation.

Cranston, who was named the NCHA Coach of the Year in 2003. "In the past we have been a very tough team defensively. This year we are trying to be a good defensive team, but at the same time we are going to try to create a little more offense than we have in the past. Another strength is that we have a lot of good shooters. Last year we only had about five good shooters, and this year we probably have 13."

O'Keefe. Paulson was second in scoring last year with 10 goals and 24 points and O'Keefe was third with 11 goals and 21 points. Leah Baron also returns after scoring five goals and 15 points. Rachel Goodwin, who played defense for the Falcons each of the past three seasons, will be moved up front this year. She finished with three goals and five points from the blue line last year. Injuries, graduation and players not returning account for 51 of the team's 94 goals not back this year.

"I don't think it is going to be a two team race this year," said Cranston. "I think that any team can beat any other team on any given day. Eau Claire and Superior have two very good recruiting classes coming in, and Point and Lake Forest will be much improved. As a league, I think we will be much stronger this season."

She scored two of the team's three goals. In Friday's game, she scored the team's first goal with the Falcons on the power play. Saturday she scored the team's only goal in a 1-1 overtime tie. She got the goal midway through the second period to tie the game. It was her seventh goal of the season. "Lou did an awesome job on our penalty kill also,"

He is the winningest coach in UW-River Falls hockey history and that was accomplished in just six seasons. He became the winningest coach in the shortest period of time than any other UWRF hockey coach.

Freeman was the No. 1 assistant for seven years and has always played a key role in the team's great success. His recruiting and leadership over the years have made the Falcons a powerhouse in Div. III hockey.

League. He served as head coach at St. Mary's Springs High School where his team won a State championship. He also had great success at Stevens Point High School where his teams made several state tournament appearances.

Feb. 9, 2004. He has been named the team's Player of the Week four times in his career. He is one of the team's captains this season. He is currently fourth on the team in scoring with 10 goals and 23 points. He is the team's top scoring defenseman. He has scored six power-play and two game-winning goals. A versatile athlete, he played forward for the Falcons in previous seasons but was moved to defense this year. Sikich has played in 79 career games and scored 25 goals and has 60 points. He has scored nine power-play goals and five game-winning goals. He was a member of the Falcon teams that played in the 2003 and 2004 NCAA Div. III National Tournament.

Marc-Andre Lalande returns for his final season with the Falcons and will be one of the top players in the NCHA. He is the lone returning Falcon who was named to the first All-NCHA team in 2004 when he scored two goals and had five assists for seven points. The talented defenseman was also named to the first All-WIAC team. He was named the team's Player of the Week on Dec. 8. He is a very disciplined player with great defensive skills.

Garrett Larson is a rangy, strong, all-around player with valuable playing experience. Larson transferred to UWRF from St. Cloud State where he was voted the team's Most Improved Player in 2002 and 2003. Larson scored nine goals and dished out four assists last year for the Huskies. He is the son of Dayton Larson and Audrey Blair and has one brother. Larson is majoring in mass communications.

Steve Moe brings a wealth of experience and talent to the Falcons for the 2004-05 season. In 2004 he was named the team's Most Improved Player when he finished with nine goals and seven assists for 16 points. He had one short-handed goal and two game-winners. He more than doubled his point totals from his first two years in 2004. Moe earned honorable mention to the 2004 All-WIAC team. In 2003 he scored three goals and got six assists in 19 games. Moe saw plenty of playing time in his rookie season. His two goals were both game winners, and he added four assists. Moe came to the Falcons after a 2001 season at Great Falls in the AWHL where he scored 22 goals and had 38 assists. He helped Great Falls win the league championship and league playoff title. He was named to the league s All-Star team. At Coon Rapids, Minn., High School he received honorable mention to the all-conference team. He is the son of Mary and Steve and has three brothers and two sisters. Moe is majoring in business administration.

Josh Schlipp will be looked upon as one of the team's top returning goal scorers for the 2004-05 season. He played in every game for the Falcons last year and scored 11 goals and finished with 19 points. He had three power-play and two short-handed goals. He tied for the team lead in short-handed goals. He has scored in double digits in goals in each of his three previous seasons. Schlipp earned All-WIAC honorable mention honors and was named the team's Player of the Week on Jan. 26. He needs just six goals to reach the 50 career goal plateau. He has 78 career points and has a great chance of reaching the 100 career points mark. In 2003 he repeated as the Falcons top scorer with 16 goals and he had 14 assists. Schlipp earned All-WIAC honorable mention honors and was twice named Falcon Player of the Week.

He led the team and ranked fourth in the conference with 17 goals. Schlipp scored two goals in his first collegiate game and had two other two-goal contests - one of which earned him UWRF Player of the Week honors on Dec.

Grant Van Wyngeeren returns to the Falcons after competing with the team in the 2001-02 season. He is a tall, rangy goalie who gives the Falcons another talented player in the important goalie position. He helped Brainerd, Minn., High School to a conference title. He is the son of Dutch and Marsha and has one sister. Van Wyngeeren is majoring in business management.

Mary's. Degerness will certainly break the career 50 point mark - he enters the season with 49 points. He plays a gritty two-way game with fine talents in both ends of the rink. In 2003 he netted 11 goals and assisted on 17.

He received honorable mention to the All-Metro team in 2000 and was twice named to the all-conference team. He is the son of Tim and Mary and has two brothers and one sister. He is majoring in history.

Meneghin had a .897 save percentage and a 3.6 goals against average in his final year with the Salsa. He went to high school at Holy Cross. He is the son of Emilio and Eva and has three brothers. Meneghin is majoring in accounting.

Andy Jurek had a great rookie year for the Falcons in 2004 and will be a mainstay on the blue line in 2005. He played in every game in 2004 and finished the season with six assists. He played in all types of situations and his physical play was a key to the team's success. He has very good puck handling skills. Jurek netted 14 goals and dished out 28 assists in 2003 and was the second-highest scorer among defensemen in the AWHL.

Tyler Kostiuk is one of the top playmakers in small college hockey and showed those skills with the Falcons in 2004. He showed his offensive flair in every game and provided the Falcons with offensive spark throughout the year. Kostiuk scored six goals and had eight assists for 14 points.

He has a talent for moving the puck up ice and has the ability to find the open player and get him the puck. He sees the ice very well. Kostiuk led the AWHL in assists with 61 in 2003. He also netted 19 goals. He is the son of Ken and Toni and has two brothers and one sister. Kostiuk is majoring in marketing communications.

Cory Lennartson was a key player for the Falcons and showed his talents throughout the 2004 season. He played some important minutes for the Falcons in crucial situations. He played in 28 of the team's games and finished with one goal and four assists for five points. He scored his first collegiate goal in his first game on Oct. 31 at MSOE. He demonstrated gritty, two-way play and gave the Falcons a physical presence in all areas of the rink.

Even though he's one of the biggest players on the team, he has a great touch with the puck. Sailer used his size and skills to become a regular in the Falcon lineup. He scored four goals and had two assists for six points. He scored his first collegiate goal in his first game and scored one game winner - it came in a 3-2 win over St. Scholastica. He led the AWHL with 46 goals in 2003. He also registered 36 assists. He was a first-team All-Star and earned team Co-MVP honors. Sailer is the son of Bill and Val. Sailer is majoring in accounting.

Joe Tiberio gave the Falcons a solid first year and will use that experience to play an even bigger role in 2005. Through hard work he played more and more as the 2004 season progressed. He gives the Falcons a some needed physical play. He finished with two goals - both game winners - and two assists. He scored a goal in his first collegiate game and it was a game winner in a 5-0 win at MSOE. He came back about two weeks later to score his second game winner in a 5-1 win over St. Thomas. In 2003 Tiberio netted 19 goals and dished out 11 helpers to go along with his 142 penalty minutes while playing at Bismarck in the AWHL. He is the son of Joe and Barb and has one brother. Tiberio is majoring in business administration.

West Division. He was also voted the team's Most Valuable Player, the playoff Most Valuable Player and he received the Matt Plauzak Award, given to the player who best represents the team on and off the ice. Those awards were all voted on by his teammates. He is the son of Mike and Kris and has one sister. Adams is majoring in elementary education.

National Championship last year playing with Texas of the NAHL, where he scored 29 goals and recorded 36 assists. He is the son of Craig and Sue and has one brother. Cooper is undecided on a major field of study.

Rob Dubel gives the Falcons a stay at home defenseman who will give them steady play and good size. At Maple Grove, Minn., High School, Dubel was earned honorable mention to the All-State team. He was named the team's defensive Most Valuable Player. Dubel played for Sioux Falls of the USHL last year and dished out 23 assists. He lists that playing in his first junior game was the biggest thrill of his hockey career. He is the son of Jim and Mary and has two brothers and one sister. Dubel is undecided on a major field of study.

He attended Michigan Tech last year, but transferred to UWRF to be a part of a winning program. Georgell played junior hockey in Fairbanks of the NAHL and played his high school hockey at West Valley High in Fairbanks, Alaska. He was twice named his junior team's best defenseman. He is the son of Gary and Nancy and has two brothers. Georgell is majoring in health and human performance.

Wade Harstad comes to the Falcons as a big, fast, physical forward who will help the team on both ends of the ice. He attended Moorhead, Minn., High School where he was named to the all-conference team. He helped lead the team to a second place finish in the Miinnesota State Tournament.

Tony Sikich (Sr., Apple Valley, Minn.) who made the move from forward to defense in the off season, showed that he can still make a difference offensively, scoring two goals and dishing out two assists in the Falcons 5-2 victories over Eau Claire and Stevens Point last weekend.

He scored two goals, including the game winner, against Eau Claire and he assisted on the first two Falcon goals against Stevens Point. Sikich also played spectacularly on the defensive end limiting the two opponents to only 44 shots combined. "He played very well defensively and was able to create offense from his defensive position," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman. He is fourth on the team in scoring with nine goals and 22 points.

Forward Jared Sailer (So., Fernie, B.C.) was the lone source of offense for the Falcons on Saturday night against St. Norbert. He scored both of the team's goals in a 3-2 loss to St. Norbert. His second goal came with the Falcons on the power play. The forward has five goals and two assists this year for the Falcons and is turning into one of the most explosive players on the team. "He has picked up his game in the second half of the year," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman. "He is playing more intense and is going to the net harder."

Forward Garrett Larson (Sr., Park River, N.D.), who transferred from St. Cloud State in the beginning of the year, has immediately made an impact on the team and become a leader. On the season Larson has 14 goals and eight assists to lead the team with 22 points. Larson showed his ability to take over a game last weekend against Stout with five goals in two games. In the finale on Saturday night, a 4-1 Falcon win, Larson posted the Falcons first hat trick of the year. "He's one of those guys who just finishes plays," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman.

Falcons in many ways since he transferred from St. Cloud State, but at no time has he helped more than this weekend at Augsburg. The senior scored two goals in the final eight minutes of regulation to help the Falcons secure a tie, 3-3, and stay unbeaten this year. Larson also played a physical game against Concordia-Moorhead in the team's 6-2 win. "He went out this weekend, played hard, and took advantage of his opportunities," said Falcon Coach Steve Freeman.

The Falcons got off to a bad start in the game by immediately getting themselves in the penalty box. Superior was able to capitalize and took a 1-0 lead early in the first. The Falcons responded though, getting a goal from senior Marc-Andre Lalande with one second left on a 5-on-3 power play. Freshman Matt Jackson got the assist on the goal. The Falcons looked to be in good shape late in the period when the Yellowjackets gave them another power-play opportunity, but Superior scored a short-handed goal to take a 2-1 lead at the end of one.

Junior goalie Andy Scanlon had 28 saves for the Falcons, but gave up six goals for the second game in a row. The Falcons out shot the Yellowjackets 39-34, but lost the special teams battle giving up three goals on just seven attempts as well as a short-handed goal.

The Falcons lose six seniors, but will return three of the top five scorers and both of their goalies. Scoring leader Garrett Larson will be lost, as well Lalande, the team's top defensemen, and Moe, the team captain.

The Blue Devils dominated the first period of the game, taking a 2-0 lead into the first intermission. The second period was a different story however, with the Falcons netting three goals. Freshman Tyler Dahl got the scoring started for the Falcons with a goal just two minutes into the period.

He was assisted by senior Garrett Larson. Sophomore Jared Sailer tied things up just one minute later with an unassisted goal. Then senior Steve Moe gave the Falcons the lead with seven minutes left in the period off a pass from freshman Matt Jackson. The third period unfortunately, was much like the first, with the Blue Devils scoring three straight goals to take a 5-3 lead. The Falcons got one back with a power-play goal by junior Aaron Degerness, but an empty-netter by the Blue Devils gave them the 6-4 victory. Junior goalie Andy Scanlon finished with just 23 saves.

The Falcons advanced to the semifinals of the NCHA Peters Cup playoffs and will travel to Superior on Friday for a one-game playoff with the Yellowjackets. The game will get underway at 7 p.m. Other first round winners were St. Norbert and Lake Forest. St. Norbert will host Lake Forest in the other semifinal.

The Falcons were lead by junior goaltender Andy Scanlon, who got his second shutout of the year, with 39 saves. Sophomore Joe Tiberio got the scoring started for the Falcons with a goal midway through the first period. He was assisted on the play by fellow sophomores Andy Jurek and Jared Sailer. Garrett Larson scored his twentieth goal of the season just 25 seconds later, unassisted. Senior Tony sikich scored a power-play goal for the Falcons with 10 seconds left in the second period to give the Falcons a 3-0 lead. He was assisted by frehmen Tyler Dahl and Jason Usher. Dahl added a goal of his own late in the third period, off an assist by freshman Joe Adams, to complete the 4-0 victory.

Arena. If the Falcons can get a win or a tie they will advance to the next round. If the Blue Devils win, the two teams will face off in a twenty minute mini-game immediatly following the first game to determine the series. The puck will drop at 7:05 p.m.

The Pointers scored just three minutes into the game and it looked like it was going to be a long night for the Falcons, but halfway through the period they had an offensive outburst. Harstad started it, scoring a goal off a pass from senior Steve Moe. A little over one minute later sophomore Aaron Venasky put the Falcons in the lead with a goal off assists from senior Marc-Andre Lalande and junior Jared Sailer.

The dam burst in the third period, with the Falcons scoring three goals and breaking the game open. Harstad opened up the scoring again with a goal exactly one minute into the period. He was assisted on the goal by Dahl. Dahl put the game away with four minues left in the game scoring wo power-play goals in 30 seconds. He was assisted on the first goal by senior Tony Sikich and freshman Jason Usher. Sikich and junior Aaron Degerness assisted on the second goal.

Junior goalie Andy Scanlon had 19 saves in the win for the Falcons, who clinched a home playoff series tonight and can clinch third place in the NCHA with a win/tie tommorow against Eau Claire or a loss/tie for Lake Forest either tonight or tommorow. The regular season finale tommorow night against Eau Claire will begin at 7:05.

Matt Jackson late in the first period. He was assisted on the goal by fellow freshman Wade Harstad and senior Tony Sikich. The Foresters struck back early in the second period, but freshman Tyler Dahl put the Falcons back in the lead just 30 seconds later. Senior Garrett Larson and junior Aaron Degerness got the assists on the goal. Unfortunatley this was all the offense the Falcons would get. Lake Forest tied it later in the second and took the lead in the opening minute of the third to get the 3-2 victory.

The Falcons wrap up the regular season at home next weekend with games against Stevens Point and Eau Claire. On Friday night the Pointers will be at Hunt Arena and on Saturday night it will be the Blugolds. Both games get underway at 7:05 p.m.

The two teams played to a stalemate in the first period, but a barrage of penalties by the Falcons lead to three Norbert goals in the first half of the second period. The Knights tacked on one more in the second period and another in the third to complete the 5-0 victory.

After a scoreless first period the Falcons scored both of their goals in the second. Steve Moe got the first at 1:37 with an assist to Jason Usher. It was Moe's third goal of the year. At 3:52 the Falcons got an insurance goal when Matt Jackson scored a power-play goal with assists to Tony Sikich and Josh Hansen. It was Jackson's eighth goal of the season and third power-play goal of the year.

The Falcons struck midway through the first period with a goal from freshman Josh Hansen. Freshman Tyler Dahl and senior Garrett Larson assisted him on the goal. The rest of the game the Falcons kept firing the shots at Saints goalie Tyler Johnson, but he stopped everything they gave him. Late in the third period the emotions erupted on both sides with five players getting major penalties. The Falcons took advantage of the opportunity and Dahl put one Johnson with five seconds left for the 2-0 victory. Freshman Matt Jackson and Wade Harstad had the assists on the play.

CSS opened the scoring when Jason Murray scored at 10:46 of the first period. But the Falcons came back just one minute later when Garrett Larson scored with an assist to Tyler Dahl. It was Larson's team leading 18th goal of the season. CSS took a 2-1 lead with the only second period goal that came at 14:20. Curtis Markewich scored the power-play goal. The Falcons tied the game early in the third. Jason Usher scored his third goal of the season just 25 seconds into the period. He was assisted by Matt Jackson and Marc-Andre Lalande. The Falcons took the lead for good at 6:05 when Wade Harstad scored an unassisted goal - it was his second goal of the season. The Falcons put the game out of reach when Tony Sikich scored with assists to Murphy Dwyer and Lalande. It was Sickich's seventh tally of the season.

Garrett Larson. Larson has 15 goals on the year, which matches the total that the top Falcon player had at the end of last year. Junior goalie Dan Meneghin had 35 saves and improved his record to 6-1-0 on the year.

Freshman Tyler Dahl got the Falcons out to an early lead with a power-play goal at 17:45 of the first period, off assists by senior Marc-Andre LaLande and freshman Jason Usher. Larson added his first goal of the night 7:12 into the second period. LaLande assisted him on the power-play goal. Five minutes later Larson put home another goal, with Dahl and junior Aaron Degerness on the assists. Stout got on the board :17 into the third period on a power play goal, but it was to little too late. Larson lit the lamp with four minutes remaining in the game to complete the hat trick. Degerness and Dahl got the assists.

Tiberio got the scoring started at 3:09 of the first period with his first of two goals. He was assisted on the play by senior Marc-Andre LaLande and freshman Wade Harstad. Junior Murphy Dwyer added an unassisted goal at 7:46. The Blue Devils got their only goal of the night on a power-play goal halfway through the second period. The Falcons quickly answered back with a power-play goal at 13:47 by Larson. He was assisted by freshman Tyler Dahl and junior Aaron Degerness. The Falcons added two goals late in the third period to put the game out of reach. Tiberio scored a power-play goal at 13:11, with LaLande and Harstad on the assists. Larson added his second goal at 14:41, with LaLande and Dwyer on the assists.

The Falcon men's hockey team suffered their first loss of the conference season on Saturday night in Stevens Point. The Falcons fell to the Pointers 7-4 in the second game of a tough road trip. On a positive note the Falcons got two goals from sophomore Jared Sailer, and one goal and one assist from both senior Garrett Larson and junior Aaron Degerness. Junior goalies Andy Scanlon and Dan Meneghin combined for 18 saves for the Falcons.

After falling behind early, Larson tied the game up with a power-play goal at 11:28 of the first period, off assists by Degerness and senior Josh Schlipp. The Pointers tacked on another power-play goal just before the end of the period. Sailer tied the game up with a power-play goal 10:08 into the second period. He was assisted on the goal by senior Tony Sikich. The Pointers ended the period on a positive note, scoring two goals in the last eight minutes to take a 4-2 lead. The Falcons roared back in the third period to tie it up when Degerness scored a short-handed goal 2:17 into the period and Sailer scored a power-play goal at the 7:15 mark. Larson and junior Murphy Dwyer assisted on the first goal and Sikich on the second. Unfortunately, the Falcons were unable to hold the lead and the Pointers went ahead for good with ten minutes to go. The Falcons gave up two empty-net goals trying to tie up the game.

Blugold goals in the first five minutes of the game. Jackson got the comeback started 10:46 into the first period with a power-play goal. Freshman Brent Cooper and senior Tony Sikich assisted him on the goal. Jackson struck again late in the second period off assists by Cooper and senior Josh Schlipp. The Falcons took the lead for the first time just two minutes into the third period on a power-play goal by Larson. He was assisted by freshmen Tyler Dahl and Jason Usher. Senior Aaron Degerness scored another goal off assists by Larson and Dahl at the 5:35 mark in the third.

The Pipers finally got on the board with a power-play goal at 18:17 in the first period by Lubos Taragel. Larson added a goal of his own 5:54 into the second period, with Degerness and Dahl on the assists. Freshman Wade Harstad added to the lead with a short-handed goal exactly halfway through the second period. He was assisted on the play by senior Marc-Andre Lalande. Jackson opened up the third period with his second goal of the night at 11:08, with Lalande on the assist once again. Ryan Manke scored a power-play goal for the Pipers with 28 seconds left in the game to wrap up the scoring.

The Falcon hockey team's unbeaten streak came to an end on Friday night with a 2-1 loss at the hands of the Bethel Royals. Despite outshooting the Royals 32-18, the Falcons were unable to get the puck past Bethel goalie Dustin Thompson.The only goal the Falcons were able to get was off a turnover by the Royals, which senior Josh Schlipp put away. Junior goalie Andy Scanlon had a good night for the Falcons with 16 saves. The Falcons had just one penalty, but it came with two minutes left in the game and ended any chance of a comeback.

Bethel's Matt Tramm started the scoring at 6:32 of the first period by slipping a wrist shot past Scanlon. Schlipp responded for the Falcons at 5:25 of the second period. Freshman Matt Jackson and senior Tony Sikich assisted him on the goal. The game looked like it would go into the third period tied, but the Royals went ahead on a goal by Josiah Matuszewski at the 18:29 mark. The Falcons controlled the third period, but were unable to slip anything past Thompson, who ended up with 31 saves for the Royals.

Larson got the scoring started four minutes into the game with a goal St. Mary's goalie Ryne Ess. He was assisted on the play by Tyler Dahl and Andy Jurek. Andy Degerness scored the Falcons second goal later in the period, with an assist on the play by Larson. St. Mary's was able to get a goal early in the third period, but failed to score again.

The Falcons improved their record to 4-0-2 and will continue non-conference play with two home games. They will play Bethel College on Friday and Hamline on Saturday. Both matches will start at 7 p.m.

In the battle between the #3 and #4 teams in the country, little was settled. In a back and forth match-up the Falcons fought the Tommies of St. Thomas to a 3-3 tie. Senior transfer Garrett Larson continued his solid play scoring two goals and just missing on a third opportunity that could have sealed the win for the Falcons. Junior goalie Andy Scanlon had 39 saves for the Falcons.

Freshman Tyler Dahl started the scoring early with a goal off a Tommies turnover in the first minute of the game. Larson scored three minutes into the second period to give the Falcons a 2-0 lead, but St. Thomas scored a power-play goal just before the end of the period. St. Thomas scored another goal three minutes into the third period to tie the game up at two. Larson changed that just one minute later when he scored his second goal of the game, this time on the power-play. Unfortunately, the Falcons were unable to hold the lead and the Tommies tied it up once again with five minutes left. The Falcons had two power-play opportunities after that, one in regulation and one in the overtime, but were unable to get anything going.

Junior Vince Pulera got the scoring started with a goal just two minutes into the game. Freshman Brent Cooper assisted him on the play. Cooper followed with a power-play goal of his own, getting assists from freshman Jim Henkemeyer and senior Tony Sikich. The Cobbers finally got on the board with less than a minute left in the period, with a power-play goal by Matt Hansen.

The Falcons got off to a quick start in the second period, with a goal by freshman Matt Jackson forty seconds into the period. Senior Josh Schlipp and junior Murphy Dwyer got the assists on the play. Then the Falcons got a power-play goal from Sikich, with Schlipp and Dwyer on the assists once again. The Cobbers ended the period with an unassisted goal by Jordan Mackner.

The Falcon men's hockey team rallied from a 3-1 deficit with eight minutes left in the third against Augsburg College to get a 3-3 tie. The Falcons got all three goals from newcomers and cut down the amount of penalties to just seven, after having well over a dozen in the first two games.

Jason Fleck and Greg May scored goals in the second period to get Augsburg out to a 2-0 lead, but Freshman Tyler Dahl responded for the Falcons with a goal late in the period. Senior Marc-Andre Lalande and freshman Jason Usher assisted him on the play. The Auggies opened up the third period with a power-play goal by Critter Nagurski. Senior transfer Garrett Larson led the Falcon comeback with two goals, including a power-play goal with under two minutes left, to tie the game up at three. He was assisted on the goals by senior Tony Sikich and Lalande, respectively. The Auggies got a power-play chance in overtime, but they were unable to convert and the game ended in a tie.

Senior Aaron Degerness made it 4-0 with a power play goal midway through the period. He was assisted by senior Garrett Larson and freshman Tyler Dahl. The Blugolds finally broke into the scoring column with a late power-play goal by Rob Ouimette.

In the third period the Falcons scored two more power-play goals. The first was by Degerness, with the assists going to Larson and Usher. The second was by Schlipp, with the assists going to freshmen Murphy Dwyer and Brent Cooper.

The Falcon men's hockey team opened up their season on Tuesday night with a 7-0 win against MSOE. The Falcons dominated the game, scoring three goals in both the second and third period. Goalie Dan Meneghin got the start, and came through with a shutout and 40 saves. UW-RF also showed some its depth, getting seven goals from seven different players. The Falcons scored four goals on the power play and one short- handed.

Steve Moe and Tony Sikich will anchor the offensive attack, along with junior Aaron Degerness, the top returning scorer from last year. They will get some help from newcomers Garrett Larson, a transfer from St.

The Green Knights were picked by the league coaches to win the 2005 NCHA regular season title in the annual Coaches Poll. Superior and Lake Forest are also expected to be in the conference title hunt. The Falcons will also compete with Superior for the top spot in the WIAC.

Marc-Andre Lalande is the only returning player for the Falcons who was named to the All-NCHA first team in 2004. Known as a complete player, he is the lone senior on the blue line and will be the leader of the Falcons young defense. Lalande also gets a fair amount of opportunities on the offensive end, scoring eight goals and dishing out 18 assists in his three-year career.

Lalande grew up in Deux-Montagnes, Que., and started playing hockey at a young age. Lalande played junior AAA hockey in Quebec and played for Cedar Rapids of the USHL. Lalande says the biggest thrill in his hockey career was when he was with St. Jerome of the LHJAAAQ, and that team made it all the way to the playoff finals. He also played baseball when he was young, but in Quebec everything revolved around hockey, and consequently other opportunities were limited.

One of his main motivators growing up was his father, Jacques. He always helped Lalande be a better hockey player. Lalande also says he is motivated by Falcon Coach Steve Freeman and his incredible will to win.

The Falcons will be in the hunt for the NCHA title, but St. Norbert is the clear favorite in the conference and in Div. III overall. Lalande believes that the younger Falcon team may have a better chance against the powerful Green Knights because it has not seen them yet. The intimidation factor will not be as high, and the Falcons can just go out and play hockey.

Schlipp hopes to grow into a leadership role with Falcons and help the younger players on the team adapt to the college game. He is a guy that had considerable success as a younger player and he hopes that he can help the new guys enjoy that same success.

He is a very talkative and hopes some of the leadership skills he has learned in hockey will help him in his career. Schlipp is a political science major and he hopes to get involved in a non-profit organization for environmental protection when he graduates. He enjoys hunting, fishing and camping, and is actively involved in the Sierra Club.

During the off season, in addition to being an avid outdoorsman, Schlipp enjoys backpacking, surfing and downhill skiing.Over the past two summers, Schlipp has lived in San Francisco, and worked for an organization called Environment California.

Schlipp's main influence growing up was his grandfather, Chuck, who passed away two years ago. He writes his grandfather's initials on the end of all his sticks in his honor. Schlipp also credits both Freeman and assistant Coach Bob Ritzer with helping him advance his hockey career.

"Coach Freeman is the hardest working coach I have ever played for and is the most dedicated person on this team," said Schlipp. "He's an extremely fair guy. If you show him that you can do it, he will let you play. He has always had confidence in me and in all the guys."

Schlipp believes that this team has a great chance to win a NCHA crown and eventually, a national championship. He doesn't care about individual statistics. He cares about one thing, helping the team win games. He believes that a lot of the success of the Falcons has to do with the program.

Last year for the Huskies, Larson scored nine goals and dished out four assists. He was also named the Most Improved Player on the team in 2002 and 2003. He came to UW-RF to hopefully gain some more playing time and to experience a new atmosphere. He hopes to bring the Falcons some offensive firepower along with line mates, Aaron Degerness and Tyler Dahl.

Larson grew up in Park River, N.D., a town of about 1,800 people, where his main hockey influence was his Dad. He was a coach on all of Larson's teams all the way up until high school. Larson says that whenever he feels like he is not playing up to his potential, he imagines his Dad yelling at him at a practice, and uses it as inspiration.

When Larson graduates he hopes to continue playing hockey at the professional level, either in the NHL or in Europe. He wants to travel the world and hockey might be his best opportunity to do so. After his hockey career, he doesn't know what he wants to do, but he hopes to do something in mass communication.

There are some minor differences in the style of play that Larson will have to adapt. At St. Cloud, the Huskies played on an Olympic-sized rink, while at UW-RF, the Falcons compete on a NHL-sized rink. The Div. III game is more physical, due to the smaller rink, while the Div. I game is faster paced, with less hitting. Larson says that the main difference between the two is that the positioning is not quite as good at the Div.

Larson hopes to lead the Falcons to a national championship and believes that they have the personal to accomplish that goal. He especially likes how well the team gels together and the tremendous fan support the team gets.

As far as personal goals for the season, Larson just hopes to stay healthy and play up to his potential. He wants to always be improving his game and hopefully provide some leadership on this young Falcon team. As a player who has been in big games he has a lot of knowledge that will be useful to the younger players.

Larson. "A lot of these guys have been playing junior hockey for a couple years and are not used to going to school. During the games you need to tell them to calm down and remind them that it is a simpler game than they make it out to be."

Larson likes to be the last one to step onto the ice, to make sure that he is mentally prepared to play the game. That is just one of the many qualities he possesses that makes him a welcome addition to this Falcon team.

The 5- 11, 190-pounder is known as a quality puck handler and an excellent skater. He is also proving himself on special teams this year, scoring two goals and two assists on the power-play. Sikich has also been able to help the team with his versatility and unselfishness by moving from forward to defense last year.

Sikich burst on to the scene in 2003, scoring seven goals and dishing out nine assists, despite appearing in just 20 games. In 2004, after moving to defense, he increased his totals to eight goals and 13 assists. He even earned NCHA Player of the Week honors after a four point effort against St. Norbert. He was also named the team's Player of the Week award after scoring two goals against UW-Eau Claire. He returned this year as the second leading scorer from last year and also as one of the four senior leaders on the team. Sikich, and fellow senior Marc-Andre Lalande, lead a talented and experienced defense.

Sikich's goal for the team this year is the same as everyone else on the team; to make the NCAA playoffs and hopefully win a championship. He believes the Falcons have what it takes, especially with the addition of so many college freshmen. He knows that the incoming freshman are older and already have a year or two of junior hockey under their belt.

He also thinks that Freeman and his intense attitude toward the game will help the Falcons reach their goals. Sikich says that Freeman, besides knowing a lot about hockey, is always fired up to come to the arena. That attitude rubs off on the players in a positive way.

On a personal level, Sikich hopes to continue to work on the finer points of playing defense, especially his positioning. He doesn't really mind the new strict enforcement of the rules, which is causing a slew of penalties, but does admit that it is slowing down the game. He thinks eventually teams will adjust and the flow of the game will pick back up. The change to defense has been good for Sikich and he says that he enjoys his new position.

Sikich, who is an accounting major, was named to the NCHA All-Academic team in 2004, and he continues to be an excellent student in the class room. During the summer he enjoys playing all kinds of sports, especially golf and softball.

He need to find a way to concentrate on the game. Meneghin also says that if you let it in a bad goal or have a bad game you need to be able to forget about and not let it bother you. He admitted that his puck handling is the part of his game that needs the most work.

Meneghin grew up near Vancouver in Surrey, BC., where he began playing hockey at a very young age. His hockey idol was fellow Canadian Patrick Roy. He started out playing goalie about half the time, but by the time he was 12 he moved to the position full time.

Meneghin believes the team has what it takes to win it all due to the immense amount of talent that they have and the closeness that the team demonstrates on and off the ice. The one weakness they have, according to Meneghin, is that the team plays inconsistently at times. He especially likes the defense that he has in front of him this year. He likes that teammates are getting down and blocking shots and doing a good job of clearing out the front of the net.

Meneghin hopes to continue playing hockey after college if opportunities are available, but otherwise he plans to start a career. He is an accounting major and is a very good student. During his free time Meneghin enjoys playing sports, watching movies and just hanging out with friends.

Nate Hansen may not be the biggest defenseman in the NCHA, but he may be one of the toughest. Hansen got the biggest ovation of the night a few weeks ago when he slammed a UW-Stout player into the boards right in front of the student section at Hunt Arena. As the 180-pound defenseman skated to the penalty box it was clear there was no mention of his size.

Hansen says that his parents influenced him a lot growing up. They did everything they could to help him in his hockey career, including getting up at 6 a.m. to take him to practice. He played his high school hockey in Austin, Minn., where he was an all-conference and all-state honorable mention selection. He once scored six goals in a game for the Packers.

After high school Hansen moved on to play junior hockey in Des Moines of the USHL. UW-RF was one of the first schools that contacted him after juniors and he had heard they had a good program, so he decided to play for the Falcons.

Scholastic Honor Roll. In 2004, he continued his consistent contribution with two goals and six assists. So far this year Hansen has played in every game and has one goal. But he is making his presence felt in the defensive end.

